










 




Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version

















SEC Info - Wachovia Asset Securitization Issuance LLC - ‘S-3/A’ on 10/31/03 - EX-3.(II)










SEC Info uses JavaScript!  To view pages properly, enable JavaScript in your browser.


    SEC Info      Home      Search      My Interests      Help      Sign In      Please Sign In




Wachovia Asset Securitization Issuance LLC – ‘S-3/A’ on 10/31/03 – EX-3.(II)On:  Friday, 10/31/03, at 4:34pm ET   ·   Accession #:  1068238-3-506   ·   File #:  333-109298
Previous ‘S-3’:  ‘S-3’ on 9/30/03   ·   Latest ‘S-3’:  This Filing



  in 
this entire Filing.
an "Entity" Search.
  Show 
Docs searched
 and 
every "hit".
the 1st "hit".

Help... Wildcards:  ? (any letter),  * (many).  Logic:  for Docs:  & (and),  | (or);  for Text:  | (anywhere),  "(&)" (near).    ↓Bottom
 
T-->  As Of                Filer                Filing    For·On·As Docs:Size              Issuer               Agent

10/31/03  Wachovia Asset Securitizatio..LLC S-3/A                 14:2.2M                                   Orrick Herringto..LLP/FAF-->Pre-Effective Amendment to Registration Statement for Securities Offered Pursuant to a Transaction   —   Form S-3Filing Table of Contents
Document/Exhibit                   Description                      Pages   Size 

 1: S-3/A       Pre-Effective Amendment to Registration Statement    295   1.60M 
                          for Securities Offered Pursuant to a                   
                          Transaction                                            
 2: EX-1        Underwriting Agreement                                19     86K 
 3: EX-3.(I)    Articles of Incorporation/Organization or By-Laws      2     12K 
 4: EX-3.(II)   Articles of Incorporation/Organization or By-Laws     14     60K 
 5: EX-4        Instrument Defining the Rights of Security Holders   106    424K 
 6: EX-4        Instrument Defining the Rights of Security Holders   106    476K 
 7: EX-4        Instrument Defining the Rights of Security Holders    37    121K 
 8: EX-4        Instrument Defining the Rights of Security Holders    78    285K 
 9: EX-4        Instrument Defining the Rights of Security Holders    49    212K 
10: EX-5        Opinion re: Legality                                   2     15K 
11: EX-5        Opinion re: Legality                                   2     11K 
12: EX-8        Opinion re: Tax Matters                                2     13K 
13: EX-8        Opinion re: Tax Matters                                1     10K 
14: EX-24       Power of Attorney                                      1     10K 

D-->EX-3.(II)   —   Articles of Incorporation/Organization or By-LawsExhibit Table of Contents
Page (sequential) | (alphabetic) Top A-->
Alternative Formats (Word, et al.)
Managers
Operating Agreement
S-->
11st Page   -   Filing Submission
"Operating Agreement
11Managers
P-->EX-3.(II)1st Page of 14TOC↑TopPreviousNext↓BottomJust 1st 
 OPERATING AGREEMENT
OF
 WACHOVIA ASSET SECURITIZATION ISSUANCE, LLC

         THIS  OPERATING  AGREEMENT  is made and executed as of the _____ day of
October 2003 by Wachovia  Bank,  National  Association  (the  "Member")  and the
Managers (as defined  below).  Robert J. Hahn as the sole  organizer of Wachovia
Asset  Securitization  Issuance,  LLC (the  "Company")  hereby  consents  to the
execution of this  Operating  Agreement  by the  Managers and by Wachovia  Bank,
National  Association as the sole Member of the Company.  Solely for federal and
state tax purposes and pursuant to Treasury  Regulations  Section 301.7701,  the
Member and the Company intend the Company to be disregarded as an entity that is
separate from the Member. For all other purposes (including, without limitation,
limited liability protection for the Member from Company liabilities),  however,
the Member and the  Company  intend the  Company to be  respected  as a separate
legal entity that is separate and apart from the Member.                        

 ARTICLE 1
 DEFINITIONS

         The following  terms used in this  Operating  Agreement  shall have the
following meanings:                                                             

         "Act" shall mean the North Carolina Limited  Liability  Company Act, as
amended from time to time.                                                      

         "Articles  of  Organization"  shall mean the  Articles of  Organization
including  Articles of  Conversion of the Company as filed with the Secretary of
State of North Carolina, as amended from time to time.                          

         "Capital  Contribution"  shall mean any  contribution to the capital of
the Company in cash or property by the Member whenever made.                    

         "Cash Flow" shall mean the gross cash  proceeds  from the  operation of
the Company's  business less the portion thereof used to establish  Reserves for
or to pay Company expenses, debt payments and capital expenditures.  "Cash Flow"
shall  include any net cash  proceeds  from the sale or  disposition  of Company
property and from the  refinancing  of  indebtedness  of the  Company,  shall be
increased by any reduction of Reserves previously established by the Member, and
shall not be reduced by  depreciation,  cost recovery,  amortization  or similar
non-cash deductions.                                                            

       "Company" shall refer to Wachovia Asset Securitization Issuance, LLC.

         "Entity"  shall  mean any  general  partnership,  limited  partnership,
limited liability  partnership,  limited liability company,  corporation,  joint
venture, trust, business trust, cooperative, association, foreign trust, foreign
business organization or other business entity.                                 

         "Fiscal  Year" shall mean the period  terminating  on December  31st of
each year during the term hereof or on such  earlier  date on which the Member's
taxable year ends.                                                              

         "Independent  Manager"  shall  mean a Person  who (1) is not an  owner,
stockholder,  director,  officer,  employee or associate, or any relative of the
foregoing,  of any Member or Member's affiliate (other than the Company), all as
provided in its  organizational  documents,  (2) has (i) prior  experience as an
independent manager or independent director for a limited liability company or a
corporation, respectively, whose organizational documents required the unanimous
consent of all independent                                                      

1 

P-->EX-3.(II)2nd Page of 14TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 2nd
managers or independent directors, as the case may be, before such company could
consent to the institution of bankruptcy or insolvency proceedings against it or
could file a petition  seeking relief under any applicable  federal or state law
relating to bankruptcy  and (ii) at least three years of  employment  experience
with  one or more  entities  that  provide,  in the  ordinary  course  of  their
respective  business,  advisory,  management or placement services to issuers of
securitization or structured finance instruments, agreements or securities.     

         "Initial Capital  Contribution" shall mean the initial  contribution to
the  capital  of the  Company  pursuant  to  Paragraph  6.01 of  this  Operating
Agreement.                                                                      

         "Majority of Managers"  means a combination  of Managers,  including at
least one (1) Independent Manager, constituting more than fifty percent (50%) of
the number of Managers then elected and qualified.                              

         "Manager" means each Person executing this Agreement as a Manager,  any
other Person that  succeeds  such Manager or any other Person  elected to act as
Manager of the Company as provided in this Agreement.  "Managers" refers to such
Persons as a group                                                              

         "Member"  shall  mean the Person  who  executed a counter  part of this
Operating Agreement as a Member and any Person who may hereafter become a member
of the Company.                                                                 

         "Net  Profits"  and "Net  Losses"  shall mean the income,  gain,  loss,
deductions and credits of the Company in the aggregate or separately  stated, as
appropriate, as of the close of each Fiscal Year.                               

         "Operating Agreement" shall mean this Operating Agreement as originally
executed and as amended from time to time.                                      

         "Person" shall mean any individual or Entity, and the heirs, executors,
administrators, legal representatives,  successors and assigns of such "Person,"
where the context so permits.                                                   

         "Representative"  shall  mean  the  legally  appointed  guardian  of  a
mentally  incapacitated  Member,  the  conservator  of a mentally  incapacitated
Member's  assets or the legally  appointed  and  qualified  executor or personal
representative  of the  estate  of a  deceased  Member.  In the  event  no  such
guardian,   executor  or  personal   representative   is  appointed,   then  the
Representative  shall mean the spouse of such  incapacitated or deceased Member,
or if such  Member does not have a spouse or the spouse is not then living or is
unable or unwilling to act, such Member's then living lineal descendants who are
willing and capable of acting,  one at a time in descending  order of age but in
no event  younger than 21 years of age or, if none,  such  Member's  then-living
lineal  ancestors  who are willing  and capable of acting,  one at a time and in
ascending order of age.                                                         

         "Reserves" shall mean funds set aside or amounts  allocated to reserves
which shall be maintained in amounts deemed sufficient by the Member for working
capital  and to pay taxes,  insurance,  debt  service or other costs or expenses
incident to the ownership or operation of the Company's business.               

 ARTICLE 2
FORMATION OF COMPANY

          Paragraph  2.01  Formation.  The Company has been organized as a North
Carolina  limited  liability  company by executing  and  delivering  Articles of
Organization  to the North  Carolina  Secretary of State in accordance  with and
pursuant to the Act.                                                            

2 

P-->EX-3.(II)3rd Page of 14TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 3rd
          Paragraph  2.02  Name.  The name of the  Company  is  "Wachovia  Asset
Securitization Issuance, LLC."                                                  

          Paragraph  2.03 Term.  There shall be no limit on the  duration of the
Company, which shall continue in existence until dissolved and its affairs wound
up in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement and the Act.             

          Paragraph 2.04 Nature of Member's  Interest.  The interest of the sole
Member in the Company shall be personal  property for all purposes.  Legal title
to all Company assets shall be held in the name of the Company.                 

 ARTICLE 3
 BUSINESS OF COMPANY

          Paragraph 3.01 Purpose.  The Company has been formed for the following
limited purposes:                                                               

          (a) To acquire, own, hold, service,  sell, transfer,  assign,  pledge,
finance,  refinance, and otherwise deal with and in: (i) loans, installment sale
agreements,  credit agreements or similar  instruments or agreements  secured by
mortgages,  deeds of trust or similar instruments creating first or junior liens
on, or security  interests in, fee leasehold or other  interests in  residential
real  property,  whether or not  completed  or  performing  or shares  issued by
corporations or partnerships formed for the purpose of cooperative  ownership of
any  such  real   property,   together  with  all  related   personal   property
(collectively, "Mortgage Loans"); (ii) certificates,  participation interests or
other  instruments  (including  Notes and  Certificates,  as defined below) that
evidence  interests  in,  or that  are  secured  by,  Mortgage  Loans,  Notes or
Certificates  (collectively,  "MBS");  and  (iii)  any  property  or  rights  in
property,  or  agreements  or rights in  agreements,  pertaining  to or securing
Mortgage Loans or MBS  (collectively,  together with the Mortgage Loans and MBS,
"Mortgage Assets");                                                             

          (b)  To  authorize,  offer,  issue,  sell,  transfer  or  deliver,  or
participate in the authorization, offering, issuance, sale, transfer or delivery
of,  participation  certificates  or other evidence of interests in, among other
assets, Mortgage Assets ("Certificates");                                       

          (c) To authorize,  offer,  issue,  sell,  transfer or deliver,  bonds,
notes or other evidence of indebtedness  secured by Mortgage  Assets  ("Notes"),
provided,  however, that the company shall have no liability on any Notes except
to the extent of the  Mortgage  Assets  securing  such  Notes and any  customary
indemnification and repurchase obligations;                                     

          (d) To hold,  and enjoy all of the rights and  privileges  as a holder
of, any of the Notes or Certificates;                                           

          (e) To negotiate,  authorize,  execute, deliver, assume the obligation
under,  and perform,  any agreement or  instrument  or document  relating to the
activities  set forth in paragraphs  (a) through (d) above,  including,  but not
limited to, any trust  agreement,  sales and  servicing  agreement,  pooling and
servicing  agreement,   indenture,   reimbursement  agreement,   credit  support
agreement,   mortgage  loan  purchase  agreement,   indemnification   agreement,
placement agreement or underwriting agreement; and                              

          (f) To engage in any activity and to exercise any powers  permitted to
limited  liability  companies under the laws of the State of North Carolina that
are related or incidental to the foregoing and necessary, suitable or convenient
to accomplish the foregoing.                                                    

3 

P-->EX-3.(II)4th Page of 14TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 4th
 ARTICLE 4
 MANAGEMENT OF THE COMPANY

          Paragraph  4.01  Management  of Company.  Except as  otherwise  may be
expressly  provided in this Agreement,  the Articles of Organization or the Act,
all decisions  with respect to the management of the business and affairs of the
Company shall be made by action of a Majority of the Managers taken at a meeting
or  evidenced  by a written  consent  executed  by a Majority  of the  Managers.
Meetings of the  Managers may be held on such terms and after such notice as the
Managers may  establish.  The Managers  shall have full and complete  authority,
power and discretion to manage and control the business of the Company,  to make
all  decisions  regarding  those  matters  and to perform any and all other acts
customary or incident to the management of the Company's  business,  except only
as to those acts as to which  approval by the Members is  expressly  required by
the Articles of Organization,  this Agreement,  the Act or other applicable law.
The Managers may delegate  responsibility  for the day-to-day  management of the
Company to any individual  Manager or Person  retained by the Managers who shall
have and  exercise on behalf of the Company all powers and rights  necessary  or
convenient to carry out such management responsibilities.                       

          Paragraph 4.02 Limitations on Power and Authority of Managers. Without
the consent of the Member, the Managers shall have no authority to do any of the
following:                                                                      

(a) Any act in contravention of this Agreement;             

          (b) Any act which would make it  impossible  to carry on the  ordinary
business of the Company; or                                                     

          (c) Possess  Property of the Company or assign the Company's rights in
specific Property for other than Company purposes.                              

          Paragraph 4.03  Execution of Documents.  Any document or instrument of
any and every nature,  including without  limitation,  any agreement,  contract,
deed, promissory note, mortgage or deed of trust, security agreement,  financing
statement,  pledge, assignment, bill of sale and certificate,  which is intended
to bind the Company or convey or encumber title to its real or personal property
shall be valid and binding for all purposes only if executed by a Manager.      

          Paragraph 4.04 Action Without Meeting. Any action required to be taken
by or on behalf of the  Company  may be taken  without a meeting if a consent in
writing, setting forth the action so taken, shall be signed by the Managers.    

          Paragraph  4.05   Indemnification  of  Managers.   The  Company  shall
indemnify the Managers to the fullest  extent  permitted or required by the Act,
as amended from time to time, and the Company may advance expenses incurred by a
Manager  upon the  approval  of the  remaining  Managers  and the receipt by the
Company of the signed  statement  of such  Manager  agreeing  to  reimburse  the
Company  for such  advance in the event it is  ultimately  determined  that such
Manager is not entitled to be indemnified by the Company  against such expenses.
The  provisions  of this Section 4.05 shall apply also to any Person to whom the
Managers  have  delegated  management  authority  as provided  in Section  4.01,
whether or not such Person is a Manager or Member.                              

          Paragraph  4.06  Compensation  and  Expenses.  The Managers  shall not
receive any  compensation  from the Company  for  serving as  Managers,  but the
Company  will  reimburse  Managers  for  expenses  incurred  by the  Managers in
connection with their service to the Company.                                   

4 

P-->EX-3.(II)5th Page of 14TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 5th
          Paragraph  4.07  Limitation  on  Liability.  No Manager of the Company
shall be liable to the  Company for  monetary  damages for an act or omission in
such Person's capacity as a Manager,  except as provided in the Act for (i) acts
or  omissions  which a Manager  knew at the time of the acts or  omissions  were
clearly in conflict with the interests of the Company; (ii) any transaction from
which a Manager derived an improper personal benefit; or (iii) acts or omissions
occurring  prior to the date this  provision  becomes  effective.  If the Act is
amended to authorize  further  elimination of or limitations on the liability of
Managers,  then the liability of the Managers  shall be eliminated or limited to
the  fullest  extent  permitted  by  the  Act  as  so  amended.  Any  repeal  or
modification of this Section shall not adversely  affect the right or protection
of a Manager existing at the time of such repeal or modification. The provisions
of this Section  4.07 shall apply also to any Person to whom the  Managers  have
delegated  management authority as provided in Section 4.01, whether or not such
Person is a Manager or Member.                                                  

          Paragraph 4.08 Officers.  The officers of the Company may consist of a
President,  several Vice Presidents,  a Treasurer,  a Secretary,  and such other
officers as the Managers may appoint  from time to time.  The officers  shall be
appointed by the Managers and shall exercise such powers and perform such duties
as are  prescribed  by the  Managers.  The same  person  may hold any  number of
offices, as the Managers may determine, except that no person may simultaneously
hold the offices of President and Secretary. The initial officers of the Company
are as set forth on Schedule I attached  hereto.  Paragraph 4.09 Term of Office.
The officers  shall hold office for the term for which they were  appointed  and
until their successors are elected and qualified;  provided,  however,  that any
officer may be removed at any time with or without cause by the Managers.       

Paragraph 4.10 Separate Entity.                             

          (a) The Company shall respect and appropriately  document the separate
and independent  nature of its  activities,  as compared with those of any other
Person,  take all reasonable  steps to continue its identity as a separate legal
entity,  and make it  apparent  to Persons  that the  Company is an entity  with
assets and liabilities distinct from those of any other Person.                 

          (b) The  Company  shall  pay the  salaries  of its own  employees  and
maintain a sufficient number of employees in light of its contemplated  business
operations.                                                                     

          (c) The  Company  shall  maintain  adequate  capital  in  light of its
contemplated business operations.                                               

          (d) The Company shall observe all customary  formalities regarding the
limited liability  company  existence of the Company,  including holding regular
meetings  of its  Managers  and its Members and  maintenance  of current  minute
books, shall be observed.                                                       

          (e) The Company  shall not acquire  obligations  or  securities of the
Members or any of the Members' affiliates.                                      

          Paragraph  4.11  Action  by  Members  and  Managers.   Notwithstanding
anything to the contrary herein:                                                

          (a) until one year and one day after all  amounts  due and owing under
indebtedness of the Company that is rated by any national recognized statistical
rating organization shall have been indefeasibly paid in full, the Company,  and
any  Member,  Manager  or other  Person on behalf of the  Company,  may take the
following  actions only with the unanimous  approval of the Managers  (including
the vote of the Independent Manager) and the Members:                           

5 

P-->EX-3.(II)6th Page of 14TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 6th
(1) make an assignment for the benefit of creditors;        

          (2) file a  voluntary  petition in  bankruptcy  or make or commence an
insolvency filing or proceeding or any similar filing or proceeding;            

          (3) file a petition or answer seeking any reorganization, arrangement,
composition, readjustment,  liquidation, dissolution or similar relief under any
statute, law or regulation;                                                     

          (4) file an answer or other  pleading  admitting or failing to contest
the  material  allegations  of a  petition  filed  against  the  Company  in any
proceeding  of the  type  described  in sub  clauses  (1)  through  (3) of  this
subsection (a);                                                                 

          (5) seek,  consent to, or acquiesce in the  appointment  of a trustee,
receiver or liquidator of the Company or of all or any  substantial  part of the
Company's properties;                                                           

(6) amend this Agreement;                                   

          (7) to the fullest extent permitted by law,  voluntarily  dissolve and
wind up, or consolidate or merger the Company or sell all of  substantially  all
of the assets of the Company;                                                   

          (8) admit in writing its inability to pay its debts  generally as they
become due or take any action in furtherance of the foregoing; or               

          (9) engage in any  business  activity not set forth in Section 3.01 of
this Agreement.                                                                 

     (b) To the fullest extent  permitted by law, the Independent  Manager shall
not be guilty of breaching any fiduciary duty to any other Manager or any Member
by refusing to consent to any of the above listed actions.                      

          Paragraph 4.12 No Management by Member.  The Member in its capacity as
Member shall not take part in the  management  or control of the  business,  nor
transact any business for the Company,  nor shall they have power to sign for or
to bind the Company.                                                            

 ARTICLE 5
 RIGHTS AND OBLIGATIONS OF MEMBERS

          Paragraph  5.01  Limitation  of  Liability.  The  Member  will  not be
personally  liable  for any  obligations,  liabilities,  debts or  losses of the
Company,  whether  arising in tort,  contract or otherwise,  except as otherwise
required by law.                                                                

          Paragraph 5.02 Right to  Indemnification.  Subject to the  limitations
and  conditions  provided  in  this  Article  5 and  in  the  Act,  each  Person
("Indemnified  Person") who was or is made a party or is threatened to be made a
party to or is involved in any threatened,  pending or completed action, suit or
proceeding,   whether   civil,   criminal,   administrative,    arbitrative   or
investigative ("Proceeding"),  or any appeal in such a Proceeding or any inquiry
or  investigation  that could lead to such a  Proceeding,  by reason of the fact
that he was or is a Member  or an  officer  of the  Company  or he was or is the
legal  representative of or a manager,  director,  officer,  partner,  venturer,
proprietor, trustee, employee, agent or similar functionary of a Member or of an
officer of the Company,  shall be indemnified by the Company against  judgments,
penalties  (including  excise and similar  taxes and punitive  damages),  fines,
settlements and reasonable costs and expenses  (including,  without  limitation,
attorneys' fees) actually incurred by such Indemnified Person in connection with
such Proceeding if such  Indemnified  Person acted in good                      

6 

P-->EX-3.(II)7th Page of 14TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 7th
faith and in a manner he  reasonably  believed  to be in, or not opposed to, the
best  interest  of the  Company  and,  with  respect to any  criminal  action or
proceeding,  had no reasonable  cause to believe his conduct was  unlawful.  The
termination of any action,  suit or proceeding by judgment,  order,  settlement,
conviction,  or upon a plea of nolo contendere or its equivalent,  shall not, of
itself,  create a presumption  that the  Indemnified  Person did not act in good
faith and in a manner  which he  reasonably  believed to be in or not opposed to
the best  interests of the Company or, with  respect to any  criminal  action or
proceeding, that the Indemnified Person had reasonable cause to believe that his
conduct was unlawful.                                                           

          Paragraph  5.03 Survival.  Indemnification  under this Article 5 shall
continue as to a Person who has ceased to serve in the capacity  that  initially
entitled such Person to indemnity hereunder. The rights granted pursuant to this
Article 5 shall be deemed  contract  rights,  and no amendment,  modification or
repeal of this  Article 5 shall have the effect of  limiting or denying any such
rights with respect to actions  taken or  Proceedings  arising prior to any such
amendment, modification or repeal.                                              

          Paragraph 5.04 Advance Payment. The right to indemnification conferred
by this  Article  5 shall  include  the  right to be paid or  reimbursed  by the
Company for the reasonable expenses incurred in advance of the final disposition
of the Proceeding and without any  determination as to the Indemnified  Person's
ultimate entitlement to indemnification;  provided, however, that the payment of
such expenses incurred in advance of the final disposition of a Proceeding shall
be made only upon  delivery  to the  Company  of a written  affirmation  by such
Indemnified  Person of his good faith  belief  that he has met the  standard  of
conduct  necessary  for  indemnification  under  this  Article  5 and a  written
undertaking, by or on behalf of such Indemnified Person, to repay all amounts so
advanced if it shall  ultimately be determined that such  Indemnified  Person is
not entitled to be indemnified under this Article 5 or otherwise.               

          Paragraph 5.05  Nonexclusivity of Rights. The right to indemnification
and the  advancement  and payment of expenses  conferred by this Article 5 shall
not be exclusive of any other right which a Person may have or hereafter acquire
under any law (common or statutory),  provision of the Articles of  Organization
or Operating Agreement, agreements, vote of members or otherwise.               

          Paragraph  5.06  Savings  Clause.  If  Paragraph  5.02 or any  portion
thereof  shall  be   invalidated  on  any  ground  by  any  court  of  competent
jurisdiction,  then the Company shall  nevertheless  indemnify and hold harmless
each Indemnified Person as to costs, charges and expenses (including  attorneys'
fees),  judgments,  fines and amounts  paid in  settlement  with  respect to any
action,  suit  or  proceeding,   whether  civil,  criminal,   administrative  or
investigative  to the full extent  permitted by any  applicable  portion of this
Article  5 that  shall  not have  been  invalidated  and to the  fullest  extent
permitted by applicable law.                                                    

 ARTICLE 6
CONTRIBUTIONS TO THE COMPANY

          Paragraph 6.01 Member's Initial Capital Contributions.  The Member has
converted  Common  Stock  of the  former  Wachovia  Asset  Securitization,  Inc.
pursuant  to that  certain  Plan of  Conversion,  dated  October 27, 2003 as its
Initial Capital Contribution to the Company.                                    

          Paragraph  6.02  Subsequent  Contributions.  The  Member  shall not be
obligated to make any Capital  Contributions to the Company other than those set
forth in Paragraph 6.01.                                                        

 ARTICLE 7
 ALLOCATIONS AND DISTRIBUTIONS

          Paragraph  7.01  Allocations  of Profits  and  Losses.  All of the Net
Profits and Net Losses of the Company for each Fiscal Year shall be allocated to
the Member.                                                                     

7 

P-->EX-3.(II)8th Page of 14TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 8th
          Paragraph  7.02  Distributions  of  Cash  Flow.  Cash  Flow  shall  be
distributed  to the  Member  in the  amounts  and at such  time or  times as the
Managers shall determine in their sole discretion.                              

 ARTICLE 8
 TRANSFERS OF MEMBERSHIP INTERESTS

          Paragraph 8.01 Restrictions on Transfers. Except as otherwise provided
herein,  Membership  Interests  may be  assigned  in  whole  or in part  only as
follows:                                                                        

          (a) Unless waived by the non-selling  Members,  a Membership  Interest
shall not be transferred  in the absence of an opinion of counsel,  satisfactory
to the non-selling Members,  that the registration of the sale of the Membership
Interest is not required under the  Securities  Act of 1933, as amended,  or any
applicable state securities laws.                                               

          (b) Any  transfer  of a  Membership  Interest,  other  than to another
Member,  shall be effective only to give the transferee the right to receive the
share of tax  allocations  and  distributions  to  which  the  transferor  would
otherwise be entitled.  No  transferee of a Membership  Interest  shall have the
right to become a substituted Member unless the non-transferring Members, in the
exercise of their sole and absolute  discretion,  expressly  consent  thereto in
writing and the transferee agrees to be bound by all the terms and conditions of
this Agreement as then in effect. Unless and until a transferee is admitted as a
substituted  Member,  the transferee  shall have no right to exercise any of the
powers,  rights, and privileges of a Member hereunder. A Member who has assigned
his  Membership  Interest  shall  cease to be a Member  upon  assignment  of the
Member's entire Membership Interest and thereafter shall have no further powers,
rights  and  privileges  as a Member  hereunder,  but  shall,  unless  otherwise
relieved of such  obligations  by  agreement  of all of the other  Members or by
operation of law,  remain liable for all  obligations  and duties  incurred as a
Member.                                                                         

          (c) The Company, each Member and any other Person having business with
the  Company  need deal only with  Members  who are  admitted  as  Members or as
substituted Members of the Company,  and they shall not be required to deal with
any other Person by reason of  assignment  by a Member or by reason of the death
of a Member,  except as otherwise provided in this Agreement.  In the absence of
the substitution (as provided herein) of a Member for an assigning or a deceased
Member,  any payment to a Member or to a Member's  executors  or  administrators
shall  release  the  Company and the  Members  from all  liability  to any other
Persons who may be interested in such payment by reason of an assignment  by, or
the death of, such Member.                                                      

          (d) No Person  shall have a perfected  lien or security  interest in a
Membership  Interest  unless the creation of such interest is in accordance with
the  provisions  of this  Agreement and the Company is notified of such interest
and  provided  a copy  of all  documentation  with  respect  thereto,  including
financing statements, prior to execution and filing.                            

          (e)  Each  Member  agrees  not to  transfer  all or  any  part  of his
Membership Interest (or take or omit any action, filing election or other action
which could result in a deemed  transfer) if such  transfer  (either  considered
alone or in the aggregate with prior transfers by other Members) would result in
the  termination  of the Company for federal  income tax  purposes,  without the
prior  written  consent of the  non-transferring  Members,  which consent may be
withheld in their sole discretion.                                              

          (f) Any  transfer not in accord with this  Agreement  shall be void ab
initio.                                                                         

8 

P-->EX-3.(II)9th Page of 14TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 9th
 ARTICLE 9
 DISSOLUTION AND TERMINATION

Paragraph 9.01 Dissolution.                                 

          (a) The Company shall be dissolved  upon the  occurrence of any of the
following events:                                                               

               (1) The entry of a decree of judicial dissolution or the issuance
of a certificate for administrative dissolution under the Act; or               

(2) by the written agreement of the Member.       

          (b) If a Member  who is an  individual  dies or a court  of  competent
jurisdiction  adjudges  him  to be  incompetent  to  manage  his  person  or his
property,  the Member's  Representative  may exercise all of the Member's rights
for the purpose of settling his estate or administering his property.           

          (c)  Notwithstanding  any  other  provision  of  this  Agreement,  the
bankruptcy or dissolution of a Member shall not cause such Member to cease to be
a member of the Company and, upon the occurrence of such an event,  the business
of the Company shall continue without dissolution.                              

      Paragraph 9.02 Winding Up, Liquidation and Distribution of Assets.

          (a) If the  Company is  dissolved  and its affairs are to be wound up,
the Member (or his Representative) is directed to:                              

               (1) sell or otherwise  liquidate such of the Company's  assets as
may be required to  discharge  all  liabilities  of the Company,  including  any
liabilities  to the Member and  establish  such  Reserves  as may be  reasonably
necessary to provide for contingent liabilities of the Company; and             

               (2)  distribute  the  remaining   assets  to  the  Member,   such
distribution  to be made either in cash or in kind,  as determined by the Member
(or his Representative).                                                        

          (b) Upon completion of the winding up, liquidation and distribution of
the assets, the Company shall be deemed terminated.                             

          Paragraph 9.03 Articles of  Dissolution.  When all debts,  liabilities
and  obligations  of the  Company  have been  paid and  discharged  or  adequate
provisions have been made therefor and all of the remaining  property and assets
of the Company have been  distributed,  articles of dissolution,  as required by
the Act, shall be executed and filed with the North Carolina Secretary of State.

          Paragraph 9.04 Effect of Filing of Articles of  Dissolution.  Upon the
filing of articles of dissolution  with the North  Carolina  Secretary of State,
the existence of the Company shall cease, except for the purpose of suits, other
proceedings  and  appropriate  action as provided in the Act. The Member (or his
Representative)   shall  have  authority  to  distribute  any  Company  property
discovered after  dissolution,  convey real estate and take such other action as
may be necessary on behalf of and in the name of the Company.                   

9 

P-->EX-3.(II)10th Page of 14TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 10th
ARTICLE 10
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

          Paragraph  10.01  Choice of Law.  This  Operating  Agreement,  and its
interpretation,  shall be governed  exclusively  by its terms and by the laws of
the  State of North  Carolina  (other  than its  conflicts  of laws  rules)  and
specifically the Act.                                                           

          Paragraph  10.02  Amendments.  This  Operating  Agreement  may  not be
amended except in writing signed by the Member.                                 

          Paragraph 10.03 Headings. The headings in this Operating Agreement are
inserted for convenience only and are in no way intended to describe, interpret,
define, or limit the scope,  extent or intent of this Operating Agreement or any
provision hereof.                                                               

          Paragraph  10.04  Severability.  If any  provision  of this  Operating
Agreement  or the  application  thereof to any Person or  circumstance  shall be
invalid, illegal or unenforceable to any extent, the remainder of this Operating
Agreement  and the  application  thereof  shall  not be  affected  and  shall be
enforceable to the fullest extent permitted by law.                             

          Paragraph  10.05 Heirs,  Successors  and Assigns.  Each and all of the
covenants,  terms,  provisions and agreements  herein contained shall be binding
upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective  heirs,
legal representatives, successors and assigns.                                  

          Paragraph  10.06  Creditors.  None of the provisions of this Operating
Agreement  shall be for the benefit of or  enforceable  by any  creditors of the
Company or of the Member. No creditor of the Company will be entitled to require
the Member to solicit or accept any loan or additional capital  contribution for
the Company or to enforce any right which the Company may have against a Member,
whether arising under this Operating Agreement or otherwise.                    

          Paragraph  10.07  No  Amendments.  No  amendment  may be  made  to the
definition of Independent  Manager, or any of Sections 3.01, 4.10, 4.11, or 9.01
without the affirmative consent of the Independent Manager.                     

10

P-->EX-3.(II)11th Page of 14TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 11th
          IN WITNESS  WHEREOF,  the Member,  the  Managers  and the Company have
executed this Operating Agreement on the date first written above.              

                                           WACHOVIA BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION

           By:
                                              ----------------------------------

              Title:
                                                 -------------------------------

 MANAGERS:

                                            ------------------------------------
                       Thomas Wickwire

                                            ------------------------------------
                         Curtis Y. Arledge

                                            ------------------------------------
                          Juliana C. Johnson
                               (Independent Manager)

ATTEST                                                                          

By:_______________________________                            

[________________________, Secretary                          

          I, __________________________, as the sole organizer of Wachovia Asset
Securitization  Issuance,  LLC, pursuant to N.C.G.S. ss. 57C-2-20(c),  do hereby
consent to the  execution  of this  Operating  Agreement  by the Managers and by
Wachovia Bank, National Association, as the sole member of the Company.         

By:_______________________________________                                    

                                            ___________________________Organizer

11

P-->EX-3.(II)12th Page of 14TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 12th
Schedule I
----------
INITIAL OFFICERS

Name                                        Title             
         -----------------------            ------------------------------------

Phil Adams                         Assistant Vice President   

Robert L. Andersen                 Senior Vice President      

Tracey W. Anklin                   Senior Vice President      

         Jacqueline A. Ballantine           Vice President & Assistant Secretary

Jerry P. Bates                     Vice President             

Dale R. Batman                     Senior Vice President      

James L. Beaver, Jr.               Senior Vice President      

Paul J. Blass                      Vice President             

Curtis L. Brouwer                  Senior Vice President      

James F. Burr                      Senior Vice President      

Sandy Cavaness                     Assistant Vice President   

John T. Chepul                     Vice President             

Francis C. Clark                   Senior Vice President      

Thomas Hal Clarke                  Senior Vice President      

Rosalia Costa-Clarke               Vice President             

Paul M. Clooney                    Officer                    

William L. Coverston               Assistant Vice President   

 Lana Cummings                      Chief Accounting Officer and
                      Vice President

Barbara R. Curry                   Officer                    

Timothy F. Danello                 Senior Vice President      

Jerry W. DeBerry                   Vice President             

Michael J. Domagala                Senior Vice President      

Douglas R. Edwards                 Senior Vice President      

Terry W. Edwards                   Vice President             

James A. Fowler, Jr.               Officer                    

William Larry Gilmer               Senior Vice President      

Herman T. Goins, Jr.               Vice President             

Jacqueline M. Granger              Assistant Vice President   

Robert A. Gray                     Vice President             

Jennifer R. Green                  Officer                    

Susan A. Groves                    Officer                    

Mark D. Gustafson                  Assistant Vice President   

Earl W. Hartenstine                Vice President             

Lori A. Hartman                    Assistant Secretary        

 1

P-->EX-3.(II)13th Page of 14TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 13th
Rebecca Henderson                  Senior Vice President      

Sandra B. Hollenbach               Vice President             

Sonya M. Holmes                    Vice President             

David R. Hopkins                   Senior Vice President      

Bradley T. Hubacher                Vice President             

April Hughey                       Vice President             

David Hutchinson                   Officer                    

         Beverly W. Jackson                 Assistant Vice President & Assistant
                 Secretary

John W. Johnson                    Vice President             

Benjamin J. Jolley                 Senior Vice President      

David M. Julian                    Senior Vice President      

Nancy Kerkhoff                     Associate                  

Jack B. Kester, Jr.                Vice President             

Janet M. Le Clair                  Senior Vice President      

Deborah B. Lineberger              Vice President             

Dorothy Y. London                  Vice President             

Joe Long                           Senior Vice President      

David T. Mason                     Vice President             

Dawn G. McCall                     Vice President             

Christina H. McDonald              Assistant Vice President   

Mark Metz                          Senior Vice President      

         Aprille M. Mitchell                Assistant Vice President & Assistant
                 Secretary

         Carol R. Mullis                    Vice President & Assistant Secretary

Douglas Nguyen                     Assistant Vice President   

Marta A. Ochoa                     Officer                    

Vanessa M. Pelzer                  Officer                    

Robert J. Perret                   Vice President             

David L. Pitelka                   Treasurer                  

Anthony B. Powers                  Officer                    

        James F. Powers                    Senior Vice President and Secretary

David W. Reed                      Vice President             

         William H. Schwartz                Assistant Vice President & Assistant
                 Secretary

Gary R. Sessions                   Vice President             

Patrick J. Shevlin                 Senior Vice President      

Chudney Smalls                     Officer                    

Michael C. Smith                   Vice President             

Sterling A. Spainhour              Senior Vice President      

 2

P-->EX-3.(II)Last Page of 14TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 14th
Benjamin C. Stewart                Senior Vice President      

Barry Taylor-Brill                 Senior Vice President      

Gloria A. Thompson                 Senior Vice President      

        David K. Tinkler                   Senior Vice President and Assistant
                 Secretary

Heather M. Thompson                Officer                    

Herbert A. Ware                    Senior Vice President      

Michael A. Watkins                 Senior Vice President      

Scott D. Weaver                    Vice President             

Patricia J. Wichnoski              Assistant Vice President   

  Thomas Wickwire                    President and Chief Executive
               Officer

Thomas J. Wurtz                    Executive Vice President   

 3
R-->Dates Referenced Herein
Referenced-On PageThis ‘S-3/A’ Filing    Date First  Last      Other FilingsFiled on:10/31/03None on these Dates10/27/037 List all Filings 
↑TopFiling Submission 0001068238-03-000506   –   Alternative Formats (Word / Rich Text, HTML, Plain Text, et al.)
Copyright © 2017 Fran Finnegan & Company.  All Rights Reserved.About – Privacy – Redactions – Help —
Sat, 29 Jul 05:50:24.0 GMT 


WACHOVIA ASSET SECURITIZATION ISSUANCE II, LLC 2007-HE2 TRUST - WILMINGTON, DE - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



DE



WILMINGTON



Trusts, Nec



Trusts, Nec



                            WACHOVIA ASSET SECURITIZATION ISSUANCE II, LLC 2007-HE2 TRUST
                                    



 





















W 


WACHOVIA ASSET SECURITIZATION ISSUANCE II, LLC 2007-HE2 TRUST
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



1100 N MARKET ST WILMINGTON, DE 19801
Get Directions








Business Info



 Founded --
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue $88,000.00
 Employee Count 2
 Industries Trusts, Nec
 Contacts 






Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


It employs 2 employees and is generating approximately $88,000.00 in annual revenue. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







W

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com







Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.



















SEC Info - Wachovia Asset Securitization Issuance LLC - ‘424B3’ on 5/1/98










SEC Info uses JavaScript!  To view pages properly, enable JavaScript in your browser.


    SEC Info      Home      Search      My Interests      Help      Sign In      Please Sign In




Wachovia Asset Securitization Issuance LLC – ‘424B3’ on 5/1/98As of:  Friday, 5/1/98   ·   Accession #:  950144-98-5492   ·   File #:  333-03574




  in 
this entire Filing.
an "Entity" Search.
  Show 
Docs searched
 and 
every "hit".
the 1st "hit".

Help... Wildcards:  ? (any letter),  * (many).  Logic:  for Docs:  & (and),  | (or);  for Text:  | (anywhere),  "(&)" (near).    ↓Bottom
 
T-->  As Of                Filer                Filing    For·On·As Docs:Size              Issuer               Agent

 5/01/98  Wachovia Asset Securitizatio..LLC 424B3                  1:854K                                   Bowne of Atlanta Inc/FAF-->Prospectus   —   Rule 424(b)(3)Filing Table of Contents
Document/Exhibit                   Description                      Pages   Size 

 1: 424B3       First Union Residential Securitization 424B3         206   1.11M 

D-->Document Table of Contents
Page (sequential) | (alphabetic) Top A-->
Alternative Formats (Word, et al.)
Accrual of Original Issue Discount
Advances
Agency Securities
Allocation of the Income of the REMIC to the Residual Certificates
Annex I
Anti-Deficiency Legislation and Other Limitations on Lenders
Anti-Deficiency Legislation; Bankruptcy and Consumer Protection Legislation
Appendix A
Assignment of Mortgage Assets
Available Distribution Amount
Available Information
Bankruptcy Bonds
Basic Prepayment Assumption
Book-Entry Registration
Book-Entry System
Capitalized Interest Account
Certain Federal Income Tax Consequences
Certain Legal Aspects of the Mortgage Loans
Certain Matters Regarding the Master Servicer and the Depositor
Certain U.S. Federal Income Tax Documentation Requirements
Certificates
Class A-7 Reserve Fund
Class A Certificate Principal Distributions
Class SA Certificate Principal Distributions
Collection Account
Collection Procedures
Compensating Interest
Conveyance of Subsequent Mortgage Loans
Cooperative Loans
Cooperatives
Credit Enhancement
Cross-Collateralization Provisions
Deferred Interest
Definitive Certificates
Delinquency, Loan Loss and Foreclosure Information
Depositor, The
Description of the Certificates
Description of the Mortgage Loan Purchase Agreement
Disqualified Organizations
Distributions of Interest
Distributions of Principal
Due-on-Sale Clauses
Enforceability of Certain Provisions
Environmental Legislation
ERISA Considerations
Events of Default
Excess Inclusions
Exemption
FHLMC Certificates
Financial Information
First Union
First Union Capital Markets
FNMA Certificates
Foreclosure
Formation of the Trust Fund and Trust Property
General
GNMA Certificates
Group SA Mortgage Loans
Hazard Insurance
Home Equity Loans
Incorporation of Certain Information by Reference
Index of Principal Terms
Index to Defined Terms
Information Reporting and Backup Withholding
Last Scheduled Distribution Date
Legal Investment
Legal Investment Considerations
Legal Matters
Letter of Credit
Limited Guarantee
Loan Group A
Loan Group SA
Mandatory Prepayment
Market Discount
Method of Distribution
Mortgage
Mortgage Loan Pool, The
Mortgage Loan Program
Mortgage Loans -- General, The
Multiple Classes of Senior Certificates
Net Losses of the REMIC
Non-U.S. Persons
Offered Certificates Representing Interests in Loans Other Than ARMs
Original Issue Discount
Pass-Through of Non-Interest Expenses of the REMIC
Payments on Mortgage Loans; Deposits to Collection Account
Pooling and Servicing Agreement, The
Pre-Funding Account
Premium
Prepayment and Yield Considerations
Principal Prepayments
Priority of Distributions
Private Mortgage-Backed Securities
Prohibited Transactions
Prohibited Transactions and Other Taxes
Prospectus
Pte 83-1
Rating
Regular Certificates
Reports to Certificateholders
Representations by Sellers; Repurchases
Residual Certificates
Rights of Redemption
Risk Factors
Sale or Exchange of Residual Certificates
Seller and the Servicer, The
Servicing and Other Compensation and Payment of Expenses
Single Class of Senior Certificates
Soldiers' and Sailors' Civil Relief Act of 1940
Special Hazard Insurance Policies
State, Local and Other Tax Considerations
Stripped Bonds and Stripped Coupons
Subordinate Certificate Principal Distributions
Subordinated Certificates
Subordinate Principal Distribution Amount
Subordination
Subordination and Allocation of Losses
Substitution of Mortgage Assets
Summary of Terms
Summary of Terms of the Offered Certificates
Taxation of the REMIC
Tax-Exempt Investors
Tax-Related Restrictions on Transfers of Residual Certificates
Termination; Optional Termination
Termination; Purchase of Mortgage Loans
The Depositor
The Mortgage Loan Pool
The Mortgage Loans -- General
The Pooling and Servicing Agreement
The Seller and the Servicer
The Trustee
Trustee, The
Underwriter Exemptions
Underwriting
Underwriting Standards
Use of Proceeds
Yield and Prepayment Considerations
Yield Considerations With Respect to the Class SA-5, Class SA-X, Class A-6 and Class A-X Certificates
S-->
11st Page   -   Filing Submission
6Summary of Terms of the Offered Certificates
11Group SA Mortgage Loans
19Class A-7 Reserve Fund
22Legal Investment
24Risk Factors
26Book-Entry System
29The Mortgage Loan Pool
"General
30Loan Group SA
"Loan Group A
42Conveyance of Subsequent Mortgage Loans
"The Seller and the Servicer
43Delinquency, Loan Loss and Foreclosure Information
44Prepayment and Yield Considerations
45Mandatory Prepayment
46Basic Prepayment Assumption
48Yield Considerations With Respect to the Class SA-5, Class SA-X, Class A-6 and Class A-X Certificates
51Formation of the Trust Fund and Trust Property
"Description of the Certificates
52Book-Entry Registration
54Definitive Certificates
56Collection Account
57Advances
59Priority of Distributions
61Cross-Collateralization Provisions
62Distributions of Interest
63Compensating Interest
"Distributions of Principal
"Class SA Certificate Principal Distributions
65Class A Certificate Principal Distributions
66Subordinate Certificate Principal Distributions
"Subordinate Principal Distribution Amount
67Principal Prepayments
68Subordination and Allocation of Losses
71Available Distribution Amount
72Last Scheduled Distribution Date
73Pre-Funding Account
"Capitalized Interest Account
74Servicing and Other Compensation and Payment of Expenses
77Events of Default
78Termination; Purchase of Mortgage Loans
79Description of the Mortgage Loan Purchase Agreement
80The Trustee
"Certain Legal Aspects of the Mortgage Loans
81Foreclosure
82Rights of Redemption
"Anti-Deficiency Legislation; Bankruptcy and Consumer Protection Legislation
83Enforceability of Certain Provisions
"Environmental Legislation
84Soldiers' and Sailors' Civil Relief Act of 1940
"Certain Federal Income Tax Consequences
87ERISA Considerations
"Prohibited Transactions
88Exemption
90Use of Proceeds
"Legal Investment Considerations
"Underwriting
91Legal Matters
92Index of Principal Terms
96Appendix A
107Prospectus
108Available Information
"Reports to Certificateholders
"Incorporation of Certain Information by Reference
109Summary of Terms
118Yield and Prepayment Considerations
119Subordinated Certificates
120The Mortgage Loans -- General
123Home Equity Loans
"Agency Securities
"GNMA Certificates
125FHLMC Certificates
126FNMA Certificates
128Private Mortgage-Backed Securities
129Substitution of Mortgage Assets
"The Depositor
130Mortgage Loan Program
"Underwriting Standards
132Representations by Sellers; Repurchases
142Credit Enhancement
"Subordination
144Special Hazard Insurance Policies
145Bankruptcy Bonds
146Limited Guarantee
"Letter of Credit
148The Pooling and Servicing Agreement
"Assignment of Mortgage Assets
150Certificates
"Payments on Mortgage Loans; Deposits to Collection Account
152Collection Procedures
153Hazard Insurance
158Certain Matters Regarding the Master Servicer and the Depositor
160Termination; Optional Termination
162Cooperatives
164Cooperative Loans
166Anti-Deficiency Legislation and Other Limitations on Lenders
168Due-on-Sale Clauses
170Single Class of Senior Certificates
171Premium
"Original Issue Discount
"Market Discount
173Multiple Classes of Senior Certificates
"Stripped Bonds and Stripped Coupons
174Offered Certificates Representing Interests in Loans Other Than ARMs
175Accrual of Original Issue Discount
176Non-U.S. Persons
177Information Reporting and Backup Withholding
178Regular Certificates
183Deferred Interest
185Residual Certificates
"Allocation of the Income of the REMIC to the Residual Certificates
"Excess Inclusions
186Sale or Exchange of Residual Certificates
187Taxation of the REMIC
188Net Losses of the REMIC
"Pass-Through of Non-Interest Expenses of the REMIC
"Prohibited Transactions and Other Taxes
189Tax-Exempt Investors
190Tax-Related Restrictions on Transfers of Residual Certificates
"Disqualified Organizations
192State, Local and Other Tax Considerations
193Pte 83-1
194Underwriter Exemptions
196Method of Distribution
197Financial Information
"Rating
198Annex I
200Certain U.S. Federal Income Tax Documentation Requirements
202Index to Defined Terms
206First Union
"Mortgage
"First Union Capital Markets
P-->424B31st Page of 206TOC↑TopPreviousNext↓BottomJust 1st 

                                            Filed Pursuant to Rule 424(b)(3)
                                                   Registration No. 333-3574
PROSPECTUS SUPPLEMENT                                                           
(TO PROSPECTUS DATED APRIL 24, 1998)                                            
$347,077,774 (APPROXIMATE)
FIRST UNION RESIDENTIAL SECURITIZATION TRANSACTIONS, INC.,
Depositor 
FIRST UNION NATIONAL BANK,
Seller
FIRST UNION MORTGAGE CORPORATION, 
Servicer

MORTGAGE PASS-THROUGH CERTIFICATES, SERIES 1998-A 
PRINCIPAL AND INTEREST PAYABLE ON THE 25TH DAY OF EACH MONTH, BEGINNING IN MAY
1998

The Series 1998-A Mortgage Pass-Through Certificates (the "Certificates") 
will consist of the following twenty-two classes: (i) Class SA-1, Class SA-2,   
Class SA-3, Class SA-4, Class SA-5 and Class SA-X (the "Class SA Certificates"),
(ii) Class A-1, Class A-2, Class A-3, Class A-4, Class A-5, Class A-6, Class A-7
and Class A-X (the "Class A Certificates"), (iii) Class M, Class B-1 and Class  
B-2 (the "Senior Subordinate Certificates"), (iv) Class B-3, Class B-4 and Class
B-5 (the "Junior Subordinate Certificates" and, together with the Senior        
Subordinate Certificates, the "Subordinate Certificates") and (v) Class R-I and 
Class R-II (the "Residual Certificates" and, together with the Class SA         
Certificates and the Class A Certificates, the "Senior Certificates").          
                                                        (continued on next page)
--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

                                                                [Download Table]
                                                       
$    51,614,813       7.00%  Class SA-1 Certificates   
$    79,081,309       6.90%  Class SA-2 Certificates   
$     9,700,000       7.00%  Class SA-3 Certificates   
$    15,253,691       7.00%  Class SA-4 Certificates   
      (1)             7.00%  Class SA-5 Certificates   
      (2)         Variable   Class SA-X Certificates   
$   126,652,919       6.87%  Class A-1 Certificates    
$    19,168,000       7.00%  Class A-2 Certificates    
$    18,130,000       7.00%  Class A-3 Certificates    
$     9,500,000       7.00%  Class A-4 Certificates    
$     2,700,000       7.00%  Class A-5 Certificates    
      (3)             7.00%  Class A-6 Certificates    
$     2,500,000     (4)      Class A-7 Certificates    
      (5)         Variable   Class A-X Certificates    
$     7,701,171       7.00%  Class M Certificates      
$     2,975,452       7.00%  Class B-1 Certificates    
$     2,100,319       7.00%  Class B-2 Certificates    
$            50       7.00%  Class R-I Certificates(6) 
$            50       7.00%  Class R-II Certificates(7)

--------------------------------------------------------------------------------

(1) The Class SA-5 Certificates will accrue interest on the Class SA-5 Notional 
Amount. The "Class SA-5 Notional Amount" for any Distribution Date will 
    equal the Class Principal Balance of the Class SA-2 Certificates immediately
 prior to such Distribution Date multiplied by approximately 1.42857%. The
Class SA-5 Notional Amount as of the Closing Date will be approximately 
$1,129,732. The Class SA-5 Certificates will not be entitled to any     
distributions of principal.                                             
(2) The Class SA-X Certificates will accrue interest on the Class SA-X Notional 
Amount. The "Class SA-X Notional Amount" for any Distribution Date will 
   equal the Group SA Aggregate Loan Balance as of the preceding Determination
Date. The Class SA-X Notional Amount as of the Closing Date will be     
    approximately $162,984,201. The Class SA-X Certificates will not be entitled
 to any distributions of principal. The Certificate Rate on the Class SA-X
  Certificates for any Distribution Date will equal the weighted average (by
   principal balance) of the Net Loan Rate (as defined herein) on the Group SA
    Loans (as defined herein) as of the preceding Determination Date (as defined
    herein), or with respect to the initial Distribution Date, as of the Initial
  Cut-Off Date (the "Group SA Weighted Average Rate") minus 7.00% per annum.
    The Group SA Weighted Average Rate as of the Initial Cut-Off Date will equal
   7.58% per annum. The "Net Loan Rate" for each Mortgage Loan is equal to the
Loan Rate thereon less the sum of the rates at which the applicable     
Servicing Fee and Trustee Fee (each as defined herein) are calculated.  
(3) The Class A-6 Certificates will accrue interest on the Class A-6 Notional   
    Amount. The "Class A-6 Notional Amount" for any Distribution Date will equal
   the Class Principal Balance of the Class A-1 Certificates immediately prior
 to such Distribution Date multiplied by approximately 1.85714%. The Class
    A-6 Notional Amount as of the Closing Date will be approximately $2,352,122.
The Class A-6 Certificates will not be entitled to any distributions of 
principal.                                                              
(4) The Class A-7 Certificates will accrue interest for the first twelve        
 Distribution Dates at a rate of 7.5% per annum. Thereafter, the Class A-7
Certificates will accrue interest at a rate of 7.0% per annum.          
(5) The Class A-X Certificates will accrue interest on the Class A-X Notional   
    Amount. The "Class A-X Notional Amount" for any Distribution Date will equal
the sum of the Group A Aggregate Loan Balance and the balance of the    
 Pre-Funding Account (as defined herein) as of the preceding Determination
Date. The Class A-X Notional Amount as of the Closing Date will be      
   approximately $187,069,027. The Class A-X Certificates will not be entitled
to any distributions of principal. The Certificate Rate on the Class A-X
  Certificates for any Distribution Date will equal the weighted average (by
principal balance) of the Net Loan Rate on the Group A Loans (as defined
herein) as of the preceding Determination Date, or with respect to the  
initial Distribution Date, as of the Initial Cut-Off Date (the "Group A 
   Weighted Average Rate") minus 7.00% per annum. The Group A Weighted Average
Rate as of the Initial Cut-Off Date will equal 7.51% per annum.         
(6) The Class R-I Certificate is the sole residual interest in REMIC I (as      
defined herein).                                                        
(7) The Class R-II Certificate is the sole residual interest in REMIC II (as    
defined herein).                                                        

FOR A DISCUSSION OF CERTAIN FACTORS RELATING TO AN INVESTMENT IN THE  
OFFERED CERTIFICATES, SEE "RISK FACTORS" ON PAGE S-19 HEREIN AND ON PAGE 10 IN  
THE ACCOMPANYING PROSPECTUS.                                                    
   THESE CERTIFICATES DO NOT REPRESENT AN OBLIGATION OF OR INTEREST IN FIRST
UNION RESIDENTIAL SECURITIZATION TRANSACTIONS, INC. OR ANY OF ITS AFFILIATES.   
NEITHER THESE CERTIFICATES NOR THE UNDERLYING MORTGAGE LOANS ARE GUARANTEED BY  
ANY AGENCY OR INSTRUMENTALITY OF THE UNITED STATES.                             
  THESE SECURITIES HAVE NOT BEEN APPROVED OR DISAPPROVED BY THE SECURITIES
AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION OR ANY STATE SECURITIES COMMISSION NOR HAS THE          
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION OR ANY STATE SECURITIES COMMISSION PASSED    
UPON THE ACCURACY OR ADEQUACY OF THIS PROSPECTUS SUPPLEMENT OR THE RELATED      
PROSPECTUS. ANY REPRESENTATION TO THE CONTRARY IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE.           

  The Offered Certificates are being offered by First Union Capital Markets, a
division of Wheat First Securities, Inc. ("First Union Capital Markets"), an    
affiliate of the Depositor, the Seller and the Servicer, and Donaldson, Lufkin &
Jenrette Securities Corporation ("DLJ" and, together with First Union Capital   
Markets, the "Underwriters") from time to time in negotiated transactions or    
otherwise at varying prices to be determined, in each case, at the time of sale.
See "Underwriting" herein. The aggregate proceeds to the Depositor from the sale
of the Offered Certificates will be approximately $352,322,463, plus accrued    
interest, before deducting expenses payable by the Depositor, estimated to be   
approximately $570,000 in the aggregate.                                        
First Union Capital Markets and DLJ expect to enter into market making    
transactions in the Offered Certificates and may act as principal or agent in   
any such transactions. Any such purchases or sales will be made at prices       
related to prevailing market prices at the time of sale. This Prospectus        
Supplement and the Prospectus may be used by First Union Capital Markets in     
connection with such transactions.                                              
The Offered Certificates offered hereby are offered subject to prior sale,
when, as and if issued by the Trust Fund and accepted by the Underwriters and   
subject to their right to reject orders in whole or in part. It is expected that
delivery of the Offered Certificates (other than the Class R Certificates) will 
be made in book-entry form only through the facilities of The Depository Trust  
Company on or about April 29, 1998 (the "Closing Date").                        

FIRST UNION CAPITAL MARKETS                          DONALDSON LUFKIN & JENRETTE
                                                      SECURITIES CORPORATION

The date of this Prospectus Supplement is April 24, 1998.                       

P-->424B32nd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 2nd

(cover continued from previous page)                                            

The Subordinate Certificates other than the Class M Certificates are referred to
herein as the "Class B Certificates." Only the Senior Certificates and the      
Senior Subordinate Certificates (collectively, the "Offered Certificates") are  
offered hereby. The Junior Subordinate Certificates are not offered hereby. The 
Certificates will represent undivided interests in FURST Mortgage Loan Trust    
1998-A (the "Trust Fund") consisting of a pool of first-lien, fixed-rate        
mortgage loans (the "Mortgage Loans") secured by mortgages, security deeds or   
deeds of trust on one- to four-family residential properties, all monies        
received thereunder on or after a specified cut-off date (each, a "Cut-Off      
Date"), security interests in the properties which secure the Mortgage Loans,   
and certain other property. The aggregate principal balance of the Mortgage     
Loans that will be conveyed to be Trust Fund on the Closing Date (the "Initial  
Mortgage Loans") as of April 1, 1998 (the "Initial Cut-Off Date") was           
$292,308,382.37 (the "Initial Cut-Off Date Aggregate Loan Balance"). The        
Mortgage Loans will be segregated into two groups ("Loan Group SA" and "Loan
Group A", and each a "Loan Group"). All of the Mortgage Loans in Loan Group SA  
(the "Group SA Mortgage Loans") have original terms to stated maturity (based on
the date of origination or any later modification) of greater than 15 but no    
more than 30 years and were originated more than 36 months prior to the Initial 
Cut-Off Date. All of the Mortgage Loans in Loan Group A (the "Group A Mortgage  
Loans") have original terms to stated maturity (based on the date of origination
or any later modification) of greater than 15 but no more than 30 years and were
originated within the last 36 months prior to the Initial Cut-Off Date. The     
characteristics of the Mortgage Loans comprising each Loan Group are described  
herein under "The Mortgage Loan Pool." The Class SA Certificates will correspond
to the Group SA Mortgage Loans, the Class A Certificates will correspond to the 
Group A Mortgage Loans and the Subordinate Certificates will correspond to both 
the Group SA Mortgage Loans and the Group A Mortgage Loans.                     

On the Closing Date, a portion of the proceeds of the sale of the     
Certificates equal to $57,744,845 (the "Pre-Funded Amount") will be deposited in
a trust account in the name of the Trustee (as defined herein) (the "Pre-Funding
Account"). The Pooling and Servicing Agreement provides that additional         
fixed-rate mortgage loans (the "Subsequent Mortgage Loans") may be purchased by 
the Trust Fund from the Seller from time to time on or before July 24, 1998,    
from the Pre-Funded Amount. The Initial Mortgage Loans and Subsequent Mortgage  
Loans will be collectively referred to herein as the "Mortgage Loans."          

The Initial Mortgage Loans conveyed to the Trust Fund by First Union  
Residential Securitization Transactions, Inc. (the "Depositor") on the Closing  
Date were originated or purchased by First Union National Bank (in such         
capacity, the "Seller") or its affiliates and were acquired from the Seller by  
the Depositor. First Union Mortgage Corporation will service the Mortgage Loans 
(in such capacity, the "Servicer"). The Trust Fund will be created pursuant to a
Pooling and Servicing Agreement dated as of April 1, 1998 (the "Pooling and
Servicing Agreement") among the Depositor, the Seller, the Servicer and Norwest 
Bank Minnesota, National Association, as Trustee (the "Trustee") and as document
custodian (the "Document Custodian"). Terms used and not otherwise defined      
herein shall have the respective meanings ascribed to such terms in the         
Prospectus dated April 24, 1998 attached hereto (the "Prospectus").             

   Holders (alternatively, the "Holders" or the "Certificateholders") of the
Offered Certificates will receive distributions of principal and interest on the
25th day of each month (or, if such day is not a business day, the next         
following business day), beginning in May, 1998 (each such day, a "Distribution 
Date"). Distributions of interest and principal on the Class SA Certificates and
Class A Certificates will be based on interest and principal received or        
advanced with respect to the Group SA Mortgage Loans and Group A Mortgage Loans,
respectively. The rights of the Holders of the Subordinate Certificates to      
receive distributions with respect to the Mortgage Loans will be based upon     
interest and principal received or advanced with respect to both Loan Groups.   
Such rights in the case of the Subordinate Certificates will be subordinate to  
the rights of the Holders of the Senior Certificates. The rights of Holders of  
each Class of Subordinate Certificates will be subordinate to the rights of the 
Holders of any Class of Subordinate Certificates with a lower numerical         
designation (with the Class M Certificates being the lowest designation).       

The yield to maturity on (a) the Class SA Certificates and Class A    
Certificates generally will depend on the rate and timing of principal payments 
(including prepayments, liquidations, repurchases and defaults) on the Mortgage 
Loans in the related Loan Group and (b) any Class of Subordinate Certificates   
will depend on                                                                  

ii

P-->424B33rd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 3rd

the rate and timing of principal payments (including prepayments, liquidations, 
repurchases and defaults) on all of the Mortgage Loans.                         

 One or more elections will be made to treat certain segregated pools of
assets held by the Trust Fund as real estate mortgage investment conduits (each,
a "REMIC" referred to herein as "REMIC I" and "REMIC II") for federal income tax
purposes. The Certificates (other than the Class R Certificates) will represent 
"Regular Interests" in a REMIC and the Class R Certificates will each represent 
a "Residual Interest" in its respective REMIC. See "Certain Federal Income Tax
Consequences" herein and in the Prospectus.                                     

     The yield to maturity on the Class SA-5 and Class SA-X Certificates will be
extremely sensitive to the rate and timing of principal payments (including     
prepayments, liquidations, repurchases and defaults) on the Group SA Mortgage   
Loans, which may fluctuate significantly from time to time. A rapid rate of     
principal prepayments on the Group SA Mortgage Loans will have a material       
adverse effect on the yield to maturity of the Class SA-5 and Class SA-X        
Certificates. Investors should fully consider the associated risks, including   
the risk that a rapid rate of principal prepayments on the Group SA Mortgage    
Loans could result in the failure of investors in the Class SA-5 and Class SA-X 
Certificates to fully recoup their initial investment. See "Prepayment and Yield
Considerations -- Yield Considerations With Respect to the Class SA-5, Class
SA-X, Class A-6 and Class A-X Certificates" herein.                             

   The yield to maturity on the Class A-6 and Class A-X Certificates will be
extremely sensitive to the rate and timing of principal payments (including     
prepayments, liquidations, repurchases and defaults) on the Group A Mortgage    
Loans, which may fluctuate significantly from time to time. A rapid rate of     
principal prepayments on the Group A Mortgage Loans will have a material adverse
effect on the yield to maturity of the Class A-6 and Class A-X Certificates.    
Investors should fully consider the associated risks, including the risk that a 
rapid rate of principal prepayments on the Group A Mortgage Loans could result  
in the failure of investors in the Class A-6 and Class A-X Certificates to fully
recoup their initial investment. See "Prepayment and Yield
Considerations -- Yield Considerations With Respect to the Class SA-5, Class    
SA-X Class A-6 and Class A-X Certificates" herein.                              

     The rights of the Holders of the Senior Subordinate Certificates to receive
distributions of interest and principal are subordinated to the rights of the   
Holders of the Senior Certificates to receive distributions of interest and     
principal. In addition, the rights of the Holders of a Class of Class B         
Certificates to receive distributions of interest and principal will be         
subordinate to the rights of Holders of Class B Certificates with lower         
numerical designations and Holders of Class M Certificates to receive           
distributions of interest and principal, and the rights of Holders of the Class 
B-1 Certificates to receive distributions of interest and principal are         
subordinated to the rights of the Holders of the Class M Certificates to receive
distributions of interest and principal. Furthermore, following the reduction of
the aggregate Class Principal Balance of the Junior Subordinate Certificates to 
zero, the yield to maturity on each Class of the Senior Subordinate Certificates
will be extremely sensitive to certain realized losses on the Mortgage Loans    
because a disproportionate amount of such losses (rather than a pro rata portion
thereof) generally will be allocable to such Certificates first to Class B-2,   
then to Class B-1 and then to Class M. Similarly, following the reduction of the
aggregate of the Class Principal Balances of the Subordinate Certificates to    
zero, the yield to maturity on the Senior Certificates will be sensitive to all 
realized losses on the Mortgage Loans. See "Description of the
Certificates -- Subordination and Allocation of Losses" herein.                 

 Although the Class SA-4 Certificates are Senior Certificates, the Class
SA-4 Certificates generally will not be entitled to receive any distributions of
principal prepayments on the Group SA Mortgage Loans until the Distribution Date
in May 2003. Therefore, the Class SA-4 Certificates will not be entitled to     
receive the disproportionate allocations of such principal prepayments that the 
other Class SA Certificates are entitled to receive. See "Description of the
Certificates -- Distributions of Principal" and "Prepayment and Yield
Considerations" herein.                                                         

    Although the Class A-3 Certificates are Senior Certificates, the Class A-3
Certificates generally will not be entitled to receive any distributions of     
scheduled principal or principal prepayments on the Group A Mortgage Loans until
the Distribution Date in May 2003. Therefore, the Class A-3 Certificates will   
not be                                                                          

 iii

P-->424B34th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 4th

entitled to receive the disproportionate allocations of such principal          
prepayments that the other Class A Certificates are entitled to receive. See    
"Description of the Certificates -- Distributions of Principal" and "Yield and
Prepayments Considerations" herein.                                             

   The Offered Certificates, other than the Class A-2, Class A-4, Class A-5,
Class A-7 and Class R Certificates, are offered in minimum denominations        
equivalent to not less than $25,000 initial Certificate Principal Balance or    
Notional Principal Amount, as applicable, each and multiples of $1 in excess    
thereof. The Class A-2, Class A-4, Class A-5 and Class A-7 Certificates are     
offered in minimum denominations equivalent to not less than $1,000 initial     
Certificate Principal Balance each and multiples of $1 in excess thereof. The   
Class R-I and Class R-II Certificates, which will each have an initial Class    
Principal Balance of $50, will be offered in registered, certificated form in a 
single denomination of a 100% Percentage Interest each. "Percentage Interest"   
means, as to any Class of Certificates, the percentage obtained by dividing the 
principal denomination of such Certificate by the aggregate of the principal    
denominations of all certificates of the same Class.                            

The Underwriters intend to make a secondary market in the Offered     
Certificates, but have no obligation to do so. There can be no assurance that a 
secondary market for the Offered Certificates will develop, or if it does       
develop, that it will provide Holders of the Offered Certificates with liquidity
of investment at any particular time or for the life of the Offered             
Certificates. The Offered Certificates will not be listed on any securities     
exchange. In addition, the Class R-I and Class R-II Certificates are subject to 
various transfer restrictions described herein.                                 

   The Offered Certificates constitute part of a separate series of Mortgage
Pass-Through Certificates being offered by the Depositor from time to time      
pursuant to the Prospectus. This Prospectus Supplement does not contain complete
information about the offering of the Offered Certificates. Additional          
information is contained in the Prospectus, and investors are urged to read both
this Prospectus Supplement and the Prospectus in full. Sales of the Offered     
Certificates may not be consummated unless the purchaser has received both this 
Prospectus Supplement and the Prospectus.                                       

To the extent that any statements in this Prospectus Supplement modify
statements contained in the Prospectus, the statements in this Prospectus       
Supplement shall control.                                                       

 Upon receipt of a request by an investor who has received an electronic
Prospectus Supplement and Prospectus from an Underwriter or a request by such   
investor's representative within the period during which there is an obligation 
to deliver a Prospectus Supplement and Prospectus, the Depositor or such        
Underwriter will deliver or cause to be delivered, without charge, a paper copy 
of the Prospectus Supplement and Prospectus.                                    

UNTIL 90 DAYS FROM THE DATE OF THIS PROSPECTUS SUPPLEMENT, ALL DEALERS
EFFECTING TRANSACTIONS IN THE OFFERED CERTIFICATES, WHETHER OR NOT PARTICIPATING
IN THIS DISTRIBUTION, MAY BE REQUIRED TO DELIVER A PROSPECTUS SUPPLEMENT AND    
PROSPECTUS. THIS IS IN ADDITION TO THE OBLIGATION OF DEALERS TO DELIVER A       
PROSPECTUS SUPPLEMENT AND PROSPECTUS WHEN ACTING AS UNDERWRITERS AND WITH       
RESPECT TO THEIR UNSOLD ALLOTMENTS OR SUBSCRIPTIONS.                            

It is a condition to the issuance of the Offered Certificates that the
Senior Certificates each be rated "AAA" (except for the Class SA-5, Class SA-X, 
Class A-6 and Class A-X Certificates, which will be rated "AAAr") by Standard & 
Poor's Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc. ("S&P")  
and "AAA" by Duff & Phelps Credit Rating Co. ("DCR" and, together with S&P, the 
"Rating Agencies"), that the Class M Certificates be rated not less than "AA" by
DCR, that the Class B-1 Certificates be rated not less than "A" by DCR, that the
Class B-2 Certificates be rated not less than "BBB" by DCR, that the Class B-3  
Certificates be rated not less than "BB" by DCR, and that the Class B-4         
Certificates be rated not less than "B" by DCR.                                 

iv

P-->424B35th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 5th
INCORPORATION OF CERTAIN DOCUMENTS BY REFERENCE 

 There are incorporated herein by reference all documents filed by or on
behalf of the Trust Fund with the Commission pursuant to Sections 13(a), 13(c), 
14 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the "1934 Act"),
on or subsequent to the date of this Prospectus Supplement and prior to the     
termination of the offering of the Offered Certificates made by this Prospectus 
Supplement. The Depositor will provide without charge to each person to whom    
this Prospectus Supplement and Prospectus are delivered, on request of such     
person, a copy of any or all of the documents incorporated herein by reference  
other than the exhibits to such documents (unless such exhibits are specifically
incorporated by reference in such documents). Requests should be directed to the
Secretary of First Union Residential Securitization Transactions, Inc. in       
writing at 301 South College Street, Charlotte, North Carolina 28288-0600, or by
telephone at (704) 383-3624.                                                    

 v

P-->424B36th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 6th

SUMMARY OF TERMS OF THE OFFERED CERTIFICATES

This summary is qualified in its entirety by reference to the detailed
information appearing elsewhere in this Prospectus Supplement and in the        
accompanying Prospectus. Capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined
shall have the respective meanings assigned them in the Prospectus or elsewhere 
in this Prospectus Supplement.                                                  

Securities Offered.........  Mortgage Pass-Through Certificates, Series 1998-A. 

Trust Fund.................  FURST Mortgage Loan Trust 1998-A (the "Trust Fund")
                            will be formed pursuant to a Pooling and Servicing
                           Agreement (the "Pooling and Servicing Agreement")
                     dated as of April 1, 1998 among First Union
                           Residential Securitization Transactions, Inc., as
                           depositor (the "Depositor"), First Union National
                         Bank ("First Union"), as seller (the "Seller"),
                            First Union Mortgage Corporation, as servicer (the
                           "Servicer"), and Norwest Bank Minnesota, National
                        Association, as trustee (the "Trustee") and as
                            document custodian (the "Document Custodian"). The
                            property of the Trust Fund will include: a pool of
                    first-lien, fixed-rate mortgage loans (the
                       "Mortgage Loans"), secured by deeds of trust,
                    security deeds or mortgages on residential
                           properties that are primarily one- to four-family
                             residential properties (the "Mortgaged Properties")
                           (which pool, as of the Closing Date, will include
                          the Initial Mortgage Loans and subsequently, may
                         include both the Initial Mortgage Loans and any
                          Subsequent Mortgage Loans purchased by the Trust
                          Fund); payments in respect of the Mortgage Loans
                            received on and after the applicable Cut-Off Date;
                         property that secured a Mortgage Loan which has
                         been acquired by foreclosure or deed in lieu of
                  foreclosure; any funds on deposit in the
                          Pre-Funding Account; any funds on deposit in the
                          Capitalized Interest Account (as defined herein)
                             and certain other property, as described more fully
                          herein. With respect to any date, the "Aggregate
                             Loan Balance" will be equal to the aggregate of the
                        outstanding principal balances of all Mortgage
                       Loans as of such date. The "Cut-Off Date Loan
                            Balance" with respect to each Mortgage Loan is the
                         Scheduled Principal Balance (as defined herein)
                        thereof as of the applicable Cut-Off Date. The
                         "Loan Balance" of a Mortgage Loan (other than a
                          Liquidated Mortgage Loan) on any day is equal to
                  its Cut-Off Date Loan Balance, minus all
                         collections applied in reduction of the Cut-Off
                           Date Loan Balance of such Mortgage Loan. The Loan
                           Balance of a Liquidated Mortgage Loan (as defined
                           herein) after the Collection Period in which such
                          Mortgage Loan becomes a Liquidated Mortgage Loan
                             shall be zero. The "Collection Period" with respect
                           to any Distribution Date or Determination Date is
                      the calendar month immediately preceding the
                           calendar month in which such Distribution Date or
                         Determination Date, as the case may be, occurs.
                           Interest on each Mortgage Loan is payable monthly
                            at a rate per annum (the "Loan Rate") specified in
                           the related Mortgage Note on the outstanding Loan
Balance thereof.      

Depositor..................  First Union Residential Securitization             
                        Transactions, Inc. ("FURST"), a North Carolina
                      corporation, a wholly owned, limited purpose
                            subsidiary of the Seller and an affiliate of First
                             Union Capital Markets, will sell the Mortgage Loans
                             to the Trust Fund in exchange for the Certificates.
                    The Mortgage Loans will be acquired by the
    Depositor from the Seller.

 S-1

P-->424B37th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 7th

Seller.....................  First Union National Bank, a national banking      
                         association, a wholly owned subsidiary of First
                           Union Corporation and an affiliate of First Union
                        Capital Markets, will originate or acquire the
                        Mortgage Loans and sell them to the Depositor.

Servicer...................  First Union Mortgage Corporation, a North Carolina 
                         corporation, a wholly owned subsidiary of First
                           Union Corporation and an affiliate of First Union
                           Capital Markets, will service the Mortgage Loans.

Trustee and Document                                                            
Custodian..................  Norwest Bank Minnesota, National Association, a    
                           national banking association, will act as trustee
                   and document custodian of the Trust Fund.

Initial Principal Amount                                                        
of the Offered                                                              
 Certificates.............  $347,077,774 (approximate, subject to an upward or
                downward variance of no more than 5%).

Description of the
Certificates...............  The Certificates will consist of the Class SA      
                     Certificates, Class A Certificates, Class M
                        Certificates, Class B Certificates and Class R
                           Certificates (each, a "Class"). The Certificates,
                       other than Class B-3, Class B-4 and Class B-5
                           Certificates, are sometimes collectively referred
                           to herein as the "Offered Certificates". Only the
                  Offered Certificates are offered hereby.

                         The "Class SA Certificates" will consist of the
                         Class SA-1, Class SA-2, Class SA-3, Class SA-4,
                 Class SA-5 and Class SA-X Certificates.

                       The Class SA-5 Certificates are interest only
                            Certificates. The Class SA-5 Certificates will not
                            receive distributions of principal but will accrue
                             interest on the Class SA-5 Notional Amount (defined
herein).              

                       The Class SA-X Certificates are interest only
                            Certificates. The Class SA-X Certificates will not
                            receive distributions of principal but will accrue
                             interest on the Class SA-X Notional Amount (defined
herein).              

                        The "Class A Certificates" will consist of the
                           Class A-1, Class A-2, Class A-3, Class A-4, Class
                 A-5, Class A-6, Class A-7 and Class A-X
Certificates.         

                      The Class A-6 Certificates are interest only
                           Certificates. The Class A-6 Certificates will not
                            receive distributions of principal but will accrue
                            interest on the Class A-6 Notional Amount (defined
herein).              

                      The Class A-X Certificates are interest only
                           Certificates. The Class A-X Certificates will not
                            receive distributions of principal but will accrue
                            interest on the Class A-X Notional Amount (defined
herein).              

                 The "Class R Certificates" or "Residual
Certificates" will consist of the Class R-I and
  Class R-II Certificates.

                        The "Class B Certificates" will consist of the
                        Class B-1, Class B-2, Class B-3, Class B-4 and
 Class B-5 Certificates.

                            The Class M and Class B Certificates are sometimes
                             collectively referred to herein as the "Subordinate
Certificates."        

                           The Class M, Class B-1 and Class B-2 Certificates
                          are sometimes collectively referred to herein as
                the "Senior Subordinate Certificates."
 S-2

P-->424B38th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 8th

                             The Class B-3, Class B-4 and Class B-5 Certificates
                          are sometimes collectively referred to herein as
                the "Junior Subordinate Certificates."

                         The Class R-I, Class R-II, Class SA and Class A
                             Certificates are sometimes collectively referred to
              herein as the "Senior Certificates."

                             The Class B-3, Class B-4 and Class B-5 Certificates
                           are not offered hereby. Any information contained
                        herein relating to the Class B-3, Class B-4 or
                       Class B-5 Certificates is presented solely to
                       provide a better understanding of the Offered
Certificates.         

                             The approximate initial Class Principal Balances or
                           Notional Principal Amount, if applicable, and the
                       interest rate applicable to each Class of the
                           Offered Certificates (each, a "Certificate Rate")
                   will be as set forth on the cover hereof.

Prepayment and Yield
Considerations...........  The actual rate of prepayment of principal on the
                            Mortgage Loans cannot be predicted. The investment
                          performance of the Offered Certificates may vary
                      materially and adversely from the investment
                             expectations of investors due to prepayments on the
                   Mortgage Loans being higher or lower than
                           anticipated by investors. The actual yield to the
                           Holder of an Offered Certificate may not be equal
                             to the yield anticipated at the time of purchase of
                             the Certificate or, notwithstanding that the actual
                         yield is equal to the yield anticipated at that
                          time, the total return on investment expected by
                          the investor or the weighted average life of the
          Certificate may not be realized.

                             The yield to maturity on the Class M, Class B-1 and
                       Class B-2 Certificates, respectively, will be
                           extremely sensitive to losses (other than Special
                           Hazard Losses, Fraud Losses and Bankruptcy Losses
                           in excess of the applicable coverage therefor) on
                             the Mortgage Loans (and the timing thereof), to the
                   extent such losses are not covered by the
                        applicable Classes of Certificates subordinate
                        thereto, because the entire amount of any such
                        losses will be allocable to each such Class of
                       Certificates until their principal balance is
reduced to zero.      

Weighted Average                                                                
 Life Volatility..........  One indication of the impact of varying prepayment
                           rates on a security is the change in its weighted
                         average life. The "weighted average life" of an
                           Offered Certificate is the average amount of time
                          that will elapse between the date of issuance of
                           the Certificate and the date on which each dollar
                      in reduction of the principal balance of the
                         Certificate is distributed to the investor. Low
                            rates of prepayment may result in the extension of
                          the weighted average life of a Certificate; high
                             rates may result in the shortening of such weighted
                           average life. In general, if the weighted average
                            life of a Certificate purchased at par is extended
                 beyond that initially anticipated, such
                     Certificate's market value may be adversely
                             affected. The weighted average lives of the Offered
                           Certificates, under various prepayment scenarios,
                         are displayed in the tables appearing under the
                          heading "Prepayment and Yield Considerations" in
     this Prospectus Supplement.

Denominations..............  The Offered Certificates, other than the Class A-2,
                     Class A-4, Class A-5, Class A-7 and Class R
                            Certificates, are offered in minimum denominations
                     equivalent to not less than $25,000 initial
Certificate           

 S-3

P-->424B39th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 9th

                            Principal Balance or Notional Principal Amount, as
                        applicable, each and multiples of $1 in excess
                          thereof. The Class A-2, Class A-4, Class A-5 and
                       Class A-7 Certificates are offered in minimum
                          denominations equivalent to not less than $1,000
                        initial Certificate Principal Balance each and
                          multiples of $1 in excess thereof. The Class R-I
                         and Class R-II Certificates, each of which will
                         have an initial Class Principal Balance of $50,
                             will be offered in registered, certificated form in
                             a single denomination of a 100% Percentage Interest
each.                 

Initial Cut-Off Date.......  April 1, 1998.                                     

Pooling and Servicing
Agreement................  The Pooling and Servicing Agreement dated as of  
                            April 1, 1998 among the Depositor, the Seller, the
                          Servicer, the Document Custodian and the Trustee
       relating to the Certificates.

The Initial Mortgage                                                            
Loans......................  The Initial Mortgage Loans to be conveyed to the   
                         Trust Fund consist of Mortgages and the related
                           Mortgage Notes on single-family properties (which
                          may be condominiums, manufactured/modular homes,
                   townhouses, rowhouses or homes in one- to
                       four-family residences), including investment
                           properties, located in 23 states and the District
                         of Columbia. No Loan-to-Value Ratio (as defined
                            herein) (based upon appraisals made at the time of
                            origination of the related Mortgage Loan) relating
                          to any Initial Mortgage Loan exceeded 100% as of
                       the Initial Cut-Off Date. The majority of the
                            Mortgage Loans are not insured by primary mortgage
                         insurance policies, nor does any pool insurance
                        insure the Mortgage Loans. Neither the Offered
                            Certificates nor the underlying Mortgage Loans are
                        guaranteed by the Depositor, the Seller or the
                         Servicer or any affiliate of the Depositor, the
                     Seller or the Servicer. Neither the Offered
                            Certificates nor the underlying Mortgage Loans are
                             guaranteed or insured by any governmental agency or
                          instrumentality. As of the Initial Cut-Off Date,
                        the average Loan Balance was $321,218 the Loan
                         Rates of the Initial Mortgage Loans ranged from
                           7.500% to 10.750% per annum, the weighted average
                           Loan-to-Value Ratio of the Initial Mortgage Loans
                            was 72.72% (based upon appraisals made at the time
                         of the origination of the loans), approximately
                  4.61% of the Initial Mortgage Loans have
                           Loan-to-Value Ratios greater than 80% and have no
                          primary mortgage insurance, the weighted average
                            Loan Rate of the Initial Mortgage Loans was 7.961%
                            per annum, and the weighted average remaining term
                          to amortization maturity of the Initial Mortgage
                      Loans was 302 months. The remaining terms to
                             amortization maturity of the Initial Mortgage Loans
                       as of the Initial Cut-Off Date ranged from 25
                           months to 360 months. The maximum Loan Balance of
                          any Mortgage Loan as of the Initial Cut-Off Date
                             was $1,297,229.63. No Initial Mortgage Loan matures
                           after April 1, 2028. Each of the Initial Mortgage
                        Loans provides for a schedule of substantially
                        level and equal monthly payments sufficient to
                       amortize fully its principal balance over the
                             amortization period for such Initial Mortgage Loan.
                     As of the Cut-Off Date, none of the Initial
                             Mortgage Loans were more than 30 days past due, and
                          none of the Initial Mortgage Loans has been more
                        than 30 days past due more than once in the 12
                         months preceding the Cut-Off Date. The Mortgage
                      Loans consist of 910 loans as of the Initial
                           Cut-Off Date. The Mortgage Loans are divided into
                             two groups ("Loan Group SA" and "Loan Group A", and
                            each a "Loan Group"). All of the Mortgage Loans in
                            Loan Group SA (the "Group SA Mortgage Loans") have
                         original terms to stated maturity (based on the
    date of origination or any

 S-4

P-->424B310th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 10th

                            later modification) of greater than 15 but no more
                        than 30 years and were originated more than 36
                          months prior to the Initial Cut-Off Date. All of
                    the Initial Mortgage Loans in Loan Group A
                           (together with any Subsequent Mortgage Loans, the
                          "Group A Mortgage Loans") have original terms to
                           stated maturity (based on the date of origination
                           or any later modification) of greater than 15 but
                          no more than 30 years and were originated within
                         the last 36 months prior to the Initial Cut-Off
Date.                 

                             The Seller expects the Group SA and Initial Group A
                    Mortgage Loans to have the characteristics
described below.      

 S-5

P-->424B311th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 11th
SELECTED INITIAL MORTGAGE LOAN DATA 
APPROXIMATE AS OF THE INITIAL CUT-OFF DATE

Group SA Mortgage Loans                                                         

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]
                                                                                           
Number of Mortgage Loans.....................                                           568
Aggregate Unpaid Principal Balance...........                               $162,984,200.88
Range of Unpaid Principal Balances...........                     $21,990.50 to $903,623.29
Average Unpaid Principal Balance.............                                   $286,944.02
Range of Loan Rates..........................                             7.500% to 10.750%
Weighted Average Loan Rate...................                                        7.969%
Range of Remaining Terms to Amortization                                                   
  Maturity...................................                              25 to 323 months
Weighted Average Remaining Term to                                                         
  Amortization Maturity......................                                    270 months
Weighted Average Loan Age(1).................                                     68 months
Range of Original Loan-to-Value Ratios.......                              8.00% to 100.00%
Weighted Average Original Loan-to-Value                                                    
  Ratio......................................                                        72.26%
Geographic Concentration of Mortgaged                                                      
  Properties Securing Mortgage Loans in                                                    
  Excess of 5% of Aggregate Unpaid Principal                                               
  Balance(2).................................  Florida-30.00%, New Jersey-26.01%, Virginia-
                                              10.34%, New York-6.66%, Maryland-6.17%, North
                                                                             Carolina-5.28%

---------------                                                                 

(1) Based on the number of months from and including the first Monthly Payment  
to and including the Initial Cut-Off Date.                              
(2) Approximate.                                                                

Initial Group A Mortgage Loans                                                  

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]
                                                                                      
Number of Initial Mortgage Loans.............                                      342
Aggregate Unpaid Principal Balance...........                          $129,324,181.49
Range of Unpaid Principal Balances...........             $138,359.61 to $1,297,229.63
Average Unpaid Principal Balance.............                              $378,140.88
Range of Loan Rates..........................                         7.500% to 9.375%
Weighted Average Loan Rate...................                                   7.950%
Range of Remaining Terms to Amortization                                              
  Maturity...................................                        116 to 360 months
Weighted Average Remaining Term to                                                    
  Amortization Maturity......................                               343 months
Weighted Average Loan Age(1).................                                11 months
Range of Original Loan-to-Value Ratios.......                         23.00% to 96.00%
Weighted Average Original Loan-to-Value                                               
  Ratio......................................                                   73.29%
Geographic Concentration of Mortgaged                                                 
  Properties Securing Initial Mortgage Loans                                          
  in Excess of 5% of Aggregate Unpaid                                                 
  Principal Balance(2)....................... New Jersey-21.34%, Florida-19.25%, North
                                                    Carolina-9.88%, Connecticut-7.23%,
                                              Georgia-6.66%, South Carolina-6.63%, New
                                                            York-6.50%, Virginia-5.01%

---------------                                                                 

(1) Based on the number of months from and including the first Monthly Payment  
to and including the Initial Cut-Off Date.                              
(2) Approximate.                                                                

 S-6

P-->424B312th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 12th

                          For a further description of the Mortgage Loans,
                        see "Description of the Mortgage Pool" herein.

Pre-Funding Account........  On the Closing Date, $57,744,845 (the "Pre-Funded  
                          Amount") will be deposited in a trust account in
                             the name of the Trustee (the "Pre-Funding Account")
                        and may be used to acquire Subsequent Mortgage
                           Loans for inclusion in Loan Group A. The "Funding
                           Period" is the period from the Closing Date until
                            the earlier of (i) the date on which the remaining
                       balance of the Pre-Funded Amount is less than
                          $100,000, and (ii) July 24, 1998. The Pre-Funded
                             Amount will be reduced during the Funding Period by
                      the amount thereof, if any, used to purchase
                          Subsequent Mortgage Loans in accordance with the
                     Pooling and Servicing Agreement. Subsequent
                            Mortgage Loans purchased by and transferred to the
                     Trust Fund on any date (each, a "Subsequent
                             Transfer Date" and, together with the Closing Date,
                           each a "Transfer Date") must satisfy the criteria
                          set forth in the Pooling and Servicing Agreement
                       and will be purchased at a price equal to the
                             Scheduled Principal Balance of each such Subsequent
                          Mortgage Loan as of the close of business on the
                           first day of the month of the Subsequent Transfer
                           Date (the "Subsequent Cut-Off Date"). Any portion
                          of the Pre-Funded Amount remaining at the end of
                 the Funding Period will be applied as a
                         distribution of principal to the Holders of the
                           Class or Classes of Class A Certificates entitled
                   to receive principal distributions on the
                             Distribution Date which immediately follows the end
                        of the Funding Period as described herein. The
                           Pre-Funding Account will be an asset of the Trust
                             Fund but will not be an asset of any of the REMICs.
                             See "Prepayment and Yield Considerations--Mandatory
Prepayment" herein.   

Capitalized Interest                                                            
Account....................  On the Closing Date, cash will be deposited in the 
                         Capitalized Interest Account in the name of the
                            Trustee on behalf of the Trust Fund. The amount on
                      deposit in the Capitalized Interest Account,
                             including reinvestment income thereon, will be used
                         by the Trustee to fund certain interest and fee
                             shortfalls with respect to the Class A Certificates
                          and a portion of the Subordinate Certificates on
                             any Distribution Date during the Funding Period and
                             on the first Distribution Date following the end of
                      the Funding Period as described herein under
                       "Description of the Certificates--Capitalized
Interest Account." The Pooling and Servicing
                            Agreement provides that certain amounts on deposit
                      in the Capitalized Interest Account that are
                             determined not to be required to fund such payments
                            will be periodically distributed to the Seller. In
                        addition, amounts remaining in the Capitalized
                           Interest Account at the end of the Funding Period
                           and not used for such purposes are required to be
                      paid to the Seller. The Capitalized Interest
                             Account will be an asset of the Trust Fund but will
                  not be an asset of either of the REMICs.

Priority of                                                                     
Distributions..............  Commencing in May 1998, on the 25th day of each    
                           month, or if such 25th day is not a Business Day,
                         then on the immediately succeeding Business Day
                            (each, a "Distribution Date"), prior to the Credit
                    Support Depletion Date (as defined below),
                             distributions will generally be made from the Group
                      SA Available Distribution Amount (as defined
                             herein) for such Distribution Date in the order and
                         priority as follows: (1) first, interest to the
                        Class SA Certificates then entitled to receive
                           accrued and unpaid interest, and to the Class R-I
                         and Class R-II Certificates at their respective
                           Certificate Rates as described in "Description of
the Certifi           

 S-7

P-->424B313th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 13th

                         cates -- Distributions of Interest" herein; (2)
                             second, principal to the Class SA Certificates then
                           entitled to principal and the Class R-I and Class
                     R-II Certificates in the order described in
                           "Description of the Certificates -- Distributions
of Principal -- Class SA Certificate Principal
Distributions" herein; (3) third, to the
                     Subordinate Certificates, interest and then
                        principal, as described in "Description of the
Certificates -- Distributions of Interest" and
                       "-- Distributions of Principal -- Subordinate
Certificate Principal Distributions" herein; and
                             (4) fourth, the remainder of the Group SA Available
                             Distribution Amount for such Distribution Date will
                         be distributed to the Holders of the Class R-II
                           Certificates, as described in "Description of the
Certificates -- Distributions of Principal -- Class
SA Certificate Principal Distributions" herein.

                        On each Distribution Date, prior to the Credit
                    Support Depletion Date, distributions will
                      generally be made from the Group A Available
                           Distribution Amount for such Distribution Date in
                      the order of priority as follows: (1) first,
                       interest to the Class A Certificates at their
                      respective Certificate Rates as described in
                            "Descriptions of the Certificates -- Distributions
of Interest" herein; (2) second, principal to the
                            Class A Certificates then entitled to principal in
                    the order described in "Description of the
Certificates -- Distributions of Principal -- Class
A Certificate Principal Distributions" herein; (3)
                          third, to the Subordinate Certificates, interest
                             and then principal, as described in "Description of
the Certificates -- Distributions of Interest" and
                       "-- Distributions of Principal -- Subordinate
Certificate Principal Distributions" herein; and
                            (4) fourth, the remainder of the Group A Available
                             Distribution Amount for such Distribution Date will
                         be distributed to the Holders of the Class R-II
                           Certificates, as described in "Description of the
Certificates -- Distributions of Principal -- Class
A Certificate Principal Distributions" herein.

                        Distributions of interest and principal to the
                         Group SA and Group A Certificates will be based
                         solely on payments received with respect to the
                          Group SA and Group A Loans, respectively, except
                      under the limited circumstances described in
                         "Description of the Certificates -- Priority of
Distributions -- Cross-Collateralization
Provisions" herein.   

                          The "Credit Support Depletion Date" is the first
                         Distribution Date on which the aggregate of the
                           Certificate Principal Balances of the Subordinate
                           Certificates has been or will be reduced to zero.

                          On each Distribution Date on or after the Credit
                    Support Depletion Date, distributions will
                       generally be made from the Group SA Available
                          Distribution Amount in the order and priority as
                          follows: (1) first, the Class SA and the Class R
                        Certificates then entitled to interest receive
                      accrued and unpaid interest, as described in
                           "Description of the Certificates -- Distributions
of Interest"; (2) second, the Class SA Certificates
                            and the Class R Certificates receive principal pro
                            rata according to their respective Class Principal
                            Balances; (3) third, the Class A Certificates then
                          entitled to receive interest receive accrued and
                          unpaid interest, as described in "Description of
the Certificates -- Distributions of Interest", to
                       the extent the Group A Available Distribution
                            Amount for such Distribution Date was insufficient
                   for such purpose; (4) fourth, the Class A
                           Certificates receive principal pro rata according
                             to their respective Class Principal Balances to the
      extent the Group A Available
 S-8

P-->424B314th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 14th

                            Distribution Amount for such Distribution Date was
                           insufficient for such purpose; and (5) fifth, the
                          remaining Group SA Available Distribution Amount
                           for such Distribution Date will be distributed to
      the Class R-II Certificates.

                          On each Distribution Date on or after the Credit
                    Support Depletion Date, distributions will
                      generally be made from the Group A Available
                          Distribution Amount in the order and priority as
                     follows: (1) first, interest to the Class A
                           Certificates, as described in "Description of the
Certificates -- Distribution of Interest" herein;
                           (2) second, principal to the Class A Certificates
                    pro rata according to the respective Class
                     Principal Balances; (3) third, the Class SA
                        Certificates then entitled to receive interest
                           receive accrued and unpaid interest, as described
in "Description of the
Certificates -- Distributions of Interest", to the
                           extent the Group SA Available Distribution Amount
                         for such Distribution Date was insufficient for
                             such purpose; (4) fourth, the Class SA Certificates
                       receive principal pro rata according to their
                           respective Class Principal Balances to the extent
                             the Group SA Available Distribution Amount for such
                     Distribution Date was insufficient for such
                       purpose; and (5) fifth, the remaining Group A
                             Available Distribution Amount for such Distribution
                    Date will be distributed to the Class R-II
Certificates.         

                        For a description of the order and priority of
            distributions, see "Description of
Certificates -- Priority of Distributions" herein.

Interest...................  With respect to each Class of Certificates,        
                         interest will be passed through monthly on each
                         Distribution Date, commencing in May 1998. With
                         respect to each Distribution Date, an amount of
                           interest will accrue on each Class of the Offered
                             Certificates at a rate generally equal to 1/12th of
                        the applicable Certificate Rate for such Class
                           multiplied by the related Class Principal Balance
                             or Class Notional Amount. The Certificate Rates for
                          the Offered Certificates are as set forth on the
                             cover page hereof. The initial Certificate Rate for
                            each Class of Senior Subordinate Certificates will
                            be 7% per annum. Interest to be distributed on the
                            Certificates on any Distribution Date will consist
                       of accrued and unpaid interest as of previous
                            Distribution Dates and interest accrued during the
                           preceding calendar month. No interest will accrue
                           on accrued but unpaid interest. All distributions
                         of interest for each Class of Certificates will
                     generally be made only to the extent of the
                     applicable Available Distribution Amount as
                    described herein under "Description of the
Certificates -- Priority of Distributions".

 See "Description of the
Certificates -- Distributions of Interest" herein.

Compensating Interest......  Subject to the limitations described in this       
                           Prospectus Supplement under "Prepayment and Yield
Considerations", on each Distribution Date, the
                            Servicer is obligated to remit to the Distribution
                          Account an amount equal to the lesser of (a) any
                     shortfall for the related month in interest
                      collections resulting from the timing of (i)
                            Payoffs (as defined herein) made other than on the
                             first of the month or (ii) Curtailments (as defined
                        herein) and (b) the monthly Servicing Fee. The
                      amount so passed through will hereinafter be
                 referred to as "Compensating Interest".
                         Compensating Interest will be allocated to each
                         Class of Certificates pro rata according to the
                     amount of interest accrued thereon, and any
                     remaining shortfall in interest collections
      resulting from the timing of

 S-9

P-->424B315th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 15th

                            prepayments in full on a Mortgage Loan ("Payoffs")
                             or partial principal prepayments on a Mortgage Loan
                             ("Curtailments") will be applied pro rata according
                          to the amount of interest to which each Class of
                     Certificates would otherwise be entitled in
                    reduction thereof. See "Description of the
Certificates -- Distributions of Interest" herein.

Principal (including                                                            
Prepayments).............  General.  On each Distribution Date, the Class SA
                            Certificates will be entitled to receive principal
                   distributions from the Group SA Available
                             Distribution Amount to the extent described herein;
                      the Class A Certificates will be entitled to
                          receive principal distributions from the Group A
                     Available Distribution Amount to the extent
                            described herein; and the Subordinate Certificates
                            will be entitled to receive distributions from the
                            Group SA Available Distribution Amount and Group A
                             Available Distribution Amount. All distributions of
                          principal will be made only to the extent of the
                     applicable Available Distribution Amount as
                    described herein under "Description of the
Certificates -- Priority of Distributions".

                             The Class SA-5, Class SA-X, Class A-6 and Class A-X
                          Certificates will not be entitled to receive any
     distributions of principal.

                 Distributions to Class SA Certificates.

                        On each Distribution Date, prior to the Credit
                             Support Depletion Date, an amount, up to the amount
                       of the Group SA Senior Principal Distribution
                   Amount (as defined in "Description of the
Certificates -- Distributions of Principal -- Class
SA Certificates Principal Distributions" herein)
                            for such Distribution Date, will be distributed as
                            principal to the following Classes of the Class SA
                          Certificates and the Class R Certificates in the
      following order of priority:

                           (i) first, to the Class SA-4 Certificates, an
                                amount, up to the amount of the Class SA-4
                               Lockout Principal Distribution Amount (as
                                 defined herein) for such Distribution Date,
                                until the Class SA-4 Principal Balance has
           been reduced to zero;

                        (ii) second, to the Class R-I and Class R-II
                               Certificates pro rata, the portion of the
                                   Group SA Senior Principal Distribution Amount
                                remaining after the distribution described
                                  above, until the Class R-I Principal Balance
                               and the Class R-II Principal Balance have
           been reduced to zero;

                         (iii) third, the portion of the Group SA Senior
                                   Principal Distribution Amount remaining after
                        the distributions described above,
              sequentially as follows:

                                   (A) first, to the Class SA-1 and Class SA-2
                                       Certificates, pro rata, until the Class
                                     SA-1 Principal Balance and Class SA-2
                                      Principal Balance have been reduced to
     zero;

                                   (B) second, to the Class SA-3 Certificates,
                                      until the Class SA-3 Principal Balance
                             has been reduced to zero; and

                                  (C) third, to the Class SA-4 Certificates,
                                      until the Class SA-4 Principal Balance
                         has been reduced to zero.

S-10

P-->424B316th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 16th

                           On each Distribution Date on and after the Credit
                       Support Depletion Date, principal will not be
                         distributed in the order and priority described
                             above. Instead, an amount up to the Group SA Senior
                             Principal Distribution Amount for such Distribution
                           Date will be distributed as provided herein under
                         "Description of the Certificates -- Priority of
Distributions."       

                    Distributions to the Class A Certificates.

                        On each Distribution Date, prior to the Credit
                             Support Depletion Date, an amount, up to the amount
                             of the Group A Senior Principal Distribution Amount
            (as defined in "Description of the
Certificates -- Distributions of Principal -- Class
A Certificates Principal Distributions" herein) for
                        such Distribution Date, will be distributed as
                           principal to the following Classes of the Class A
                          Certificates in the following order of priority:

                        (i) first, to the Class A-3 Certificates, an
                             amount, up to the amount of the Class A-3
                             Lockout Principal Distribution Amount (as
                               defined herein) for such Distribution Date,
                                  until the Class A-3 Principal Balance has been
    reduced to zero;

                        (ii) second, the portion of the Group A Senior
                                 Principal Distribution Amount remaining after
                      the distributions described above,
            sequentially as follows:

                                 (A) first, to the Class A-1 Certificates,
                                     until the Class A-1 Principal Balance
                         has been reduced to zero;

                                  (B) second, to the Class A-2 Certificates,
                                     until the Class A-2 Principal Balance
                         has been reduced to zero;

                                 (C) third, to the Class A-4 and Class A-7
                                       Certificates, pro rata, until the Class
                                   A-4 Principal Balance and Class A-7
                                      Principal Balance have been reduced to
     zero;

                                  (D) fourth, to the Class A-5 Certificates,
                                     until the Class A-5 Principal Balance
                             has been reduced to zero; and

                                 (E) fifth, to the Class A-3 Certificates,
                                     until the Class A-3 Principal Balance
                         has been reduced to zero.

                           On each Distribution Date on and after the Credit
                       Support Depletion Date, principal will not be
                         distributed in the order and priority described
                      above. Instead, the Group A Senior Principal
                             Distribution Amount for such Distribution Date will
                 be distributed as provided herein under
                     "Description of Certificates -- Priority of
Distributions."       

                            Distributions to the Subordinate Certificates.  On
                      each Distribution Date, an amount, up to the
                          aggregate amount of the Subordinate Distribution
                          Amount (as defined herein) for such Distribution
                       Date, will be distributed as principal to the
                        Subordinate Certificates. On each Distribution
                           Date, each Class of Subordinate Certificates will
                             be entitled to receive its pro rata share (by Class
                         Principal Balance) of the Subordinate Principal
                           Distribution Amount remaining after distributions
                     of interest and principal to all Classes of
                           Subordinate Certificates senior to such Class and
                  distributions of interest to such Class.
                            Notwithstanding the foregoing, on any Distribution
         Date on which the Subordination

S-11

P-->424B317th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 17th

                    Level (as defined herein) for any Class of
                   Subordinate Certificates is less than the
                         Subordination Level as of the Closing Date, the
                          portion of the Subordinate Principal Prepayments
                           Distribution Amount (as defined herein) otherwise
                  allocable to the Class or Classes of the
                            Subordinate Certificates junior to such Class will
                  be allocated to the most senior Class of
                Subordinate Certificates for which the
                             Subordination Level is less than such percentage as
                            of the Closing Date and to the Class or Classes of
                           Subordinate Certificates senior thereto, pro rata
                           according to the Class Principal Balances of such
          Classes. See "Description of the
Certificates -- Priority of Distributions" herein.
                            The relative seniority, from highest to lowest, of
                           the Subordinate Certificates shall be as follows:
                             Class M, Class B-1, Class B-2, Class B-3, Class B-4
and Class B-5.        

                      The rights of the Holders of the Subordinate
                            Certificates to receive distributions of principal
                          are subordinated to the rights of the Holders of
                             the Senior Certificates to receive distributions of
            principal. See "Description of the
Certificates -- Subordination and Allocation of
Losses" herein.       

                For a more detailed description of how
                            distributions of principal will be allocated among
                  the various Classes of Certificates, see
                           "Description of the Certificates -- Distributions
of Principal" herein. 

Subordination and                                                               
Allocation of Losses.......  The Subordinate Certificates will be subordinate in
                            right of payment to and provide credit support for
                         the Senior Certificates; the Junior Subordinate
                      Certificates will be subordinate in right of
                       payment to and provide credit support for the
                        Senior Subordinate Certificates; the Class B-2
                      Certificates will be subordinate in right of
                             payment to and provide credit support for the Class
                         M and Class B-1 Certificates; and the Class B-1
                      Certificates will be subordinate in right of
                             payment to and provide credit support for the Class
                     M Certificates, in each case, to the extent
                       described herein. The support provided by the
                             Subordinate Certificates to the Senior Certificates
                       is intended to afford such Holders protection
                             against certain losses. The support provided by the
                       Junior Subordinate Certificates to the Senior
                             Subordinate Certificates is intended to enhance the
                             likelihood of regular receipt by the Holders of the
                            Senior Subordinate Certificates of the full amount
                            of monthly distributions of interest and principal
                       to which they are entitled and to afford such
                        Holders protection against certain losses. The
                    protection afforded the Senior Subordinate
                             Certificates by the Junior Subordinate Certificates
                            will be accomplished by the preferential right, on
                           each Distribution Date, of the Senior Subordinate
                           Certificates to receive distributions of interest
                     and principal prior to the distributions of
                         interest or principal to the Junior Subordinate
                           Certificates. The protection afforded the Class M
                     Certificates by the Class B-1 and Class B-2
                             Certificates, and the protection afforded the Class
                             B-1 Certificates by the Class B-2 Certificates will
                             be similarly accomplished by the preferential right
                of the Class M Certificates to receive
                          distributions of interest and principal prior to
                             such distributions of interest and principal to the
                      Class B-1 and Class B-2 Certificates and the
                             preferential right of the Class B-1 Certificates to
                  receive such distributions prior to such
                        distributions of interest and principal to the
 Class B-2 Certificates.

S-12

P-->424B318th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 18th

                            Except for Special Hazard Losses, Fraud Losses and
                       Bankruptcy Losses in excess of the designated
                           amount of Special Hazard Coverage, Fraud Coverage
                         and Bankruptcy Coverage, any loss realized with
                            respect to a Mortgage Loan in a Loan Group will be
                          allocated among the related Certificates (i) for
                         losses allocable to principal (a) first, to the
                    Junior Subordinate Certificates, until the
                           aggregate of the Class Principal Balances thereof
                             have been reduced to zero, (b) second, to the Class
                         B-2 Certificates, until the Class B-2 Principal
                             Balance has been reduced to zero, (c) third, to the
                     Class B-1 Certificates, until the Class B-1
                         Principal Balance has been reduced to zero, (d)
                        fourth, to the Class M Certificates, until the
                            Class M Principal Balance has been reduced to zero
                           and (e) fifth, to the related Senior Certificates
                           (other than the Class SA-5, Class SA-X, Class A-6
                             and Class A-X Certificates), pro rata, according to
                        their Class Principal Balances in reduction of
                             their respective Class Principal Balances; and (ii)
                            for losses allocable to interest (a) first, to the
                          Junior Subordinate Certificates, in reduction of
                         accrued but unpaid interest thereon and then in
                          reduction of the Class Principal Balances of the
                             Junior Subordinate Certificates, (b) second, to the
                             Class B-2 Certificates, in reduction of accrued but
                          unpaid interest thereon and then in reduction of
                            the Class B-2 Principal Balance, (c) third, to the
                             Class B-1 Certificates, in reduction of accrued but
                          unpaid interest thereon and then in reduction of
                             the Class B-1 Principal Balance, (d) fourth, to the
                           Class M Certificates, in reduction of accrued but
                          unpaid interest thereon and then in reduction of
                          the Class M Principal Balance, (e) fifth, to the
                            applicable Senior Certificates, pro rata according
                             to accrued but unpaid interest thereon and then pro
                             rata according to their Class Principal Balances in
                       reduction of their respective Class Principal
  Balances, as applicable.

                           The allocation of the principal portion of losses
                           relating to a Mortgage Loan in a given Loan Group
                           to all Classes of the related Senior Certificates
                      and to the Subordinate Certificates pro rata
                       according to their respective Class Principal
                             Balances and the allocation of the interest portion
                       of losses pro rata according to the amount of
                          interest accrued on each such Class in reduction
                           thereof and then, pro rata, in reduction of their
                        related Class Principal Balance is hereinafter
                            referred to as "Pro Rata Allocation." For purposes
                   of any Pro Rata Allocation in part to the
                             Subordinate Certificates, each Class of Subordinate
                     Certificates will be deemed to have a Class
                            Principal Balance (and to accrue interest thereon)
                             equal to the actual Class Principal Balance thereof
                             multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is
                          the Group SA Subordinate Amount (for a loss on a
                            Group SA Mortgage Loan) or the Group A Subordinate
                             Amount (for a loss on a Group A Mortgage Loan), and
                          the denominator of which is the aggregate of the
                     Group SA Subordinate Amount and the Group A
                      Subordinate Amount (each as defined herein).

                        Since the Subordinate Certificates will absorb
                        losses on Mortgage Loans in both Mortgage Loan
                          Groups, a disproportionate amount of losses with
                          respect to Mortgage Loans in one Loan Group will
                             adversely impact the subordination available to the
                       Senior Certificates related to the other Loan
Group.                

S-13

P-->424B319th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 19th

                            Special Hazard Losses, Fraud Losses and Bankruptcy
                             Losses in excess of the applicable coverage will be
                         allocated to all outstanding Classes of related
                          Certificates by Pro Rata Allocation. Each of the
                           applicable coverages may be reduced periodically,
                      as described herein. See "Description of the
Certificate -- Subordination and Allocation of
Losses" and "-- Distributions of Principal" herein.

Credit Enhancements........  Subordination.  The subordination of the           
                  Subordinate Certificates and the further
                       subordination within the Class of Subordinate
                             Certificates described above and in "Description of
the Certificates -- Subordination and Allocation of
Losses" will provide credit enhancement to the
                           Senior Certificates and each Class of Subordinate
                     Certificates with lower Class designations.

Class A-7 Reserve Fund.  A reserve fund of
                       approximately $12,500 (the "Class A-7 Reserve
Fund") for the benefit of the Holders of the Class
                           A-7 Certificates, which will be an asset of REMIC
                 II, will be established at the time the
                             Certificates are issued. No additional amounts will
                            be deposited into the Class A-7 Reserve Fund after
                          the initial deposit. The Funds on deposit in the
                      Class A-7 Reserve Fund will not be invested.

                           A withdrawal from the Class A-7 Reserve Fund will
                          be made on each of the first twelve Distribution
                     Dates equal to the product of (i) the Class
                            Principal Balance of the Class A-7 Certificates on
                 the day immediately preceding each such
                           Distribution and (ii) approximately 0.04167%. The
                            Holders of the Class A-7 Certificates will receive
                           such amount as a distribution of interest on each
                 of the first twelve Distribution Dates.

                             Any amounts remaining in the Class A-7 Reserve Fund
                        at the end of such twelve month period will be
                      distributed to the Holders of the Class R-II
Certificates.         

                           Shifting of Interests.  The Class SA Certificates
                    entitled to principal will receive 100% of
                           Prepayments received with respect to the Group SA
                           Mortgage Loans until the earliest to occur of (i)
                         the fifth anniversary of the first Distribution
                         Date, (ii) the Credit Support Depletion Date or
                       (iii) the Distribution Date on which Class SA
                        Certificates are retired. During the next four
                        years, unless previously retired, the Class SA
                           Certificates entitled to principal will receive a
                            disproportionately large, but decreasing, share of
                  such Prepayments. This will result in an
                           acceleration of the amortization of such Class SA
                           Certificates, subject to the priorities described
in "Description of the
Certificates -- Distributions of Principal" herein,
                       enhancing the likelihood that Holders of such
                       Classes of Certificates will be paid the full
                         amount of principal to which they are entitled.

                             The Class A Certificates entitled to principal will
                       receive 100% of the Prepayments received with
                         respect to the Group A Mortgage Loans until the
                           earliest to occur of (i) the fifth anniversary of
                      the first Distribution Date, (ii) the Credit
                          Support Depletion Date or (iii) the Distribution
                             Date on which the Class A Certificates are retired.
                       During the next four years, unless previously
                       retired, the Class A Certificates entitled to
                            principal will receive a disproportionately large,
                         but decreasing, share of such Prepayments. This
                            will result in an acceleration of the amortization
                      of such Class A Certificates, subject to the
 priorities described in
S-14

P-->424B320th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 20th
"Description of the Certificates -- Distributions
of Principal" herein, enhancing the likelihood that
                         Holders of such Classes of Certificates will be
                             paid the full amount of principal to which they are
entitled.             

                            For a more detailed description of how Prepayments
                             are allocated among the Senior Certificates and the
                           Subordinate Certificates, see "Description of the
Certificates -- Distributions of Principal" herein.

Advances...................  The Servicer will be obligated to make advances of 
                             cash in an amount equal to all amounts of scheduled
                           principal and interest, if any, at the time known
                           by the Servicer to be delinquent on each Mortgage
                           Loan and not previously advanced, but only to the
                            extent that such amounts are deemed recoverable by
                             the Servicer. Any advance made by the Servicer with
                            respect to a Mortgage Loan will be reimbursable to
                        it. The Servicer will be entitled to reimburse
                        itself in respect of otherwise non-recoverable
                        advances from funds otherwise distributable to
                     Certificateholders. See "Description of the
Certificates -- Advances" herein. The Servicer may
                           distribute Payaheads paid to the Servicer not yet
                        due in lieu of a required advance of scheduled
                       principal and interest, but must increase its
                      advances in subsequent months for which such
                       Payaheads are due to cover scheduled payments
represented thereby.  

Servicing Fee..............  The Servicer will receive a fee (the "Servicing    
                      Fee") with respect to each Collection Period
                           computed at an annual rate equal to not more than
                            0.44% on the Loan Balance of each Mortgage Loan as
                         of the first day of each such Collection Period
                           and, for any Distribution Date, the Servicing Fee
                        will be deducted from collections allocable to
                          payments of interest received during the related
                    Collection Period. See "Description of the
Certificates -- Servicing and Other Compensation
and Payment of Expenses" herein.

Trustee Fee................  The Trustee will receive a fee (the "Trustee Fee") 
                            with respect to each Collection Period computed at
                           an annual rate equal to 0.01% on the Loan Balance
                           of each Mortgage Loan as of the first day of each
                          such Collection Period and, for any Distribution
                     Date, the Trustee Fee will be deducted from
                       collections allocable to payments of interest
                        received during the related Collection Period.

Optional Termination by the                                                     
Servicer.................  The Servicer may, at its option, terminate the   
                        Pooling and Servicing Agreement on any date on
                             which the Aggregate Loan Balance is less than 5% of
                           the sum of (i) the aggregate principal balance of
                           the Mortgage Loans as of the Initial Cut-Off Date
                             (the "Initial Cut-Off Date Aggregate Loan Balance")
                         and (ii) the original Pre-Funded Amount, at the
                          price described herein under "Description of the
Certificates -- Termination; Purchase of Mortgage
Loans."               

Certain Federal Income Tax                                                      
Consequences.............  For federal income tax purposes, the Trust Fund  
                          will make one or more elections to treat certain
                             assets of the Trust Fund as one or more REMICs. The
                            Certificates (other than the Class R Certificates)
                             will constitute "Regular Interests" in REMIC II and
                          generally will be treated for federal income tax
                       purposes as debt instruments of REMIC II with
                       payment terms equivalent to the terms of such
                          certificates. The Class R-I Certificates and the
                            Class R-II Certificates will constitute the single
                            class of "Residual Interests" in REMIC I and REMIC
II,                   
S-15

P-->424B321st Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 21st

                             respectively. Continued qualification of each REMIC
                         of the Trust Fund as a REMIC will be subject to
                          compliance with the applicable provisions of the
                        Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the
                            "Code"), and the related requirements set forth in
              the Pooling and Servicing Agreement.

                      Interest on the Offered Certificates will be
                      required to be included in the income of the
                        Holders thereof in accordance with the accrual
                           method of accounting. The Class SA-5, Class SA-X,
                           Class A-6 and Class A-X Certificates will be (and
                       other Classes of Offered Certificates may be)
                         issued with original issue discount for federal
                           income tax purposes. Original issue discount must
                           be included in income as it accrues on a constant
                      yield method, regardless of whether a Holder
                             receives concurrently the cash attributable to such
  original issue discount.

                           A Holder of a Residual Certificate generally will
                          be required to include in income the REMIC's net
                             income or net loss, without regard to the timing or
                         amount of cash distributions. It is anticipated
                       that all or a substantial part of the taxable
                          income of REMIC II and REMIC I includible by the
                             Class R-II and Class R-I Certificateholders will be
                         treated as "excess inclusion" income subject to
                        special rules and requirements under the Code.
                         Accordingly, the tax liability of a Holder of a
                            Residual Certificate attributable to the ownership
                             of a residual interest may substantially exceed the
                          amount of cash distributed thereon, and thus the
                          after-tax return of the Class R-II and Class R-I
                            Certificates may be significantly lower than would
                             be the case were those Certificates treated as debt
                      instruments for federal income tax purposes.
                       Further significant restrictions apply to the
               transfer of the Class R Certificates.

                       For further information regarding the federal
                             income tax consequences of investing in the Offered
                       certificates, see "Certain Federal Income Tax
Consequences" herein and in the Prospectus.

Transfer Restrictions on                                                        
Residual Certificates......  A Residual Certificate may not be transferred, sold
                          or otherwise assigned unless generally, prior to
                            such transfer, the proposed transferee delivers to
                            the Trustee an affidavit to the effect that, among
                other things, such transferee is not a
                           "disqualified organization" within the meaning of
                            the Code. If, notwithstanding such restrictions, a
                  Residual Certificate is transferred to a
                            "disqualified organization", a substantial tax may
                        be imposed on the transferor. In the case of a
                           purported transfer of a Residual Certificate to a
                         non-U.S. person, certain additional significant
                           conditions must be satisfied prior to transfer of
                      the Residual Certificate. In addition to the
                        foregoing, Treasury regulations prescribe that
                        certain transfers of a Residual Certificate be
                         disregarded with the result that the transferor
                         will continue to be treated as the owner of the
                     Residual Certificate for federal income tax
                   purposes. See "Certain Federal Income Tax
Consequences" herein and in the Prospectus.

ERISA Considerations.......  A fiduciary of a pension or other employee benefit 
                        plan (an "ERISA Plan") subject to the Employee
                            Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended
                      ("ERISA"), contemplating the purchase of the
                      Offered Certificates should consult with its
                            counsel before making a purchase and the fiduciary
                     and such legal advisors should consider the
                            possible application of the prohibited transaction
rules under ERISA and 

S-16

P-->424B322nd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 22nd

                       the Code and the possible availability of the
                            prohibited transaction exemption and certain other
                 exemptions described herein. See "ERISA
Considerations" herein and in the Prospectus.

                      Subject to the considerations and conditions
                           described under "ERISA Considerations" herein, it
                         is expected that the Senior Certificates (other
                            than the Class R Certificates) may be purchased by
                         an ERISA Plan. The Class R Certificates and the
                    Senior Subordinate Certificates may not be
                        transfered except upon satisfaction of certain
                        conditions. See "ERISA Considerations" herein.

Legal Investment                                                                
Considerations...........  As of the date of their issuance, the Offered    
                          Certificates, other than the Class B-1 and Class
                             B-2 Certificates, will constitute "mortgage related
                            securities" for purposes of the Secondary Mortgage
                         Market Enhancement Act of 1984 ("SMMEA"). SMMEA
                             provides that states may override its provisions on
                    legal investment and restrict or condition
                             investment in mortgage related securities by taking
                            statutory action prior to October 4, 1991. Certain
                   states have enacted legislation which has
                        overridden the provisions of SMMEA. See "Legal
Investment Considerations" herein. It is
                      anticipated that the Class B-1 and Class B-2
                      Certificates will not be rated in one of the
                   highest rating categories by a nationally
                         recognized statistical rating organization and,
                          therefore, will not constitute "mortgage related
            securities" for purposes of SMMEA.

                      Institutions whose investment activities are
                             subject to review by certain regulatory authorities
                         may be or may become subject to restrictions on
                          investment in the Offered Certificates, and such
                        restrictions may be retroactively imposed. The
                             Federal Financial Institutions Examination Council,
                        the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the
                        Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, the
                           Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System,
                           the Office of Thrift Supervision and the National
                  Credit Union Administration have adopted
                           guidelines, and have proposed policies, regarding
                            the suitability of investments in various types of
                          derivative mortgage-backed securities, including
                         securities such as the Offered Certificates. In
                      addition, several states have adopted or are
                     considering regulations that would prohibit
                 regulated institutions subject to their
                   jurisdiction from holding mortgage-backed
                      securities such as the Offered Certificates,
                         including such securities previously purchased.
                           Investors should consult their own legal advisors
                       in determining whether and to what extent the
                           Offered Certificates constitute legal investments
for such investors.   

Use of Proceeds............  Substantially all of the net proceeds from the sale
                            of the Offered Certificates will be applied by the
                         Depositor to the purchase price of the Mortgage
                          Loans and to pay expenses connected with pooling
                          the Mortgage Loans and issuing the Certificates,
                           including funding the Pre-Funding Account and the
       Capitalized Interest Account.

S-17

P-->424B323rd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 23rd

Certificate Rating.........  It is a condition to the issuance of the Offered   
                           Certificates that the Senior Certificates each be
                             rated "AAA" (except for the Class SA-5, Class SA-X,
                             Class A-6 and Class A-X Certificates, which will be
                    rated "AAAr") by Standard & Poor's Ratings
                            Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies,
                        Inc. ("S&P") and "AAA" by Duff & Phelps Credit
                           Rating Co. ("DCR"), that the Class M Certificates
                            be rated not less than "AA" by DCR, that the Class
                             B-1 Certificates be rated not less than "A" by DCR,
                          and that the Class B-2 Certificates be rated not
                    less than "BBB" by DCR, that the Class B-3
                          Certificates be rated not less than "BB" by DCR,
                          and that the Class B-4 Certificates be rated not
less than "B" by DCR. 

Registration of Offered                                                         
Certificates.............  Except in certain limited circumstances as       
                            described herein, the Offered Certificates (except
                         for the Class R Certificates) generally will be
                       available only in book-entry form through the
                             facilities of The Depository Trust Company ("DTC").
         See "Risk Factors -- Book-Entry
System", "Description of the
Certificates -- Book-Entry Registration" and
              "-- Definitive Certificates" herein.

S-18

P-->424B324th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 24th

RISK FACTORS
LIMITED LIQUIDITY                                                               

There is currently no market for the Offered Certificates. While the  
Underwriters currently intend to make a market in the Offered Certificates, they
are under no obligation to do so. There can be no assurance that a secondary    
market will develop or, if a secondary market does develop, that it will provide
Holders of the Offered Certificates with liquidity of investment or that it will
continue for the lives of the Offered Certificates. The Offered Certificates    
will not be listed on any securities exchange.                                  

Issuance of the Offered Certificates in book-entry form may reduce the
liquidity of such Certificates in the secondary trading market since investors  
may be unwilling to purchase Offered Certificates for which they cannot obtain  
physical certificates. See "Description of the Certificates -- Book-Entry
Registration" herein.                                                           

RISKS ASSOCIATED WITH MORTGAGE LOANS                                            

    In addition, adverse economic conditions (which may or may not affect real
property values) may affect the timely payment by borrowers of payments of      
principal and interest when due on the Mortgage Loans and, accordingly, the     
actual rates of delinquencies, foreclosures and losses with respect to the      
Mortgage Loans. Further, application of federal and state bankruptcy and debtor 
relief laws would affect the interests of the Certificateholders in the Mortgage
Loans if such laws result in certain Mortgage Loans being uncollectible. See    
"Certain Legal Aspects of the Mortgage Loans -- Anti-Deficiency Legislation;
Bankruptcy and Consumer Protection Legislation" herein.                         

   Even assuming that the Mortgaged Properties provide adequate security for
the Mortgage Loans, delay could be encountered in connection with the           
liquidation of defaulted Mortgage Loans, with corresponding delays in the       
receipt of related proceeds by the Certificateholders. Further, the Servicer    
will be entitled to deduct from Liquidation Proceeds all expenses reasonably    
incurred in attempting to recover amounts due on Liquidated Mortgage Loans and  
not yet repaid, including legal fees and costs of legal action, real estate     
taxes, and maintenance and preservation expenses, thereby reducing collections  
available to the Certificateholders. In the event that any Mortgaged Properties 
fail to provide adequate security for the related Mortgage Loans and the        
protection provided by the subordination feature is insufficient,               
Certificateholders could experience a loss on their investment. See "Certain
Legal Aspects of the Mortgage Loans -- Foreclosure" and "-- Rights of
Redemption" herein.                                                             

    Under federal and state environmental legislation and applicable case law,
it is unclear whether liability for costs of eliminating environmental hazards  
in respect of real property may be imposed on a secured lender (such as the     
Trust Fund) acquiring title to such real property. Such costs could be          
substantial. See "Certain Legal Aspects of the Mortgage Loans -- Environmental
Legislation" herein.                                                            

LOCAL REAL ESTATE MARKETS                                                       

    An overall decline in the residential real estate markets in the states in
which the Mortgaged Properties are located could adversely affect the values of 
the Mortgaged Properties such that the outstanding Loan Balances equal or exceed
the value of the Mortgaged Properties. Such declines could reduce the interest  
of the holder of a mortgage on the Mortgaged Property. Residential real estate  
markets in many states have softened in recent years. There is no reliable      
information available to the Seller with respect to the rate at which real      
estate values have declined in such states. The Seller can neither quantify the 
impact of such declines in property values nor predict how long such declines   
may continue or when such declines will end. During a period of such declines,  
the rates of delinquencies, foreclosures and losses on the Mortgage Loans would 
be expected to be higher than those experienced in the mortgage lending industry
in general.                                                                     

     A rise in interest rates over a period of time and the general condition of
the Mortgaged Property as well as other factors may have the effect of reducing 
the value of the Mortgaged Property from the appraised value at the time the    
Mortgage Loan was originated. If there is a reduction in value of the Mortgaged 
Property, the ratio of the amount of the Mortgage Loan to the value of the      
Mortgaged Property may increase over what it                                    

S-19

P-->424B325th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 25th

was at the time the Mortgage Loan was originated. Such an increase may reduce   
the likelihood of liquidation or other proceeds being sufficient to satisfy the 
Mortgage Loan after satisfaction of any senior liens.                           

PREPAYMENTS; DUE-ON-SALE PROVISIONS                                             

   The Mortgage Loans may be prepaid in whole or in part at any time without
penalty. In addition, a substantial portion of the Mortgage Loans contain       
due-on-sale provisions which, to the extent enforced by the Servicer, will      
result in prepayment of such Mortgage Loans. See "Prepayment and Yield
Considerations" and "Certain Legal Aspects of the Mortgage
Loans -- Enforceability of Certain Provisions" herein. The rate of prepayments  
on fixed-rate mortgage loans, such as the Mortgage Loans, is sensitive to       
prevailing interest rates. Generally, if prevailing interest rates fall         
significantly below the interest rates on the Mortgage Loans, the Mortgage Loans
are likely to be subject to higher prepayment rates than if prevailing rates    
remain at or above the interest rates on the Mortgage Loans. Conversely, if     
prevailing interest rates rise significantly above the interest rates on the    
Mortgage Loans, the rate of prepayments is likely to decrease. The average life 
of the Offered Certificates, and, if purchased at other than par, the yields    
realized by Holders of the Offered Certificates, will be sensitive to levels of 
payment (including prepayments relating to the Mortgage Loans, the              
"Prepayments") on the Mortgage Loans. In general, the yield on an Offered       
Certificate that is purchased at a premium from the outstanding principal amount
thereof will be adversely affected by a higher than anticipated level of        
Prepayments of the Mortgage Loans and enhanced by a lower than anticipated      
level. Conversely, the yield on an Offered Certificate that is purchased at a   
discount from the outstanding principal amount thereof will be enhanced by a    
higher than anticipated level of Prepayments and adversely affected by a lower  
than anticipated level.                                                         

     The yield to maturity on the Class SA-5 and Class SA-X Certificates will be
extremely sensitive to the level of Prepayments of the Group SA Mortgage Loans. 
Therefore, the yield to maturity on the Class SA-5 and Class SA-X Certificates  
will decrease as a result of faster than expected Prepayments on the Group SA   
Mortgage Loans. Prospective investors should fully consider the risks associated
with an investment in the Class SA-5 and Class SA-X Certificates, including the 
possibility that if the rate of Prepayments on the Group SA Mortgage Loans is   
rapid, such investors may not fully recoup their initial investments.           

   The yield to maturity on the Class A-6 and Class A-X Certificates will be
extremely sensitive to the level of Prepayments of the Group A Mortgage Loans.  
Therefore, the yield to maturity on the Class A-6 and Class A-X Certificates    
will decrease as a result of faster than expected Prepayments on the Group A    
Mortgage Loans. Prospective investors should fully consider the risks associated
with an investment in the Class A-6 and Class A-X Certificates, including the   
possibility that if the rate of Prepayments on the Group A Mortgage Loans is    
rapid, such investors may not fully recoup their initial investments.           

     The yield to maturity on each Class of Senior Subordinate Certificates will
be extremely sensitive to realized losses on the Mortgage Loans (other than     
Special Hazard Losses, Fraud Losses and Bankruptcy Losses in excess of the      
applicable coverage therefor provided by the Subordinate Certificates), because 
a disproportionately large amount of such losses (rather than a pro rata portion
thereof) generally will be allocable to such Classes of Certificates following  
the reduction of the aggregate Class Principal Balances of the Junior           
Subordinate Certificates to zero, as described under "Description of the
Certificates -- Subordination and Allocation of Losses" herein.                 

RISKS OF HOLDING SUBORDINATE CERTIFICATES                                       

The rights of the Holders of the Subordinate Certificates to receive  
distributions with respect to the Mortgage Loans will be subordinated to such   
rights of the Holders of the Senior Certificates and the rights of the Holders  
of each Class of Subordinate Certificates to receive such distributions with    
respect to the Mortgage Loans will be subordinated to such rights of the Class  
or Classes of Subordinate Certificates subordinate thereto in each case only to 
the extent described herein. Delinquencies that are not advanced by or on behalf
of the Servicer (because the amounts, if advanced, would be nonrecoverable),    
will adversely affect the yield on the Subordinate Certificates. Because of the 
priority of distributions, shortfalls resulting from delinquencies not so       
advanced will be borne first by the Subordinate Certificates, in reverse order  
of their Class                                                                  

S-20

P-->424B326th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 26th

designations, and then by the related Senior Certificates. If, as a result of   
such shortfalls, the aggregate of the Class Principal Balances of all Classes of
Certificates exceeds the Aggregate Loan Balance, the Class of Subordinate       
Certificates then outstanding with the highest Class designation will be reduced
by the amount of such excess.                                                   

     The weighted average life of, and the yield to maturity on, the Subordinate
Certificates, in decreasing order of their priority of distributions, will be   
progressively more sensitive to the rate and timing of Mortgagor defaults and   
the severity of ensuing losses on the Mortgage Loans. If the actual rate and    
severity of losses on the Mortgage Loans is higher than those assumed by a      
Holder of a Subordinate Certificate, the actual yield to maturity of such       
Certificate may be lower than the yield expected by such Holder based on such   
assumption. The timing of losses on the Mortgage Loans will also affect an      
investor's actual yield to maturity, even if the rate of defaults and severity  
of losses over the life of the Mortgage Loans are consistent with such investors
expectations. In general, the earlier a loss occurs the greater the effect on an
investor's yield to maturity. Losses on the Mortgage Loans will reduce the Class
Principal Balance of the Subordinate Certificates to the extent of any losses   
allocated thereto without the receipt of cash attributable to such reduction.   
See "Description of the Certificates -- Subordination and Allocation of Losses" 
herein. As a result of such reductions, less interest will accrue on such       
Classes of Subordinate Certificates than otherwise would be the case. The yield 
to maturity of the Subordinate Certificates will also be affected by            
disproportionate allocations of Prepayments to the Senior Certificates and other
cash shortfalls in Available Funds. See "Description of the
Certificates -- Subordination and Allocation of Losses" herein.                 

    Since the Subordinate Certificates will absorb losses on Mortgage Loans in
both Loan Groups, a disproportionate amount of losses with respect to Mortgage  
Loans in one Loan Group will adversely impact the availability of subordination 
to the Senior Certificates related to the other Loan Group.                     

LIMITED SOURCE OF PAYMENTS -- NO RECOURSE TO DEPOSITOR, SELLER, SERVICER OR     
TRUSTEE                                                                         

The Mortgage Loans are to be the sole source of payments on the       
Certificates. The Certificates do not represent an interest in or obligation of 
the Depositor, the Seller, the Servicer, the Trustee or any of their affiliates,
except for the limited obligations of the Depositor and the Seller with respect 
to certain breaches of their representations and warranties and of the Servicer 
with respect to its servicing obligations. Neither the Certificates nor the     
Mortgage Loans will be guaranteed by or insured by any governmental agency or   
instrumentality, the Depositor, the Seller, the Servicer, the Trustee or any of 
their affiliates. Consequently, in the event that payments on the Mortgage Loans
are insufficient or otherwise unavailable to make all payments required on the  
Certificates, there will be no recourse to the Depositor, the Seller, the       
Servicer, the Trustee or any of their affiliates.                               

GEOGRAPHIC CONCENTRATION                                                        

    Approximately 25.24% of all Initial Mortgage Loans, 30.00% of the Group SA
Mortgage Loans and approximately 19.25% of the Initial Group A Mortgage Loans   
(by Initial Cut-Off Date Principal Balances) are secured by Mortgaged Properties
located in the State of Florida. In addition, approximately 26.01% and 10.34% of
the Group SA Mortgage Loans are located in New Jersey and Virginia,             
respectively. Approximately 21.34%, 9.88%, 7.23%, 6.66%, and 6.63% of the       
Initial Group A Mortgage Loans (by Initial Cut-Off Date Principal Balance) are  
located in New Jersey, North Carolina, Connecticut, Georgia and South Carolina  
respectively.                                                                   

BOOK-ENTRY SYSTEM 

   Since transactions in the Class SA Certificates, the Class A Certificates
and the Senior Subordinate Certificates (the "Book-Entry Certificates")         
generally can be effected only through The Depository Trust Company ("DTC"),    
participating organizations, indirect participants and certain banks, the       
ability of a Certificateholder to pledge a Book-Entry Certificate to persons or 
entities that do not participate in the DTC system, or otherwise to take actions
with respect to such Certificates, may be limited due to a lack of a physical   
certificate representing the Book-Entry Certificates. In addition, the          
Certificateholders may experi-                                                  

S-21

P-->424B327th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 27th

ence some delay in their receipt of distribution of interest and principal on   
the Book-Entry Certificates, since such distributions will be forwarded by the  
Trustee (or its duly appointed paying agent, if any) to DTC, and DTC will credit
such distributions to the accounts of DTC Participants (as defined herein) which
will thereafter credit them to the accounts of Certificateholders either        
directly or indirectly through indirect participants. Also, issuance of the     
Book-Entry Certificates in book-entry form may reduce the liquidity thereof in  
any secondary trading market that may develop therefor because investors may be 
unwilling to purchase securities for which they cannot obtain delivery of       
physical certificates. See "Description of the Certificates -- Book-Entry
Registration" herein.                                                           

CERTIFICATE RATINGS 

The rating of the Offered Certificates will depend primarily on an    
assessment by the Rating Agencies of the underlying Mortgage Loans and the      
amount of subordination. The rating by the Rating Agencies of the Offered       
Certificates is not a recommendation to purchase, hold or sell the Offered      
Certificates, in as much as such rating does not comment as to the market price 
or suitability for a particular investor. There is no assurance that the ratings
will remain for any given period of time or that the ratings will not be        
reduced, suspended or withdrawn by the Rating Agencies.                         

RISK OF YEAR 2000                                                               

    The transition from the year 1999 to the year 2000 may disrupt the ability
of computerized systems to process information. The Servicer and the Trustee are
currently modifying their computer systems and applications such that they will 
be year 2000 compliant by no later than August 31, 1999. If the Servicer or the 
Trustee is unable to complete such modifications by the year 2000, the ability  
of the Servicer or Trustee to service the Mortgage Loans and make distributions 
to the Certificateholders, respectively, may be materially and adversely        
affected.                                                                       

OTHER LEGAL CONSIDERATIONS                                                      

     Certain states have imposed statutory prohibitions which limit the remedies
of a beneficiary under a deed of trust, security deed or a mortgagee under a    
mortgage. In some states, statutes limit the right of the beneficiary or        
mortgagee to obtain a deficiency judgment against the borrower following        
foreclosure or sale under a deed of trust, security deed or mortgage. A         
deficiency judgment would be a personal judgment against the former borrower    
equal in most cases to the difference between the net amount received upon the  
public sale of the real property and the amount due to the lender. Other        
statutes require the beneficiary or mortgagee to exhaust the security afforded  
under a deed of trust, security deed or mortgage by foreclosure in an attempt to
satisfy the full debt before bringing a personal action against the borrower.   
Finally, other statutory provisions limit any deficiency judgment against the   
former borrower following a judicial sale to the excess of the outstanding debt 
over the fair market value of the property at the time of the public sale. The  
purpose of these statutes is generally to prevent a beneficiary or a mortgagee  
from obtaining a large deficiency judgment against the former borrower as a     
result of low or no bids at the judicial sale.                                  

    Applicable state laws generally regulate interest rates and other charges,
require certain disclosures, and require licensing of the Seller. In addition,  
other state laws, public policy and general principles of equity relating to the
protection of consumers, unfair and deceptive practices and debt collection     
practices may apply to the origination, servicing and collection of the Mortgage
Loans. The Seller will be required to repurchase any Mortgage Loans which, at   
the time of origination did not comply with applicable federal and state laws   
and regulations. Depending on the provisions of the applicable law and the      
specific facts and circumstances involved, violations of these laws, policies   
and principles may limit the ability of the Trust Fund to collect all or part of
the principal of or interest on the Mortgage Loans, may entitle the borrower to 
a refund of amounts previously paid and, in addition, could subject the Trust   
Fund to damages and administrative enforcement. See "Certain Legal Aspects of
Mortgage Loans" herein.                                                         

S-22

P-->424B328th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 28th

The Mortgage Loans are also subject to federal laws, including:       

     (i) the federal Truth in Lending Act and Regulation Z promulgated
  thereunder, which require certain disclosures to the borrowers regarding
the terms of the Mortgage Loans;                                      

      (ii) the Equal Credit Opportunity Act and Regulation B promulgated
     thereunder, which prohibit discrimination on the basis of age, race, color,
sex, religion, marital status, national origin, receipt of public     
assistance or the exercise of any right under the Consumer Credit     
Protection Act, in the extension of credit;                           

    (iii) the Fair Credit Reporting Act, which regulates the use and
reporting of information related to the borrower's credit experience; 

        (iv) the Americans with Disabilities Act, which, among other things,
   prohibits discrimination on the basis of disability in the full and equal
 enjoyment of the goods, services, facilities, privileges, advantages or
accommodations of any place of public accommodation; and              

     (v) the Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act and the Fair Credit
Billing Act.                                                          

Violations of certain provisions of these federal laws may limit the  
ability of the Servicer to collect all or part of the principal of or interest  
on the Mortgage Loans and in addition could subject the Trust Fund to damages   
and administrative enforcement. The Seller will be required to repurchase any   
Mortgage Loans which, at the time of origination did not comply with such       
federal laws or regulations. See "Certain Legal Aspects of the Mortgage Loans"  
herein.                                                                         

    The federal Soldiers' and Sailors' Civil Relief Act of 1940 may affect the
ability of the Servicer to collect full amounts of interest on certain Mortgage 
Loans and could interfere with the ability of the Servicer to foreclose on      
certain properties. See "Certain Legal Aspects of the Mortgage
Loans -- Soldiers' and Sailors' Civil Relief Act of 1940" herein.               

RISK OF EARLY DEFAULTS                                                          

   The majority of the Initial Group A Mortgage Loans were originated within
18 months prior to the Initial Cut-Off Date. The weighted average remaining term
to amortization maturity of the Initial Group A Mortgage Loans as of the Initial
Cut-Off Date is approximately 343 months. It is anticipated that any Subsequent 
Mortgage Loans added to Loan Group A during the Funding Period will have been   
originated within 12 months of the date of their addition. Although little data 
is available, defaults on mortgage loans, including mortgage loans similar to   
the Mortgage Loans, are generally expected to occur with greater frequency in   
the early years of the terms of mortgage loans.                                 

THE SUBSEQUENT MORTGAGE LOANS AND THE PRE-FUNDING ACCOUNT                       

    To the extent that the Pre-Funded Amount has not been fully applied to the
purchase of Subsequent Mortgage Loans by the Trust Fund by the end of the       
Funding Period, the Class or Classes of Class A Certificates then entitled to   
receive distributions of principal as described herein, will receive a partial  
prepayment of principal in an aggregate amount equal to the Pre-Funded Amount   
remaining in the Pre-Funding Account on the Distribution Date following the end 
of the Funding Period (is no event later than the July, 1998 Distribution Date).
As a result, the yield to Holders of the Class A Certificates, if purchased at a
premium, may be adversely affected. Although no assurances can be given, the    
Seller intends that the principal amount of Subsequent Mortgage Loans sold to   
the Trust Fund will require the application of substantially all of the         
Pre-Funded Amount and that there will be no material principal prepayment from  
the Pre-Funded Amount to the Holders of the Class A Certificates.               

  The Seller will not select Subsequent Mortgage Loans in a manner that it
believes is adverse to the interest of the Holders of the Class A Certificates. 
Following the transfer of Subsequent Mortgage Loans to the Trust Fund, the      
aggregate characteristics of the Mortgage Loans then held in the Trust Fund will
not vary significantly from those of the Initial Mortgage Loans. See "The
Mortgage Loan Pool -- Conveyance of Subsequent Mortgage Loans."
S-23

P-->424B329th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 29th

     The ability of the Trust Fund to purchase Subsequent Mortgage Loans will be
largely dependent upon the ability of the Seller to originate or acquire        
additional loans meeting the required criteria. The ability of the Seller to    
originate or acquire additional loans may be affected by a variety of social and
economic factors. Economic factors include interest rates, unemployment levels, 
the rate of inflation and consumer perception of economic conditions generally. 
However, the Seller is unable to determine and has no basis to predict whether  
or to what extent economic or social factors will affect the Seller's ability to
originate or acquire additional loans and therefore the availability of         
Subsequent Mortgage Loans.                                                      

THE MORTGAGE LOAN POOL

GENERAL 

    The Initial Mortgage Loans to be transferred by the Depositor to the Trust
Fund on April 30, 1998 (the "Startup Day") will consist of 910 first-lien,      
fixed-rate conventional mortgage loans evidenced by promissory notes (the       
"Mortgage Notes") secured by mortgages and deeds of trust, security deeds or    
mortgages (each, a "Mortgage"), which are located in 23 states and the District 
of Columbia. The Mortgaged Properties securing the Mortgage Loans consist of    
single-family residences (which may be detached, part of a two-to-four family   
dwelling, a condominium unit, a manufactured or modular home, a townhouse or a  
unit in a planned unit development). The Mortgaged Properties may be            
owner-occupied (which includes second and vacation homes) and non-owner occupied
investment properties. All Initial Mortgage Loans were originated or purchased  
after June 2, 1986.                                                             

The Loan-to-Value Ratios shown below were calculated based upon the   
appraised values of the Mortgaged Properties at the time of origination (the    
"Appraised Values").                                                            

No assurance can be given that values of the Mortgaged Properties have
remained or will remain at their levels on the dates of origination of the      
related Mortgage Loans. If the residential real estate market in general or in  
any particular area has experienced or should experience an overall decline in  
property values such that the outstanding balances of the Mortgage Loans become 
equal to or greater than the value of the Mortgaged Properties, the actual rates
of delinquencies, foreclosures and losses could be higher than those now        
generally experienced in the mortgage lending industry.                         

No Loan-to-Value Ratio (based upon appraisals made at the time of     
origination of the related Mortgage Loan) relating to any Initial Mortgage Loan 
exceeded 100% as of the Initial Cut-Off Date. No pool insurance insures the     
Mortgage Loans. The Mortgage Loans are not guaranteed by the Depositor, the     
Seller or any affiliate of the Depositor or the Seller.                         

   As of the Initial Cut-Off Date, the average Loan Balance was $321,218.00,
the Loan Rates of the Initial Mortgage Loans ranged from 7.500% to 10.750% per  
annum, the weighted average Loan-to-Value Ratio of the Initial Mortgage Loans   
was 72.72% (based upon appraisals made at the time of the origination of such   
loans), the weighted average Loan Rate of the Initial Mortgage Loans was 7.961% 
per annum, and the weighted average remaining term to amortization maturity of  
the Mortgage Loans was 302 months. Approximately 4.61% of the Initial Mortgage  
Loans have a Loan-to-Value Ratio in excess of 80% and do not have primary       
mortgage insurance. The remaining terms to amortization maturity of the Initial 
Mortgage Loans as of the Initial Cut-Off Date ranged from 25 months to 360      
months. The maximum Loan Balance, as of the Initial Cut-Off Date, was           
$1,297,229.63. No Initial Mortgage Loan matures after April 1, 2028. The Initial
Mortgage Pool consist of 910 loans as of the Initial Cut-Off Date. As a         
percentage of the Initial Cut-Off Date Aggregate Loan Balance, 93.13% were      
secured by mortgages, deeds to secure debt or deeds of trust on single-family   
dwellings, 0.08% were secured by mortgages or deeds of trust on two-to-four     
family dwellings, 5.72% were secured by mortgages or deeds of trust on          
condominium units and planned unit developments, 1.07% were secured by mortgages
or deeds of trust on other types of dwellings.                                  

S-24

P-->424B330th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 30th

LOAN GROUP SA 

   The latest original scheduled maturity of any Group SA Mortgage Loan will
be March 1, 2025. Each of the Group SA Mortgage Loans will have original terms  
to maturity of not more than 30 years. At origination, based upon an appraisal  
of the Mortgaged Property securing each Group SA Mortgage Loan, obtained at or  
about the date of origination, approximately 15.76% of the Group SA Mortgage    
Loans will have had Loan-to-Value Ratios greater than 80% but less than or equal
to 100%. No Group SA Mortgage Loan will have had a Loan-to-Value Ratio at       
origination greater than 100%. Approximately 3.81% of the Group SA Mortgage     
Loans have a Loan-to-Value Ratio in excess of 80% and do not have primary       
mortgage insurance.                                                             

LOAN GROUP A 

     The latest original scheduled maturity of any Initial Group A Mortgage Loan
will be April 1, 2028. Each of the Group A Mortgage Loans will have original    
terms to maturity of not more than 30 years. At origination, based upon an      
appraisal of the Mortgaged Property securing each Initial Group A Mortgage Loan 
obtained at or about the time of origination, approximately 13.28% of the       
Initial Group A Mortgage Loans will have had Loan-to-Value Ratios greater than  
80% but less than or equal to 100%. No Initial Group A Mortgage Loan will have  
had a Loan-to-Value Ratio at origination greater than 96.00%. Approximately     
5.61% of the Group A Mortgage Loans have a Loan-to-Value Ratio in excess of 80% 
and do not have primary mortgage insurance.                                     

     The following information sets forth in tabular format certain information,
as of the Initial Cut-Off Date, with respect to the Mortgage Loans. Other than  
with respect to rates of interest, percentages (approximate) are stated by      
Aggregate Balance of the Mortgage Loans.                                        

The percentages of the Initial Cut-Off Date Aggregate Loan Balance set
forth in the following tables may not sum to 100.00% due to rounding.           

INITIAL MORTGAGE LOANS IN THE AGGREGATE 
GEOGRAPHIC DISTRIBUTION OF ALL MORTGAGED PROPERTIES(1)

 The geographic distribution of Mortgaged Properties by state, as of the
Initial Cut-Off Date, was as follows:                                           

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                                NUMBER OF      INITIAL CUT-OFF       % OF INITIAL     
                                             INITIAL MORTGAGE     DATE LOAN     CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
STATE                                             LOANS           BALANCES           LOAN BALANCE     
-----                                        ----------------  ---------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                      
Arizona.....................................         2         $  1,250,676.59            0.43%       
California..................................        15            4,763,829.09            1.63        
Colorado....................................         2              655,774.98            0.22        
Connecticut.................................        30           12,581,544.87            4.30        
Delaware....................................         1              232,975.43            0.08        
District of Columbia........................        10            3,752,102.28            1.28        
Florida.....................................       234           73,783,396.95           25.24        
Georgia.....................................        26            9,222,060.73            3.15        
Hawaii......................................         1              396,171.12            0.14        
Illinois....................................         1              242,349.84            0.08        
Maryland....................................        58           16,492,921.57            5.64        
Massachusetts...............................         2              534,854.48            0.18        
Michigan....................................         1              279,498.44            0.10        
New Jersey..................................       214           69,999,177.70           23.95        
New York....................................        62           19,257,962.28            6.59        
North Carolina..............................        66           21,385,508.32            7.32        
Pennsylvania................................        46           13,523,787.86            4.63        
Rhode Island................................         2              793,811.75            0.27        
South Carolina..............................        43           14,168,008.54            4.85        
Tennessee...................................        13            4,399,428.23            1.51        

S-25

P-->424B331st Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 31st

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                                NUMBER OF      INITIAL CUT-OFF       % OF INITIAL     
                                             INITIAL MORTGAGE     DATE LOAN     CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
STATE                                             LOANS           BALANCES           LOAN BALANCE     
-----                                        ----------------  ---------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                      
Texas.......................................         2              618,203.26            0.21        
Virginia....................................        77           23,334,877.45            7.98        
Vermont.....................................         1              301,939.27            0.10        
Washington..................................         1              337,521.34            0.12        
                                                   ---         ---------------          ------        
          Totals............................       910         $292,308,382.37          100.00%       
                                                   ===         ===============          ======        

---------------                                                                 

(1) Determined by property address designated as such in the related Mortgage.  

LOAN-TO-VALUE RATIOS(1) FOR ALL INITIAL MORTGAGE LOANS

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                                NUMBER OF      INITIAL CUT-OFF       % OF INITIAL     
RANGE OF                                     INITIAL MORTGAGE     DATE LOAN     CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
LOAN-TO-VALUE RATIO                               LOANS           BALANCES           LOAN BALANCE     
-------------------                          ----------------  ---------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                      
 5.001% -- 10.000%..........................         1         $    288,758.45            0.10%       
20.001% -- 25.000%..........................         1              374,159.87            0.13        
30.001% -- 35.000%..........................         4            1,285,116.85            0.44        
35.001% -- 40.000%..........................        12            5,254,559.47            1.80        
40.001% -- 45.000%..........................        17            6,021,188.06            2.06        
45.001% -- 50.000%..........................        20            7,121,273.95            2.44        
50.001% -- 55.000%..........................        29            8,913,562.07            3.05        
55.001% -- 60.000%..........................        56           19,811,331.58            6.78        
60.001% -- 65.000%..........................        50           16,320,578.43            5.58        
65.001% -- 70.000%..........................        94           34,247,159.79           11.72        
70.001% -- 75.000%..........................       160           51,646,528.83           17.67        
75.001% -- 80.000%..........................       322           98,157,269.21           33.58        
80.001% -- 85.000%..........................        28           10,346,740.25            3.54        
85.001% -- 90.000%..........................        78           21,820,106.96            7.46        
90.001% -- 95.000%..........................        28            7,675,210.31            2.63        
95.001% -- 100.000%.........................        10            3,024,838.29            1.03        
                                                   ---         ---------------          ------        
          Total.............................       910         $292,308,382.37          100.00%       
                                                   ===         ===============          ======        

---------------                                                                 

(1) The loan-to-value ratios (the "Loan-to-Value Ratios") shown above are equal,
 with respect to each Initial Mortgage Loan, to (i) the original principal
    balance of such Mortgage Loan at the date of origination divided by (ii) the
 lesser of (a) the value of the related Mortgaged Property, based upon the
   appraisal made at the time of origination of such Mortgage Loan and (b) the
    purchase price of such Mortgaged Property if the Mortgage Loan proceeds from
such Mortgage Loan are used to purchase such Mortgage Property.         

LOAN RATES FOR ALL INITIAL MORTGAGE LOANS 

     The Loan Rates borne by the Mortgage Notes relating to the Initial Mortgage
Loans were distributed as follows as of the Initial Cut-Off Date:               

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                                NUMBER OF      INITIAL CUT-OFF       % OF INITIAL     
RANGE OF                                     INITIAL MORTGAGE     DATE LOAN     CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
LOAN RATES                                        LOANS           BALANCES           LOAN BALANCE     
----------                                   ----------------  ---------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                      
 7.251% -- 7.500%...........................        162        $ 55,947,925.19           19.14%       
 7.501% -- 7.750%...........................        210          68,476,905.20           23.43        
 7.751% -- 8.000%...........................        214          67,529,329.56           23.10        
 8.001% -- 8.250%...........................        146          50,476,826.57           17.27        
 8.251% -- 8.500%...........................        105          29,086,693.53            9.95        
 8.501% -- 8.750%...........................         33          10,018,638.53            3.43        

S-26

P-->424B332nd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 32nd

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                                NUMBER OF      INITIAL CUT-OFF       % OF INITIAL     
RANGE OF                                     INITIAL MORTGAGE     DATE LOAN     CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
LOAN RATES                                        LOANS           BALANCES           LOAN BALANCE     
----------                                   ----------------  ---------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                      
 8.751% -- 9.000%...........................         22           6,201,080.18            2.12        
 9.001% -- 9.250%...........................          6           1,536,662.82            0.53        
 9.251% -- 9.500%...........................          1             287,108.48            0.10        
 9.501% -- 9.750%...........................          2             547,927.47            0.19        
 9.751% -- 10.000%..........................          3             780,590.51            0.27        
10.001% -- 10.250%..........................          4             918,968.33            0.31        
10.251% -- 10.500%..........................          1             278,748.08            0.10        
10.501% -- 10.750%..........................          1             220,977.92            0.08        
                                                  -----        ---------------          ------        
          Total.............................        910        $292,308,382.37          100.00%       
                                                  =====        ===============          ======        

INITIAL CUT-OFF DATE PRINCIPAL BALANCES OF ALL INITIAL MORTGAGE LOANS 

The distribution of the outstanding principal balances of the Initial 
Mortgage Loans as of the Initial Cut-Off Date was as follows:                   

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                                NUMBER OF      INITIAL CUT-OFF       % OF INITIAL     
RANGE OF                                     INITIAL MORTGAGE     DATE LOAN     CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
INITIAL CUT-OFF DATE LOAN BALANCE                 LOANS           BALANCES           LOAN BALANCE     
---------------------------------            ----------------  ---------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                      
      $0.01 --  $100,000.00.................         8         $    496,393.75            0.17%       
$100,000.01 --  $200,000.00.................        37            6,343,641.42            2.17        
$200,000.01 --  $300,000.00.................       522          130,860,706.02           44.77        
$300,000.01 --  $400,000.00.................       178           61,240,725.86           20.95        
$400,000.01 --  $500,000.00.................        82           37,244,815.23           12.74        
$500,000.01 --  $600,000.00.................        41           22,461,164.82            7.68        
$600,000.01 --  $700,000.00.................        14            9,194,414.03            3.15        
$700,000.01 --  $800,000.00.................        12            9,250,858.39            3.16        
$800,000.01 --  $900,000.00.................         8            6,936,309.27            2.37        
$900,000.01 -- $1,000,000.00................         5            4,842,018.54            1.66        
Over $1,000,000.00..........................         3            3,437,335.04            1.18        
                                                   ---         ---------------          ------        
          Total.............................       910         $292,308,382.37          100.00%       
                                                   ===         ===============          ======        

TYPES OF MORTGAGED PROPERTIES FOR ALL INITIAL MORTGAGE LOANS

  The Mortgaged Properties securing the Initial Mortgage Loans were of the
property types as follows:                                                      

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                                NUMBER OF      INITIAL CUT-OFF       % OF INITIAL     
                                             INITIAL MORTGAGE     DATE LOAN     CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
PROPERTY TYPE                                     LOANS           BALANCES           LOAN BALANCE     
-------------                                ----------------  ---------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                      
Single Family...............................       845         $272,224,174.16           93.13%       
Condominium/Planned Unit Development........        53           16,724,894.39            5.72        
Other.......................................        12            3,359,313.82            1.15        
                                                   ---         ---------------          ------        
          Total.............................       910         $292,308,382.37          100.00%       
                                                   ===         ===============          ======        

S-27

P-->424B333rd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 33rd
MONTHS SINCE ORIGINATION FOR ALL INITIAL MORTGAGE LOANS 

   The distribution of the number of months since the date of origination of
the Initial Mortgage Loans as of the Initial Cut-Off Date was as follows:       

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                               NUMBER OF       INITIAL CUT-OFF        % OF INITIAL     
RANGE OF                                   INITIAL MORTGAGE       DATE LOAN      CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
MONTHS SINCE ORIGINATION                         LOANS            BALANCES            LOAN BALANCE     
------------------------                   -----------------  -----------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                       
    --   0................................          7          $  3,215,250.00             1.10%       
  1 --   6................................        111            45,912,497.73            15.71        
  7 --  12................................        122            47,730,262.21            16.33        
 13 --  18................................         34            11,727,786.92             4.01        
 19 --  24................................         12             4,169,159.43             1.43        
 25 --  30................................         10             3,788,142.91             1.30        
 31 --  36................................         46            12,781,082.29             4.37        
 37 --  42................................         21             5,609,187.47             1.92        
 43 --  48................................         55            15,321,528.09             5.24        
 49 --  54................................         53            15,892,871.85             5.44        
 55 --  60................................        103            31,299,005.72            10.71        
 61 --  66................................         90            26,220,058.74             8.97        
 67 --  72................................         70            21,991,140.11             7.52        
 73 --  78................................         32             8,484,864.58             2.90        
 79 --  84................................         28             7,362,623.07             2.52        
 85 --  90................................         19             4,489,341.37             1.54        
 91 --  96................................         24             6,966,067.36             2.38        
 97 -- 102................................         23             6,758,530.65             2.31        
103 -- 108................................         23             6,178,921.16             2.11        
109 -- 114................................         10             2,576,638.81             0.88        
115 -- 120................................         15             3,407,008.74             1.17        
121 -- 126................................          2               426,413.16             0.15        
                                                  ---          ---------------           ------        
          Total...........................        910          $292,308,382.37           100.00%       
                                                  ===          ===============           ======        

REMAINING TERM TO AMORTIZATION MATURITY FOR ALL INITIAL MORTGAGE LOANS

     The distribution of the number of months remaining to amortization maturity
of the Initial Mortgage Loans as of the Initial Cut-Off Date was as follows:    

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                               NUMBER OF       INITIAL CUT-OFF        % OF INITIAL     
RANGE OF                                   INITIAL MORTGAGE       DATE LOAN      CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
REMAINING MONTHS TO AMORTIZATION MATURITY        LOANS            BALANCES            LOAN BALANCE     
-----------------------------------------  -----------------  -----------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                       
 25 --  48................................          3          $    233,148.50             0.08%       
 49 --  72................................          1                58,577.18             0.02        
 73 --  96................................          2               322,568.09             0.11        
 97 -- 120................................          6             1,770,657.70             0.61        
121 -- 144................................         10             2,063,627.28             0.71        
145 -- 168................................         21             4,730,322.98             1.62        
169 -- 192................................         41            10,912,732.07             3.73        
193 -- 216................................         10             2,466,561.29             0.84        
217 -- 240................................         29             8,061,555.21             2.76        
241 -- 264................................         79            23,932,229.69             8.19        
265 -- 288................................        108            31,395,810.19            10.74        
289 -- 312................................        234            71,328,409.31            24.40        

S-28

P-->424B334th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 34th

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                               NUMBER OF       INITIAL CUT-OFF        % OF INITIAL     
RANGE OF                                   INITIAL MORTGAGE       DATE LOAN      CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
REMAINING MONTHS TO AMORTIZATION MATURITY        LOANS            BALANCES            LOAN BALANCE     
-----------------------------------------  -----------------  -----------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                       
313 -- 336................................         99            29,564,854.05            10.11        
337 -- 360................................        267           105,467,328.83            36.08        
                                                  ---          ---------------           ------        
          Total...........................        910          $292,308,382.37           100.00%       
                                                  ===          ===============           ======        

OCCUPANCY TYPE OF MORTGAGED PROPERTY FOR ALL INITIAL MORTGAGE LOANS 

   The Mortgaged Properties securing the Initial Mortgage Loans were used as
follows as of the Initial Cut-Off Date:                                         

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                               NUMBER OF       INITIAL CUT-OFF        % OF INITIAL     
                                           INITIAL MORTGAGE       DATE LOAN      CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
OCCUPANCY TYPE                                   LOANS            BALANCES            LOAN BALANCE     
--------------                             -----------------  -----------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                       
Primary...................................        877          $280,484,436.51            95.95%       
Second....................................         32            11,590,970.43             3.97        
Investor..................................          1               232,975.43             0.08        
                                                  ---          ---------------           ------        
          Totals..........................        910          $292,308,382.37           100.00%       
                                                  ===          ===============           ======        

ORIGINAL TERM TO STATED MATURITY FOR ALL INITIAL MORTGAGE LOANS 

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                               NUMBER OF       INITIAL CUT-OFF        % OF INITIAL     
RANGE OF                                   INITIAL MORTGAGE       DATE LOAN      CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
ORIGINAL TERM TO STATED MATURITY                 LOANS            BALANCES            LOAN BALANCE     
--------------------------------           -----------------  -----------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                       
181 -- 240................................         63          $ 16,208,844.07             5.55%       
241 -- 300................................          4               970,117.12             0.33        
301 -- 360................................        843           275,129,421.18            94.12        
                                                  ---          ---------------           ------        
          Total...........................        910          $292,308,382.37           100.00%       
                                                  ===          ===============           ======        

GROUP SA MORTGAGE LOANS 
GEOGRAPHIC DISTRIBUTION OF GROUP SA MORTGAGED PROPERTIES(1) 

 The geographic distribution of Mortgaged Properties by state, as of the
Initial Cut-Off Date, was as follows:                                           

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                               NUMBER OF       INITIAL CUT-OFF       % OF GROUP SA     
                                           GROUP SA MORTGAGE      DATE LOAN      CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
STATE                                            LOANS            BALANCES            LOAN BALANCE     
-----                                      -----------------  -----------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                       
California................................         11          $  3,190,635.93             1.96%       
Connecticut...............................         13             3,226,636.80             1.98        
District of Columbia......................          8             2,908,679.64             1.78        
Florida...................................        169            48,887,596.83            30.00        
Georgia...................................          2               611,433.22             0.38        
Massachusetts.............................          2               534,854.48             0.33        
Maryland..................................         38            10,062,932.54             6.17        
New Jersey................................        144            42,397,636.69            26.01        
New York..................................         40            10,852,947.20             6.66        
North Carolina............................         29             8,602,279.11             5.28        
Pennsylvania..............................         29             7,723,942.98             4.74        
Rhode Island..............................          1               282,431.63             0.17        
South Carolina............................         21             5,592,346.89             3.43        
Tennessee.................................          3               949,523.78             0.58        

S-29

P-->424B335th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 35th

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                               NUMBER OF       INITIAL CUT-OFF       % OF GROUP SA     
                                           GROUP SA MORTGAGE      DATE LOAN      CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
STATE                                            LOANS            BALANCES            LOAN BALANCE     
-----                                      -----------------  -----------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                       
Virginia..................................         57            16,858,383.89            10.34        
Vermont...................................          1               301,939.27             0.19        
                                                  ---          ---------------           ------        
          Totals..........................        568          $162,984,200.88           100.00%       
                                                  ===          ===============           ======        

LOAN-TO-VALUE RATIOS(1) FOR GROUP SA MORTGAGE LOAN

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                               NUMBER OF      INITIAL CUT-OFF      % OF GROUP SA     
RANGE OF                                   GROUP SA MORTGAGE     DATE LOAN     CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
LOAN-TO-VALUE RATIO                              LOANS           BALANCES           LOAN BALANCE     
-------------------                        -----------------  ---------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                     
 5.001% --  10.000%.......................          1         $    288,758.45            0.18%       
30.001% --  35.000%.......................          2              687,530.69            0.42        
35.001% --  40.000%.......................          7            2,606,060.12            1.60        
40.001% --  45.000%.......................         12            4,113,694.21            2.52        
45.001% --  50.000%.......................         11            3,697,098.42            2.27        
50.001% --  55.000%.......................         25            7,788,608.56            4.78        
55.001% --  60.000%.......................         38           11,396,343.67            6.99        
60.001% --  65.000%.......................         35           10,311,597.40            6.33        
65.001% --  70.000%.......................         61           19,870,359.91           12.19        
70.001% --  75.000%.......................        106           30,153,100.75           18.50        
75.001% --  80.000%.......................        175           46,384,265.30           28.46        
80.001% --  85.000%.......................         16            4,757,374.91            2.92        
85.001% --  90.000%.......................         48           12,726,273.72            7.81        
90.001% --  95.000%.......................         22            5,432,689.62            3.33        
95.001% -- 100.000%.......................          9            2,770,445.15            1.70        
                                                  ---         ---------------          ------        
          Total...........................        568         $162,984,200.88          100.00%       
                                                  ===         ===============          ======        

---------------                                                                 

(1) The loan-to-value ratios shown above are equal, with respect to each        
  Mortgage Loan, to (i) the original principal balance of such Mortgage Loan
 at the date of origination divided by (ii) the lesser of (a) the value of
    the related Mortgaged Property, based upon the appraisal made at the time of
origination of such Mortgage Loan and (b) the purchase price of such    
    Mortgaged Property if the Mortgage Loan proceeds from such Mortgage Loan are
used to purchase such Mortgage Property.                                

LOAN RATES FOR GROUP SA MORTGAGE LOAN 

The Loan Rates borne by the Mortgage Notes relating to the Group SA   
Mortgage Loans were distributed as follows as of the Initial Cut-Off Date:      

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                               NUMBER OF      INITIAL CUT-OFF      % OF GROUP SA     
RANGE OF                                   GROUP SA MORTGAGE     DATE LOAN     CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
LOAN RATES                                       LOANS           BALANCES           LOAN BALANCE     
----------                                 -----------------  ---------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                     
 7.251% --  7.500%........................        117         $ 35,888,332.32           22.02%       
 7.501% --  7.750%........................        118           32,769,197.37           20.11        
 7.751% --  8.000%........................        136           39,594,417.72           24.29        
 8.001% --  8.250%........................         86           25,219,977.96           15.47        
 8.251% --  8.500%........................         69           17,893,305.88           10.98        
 8.501% --  8.750%........................         15            4,573,727.02            2.81        
 8.751% --  9.000%........................         11            3,015,760.62            1.85        
 9.001% --  9.250%........................          5            1,282,269.68            0.79        
 9.501% --  9.750%........................          2              547,927.47            0.34        
 9.751% -- 10.000%........................          3              780,590.51            0.48        
10.001% -- 10.250%........................          4              918,968.33            0.56        

S-30

P-->424B336th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 36th

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                               NUMBER OF      INITIAL CUT-OFF      % OF GROUP SA     
RANGE OF                                   GROUP SA MORTGAGE     DATE LOAN     CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
LOAN RATES                                       LOANS           BALANCES           LOAN BALANCE     
----------                                 -----------------  ---------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                     
10.251% -- 10.500%........................          1              278,748.08            0.17        
10.501% -- 10.750%........................          1              220,977.92            0.14        
                                                  ---         ---------------          ------        
          Total...........................        568         $162,984,200.88          100.00%       
                                                  ===         ===============          ======        

INITIAL CUT-OFF DATE PRINCIPAL BALANCES OF GROUP SA MORTGAGE LOANS

The distribution of the outstanding principal balances of the Group SA
Mortgage Loans as of the Initial Cut-Off Date was as follows:                   

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                               NUMBER OF      INITIAL CUT-OFF      % OF GROUP SA     
RANGE OF                                   GROUP SA MORTGAGE     DATE LOAN     CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
INITIAL CUT-OFF DATE LOAN BALANCE                LOANS           BALANCES           LOAN BALANCE     
---------------------------------          -----------------  ---------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                     
       $0.01 --  $100,000.00..............          8         $    496,393.75            0.30%       
$100,000.01 --  $200,000.00...............         35            6,017,865.23            3.69        
$200,000.01 --  $300,000.00...............        368           90,413,887.30           55.47        
$300,000.01 --  $400,000.00...............         93           31,679,298.21           19.44        
$400,000.01 --  $500,000.00...............         33           14,717,291.12            9.03        
$500,000.01 --  $600,000.00...............         15            8,130,786.21            4.99        
$600,000.01 --  $700,000.00...............          8            5,218,488.11            3.20        
$700,000.01 --  $800,000.00...............          6            4,573,061.50            2.81        
$800,000.01 --  $900,000.00...............          1              833,506.16            0.51        
$900,000.01 -- $1,000,000.00..............          1              903,623.29            0.55        
                                                  ---         ---------------          ------        
          Total...........................        568         $162,984,200.88          100.00%       
                                                  ===         ===============          ======        

TYPES OF MORTGAGED PROPERTIES FOR GROUP SA MORTGAGE LOANS 

   The Mortgaged Properties securing the Group SA Mortgage Loans were of the
property types as follows:                                                      

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                               NUMBER OF      INITIAL CUT-OFF      % OF GROUP SA     
                                           GROUP SA MORTGAGE     DATE LOAN     CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
              PROPERTY TYPE                      LOANS           BALANCES           LOAN BALANCE     
              -------------                -----------------  ---------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                     
Single Family.............................        527         $150,899,692.24           92.59%       
Condominium/Planned Unit Development......         35           10,294,443.83            6.32        
Other.....................................          6            1,790,064.81            1.10        
                                                  ---         ---------------          ------        
          Total...........................        568         $162,984,200.88          100.00%       
                                                  ===         ===============          ======        

MONTHS SINCE ORIGINATION FOR GROUP SA MORTGAGE LOANS

   The distribution of the number of months since the date of origination of
the Group SA Mortgage Loans as of the Initial Cut-Off Date was as follows:      

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                               NUMBER OF      INITIAL CUT-OFF      % OF GROUP SA     
RANGE OF                                   GROUP SA MORTGAGE     DATE LOAN     CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
MONTHS SINCE ORIGINATION                         LOANS           BALANCES           LOAN BALANCE     
------------------------                   -----------------  ---------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                     
 37 --  42................................         21         $  5,609,187.47            3.44%       
 43 --  48................................         55           15,321,528.09            9.40        
 49 --  54................................         53           15,892,871.85            9.75        
 55 --  60................................        103           31,299,005.72           19.20        
 61 --  66................................         90           26,220,058.74           16.09        
 67 --  72................................         70           21,991,140.11           13.49        
 73 --  78................................         32            8,484,864.58            5.21        
 79 --  84................................         28            7,362,623.07            4.52        

S-31

P-->424B337th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 37th

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                               NUMBER OF      INITIAL CUT-OFF      % OF GROUP SA     
RANGE OF                                   GROUP SA MORTGAGE     DATE LOAN     CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
MONTHS SINCE ORIGINATION                         LOANS           BALANCES           LOAN BALANCE     
------------------------                   -----------------  ---------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                     
 85 --  90................................         19            4,489,341.37            2.75        
 91 --  96................................         24            6,966,067.36            4.27        
 97 -- 102................................         23            6,758,530.65            4.15        
103 -- 108................................         23            6,178,921.16            3.79        
109 -- 114................................         10            2,576,638.81            1.58        
115 -- 120................................         15            3,407,008.74            2.09        
121 -- 126................................          2              426,413.16            0.26        
                                                  ---         ---------------          ------        
          Total...........................        568         $162,984,200.88          100.00%       
                                                  ===         ===============          ======        

REMAINING TERM TO AMORTIZATION MATURITY FOR GROUP SA MORTGAGE LOANS 

     The distribution of the number of months remaining to amortization maturity
of the Group SA Mortgage Loans as of the Initial Cut-Off Date was as follows:   

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                               NUMBER OF      INITIAL CUT-OFF      % OF GROUP SA     
RANGE OF                                   GROUP SA MORTGAGE     DATE LOAN     CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
REMAINING MONTHS TO AMORTIZATION MATURITY        LOANS           BALANCES           LOAN BALANCE     
-----------------------------------------  -----------------  ---------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                     
 25 --  48................................          3         $    233,148.50            0.14%       
 49 --  72................................          1               58,577.18            0.04        
 73 --  96................................          2              322,568.09            0.20        
 97 -- 120................................          5            1,187,653.30            0.73        
121 -- 144................................         10            2,063,627.28            1.27        
145 -- 168................................         20            4,542,906.40            2.79        
169 -- 192................................         40           10,704,683.02            6.57        
193 -- 216................................         10            2,466,561.29            1.51        
217 -- 240................................         26            6,990,652.92            4.29        
241 -- 264................................         76           22,510,334.75           13.81        
265 -- 288................................        107           31,161,426.18           19.12        
289 -- 312................................        223           68,420,099.82           41.98        
313 -- 336................................         45           12,321,962.15            7.56        
                                                  ---         ---------------          ------        
          Total...........................        568         $162,984,200.88          100.00%       
                                                  ===         ===============          ======        

OCCUPANCY TYPE OF MORTGAGED PROPERTY FOR GROUP SA MORTGAGE LOANS

    The Mortgaged Properties securing the Group SA Mortgage Loans were used as
follows as of the Initial Cut-Off Date:                                         

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                               NUMBER OF      INITIAL CUT-OFF      % OF GROUP SA     
                                           GROUP SA MORTGAGE     DATE LOAN     CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
OCCUPANCY TYPE                                   LOANS           BALANCES           LOAN BALANCE     
--------------                             -----------------  ---------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                     
Primary...................................        556         $159,616,032.57           97.93%       
Second....................................         12            3,368,168.31            2.07        
                                                  ---         ---------------          ------        
          Total...........................        568         $162,984,200.88          100.00%       
                                                  ===         ===============          ======        

S-32

P-->424B338th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 38th
ORIGINAL TERM TO STATED MATURITY FOR GROUP SA MORTGAGE LOANS

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                               NUMBER OF      INITIAL CUT-OFF      % OF GROUP SA     
RANGE OF                                   GROUP SA MORTGAGE     DATE LOAN     CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
ORIGINAL TERM TO STATED MATURITY                 LOANS           BALANCES           LOAN BALANCE     
--------------------------------           -----------------  ---------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                     
 181 -- 240...............................         60         $ 15,137,941.78            9.29%       
 241 -- 300...............................          3              716,421.27            0.44        
 301 -- 360...............................        505          147,129,837.83           90.27        
                                                  ---         ---------------          ------        
          Total...........................        568         $162,984,200.88          100.00%       
                                                  ===         ===============          ======        

INITIAL GROUP A MORTGAGE LOANS
GEOGRAPHIC DISTRIBUTION OF INITIAL GROUP A MORTGAGED PROPERTIES(1)

    The geographic distribution of Mortgaged Properties related to the Initial
Group A Mortgage Loans by state, as of the Initial Cut-Off Date, was as follows:

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                           NUMBER OF INITIAL  INITIAL CUT-OFF   % OF INITIAL GROUP A 
                                           GROUP A MORTGAGE      DATE LOAN     CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
STATE                                            LOANS           BALANCES           LOAN BALANCE     
-----                                      -----------------  ---------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                     
Arizona...................................          2         $  1,250,676.59            0.97%       
California................................          4            1,573,193.16            1.22        
Colorado..................................          2              655,774.98            0.51        
Connecticut...............................         17            9,354,908.07            7.23        
Delaware..................................          1              232,975.43            0.18        
District of Columbia......................          2              843,422.64            0.65        
Florida...................................         65           24,895,800.12           19.25        
Georgia...................................         24            8,610,627.51            6.66        
Hawaii....................................          1              396,171.12            0.31        
Illinois..................................          1              242,349.84            0.19        
Maryland..................................         20            6,429,989.03            4.97        
Michigan..................................          1              279,498.44            0.22        
New Jersey................................         70           27,601,541.01           21.34        
New York..................................         22            8,405,015.08            6.50        
North Carolina............................         37           12,783,229.21            9.88        
Pennsylvania..............................         17            5,799,844.88            4.48        
Rhode Island..............................          1              511,380.12            0.40        
South Carolina............................         22            8,575,661.65            6.63        
Tennessee.................................         10            3,449,904.45            2.67        
Texas.....................................          2              618,203.26            0.48        
Virginia..................................         20            6,476,493.56            5.01        
Washington................................          1              337,521.34            0.26        
                                                  ---         ---------------          ------        
          Total...........................        342         $129,324,181.49          100.00%       
                                                  ===         ===============          ======        

---------------                                                                 

(1) Determined by property address designated as such in the related Mortgage.  

S-33

P-->424B339th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 39th
LOAN-TO-VALUE RATIOS FOR INITIAL GROUP A MORTGAGE LOANS(1)

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                             NUMBER OF INITIAL                            % OF         
                                                  GROUP A       INITIAL CUT-OFF     INITIAL GROUP A    
                                                 MORTGAGE          DATE LOAN     CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
RANGE OF LOAN-TO-VALUE RATIO                       LOANS           BALANCES           LOAN BALANCE     
----------------------------                 -----------------  ---------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                       
20.01% --  25.00%...........................          1         $    374,159.87            0.29%       
30.01% --  35.00%...........................          2              597,586.16            0.46        
35.01% --  40.00%...........................          5            2,648,499.35            2.05        
40.01% --  45.00%...........................          5            1,907,493.85            1.47        
45.01% --  50.00%...........................          9            3,424,175.53            2.65        
50.01% --  55.00%...........................          4            1,124,953.51            0.87        
55.01% --  60.00%...........................         18            8,414,987.91            6.51        
60.01% --  65.00%...........................         15            6,008,981.03            4.65        
65.01% --  70.00%...........................         33           14,376,799.88           11.12        
70.01% --  75.00%...........................         54           21,493,428.08           16.62        
75.01% --  80.00%...........................        147           51,773,003.91           40.03        
80.01% --  85.00%...........................         12            5,589,365.34            4.32        
85.01% --  90.00%...........................         30            9,093,833.24            7.03        
90.01% --  95.00%...........................          6            2,242,520.69            1.73        
95.01% -- 100.00%...........................          1              254,393.14            0.20        
                                                    ---         ---------------          ------        
          Total.............................        342         $129,324,181.49          100.00%       
                                                    ===         ===============          ======        

---------------                                                                 

(1) The Loan-to-Value Ratios shown above are equal, with respect to each        
  Mortgage Loan, to (i) the original principal balance of such Mortgage Loan
 at the date of origination divided by (ii) the lesser of (a) the value of
    the related Mortgaged Property, based upon the appraisal made at the time of
origination of such Mortgage Loan and (b) the purchase price of such    
    Mortgaged Property if the Mortgage Loan proceeds from such Mortgage Loan are
used to purchase such Mortgage Property.                                

LOAN RATES FOR INITIAL GROUP A MORTGAGE LOANS 

    The Loan Rates borne by the Mortgage Notes relating to the Initial Group A
Mortgage Loans were distributed as follows as of the Initial Cut-Off Date:      

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                             NUMBER OF INITIAL                            % OF         
                                                  GROUP A       INITIAL CUT-OFF     INITIAL GROUP A    
                                                 MORTGAGE          DATE LOAN     CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
RANGE OF LOAN RATES                                LOANS           BALANCES           LOAN BALANCE     
-------------------                          -----------------  ---------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                       
7.251% -- 7.500%............................         45         $ 20,059,592.87           15.51%       
7.501% -- 7.750%............................         92           35,707,707.83           27.61        
7.751% -- 8.000%............................         78           27,934,911.84           21.60        
8.001% -- 8.250%............................         60           25,256,848.61           19.53        
8.251% -- 8.500%............................         36           11,193,387.65            8.66        
8.501% -- 8.750%............................         18            5,444,911.51            4.21        
8.751% -- 9.000%............................         11            3,185,319.56            2.46        
9.001% -- 9.250%............................          1              254,393.14            0.20        
9.251% -- 9.500%............................          1              287,108.48            0.22        
                                                    ---         ---------------          ------        
          Total.............................        342         $129,324,181.49          100.00%       
                                                    ===         ===============          ======        

S-34

P-->424B340th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 40th
INITIAL CUT-OFF DATE PRINCIPAL BALANCES OF INITIAL GROUP A MORTGAGE LOANS 

     The distribution of the outstanding principal balances of the Initial Group
A Mortgage Loans as of the Initial Cut-Off Date was as follows:                 

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                            NUMBER OF INITIAL  INITIAL CUT-OFF   % OF INITIAL GROUP A 
                                            GROUP A MORTGAGE      DATE LOAN     CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
RANGE OF CUT-OFF DATE LOAN BALANCE                LOANS           BALANCES           LOAN BALANCE     
----------------------------------          -----------------  ---------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                      
$100,000.01 -- $ 200,000.00................          2         $    325,776.19            0.25%       
$200,000.01 -- $ 300,000.00................        154           40,446,818.72           31.28        
$300,000.01 -- $ 400,000.00................         85           29,561,427.65           22.86        
$400,000.01 -- $ 500,000.00................         49           22,527,524.11           17.42        
$500,000.01 -- $ 600,000.00................         26           14,330,378.61           11.08        
$600,000.01 -- $ 700,000.00................          6            3,975,925.92            3.07        
$700,000.01 -- $ 800,000.00................          6            4,677,796.89            3.62        
$800,000.01 -- $ 900,000.00................          7            6,102,803.11            4.72        
$900,000.01 -- $1,000,000.00...............          4            3,938,395.25            3.05        
Over $1,000,000.00.........................          3            3,437,335.04            2.66        
                                                   ---         ---------------          ------        
          Total............................        342         $129,324,181.49          100.00%       
                                                   ===         ===============          ======        

TYPES OF MORTGAGED PROPERTIES FOR INITIAL GROUP A MORTGAGE LOANS

   The Mortgaged Properties securing the Initial Group A Mortgage Loans were
of the property types as follows:                                               

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                           NUMBER OF INITIAL  INITIAL CUT-OFF   % OF INITIAL GROUP A 
                                           GROUP A MORTGAGE      DATE LOAN     CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
PROPERTY TYPE                                    LOANS           BALANCES           LOAN BALANCE     
-------------                              -----------------  ---------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                     
Single Family.............................        318         $121,324,481.92           93.81%       
Condominium/Planned Unit Development......         18            6,430,450.56            4.97        
Other.....................................          6            1,569,249.01            1.21        
                                                  ---         ---------------          ------        
          Total...........................        342         $129,324,181.49          100.00%       
                                                  ===         ===============          ======        

MONTHS SINCE ORIGINATION FOR INITIAL GROUP A MORTGAGE LOANS 

   The distribution of the number of months since the date of origination of
the Initial Group A Mortgage Loans as of the Initial Cut-Off Date was as        
follows:                                                                        

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                           NUMBER OF INITIAL  INITIAL CUT-OFF   % OF INITIAL GROUP A 
RANGE OF                                   GROUP A MORTGAGE      DATE LOAN     CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
MONTHS SINCE ORIGINATION                         LOANS           BALANCES           LOAN BALANCE     
------------------------                   -----------------  ---------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                     
 0........................................          7         $  3,215,250.00            2.49%       
 1 -- 6...................................        111           45,912,497.73           35.50        
 7 -- 12..................................        122           47,730,262.21           36.91        
13 -- 18..................................         34           11,727,786.92            9.07        
19 -- 24..................................         12            4,169,159.43            3.22        
25 -- 30..................................         10            3,788,142.91            2.93        
31 -- 36..................................         46           12,781,082.29            9.88        
                                                  ---         ---------------          ------        
          Total...........................        342         $129,324,181.49          100.00%       
                                                  ===         ===============          ======        

S-35

P-->424B341st Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 41st
REMAINING TERM TO AMORTIZATION MATURITY FOR INITIAL GROUP A MORTGAGE LOANS

     The distribution of the number of months remaining to amortization maturity
of the Initial Group A Mortgage Loans as of the Initial Cut-Off Date was as     
follows:                                                                        

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                           NUMBER OF INITIAL  INITIAL CUT-OFF   % OF INITIAL GROUP A 
RANGE OF                                   GROUP A MORTGAGE      DATE LOAN     CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
REMAINING MONTHS TO AMORTIZATION MATURITY        LOANS           BALANCES           LOAN BALANCE     
-----------------------------------------  -----------------  ---------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                     
 97 -- 120................................          1         $    583,004.40            0.45%       
145 -- 168................................          1              187,416.58            0.14        
169 -- 192................................          1              208,049.05            0.16        
217 -- 240................................          3            1,070,902.29            0.83        
241 -- 264................................          3            1,421,894.94            1.10        
265 -- 288................................          1              234,384.01            0.18        
289 -- 312................................         11            2,906,309.49            2.25        
313 -- 336................................         54           17,242,891.90           13.33        
337 -- 360................................        267          105,467,328.83           81.55        
                                                  ---         ---------------          ------        
          Total...........................        342         $129,324,181.49          100.00%       
                                                  ===         ===============          ======        

OCCUPANCY TYPE OF MORTGAGED PROPERTY FOR INITIAL GROUP A MORTGAGE LOANS 

   The Mortgaged Properties securing the Initial Group A Mortgage Loans were
used as follows as of the Initial Cut-Off Date:                                 

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                              NUMBER OF          INITIAL CUT-OFF   % OF INITIAL GROUP A 
                                       INITIAL GROUP A MORTGAGE     DATE LOAN     CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
OCCUPANCY TYPE                                  LOANS               BALANCES           LOAN BALANCE     
--------------                         ------------------------  ---------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                        
Primary...............................           321             $120,868,403.94           93.46%       
Second................................            20                8,222,802.12            6.36        
Investor..............................             1                  232,975.43            0.18        
                                                 ---             ---------------          ------        
          Total.......................           342             $129,324,181.49          100.00%       
                                                 ===             ===============          ======        

ORIGINAL TERM TO STATED MATURITY FOR INITIAL GROUP A MORTGAGE LOANS 

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                              NUMBER OF          INITIAL CUT-OFF   % OF INITIAL GROUP A 
RANGE OF                               INITIAL GROUP A MORTGAGE     DATE LOAN     CUT-OFF DATE AGGREGATE
ORIGINAL TERM TO STATED MATURITY                LOANS               BALANCES           LOAN BALANCE     
--------------------------------       ------------------------  ---------------  ----------------------
                                                                                                        
181 -- 240............................             3             $  1,070,902.29            0.83%       
241 -- 300............................             1                  253,695.85            0.20        
301 -- 360............................           338              127,999,583.35           98.98        
                                                 ---             ---------------          ------        
          Total.......................           342             $129,324,181.49          100.00%       
                                                 ===             ===============          ======        

PAYMENTS ON THE MORTGAGE LOANS                                                  

The Mortgage Loans provide that interest is charged to the Mortgagors 
thereunder, and payments are due from such Mortgagors, as of a scheduled day of 
each month which is fixed at the time of origination. Scheduled monthly payments
made by the Mortgagors on the Mortgage Loans either earlier or later than the   
scheduled due dates thereof will not affect the amortization schedule or the    
relative application of such payments to principal and interest. All of the     
Mortgage Loans provide for monthly installments of principal and interest       
sufficient to amortize fully their respective principal balances over their     
respective amortization periods.                                                

   The Mortgage Loans provide for required monthly payments to be due on the
first day of each month (the "Due Date").                                       

S-36

P-->424B342nd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 42nd

CONVEYANCE OF SUBSEQUENT MORTGAGE LOANS 

     The Pooling and Servicing Agreement permits the Trust Fund to acquire up to
$57,744,845 aggregate principal balance of Subsequent Mortgage Loans which will 
be added to Loan Group A. No Subsequent Mortgage Loans will be added to Loan    
Group SA. Accordingly, the statistical characteristics of the Mortgage Loans    
will vary from those of the Initial Mortgage Loans as of any Subsequent Transfer
Date upon the acquisition of Subsequent Mortgage Loans.                         

     The obligation of the Trust Fund to purchase Subsequent Mortgage Loans on a
Subsequent Transfer Date is subject to the following requirements, any of which 
requirements (except for the requirement stated in clause (ii) of this          
paragraph) may be waived or modified in any respect by the Rating Agencies: (i) 
such Subsequent Mortgage Loan may not be 30 or more days contractually          
delinquent as of the related Subsequent Cut-Off Date; (ii) the original term to 
stated maturity of such Subsequent Mortgage Loan must be 30 years and such      
Subsequent Mortgage Loan must have a fixed rate of interest; (iii) such         
Subsequent Mortgage Loan will be secured by a Mortgage in a first lien position 
on a one- to four-family property (which may be attached, part of a two- to     
four-family dwelling, a condominium unit, a townhouse or a unit in a planned    
unit development); (iv) such Subsequent Mortgage Loan will not have a Loan Rate 
less than 7.26% per annum; (v) such Subsequent Mortgage Loan will be otherwise  
acceptable to the Rating Agencies; (vi) such Subsequent Mortgage Loan will have 
an origination date of not more than 36 months prior to the related Subsequent  
Cut-Off Date; (vii) and following the purchase of such Subsequent Mortgage Loan 
by the Trust Fund on a Subsequent Transfer Date, the Mortgage Loans (including  
such Subsequent Mortgage Loans) as of the first day of the month following such 
Subsequent Transfer Date: (a) will have a weighted average Loan Rate by Loan    
Balance of between 7.75% and 8.15% per annum; (b) will have a weighted average  
remaining term to stated maturity of between 300 and 315 months; (c) will have a
weighted average Loan-to-Value Ratio by Loan Balance of between 70% and 75%,    
inclusive; (d) will have a state concentration not in excess of 28% (by         
Aggregate Loan Balance) for any one state; (e) will have no more than 10% (by   
Aggregate Loan Balance) of Mortgage Loans relating to non-owner occupied        
properties; (f) will have no more than 2.00% (by Aggregate Loan Balance) of     
Mortgage Loans secured by three- to four-family properties; and (g) will not    
have more than 25% (by Loan Balance) of Subsequent Mortgage Loans.              

THE SELLER AND THE SERVICER 

GENERAL 

 First Union National Bank is the Seller under the Pooling and Servicing
Agreement. First Union Mortgage Corporation, a North Carolina corporation, is   
the Servicer under the Pooling and Servicing Agreement. First Union National    
Bank is a national banking association and a banking subsidiary of First Union  
Corporation, a North Carolina corporation and a multi-bank holding company      
registered under the Bank Holding Company Act. First Union Mortgage Corporation 
is a wholly-owned subsidiary of First Union Corporation. First Union Corporation
is the sixth largest bank holding company in the United States based on total   
assets as of December 31, 1997.                                                 

  The Offered Certificates will not represent an interest in or obligation
of, nor are the Mortgage Loans guaranteed by, the Seller, the Servicer or any of
their affiliates.                                                               

   The Servicer may use a subservicer (the "Subservicer") in the performance
of the administrative and servicing obligations of the Servicer under the       
Pooling and Servicing Agreement, but no such subservicing arrangements will     
discharge the Servicer from its obligations under the Pooling and Servicing     
Agreement.                                                                      

   The Trustee may remove the Servicer, and the Servicer may resign, only in
accordance with the terms of the Pooling and Servicing Agreement. No removal or 
resignation shall become effective until the Trustee or a successor servicer    
shall have assumed the Servicer's responsibilities and obligations in accordance
therewith.                                                                      

     Any collections received by the Servicer after removal or resignation shall
be endorsed by it to the Trustee and remitted directly to the Trustee.          

S-37

P-->424B343rd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 43rd
CREDIT AND UNDERWRITING GUIDELINES                                              

   The following is a description of the underwriting guidelines customarily
employed by the Seller with respect to mortgage loans which it purchases        
(including by acquisitions or mergers) or originates. The Seller believes that  
many of the Mortgage Loans were underwritten with exceptions to these           
guidelines. Those that were made with exceptions to these underwriting          
guidelines were approved when other compensating factors existed. The Seller    
believes its standards are consistent with those utilized by mortgage lenders   
generally. The underwriting process is intended to assess both the prospective  
borrower's ability to repay and the adequacy of the real property security as   
collateral for the loan granted. Loans may be made outside of those guidelines  
with the prior approval of a senior official of the Seller.                     

    The Seller generally originates or purchases fixed rate loans, which fully
amortize over a period not to exceed 360 months. The original loan amounts      
generally range from a minimum of $203,200 to a maximum of $1,000,000.          

 The homes used for collateral to secure the loans may be either primary
residential (which includes second and vacation homes) or investor owned one- to
four-family homes, condominiums, planned unit developments or modular homes or  
townhouses.                                                                     

The Loan-to-Value Ratio generally may not exceed 95% for a primary    
residence and 90% for a second home. Each property proposed as security for a   
loan must be appraised.                                                         

Each mortgage applicant generally provides, and the Seller generally  
verifies, personal financial information. The applicant's total monthly         
obligations (which includes principal and interest on each mortgage, tax        
assessments, other loans, charge accounts and all other scheduled indebtedness) 
generally cannot exceed 38% of the applicant's gross monthly income. Applicants 
who are salaried employees must provide current employment information in       
addition to two recent years of employment history and the Seller verifies this 
information. Verifications are based on written confirmation from employers or a
combination of a recent pay stub, the most recent W-2 tax form and telephone    
confirmation from the employer. Self-employed applicants must be self-employed  
in the same field for a minimum of two years. The self-employed applicant must  
provide signed copies of complete federal income tax returns (including         
schedules) filed for the most recent two years.                                 

A credit report by an independent credit reporting agency is generally
required reflecting the applicant's complete credit history. The credit report  
should reflect all delinquencies of 30 days or more, repossessions, judgments,  
foreclosures, garnishments, bankruptcies, divorce actions and similar adverse   
credit practices that can be discovered by a search of public records. If the   
report is obtained more than 120 or 180 days (depending on type of property)    
prior to the loan closing, the lender must determine that the reported          
information has not changed. All taxes and assessments not included in the      
payment must be verified as current.                                            

The Seller is responsible for using sound judgment in underwriting the
loans consistent with prudent industry practices. Generally, the applicant      
should have an acceptable credit history given the amount of equity available,  
the strength of the applicant's employment history and the level of the         
applicant's income to debt obligations. The rescission period must have expired 
prior to funding a loan. The rescission period may not be waived by the         
applicant except as permitted by law. An attorney's title opinion or an ALTA    
title insurance policy is required for all loans.                               

The applicant is required to secure property insurance in an amount   
sufficient to cover the new loan. The Seller must ensure that its name and      
address is properly added to the mortgagee clause of the insurance policy.      

DELINQUENCY, LOAN LOSS AND FORECLOSURE INFORMATION 

  The following table sets forth the Seller's delinquency experience, on a
servicing portfolio of mortgage loans similar to the Mortgage Loans, at the     
dates indicated below. The Seller's portfolio of mortgage loans may differ      
significantly from the Mortgage Loans included in the Trust Fund in terms of    
interest rates, principal balances, geographic distribution, Loan-to-Value      
Ratios and other relevant characteristics. There                                

S-38

P-->424B344th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 44th

can be no assurance the delinquency and loss experienced on the Mortgage Loans  
(most of which have been acquired by the Seller during the past twelve months)  
will be consistent with the historical information provided below. Such losses  
and delinquencies on the Mortgage Loans may be higher than the historical       
information presented below.                                                    

The following table sets forth information relating to the delinquency
experience of mortgage loans similar to and including the Mortgage Loans for the
four quarters ended March 31, 1997, June 30, 1997, September 30, 1997 and       
December 31, 1997.                                                              

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                                         QUARTER ENDED                                     
                      ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------ 
                          DECEMBER 31, 1997 SEPTEMBER 30, 1997 JUNE 30, 1997        
                      --------------------------   --------------------------   -------------------------- 
                      NUMBER OF       DOLLAR       NUMBER OF       DOLLAR       NUMBER OF       DOLLAR     
                        LOANS         AMOUNT         LOANS         AMOUNT         LOANS         AMOUNT     
                      ---------   --------------   ---------   --------------   ---------   -------------- 
                                                                                                           
Portfolio............   3,816     $1,249,896,170     3,737     $1,222,191,914     3,645     $1,174,533,467 
Delinquency                                                                                                
  percentage(1)                                                                                            
  30-59 days.........    1.23%              1.21%     1.58%              1.41%     1.43%              1.36%
  60-89 days.........    0.18               0.15      0.27               0.24      0.38               0.36 
  90 days or more....    0.58               0.76      0.51               0.54      0.60               0.69 
                       ------     --------------    ------     --------------    ------     -------------- 
         Total.......    1.99%              2.12%     2.36%              2.19%     2.41%              2.41%
Foreclosures.........    0.45%              0.44%     0.35%              0.37%     0.36%              0.37%
Percentage of Net                                                                                          
  Gains/(Losses) on                                                                                        
  liquidated loans...    0.03%            (0.00)%   (0.03)%            (0.02)%   (0.03)%            (0.00)%


                            QUARTER ENDED                                                                  
                      --------------------------                                                           
                            MARCH 31, 1997                                                                 
                      --------------------------                                                           
                      NUMBER OF       DOLLAR                                                               
                        LOANS         AMOUNT                                                               
                      ---------   --------------                                                           
                                                                                                           
Portfolio............   3,552     $1,144,951,857                                                           
Delinquency                                                                                                
  percentage(1)                                                                                            
  30-59 days.........    1.15%              1.02%                                                          
  60-89 days.........    0.31               0.28                                                           
  90 days or more....    0.76               0.95                                                           
                       ------     --------------                                                           
         Total.......    2.22%              2.25%                                                          
Foreclosures.........    0.37%              0.32%                                                          
Percentage of Net                                                                                          
  Gains/(Losses) on                                                                                        
  liquidated loans...     N/A                N/A                                                           

---------------                                                                 

(1) The period of delinquency is based on the number of days the payment is     
contractually past due.                                                 

     The above delinquency experience percentages are calculated on the basis of
the total mortgage loan portfolio of similar loans serviced by the Seller at the
date indicated, all of which loans were acquired or originated by the Seller.   
However, because the total amount of loans serviced by the Seller has increased 
over these periods as a result of new originations, the total amount of loans   
serviced as of the end of any indicated period will include many loans that will
not have been outstanding long enough to give rise to some or all of the        
indicated periods of delinquency. Because the Trust Fund consists of a fixed    
group of Mortgage Loans, the actual delinquency percentages with respect to the 
Mortgage Loans may differ from the delinquency percentages indicated above.     

PREPAYMENT AND YIELD CONSIDERATIONS 

GENERAL 

     The yield to maturity of each Class of Certificates will depend upon, among
other things, the price at which such Certificates are purchased, the applicable
Certificate Rate, the actual characteristics of the Mortgage Loans in the       
related Loan Group, the rate of principal payments (including Prepayments) on   
the Mortgage Loans in the related Loan Group and the rate of liquidations on the
Mortgage Loans. The yield to maturity to Holders of the Certificates will be    
lower than the yield to maturity otherwise produced by the applicable           
Certificate Rate and purchase price of such Certificates because principal and  
interest distributions will not be payable to such Certificateholders until the 
25th day of the month following the month of accrual (without any additional    
distribution of interest or earnings thereon with respect to such delay). Except
in the limited circumstances set forth herein, distributions to the Class SA    
Certificates and the Class A Certificates relate to payments on the Group SA    
Mortgage Loans and Group A Mortgage Loans, respectively. Distributions of the   
Subordinate Certificates and the Residual Certificate, relate to payments on    
both the Group SA Mortgage Loans and Group A Mortgage Loans.                    

S-39

P-->424B345th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 45th
PRINCIPAL PREPAYMENTS AND COMPENSATING INTEREST                                 

     When a Mortgagor prepays a Mortgage Loan in full between Due Dates for such
Mortgage Loan, the Mortgagor pays interest on the amount prepaid only to the    
date of prepayment instead of for the entire month. Also, when a Curtailment is 
made on a Mortgage Loan together with the scheduled Monthly Payment for a month 
on or after the related Due Date, the principal balance of the Mortgage Loan is 
reduced by the amount of the Curtailment as of such Due Date, but such principal
is not distributed to related Certificateholders until the Distribution Date in 
the next month; therefore, one month of interest shortfall accrues on the amount
of such Curtailment.                                                            

In order to reduce the adverse effect on Certificateholders from the  
deficiency in interest payable as a result of a Payoff or Curtailment on a      
Mortgage Loan between its Due Dates, the Servicer will pass through Compensating
Interest to the related Certificateholders to the limited extent and in the     
manner set forth below. The Servicer is obligated to remit to the Distribution  
Account on the day prior to each Distribution Date with respect to the Mortgage 
Loans in each Loan Group an amount equal to the lesser of (a) any shortfall for 
the related month in interest collections resulting from the timing of Payoffs  
made other than on the first day of the month or Curtailments and (b) the       
monthly Servicing Fee payable to the Servicer.                                  

     To the extent that the amount allocated to a Loan Group to pay Compensating
Interest is insufficient to cover the deficiency in interest payable as a result
of a Payoff and any deficiency as a result of a Curtailment on a Mortgage Loan, 
such deficiency will be allocated to the Certificates of the related Certificate
Group pro rata according to the amount of interest to which each related Class  
of Certificates would otherwise be entitled in reduction thereof.               

MANDATORY PREPAYMENT 

The original Pre-Funded Amount of $57,744,845 will be funded from the 
proceeds of the sale of the Certificates and is intended to be used to acquire  
Subsequent Mortgage Loans. In the event that, on July 24, 1998, not all of the  
Pre-Funded Amount has been used to acquire Subsequent Mortgage Loans, then the  
Class or Classes of Class A Certificates then entitled to receive payments of   
principal will receive a partial prepayment on the July, 1998 Distribution Date 
in an aggregate amount equal to the remainder of the Pre-Funded Amount.         

    Although no assurances can be given, the Seller intends that the principal
amount of Subsequent Mortgage Loans sold to the Trust Fund will require the     
application of substantially all of the Pre-Funded Amount and that there should 
be no material amount of principal prepaid from the Pre-Funded Amount to the    
Holders of any of the Certificates.                                             

THE SUBORDINATE CERTIFICATES 

     The weighted average life of, and the yield to maturity on, the Subordinate
Certificates, in decreasing order of their priority of distributions, will be   
progressively more sensitive to the rate and timing of Mortgagor defaults and   
the severity of ensuing losses on the Mortgage Loans. If the actual rate and    
severity of losses on the Mortgage Loans is higher than those assumed by a      
Holder of a Subordinate Certificate, the actual yield to maturity of such       
Certificate may be lower than the yield expected by such Holder based on such   
assumption. The timing of losses on the Mortgage Loans will also affect an      
investor's actual yield to maturity, even if the rate of defaults and severity  
of losses over the life of the Mortgage Loans are consistent with such          
investor's expectations. In general, the earlier a loss occurs the greater the  
effect on an investor's yield to maturity. Losses on the Mortgage Loans will    
reduce the Class Principal Balance of the Subordinate Certificates to the extent
of any losses allocated thereto without the receipt of cash attributable to such
reduction. See "Description of the Certificates -- Subordination and Allocation
of Losses" herein. As a result of such reductions, less interest will accrue on 
such Classes of Subordinate Certificates than otherwise would be the case. The  
yield to maturity of the Subordinate Certificates will also be affected by      
disproportionate allocations of principal prepayments to the Senior Certificates
and other cash shortfalls in Available Funds. See "Description of the
Certificates -- Subordination and Allocation of Losses" herein.                 

S-40

P-->424B346th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 46th
RATE OF PAYMENTS                                                                

The rate of principal payments on the Certificates entitled to receive
principal generally is directly related to the rate of principal payments on the
Mortgage Loans in the related Loan Group, which may be in the form of scheduled 
payments or Prepayments. See "Risk Factors" herein and "Yield and Prepayment
Considerations" in the Prospectus. Mortgagors may prepay the Mortgage Loans at  
any time without penalty. A higher than anticipated rate of Prepayments would   
reduce the aggregate principal balance of the Mortgage Loans more quickly than  
expected. As a consequence, aggregate interest payments with respect to the     
Mortgage Loans would be substantially less than expected, therefore, a higher   
rate of Prepayments in a Loan Group could result in a lower than expected yield 
to maturity on each related Class of Certificates purchased at a premium and in 
certain circumstances such investors may not fully recoup their initial         
investments. Conversely, a lower than anticipated rate of Prepayments in a Loan 
Group would reduce the return to investors on any related Classes of            
Certificates purchased at a discount, in that principal payments with respect to
the Mortgage Loans would occur later than anticipated. There can be no assurance
that Certificateholders will be able to reinvest amounts received with respect  
to the Certificates at a rate which is comparable to the applicable Certificate 
Rate. Investors should fully consider all of the associated risks.              

SPECIAL SENSITIVITIES                                                           

     The yield to maturity on the Class SA-5 and Class SA-X Certificates will be
extremely sensitive to the level of Prepayments of the Group SA Mortgage Loans. 
Therefore, the yield to maturity on the Class SA-5 and Class SA-X Certificates  
will decrease as a result of faster than expected Prepayments on the Group SA   
Mortgage Loans. Prospective investors should fully consider the risks associated
with an investment in the Class SA-5 and Class SA-X Certificates, including the 
possibility that if the rate of Prepayments on the Group SA Mortgage Loans is   
rapid, such investors may not fully recoup their initial investments.           

   The yield to maturity on the Class A-6 and Class A-X Certificates will be
extremely sensitive to the level of Prepayments of the Group A Mortgage Loans.  
Therefore, the yield to maturity on the Class A-6 and Class A-X Certificates    
will decrease as a result of faster than expected Prepayments on the Group A    
Mortgage Loans. Prospective investors should fully consider the risks associated
with an investment in the Class A-6 and Class A-X Certificates, including the   
possibility that if the rate of Prepayments on the Group A Mortgage Loans is    
rapid, such investors may not fully recoup their initial investments.           

BASIC PREPAYMENT ASSUMPTION 

Prepayments on mortgage loans are commonly measured relative to a     
prepayment standard or model. The prepayment model used in this Prospectus      
Supplement (the "Basic Prepayment Assumption" or "BPA") represents an assumed   
rate of prepayment each month relative to the then outstanding principal balance
of a pool of mortgage loans. For all mortgage loans, a 100% Basic Prepayment    
Assumption assumes a per annum rate of prepayment of 0.2% of the then           
outstanding principal balance of a pool of mortgage loans in the first month of 
the life of such mortgage loan, following which, such annual prepayment rate    
increases by 0.2% each month until the 30th month after origination of such     
mortgage loans and remains constant at 6% per annum in the 30th month after     
origination of such mortgage loans and in each month thereafter. As used in the 
tables below, a 50% BPA assumes current rates equal to 50% of the BPA.          
Correspondingly, a 300% BPA assumes prepayment rates equal to 300% of the BPA,  
and so forth.                                                                   

BPA does not purport to be either an historical description of the    
prepayment experience of any pool of mortgage loans or a prediction of the      
anticipated rate of prepayment of any pool of mortgage loans, including the     
Mortgage Loans, and there is no assurance that the Mortgage Loans in any Loan   
Group will prepay at any given percentage of the BPA. The actual rate of        
Prepayments on the Mortgage Loans may be influenced by a variety of economic,   
geographic, social and other factors. In general, if prevailing interest rates  
fall significantly below the interest rates on the Mortgage Loans, the Mortgage 
Loans are likely to be subject to higher prepayment rates than if prevailing    
rates remain at or above the interest rates on the Mortgage Loans. Conversely,  
if interest rates rise above the interest rates on the Mortgage Loans, the rate 
of prepayment would                                                             

S-41

P-->424B347th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 47th

be expected to decrease. A comparatively low interest-rate environment may      
result in a higher than expected rate of Prepayments on the Mortgage Loans and  
an earlier than expected retirement of the Certificates.                        

    The Depositor makes no representation as to the specific factors that will
affect the prepayment of the Mortgage Loans or the relative importance of such  
factors. Factors not identified by the Depositor or discussed herein may        
significantly affect the prepayment rate of the Mortgage Loans. In particular,  
the Depositor makes no representation as to the percentage of the principal     
amount of the Mortgage Loans that will be paid as of any date or as to the      
overall rate of prepayment.                                                     

    For purposes of the tables set forth in Appendix A, it is assumed that the
Mortgage Loans included in the Mortgage Pool on the Closing Date have the       
characteristics set forth below: (i) the scheduled payments on all Mortgage     
Loans are received on the first day of each month beginning May 1, 1998, (ii)   
any Prepayments on the Mortgage Loans are received on the last day of each month
beginning on April 30, 1998 and include 30 days of interest thereon, (iii) there
are no defaults or delinquencies on the Mortgage Loans, (iv) optional           
termination of the Trust Fund does not occur, (v) there are no partial          
prepayments on the Mortgage Loans and prepayments are computed after giving     
effect to scheduled payments received on the following day, (vi) the Mortgage   
Loans in each Loan Group prepay at the indicated constant percentages of the    
BPA, (vii) the date of issuance for the Certificates is April 29, 1998, (viii)  
cash distributions are received by the Certificateholders on the 25th day of    
each month when due, (ix) the scheduled monthly payments for each Mortgage Loan 
are computed based upon its unpaid principal balance, Loan Rate and amortized   
remaining term such that the Mortgage Loan will fully amortize on its maturity  
date, and (x) all of the Pre-Funded Amount is used to acquire Subsequent        
Mortgage Loans on the Initial Cut-Off Date (collectively, the "Modeling         
Assumptions"). The approximate Class Principal Balances of the Junior           
Subordinate Certificates as of the Closing Date will be as follows: Class B-3,  
$1,225,186, Class B-4, $700,106 and Class B-5 $1,050,161.64.                    

REPRESENTATIVE LOAN POOLS 

                                                                [Download Table]

                 PRINCIPAL       GROSS      NET               ORIGINAL    
                  BALANCE         WAC       WAC     WAM   TERM TO MATURITY
                 ---------      -------   -------   ---   ----------------
 
LOAN GROUP A 
                49,127,747.73   7.72868   7.34368   352         356       
                47,730,262.21   8.05367   7.66867   345         354       
                32,466,171.55   8.13271   7.74771   328         353       
                30,317,064.95   7.53603   7.27603   356         358       
                22,544,770.11   7.86156   7.60156   358         358       
                 4,883,010.21   7.26000   7.00000   357         357       
LOAN GROUP SA                                                             
                30,802,921.25   8.12218   7.73718   239         339       
                15,847,487.65   8.10856   7.72356   254         332       
                48,211,198.85   8.00638   7.62138   269         335       
                47,191,877.57   7.74158   7.35658   280         336       
                20,930,715.56   8.06325   7.67825   305         349       

  Any discrepancy between the actual characteristics of the Mortgage Loans
and the characteristics of the Mortgage Loans set forth above may affect the    
percentages of the initial Class Principal Balances set forth in the tables and 
the weighted average lives of the Offered Certificates. In addition, to the     
extent that the characteristics of the Mortgage Loans differ and the initial    
Class Principal Balances differ from those assumed in preparing the tables in   
Appendix A, the outstanding Class Principal Balance of any Class of Offered     
Certificates may be reduced to zero earlier or later than indicated by such     
tables.                                                                         

 Variations in actual prepayment experience may increase or decrease the
percentages of the original outstanding Class Principal Balances and the        
weighted average lives shown in the tables in Appendix A. Such variations may   
occur even if the average prepayment experience of all the Mortgage Loans equals
the                                                                             

S-42

P-->424B348th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 48th

indicated percentage of the applicable Basic Prepayment Assumption. There is no 
assurance, however, that prepayment of the Mortgage Loans of any Loan Group will
conform to any given percentage of the Basic Prepayment Assumption. The         
Depositor makes no representations that the actual rates of prepayments on the  
Mortgage Loans will in any way correspond to any of the assumptions made herein.

   Based on the foregoing assumptions, the tables in Appendix A indicate the
weighted average lives of the Offered Certificates and set forth the percentages
of the initial outstanding Class Principal Balances of each such Class of       
Offered Certificates that would be outstanding after each of the dates shown at 
various constant percentages of the Basic Prepayment Assumption.                

     There is no historical prepayment data available for the Mortgage Pool, and
comparable data is not available because the Mortgage Loans do not constitute a 
representative sample of mortgage loans generally. In addition, historical data 
available with respect to mortgage loans underlying mortgage pass through       
certificates issued by GNMA, FNMA and FHLMC may not be comparable to prepayments
expected to be experienced by the Mortgage Pool because the Mortgage Loans may  
have characteristics which differ from the mortgage loans underlying            
certificates issued by GNMA, FNMA and FHLMC.                                    

   The Depositor makes no representation that the Mortgage Loans will prepay
in the manner or at any of the rates assumed above. Each investor must make its 
own decision as to the appropriate prepayment assumptions to be used in deciding
whether or not to purchase any of the Certificates. Since the rate of principal 
payments (including Prepayments) with respect to, and repurchases of, the       
Mortgage Loans will significantly affect the yields to maturity on the Offered  
Certificates, prospective investors are urged to consult their investment       
advisors as to both the anticipated rate of future principal payments (including
Prepayments) on the Mortgage Loans and the suitability of the Certificates to   
their investment objectives.                                                    

YIELD CONSIDERATIONS WITH RESPECT TO THE CLASS SA-5, CLASS SA-X, CLASS A-6 AND  
CLASS A-X CERTIFICATES 

   The yields to maturity on the Class SA-5, Class SA-X, Class A-6 and Class
A-X Certificates will be extremely sensitive to the level of Prepayments of the 
Mortgage Loans in the related Loan Group. The yield to maturity on such         
Certificates will generally decrease as a result of faster than expected        
Prepayments on the related Mortgage Loans. Prospective investors should fully   
consider the risks associated with an investment in the Class SA-5, Class SA-X, 
Class A-6 and Class A-X Certificates, including the possibility that if the rate
of Prepayments on the related Mortgage Loans is rapid, such investors may not   
fully recoup their initial investments.                                         

 To illustrate the significance of different rates of Prepayments on the
distributions to the Class SA-5, Class SA-X, Class A-6 and Class A-X            
Certificates, the following tables indicate the approximate pre-tax yields to   
maturity (on a corporate bond equivalent basis) under the different percentages 
of the BPA indicated. Because the rate of distribution of interest on the Class 
SA-5, Class SA-X, Class A-6 and Class A-X Certificates, will be directly related
to the actual amortization (including Prepayments) of the Mortgage Loans in     
related Loan Group. The pre-tax yields to maturity on the Class SA-5, Class     
SA-X, Class A-6 and Class A-X Certificates are likely to differ from those shown
in the following tables even if all the Mortgage Loans in related Loan Group    
prepay at the indicated constant percentages of the applicable BPA. Any         
differences between such assumptions and the actual characteristics and         
performance of the Mortgage Loans and of the Certificates may result in yields  
to maturity being different from those shown in such tables. Discrepancies      
between assumed and actual characteristics and performances underscore the      
hypothetical nature of the tables, which are provided only to give a general    
sense of the sensitivity of yields to maturity in varying prepayment scenarios. 
In addition, it is highly unlikely that the Mortgage Loans will prepay at a     
constant level of the BPA until maturity or that all of such Mortgage Loans will
prepay at the same rate. The timing of changes to the rate of Prepayments may   
significantly affect the actual yield to maturity to an investor, even if the   
average rate of Prepayments is consistent with an investor's expectation. In    
general, the earlier a payment of principal of the Mortgage Loans, the greater  
the effect on an investor's yield to maturity. As a result, the effect on an    
investor's yield to maturity of Prepayments occurring at a rate higher (or      
lower) than the rate anticipated by the investor during the period immediately  
following the issuance of the Certificates will not be equally offset by a      
subsequent like reduction (or increase) in the rate of Prepayments.             

S-43

P-->424B349th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 49th

     In addition, the yield to maturity on the Class SA-5, Class SA-X, Class A-6
and Class A-X Certificates may be adversely affected if an optional termination 
of the Trust Fund occurs. See "Description of the Certificates -- Termination;
Purchase of Mortgage Loans" herein.                                             

    The sensitivity tables for the Class SA-5, Class SA-X, Class A-6 and Class
A-X Certificates set forth below are based on the Modeling Assumptions and      
assume further that the Certificates are purchased at prices equal to those set 
forth in the tables (which include Accrued Interest). There can be no assurance 
that the Mortgage Loans will have the assumed characteristics, will prepay at   
any of the rates shown herein, or that the purchase prices of the Certificates  
will be as assumed or that the pre-tax yields to maturity will correspond to any
of the pre-tax yields shown herein. The actual prices to be paid on the Class   
SA-5, Class SA-X, Class A-6 and Class A-X Certificates have not been determined 
and will be dependent on the characteristics of the Mortgage Pool as ultimately 
constituted. In addition to any other factors an investor may deem material,    
each investor must make its own decision as to the appropriate prepayment       
assumptions to be used in deciding whether or not to purchase a Class of        
Certificates.                                                                   

SENSITIVITY OF PRE-TAX YIELD TO MATURITY
OF THE CLASS SA-5 CERTIFICATES TO PREPAYMENTS 
AT AN ASSUMED PURCHASE PRICE OF APPROXIMATELY 12.23% OF THE CLASS SA-5 NOTIONAL 
AMOUNT

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                                              PERCENTAGE OF THE BPA          
                                                      -------------------------------------  
                                                       0%     100%    300%    350%    500%   
                                                      ----    ----    ----    ----    -----  
                                                                                             
Pre-Tax Yield........................................ 62.3%   52.4%   28.6%   21.3%    (3.3%)

 On the basis of a constant prepayment rate of 481% of the BPA used with
respect to Loan Group SA, a purchase price of approximately $138,189, which     
includes accrued interest, and the assumptions described above, the pre-tax     
yield to maturity of the Class SA-5 Certificates would be approximately 0%.     

SENSITIVITY OF PRE-TAX YIELD TO MATURITY
OF THE CLASS SA-X CERTIFICATES TO PREPAYMENTS 
AT AN ASSUMED PURCHASE PRICE OF APPROXIMATELY 1.50% OF THE CLASS SA-X NOTIONAL
AMOUNT

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                                              PERCENTAGE OF THE BPA         
                                                      ------------------------------------- 
                                                       0%     100%    300%    350%    500%  
                                                      ----    ----    ----    ----    ----- 
                                                                                            
Pre-Tax Yield........................................ 39.6%   32.5%   17.6%   13.7%     1.5%

 On the basis of a constant prepayment rate of 518% of the BPA used with
respect to Loan Group SA, a purchase price of approximately $2,452,894, which   
includes accrued interest, and the assumptions described above, the pre-tax     
yield to maturity of the Class SA-X Certificates would be approximately 0%.     

SENSITIVITY OF PRE-TAX YIELD TO MATURITY
OF THE CLASS A-6 CERTIFICATES TO PREPAYMENTS
AT AN ASSUMED PURCHASE PRICE OF APPROXIMATELY 11.41% OF THE CLASS A-6 NOTIONAL
AMOUNT

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                                              PERCENTAGE OF THE BPA         
                                                      ------------------------------------- 
                                                       0%     100%    300%    350%    500%  
                                                      ----    ----    ----    ----    ----- 
                                                                                            
Pre-Tax Yield........................................ 68.4%   59.9%   39.2%   33.5%    16.1%

 On the basis of a constant prepayment rate of 643% of the BPA used with
respect to Loan Group A, a purchase price of approximately $268,306, which      
includes accrued interest, and the assumptions described above, the pre-tax     
yield to maturity of the Class A-6 Certificates would be approximately 0%.      

S-44

P-->424B350th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 50th
SENSITIVITY OF PRE-TAX YIELD TO MATURITY
OF THE CLASS A-X CERTIFICATES TO PREPAYMENTS
AT AN ASSUMED PURCHASE PRICE OF APPROXIMATELY 1.49% OF THE CLASS A-X NOTIONAL 
AMOUNT

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                                              PERCENTAGE OF THE BPA        
                                                       ------------------------------------
                                                        0%     100%    300%    350%    500%
                                                       ----    ----    ----    ----    ----
                                                                                           
Pre-Tax Yield......................................... 35.3%   29.5%   17.6%   14.5%   5.1%

 On the basis of a constant prepayment rate of 578% of the BPA used with
respect to Loan Group A, a purchase price of approximately $2,788,339, which    
includes accrued interest, and the assumptions described above, the pre-tax     
yield to maturity of the Class A-X Certificates would be approximately 0%.      

The pre-tax yields to maturity set forth in the preceding tables were 
calculated by determining the monthly discount rates (whether positive or       
negative) which, when applied to the assumed streams of cash flows to be paid on
the Class SA-5, Class SA-X, Class A-6 and Class A-X Certificates, would cause   
the discounted present values of such assumed streams of cash flows to equal the
assumed purchase price, including accrued interest. These monthly discount rates
were converted to corporate bond equivalent rates, which are higher than the    
monthly discount rates because they are based on semiannual compounding. These  
yields to maturity do not take into account the different interest rates at     
which investors may be able to reinvest funds received by them as distributions 
on the Class SA-5, Class SA-X, Class A-6 and Class A-X Certificates and thus do 
not reflect the return on any investment in the Class SA-5, Class SA-X, Class   
A-6 and Class A-X Certificates when any reinvestment rates other than the       
discount rates are considered.                                                  

   There are no historical prepayment data available for the Mortgage Loans,
and comparable data is not available because the Mortgage Loans generally do not
constitute a representative sample of mortgage loans. In addition, historical   
data available with respect to mortgage loans underlying mortgage pass-through  
certificates issued by the GNMA, FNMA, and FHLMC may not be comparable to       
prepayments expected to be experienced by the Mortgage Loans because the        
Mortgage Loans may have characteristics which differ from the mortgage loans    
underlying certificates issued by GNMA, FNMA and FHLMC.                         

   The Depositor makes no representation that the Mortgage Loans will prepay
in the manner or at any of the rates assumed above. Each investor must make its 
own decision as to the appropriate prepayment assumptions to be used in deciding
whether or not to purchase any of the Certificates. Since the rate of principal 
payments (including Prepayments) with respect to, and repurchases of, the       
Mortgage Loans will significantly affect the yields to maturity on the Offered  
Certificates, prospective investors are urged to consult their investment       
advisors as to both the anticipated rate of future principal payments (including
Prepayments) on the Mortgage Loans and the suitability of the Certificates to   
their investment objectives.                                                    

ADDITIONAL YIELD CONSIDERATIONS APPLICABLE SOLELY TO THE RESIDUAL CERTIFICATES  

     Holders of interest in a Residual Certificate may have tax liabilities with
respect to their Certificates during many or all of the years of the REMICs'    
terms that substantially exceed any distributions payable thereon during any    
such period. In addition, Holders of interests in a Residual Certificate may    
have tax liabilities with respect to their Certificates the present value of    
which substantially exceeds the present value of distributions payable thereon  
and of any tax benefits that may arise with respect thereto. Accordingly, the   
after-tax rate of return on a Residual Certificate may be negative or may       
otherwise be significantly adversely affected. The timing and amount of taxable 
income attributable to a Residual Certificate will depend on, among other       
things, the timing and amounts of prepayments and losses experienced with       
respect to the Mortgage Pool.                                                   

     The Residual Certificateholders should consult their own tax advisors as to
the effect of taxes and the receipt of any payments made to such Holders in     
connection with the purchase, ownership and disposition of interests in a       
Residual Certificate and the after-tax rate of return thereon. See "Certain
Federal Income Tax Consequences" herein and in the Prospectus.                  

S-45

P-->424B351st Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 51st
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION                                                          

   The Depositor intends to file with the Securities and Exchange Commission
certain additional yield tables and other computational materials with respect  
to one or more Classes of the Offered Certificates on a Current Report on Form  
8-K. Such tables and material were prepared by DLJ at the request of certain    
prospective investors, based on assumptions provided by, and satisfying the     
special requirements of, such prospective investors. Such tables and materials  
are preliminary in nature, and the information contained therein is subject to, 
and superseded by, the information in this Supplement.                          

FORMATION OF THE TRUST FUND AND TRUST PROPERTY

The FURST Mortgage Loan Trust 1998-A will be created and established  
pursuant to the Pooling and Servicing Agreement. As of the Closing Date, the    
Depositor will convey without recourse (subject to certain obligations to       
repurchase Defective Mortgage Loans or replace Defective Mortgage Loans with    
Eligible Substitute Mortgage Loans) the Initial Mortgage Loans to the Trust Fund
and will fund the Pre-Funding Account, Capitalized Interest Account and the     
Class A-7 Reserve Fund, and the Trust Fund will issue the Offered Certificates  
and the Junior Subordinate Certificates to the Depositor.                       

The property of the Trust Fund shall include (a) the Mortgage Loans   
together with the related Mortgage Loan documents (including any guaranty       
executed in connection therewith) and the Depositor's interest in any property  
which secures a Mortgage Loan (the "Mortgaged Property") and all payments       
thereon and proceeds of the conversion, voluntary or involuntary, of the        
foregoing, (b) such amounts as may be held in the Distribution Account, the     
Collection Account and the Class A-7 Reserve Fund, (d) any funds on deposit in  
the Pre-Funding Account and the Capitalized Interest Account, and (e) proceeds  
of all the foregoing (including, but not by way of limitation, all of any       
mortgage insurance, hazard insurance and title insurance policy relating to the 
Mortgage Loans, cash proceeds, accounts, accounts receivable, notes, drafts,    
acceptances, chattel paper, checks, deposit accounts, rights to payment of any  
and every kind, and other forms of obligations and receivables which at any time
constitute all or part of or are included in the proceeds of any of the         
foregoing but excluding any net investment income from the investment of funds  
in the Collection Account, if any, and the Distribution Account) to pay the     
Certificates as specified in the Pooling and Servicing Agreement.               

     The Certificates will not represent an interest in or an obligation of, nor
will the Mortgage Loans be guaranteed by, the Depositor, the Seller, the        
Servicer, the Trustee or any of their affiliates.                               

Prior to its formation the Trust Fund will have had no assets or      
obligations. Upon formation, the Trust Fund will not engage in any business     
activity other than acquiring, holding and collecting payments on the Mortgage  
Loans, issuing the Certificates and distributing payments thereon. The Trust    
Fund will not acquire any receivables or assets other than the Mortgage Loans,  
investments in the Pre-Funding Account and investments in the Capitalized       
Interest Account, and the rights appurtenant thereto. To the extent that        
borrowers make scheduled payments under the Mortgage Loans the Trust Fund will  
have sufficient liquidity to make distributions on the Certificates. As the     
Trust Fund does not have any operating history and will not engage in any       
business activity other than issuing the Certificates and making distributions  
thereon, there has not been included any historical or pro forma ratio of       
earnings to fixed charges with respect to the Trust Fund.                       

DESCRIPTION OF THE CERTIFICATES 

The Certificates will be issued pursuant to the Pooling and Servicing 
Agreement among the Document Custodian, the Depositor, the Seller, the Servicer 
and the Trustee. Reference is made to the Prospectus for additional information 
regarding the terms and conditions of the Pooling and Servicing Agreement to the
extent not revised by the following description. To the extent that the         
statements in this Prospectus Supplement modify statements in the Prospectus,   
the statements in this Prospectus Supplement control.                           

   The following summaries do not purport to be complete and are subject to,
and are qualified in their entirety by reference to, the provisions of the      
Pooling and Servicing Agreement. When particular provisions or                  

S-46

P-->424B352nd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 52nd

terms used in the Pooling and Servicing Agreement are referred to, the actual   
provisions (including definitions of terms) are incorporated by reference.      

GENERAL 

The Certificates will evidence all the beneficial ownership in a trust
established by the Depositor into which the mortgage loans (the "Mortgage       
Loans") will be deposited. The Mortgage Pass-Through Certificates, Series 1998-A
(the "Certificates"), will consist of the following twenty-two classes: (i)     
Class SA-1, Class SA-2, Class SA-3, Class SA-4, Class SA-5 and Class SA-X (the  
"Class SA Certificates"), (ii) Class A-1, Class A-2, Class A-3, Class A-4, Class
A-5, Class A-6, Class A-7 and Class A-X (the "Class A Certificates"), (iii)     
Class M, Class B-1 and Class B-2 (the "Senior Subordinate Certificates"), (iv)  
Class B-3, Class B-4 and Class B-5 (the "Junior Subordinate Certificates" and,  
together with the Senior Subordinate Certificates, the "Subordinate
Certificates") and (v) Class R-I and Class R-II (the "Residual Certificates"    
and, together with the Class SA and Class A Certificates, the "Senior           
Certificates"). Only the Senior Certificates and the Senior Subordinate         
Certificates (collectively, the "Offered Certificates") are offered hereby. The 
Junior Subordinate Certificates are not offered hereby. The Class SA            
Certificates, the Class A Certificates and the Subordinate Certificates are each
a "Certificate Group". The "Class Principal Balance" for any Class of           
Certificates will equal the aggregate amount of principal to which such Class is
entitled, after giving effect to prior (i) distributions of principal to such   
Class and (ii) allocations of losses required to be borne by such Class.        
Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Class Principal Balance of the most          
Subordinate Class of Certificates outstanding at any time is equal to the       
aggregate Scheduled Principal Balance of all of the Mortgage Loans less the     
Class Principal Balance of all other Classes of Certificates. As used herein the
"Principal Balance" of a Class means the Class Principal Balance thereof.       

     The "Certificate Principal Balance" for any Certificate will be the portion
of the corresponding Class Principal Balance represented by such Certificate.   
The aggregate initial Certificate Principal Balance will be approximately equal 
to the sum of (i) the aggregate principal balance of the Mortgage Loans as of   
the Initial Cut-Off Date and (ii) the original Pre-Funded Amount. The Offered   
Certificates, other than the Class A-2, Class A-4, Class A-5, Class A-7 and     
Class R Certificates, are offered in minimum denominations equivalent to not    
less than $25,000 initial Certificate Principal Balance or Notional Principal   
Amount, as applicable, each and multiples of $1 in excess thereof. The Class    
A-2, Class A-4, Class A-5 and Class A-7 Certificates are offered in minimum     
denominations equivalent to not less than $1,000 initial Certificate Principal  
Balance each and multiple of $1 in excess thereof. The Class R-I and Class R-II 
Certificates, each of which will have an initial Class Principal Balance of $50,
will be offered in registered, certificated form in a single denomination of a  
100% Percentage Interest each.                                                  

BOOK-ENTRY REGISTRATION 

  Each Class of Book-Entry Certificates will initially be represented by a
global Certificate registered in the name of the nominee of DTC. DTC has advised
the Depositor that DTC's nominee will be Cede & Co. ("Cede"). Accordingly, Cede 
is expected to be the Holder of record of the Book-Entry Certificates. No       
Beneficial Owners will be entitled to receive a certificate representing such   
person's interest in such Certificate. Unless and until Definitive Certificates 
(as defined below) are issued under the limited circumstances described herein, 
all references herein to actions by Beneficial Owners shall refer to actions    
taken by DTC upon instructions from DTC Participants (as defined below), and all
references herein to distributions, notices, reports, and statements to         
Beneficial Owners shall refer to distributions, notices, reports, and statements
to Cede, as the registered Holder of such Certificates, for distribution to     
Beneficial Owners in accordance with DTC procedures.                            

  Certificateholders may hold their Book-Entry Certificate through DTC, if
they are DTC Participants (as defined below), or indirectly through             
organizations which are DTC Participants. Transfers between DTC Participants    
will occur in the ordinary way in accordance with DTC rules. Cede, as nominee of
DTC, will hold the global Certificates for the Book-Entry Certificates.         

S-47

P-->424B353rd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 53rd

  DTC has advised the Depositor that it is a limited-purpose trust company
organized under the New York Banking Law, a "banking organization" within the   
meaning of the New York Banking Law, a member of the Federal Reserve System, a  
"clearing corporation" within the meaning of the New York Uniform Commercial    
Code and a "clearing agency" registered pursuant to the provisions of Section   
17A of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. DTC holds securities    
that its participants ("DTC Participants") deposit with DTC. DTC also           
facilitates the settlement among DTC Participants of securities transactions,   
such as transfers and pledges, in deposited securities through electronic       
computerized book-entry changes in DTC Participants' accounts, thereby          
eliminating the need for physical movement of securities certificates. DTC      
Participants include securities brokers and dealers, banks, trust companies,    
clearing corporations and certain other organizations. Indirect access to the   
DTC system also is available to other entities, such as banks, brokers, dealers,
and trust companies that clear through or maintain a custodial relationship with
a DTC Participant, either directly or indirectly ("Indirect DTC Participants"). 

Beneficial Owners that are not DTC Participants or Indirect DTC       
Participants but desire to purchase, sell, or otherwise transfer ownership of or
other interests in Book-Entry Certificates may do so only through DTC           
Participants and Indirect DTC Participants. In addition, unless Definitive      
Certificates as issued, Certificateholders will receive all distributions of    
principal and interest on the Book-Entry Certificates through DTC Participants. 
Under a book-entry format, Beneficial Owners will receive payments after the    
related Distribution Date because, while payments are required to be forwarded  
to Cede, as nominee for DTC, on each such date, DTC will forward such payments  
to DTC Participants which thereafter will be required to forward them to        
Indirect DTC Participants or Beneficial Owners. It is anticipated that the sole 
"Certificateholder" (as such term is used in the Pooling and Servicing          
Agreement) for each Class of Book-Entry Certificates will be Cede, as nominee of
DTC, and that Beneficial Owners will not be recognized by the Trustee as        
Certificateholders under the Pooling and Servicing Agreement. Beneficial Owners 
will be permitted to exercise the rights of Certificateholders under the Pooling
and Servicing Agreement only indirectly through DTC Participants, who in turn   
will exercise their rights through DTC.                                         

    Under the rules, regulations and procedures creating and affecting DTC and
its operations (the "Rules"), DTC is required to make book-entry transfers among
DTC Participants on whose behalf it acts with respect to the Book-Entry         
Certificates and is required to receive and transmit payments of principal and  
interest, if any, on such Book-Entry Certificates. DTC Participants and Indirect
DTC Participants with whom Beneficial Owners have accounts with respect to the  
Book-Entry Certificates are required to make book-entry transfers and receive   
and transmit such payments on behalf of their respective Beneficial Owners.     
Accordingly, although Beneficial Owners of Book-Entry Certificates will not     
possess Definitive Certificates, the Rules provide a mechanism by which owners  
of the Book-Entry Certificates through their DTC Participants will receive      
payments and will be able to transfer their interest.                           

    Because DTC can only act on behalf of DTC Participants, who in turn act on
behalf of Indirect DTC Participants and certain banks, the ability of a         
Beneficial Owner to pledge Book-Entry Certificates to persons or entities that  
do not participate in the DTC system, or otherwise take actions in respect of   
such Book-Entry Certificates, may be limited due to the lack of a physical      
certificate for such Book-Entry Certificates.                                   

    DTC has advised the Depositor that it will take any action permitted to be
taken by a Beneficial Owner under the Pooling and Servicing Agreement only at   
the direction of one or more DTC Participants to whose account with DTC the     
Certificates are credited. Additionally, DTC has advised the Depositor that it  
will take such actions with respect to a Book-Entry Certificate only at the     
direction of and on behalf of the DTC Participant whose holdings include that   
Certificate. DTC may take conflicting actions with respect to other Book-Entry  
Certificates to the extent that such actions are taken on behalf of DTC         
Participants whose holdings include such Book-Entry Certificates.               

    Although DTC has agreed to the foregoing procedures in order to facilitate
transfers of Book-Entry Certificates among DTC Participants, it is under no     
obligation to perform or continue to perform such procedures and such procedures
may be discontinued at any time.                                                

S-48

P-->424B354th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 54th

DEFINITIVE CERTIFICATES 

The Book-Entry Certificates will be issued in fully registered,       
certificated form to Certificateholders or their nominees ("Definitive          
Certificates"), rather than to DTC or its nominee, only if (i) the Depositor    
advises the Trustee in writing that DTC is no longer willing or able to         
discharge properly its responsibilities as Depository with respect to the       
Book-Entry Certificates and the Trustee or the Depositor is unable to locate a  
qualified successor, (ii) the Depositor, at its option, elects to terminate the 
book-entry system through DTC or (iii) after the occurrence of an Event of      
Default, Certificateholders of Book-Entry Certificates evidencing not less than 
66% of the aggregate outstanding Certificate Principal Balance advise the       
Trustee and DTC through DTC Participants in writing that the continuation of a  
book-entry system through DTC (or a successor thereto) is no longer in the best 
interest of the Certificateholders.                                             

Upon notice of the occurrence of any of the events described in the   
immediately preceding paragraph, DTC is required to notify all DTC Participants 
of the availability of Definitive Certificates. Upon surrender by DTC of the    
global Certificates and receipt from DTC of instructions for re-registration,   
the Trustee will issue the Book-Entry Certificates in the form of Definitive    
Certificates, and thereafter the Trustee will recognize the Holders of such     
Definitive Certificates as Certificateholders under the Pooling and Servicing   
Agreement.                                                                      

    Distributions of principal and interest on the Definitive Certificates, as
well as the other Classes of Certificates, will be made by the Trustee (or its  
duly appointed paying agent, if any) directly to Holders of such Certificates in
accordance with the procedures set forth herein and in the Pooling and Servicing
Agreement. Distributions of principal and interest on each Distribution Date    
will be made to Holders in whose names such Certificates were registered at the 
close of business on the last business day of the month preceding the month of  
such Distribution Date. Distributions will be made by wire transfer in          
immediately available funds for the account of each such Holder or, if a Holder 
has not provided wire instructions, by check mailed to the address of such      
Holder as it appears on the register maintained by the Certificate Registrar.   
The final payment on any Certificate (whether a Definitive Certificate or the   
global Certificates registered in the name of Cede) will be made only upon      
presentation and surrender of such Certificate at the offices of the Trustee or 
its agent or such office or agency as is specified in the notice of final       
distribution to Holders of Certificates being retired. The Trustee will provide 
such notice to registered Certificateholders not later than the fifteenth day of
the month in which all remaining outstanding Certificates will be retired.      

     Definitive Certificates, as well as the other Classes of Certificates, will
be transferable and exchangeable at the offices of the Trustee or its agent. A  
reasonable service charge may be imposed for any registration of transfer or    
exchange, and the Trustee or such agent may require payment of a sum sufficient 
to cover any tax or other governmental charge imposed in connection therewith.  

    On the Closing Date, upon the order of the Depositor concurrently with the
sale and assignment to the Trustee of the Trust Fund assets, the Trustee will   
execute, deliver and authenticate the Certificates. ASSIGNMENT OF MORTGAGE LOANS

 On the Closing Date, with respect to the Initial Mortgage Loans, and on
each Subsequent Transfer Date, with respect to the related Subsequent Mortgage  
Loans, the Depositor will assign to the Trustee all of its right, title and     
interest in and to the Mortgage Loans, including all payments of interest and   
principal, from whatever source derived, which are received on or with respect  
to the Mortgage Loans on or after the applicable Cut-Off Date, together with the
other assets and related documents (collectively, the "Related Documents")      
included in the Trust Fund. Concurrently with such assignment, the Trustee will 
deliver the Certificates to the Depositor. Each Mortgage Loan will be identified
in a schedule delivered to the Trustee.                                         

    Under the terms of the Pooling and Servicing Agreement, the Depositor will
deliver the Mortgages, the Mortgage Notes and certain of the other Related      
Documents (together, the "Mortgage Files") to the Trustee, as Document          
Custodian. The Document Custodian shall maintain possession of the Mortgage     
Files. The Document Custodian will review such Mortgage Files within the period 
specified in the Pooling and Servicing Agreement. Notwithstanding the foregoing,
the Document Custodian shall perform the review required by the Pooling and     
Servicing Agreement as to each Mortgage File and shall deliver a certificate as 
to the status of                                                                

S-49

P-->424B355th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 55th

such review within 90 days, and a final review certificate within 180 days from 
(i) the Closing Date with respect to Mortgage Files delivered on or before the  
Closing Date and (ii) the date a Mortgage File is delivered, if delivered after 
the Closing Date. If any document required to be included in any Mortgage File, 
has not been received or is unrelated to the applicable Mortgage Loan, and such 
defect is not cured as provided in the Pooling and Servicing Agreement following
receipt of notification thereof to the Seller by the Trustee, the Seller will be
required either to repurchase or to replace the affected Mortgage Loan in the   
manner set forth below. In the Pooling and Servicing Agreement, Norwest Bank    
Minnesota, National Association as Trustee of the Trust Fund will acknowledge   
the assignment of the Mortgage Loans to the Trust Fund and the Document         
Custodian will agree to hold the Mortgage Files for the Mortgage Loans for and  
on behalf of the Trust Fund for so long as the Mortgage Loans are owned by the  
Trust Fund. The Seller shall use its best efforts, within 180 days of the       
Closing Date with respect to the Initial Mortgage Loans and of the applicable   
Subsequent Transfer Date with respect to Subsequent Mortgage Loans, at its own  
expense, to either (i) record the assignment of each Mortgage in favor of the   
Trustee in the appropriate real property office or other records office or (ii) 
deliver to the Trustee the assignment of each Mortgage in favor of the Trustee  
in form for recordation, together with an opinion of counsel to the effect that 
recording is not required to protect the Trustee's right, title and interest in 
and to the related Mortgage Loan or, in the event a court should recharacterize 
the conveyance of the Mortgage Loans as a loan or a security for a loan, to     
perfect a first priority security interest in favor of the Trustee in the       
related Mortgage Loan.                                                          

     The Seller will make certain representations and warranties with respect to
each Mortgage Loan. In the event there is a breach of any representation or     
warranty made by the Seller in the Pooling and Servicing Agreement as to a      
Mortgage Loan that materially and adversely affects the interest of the         
Certificateholders, the Seller will be required either to (i) repurchase the    
related Mortgage Loan from the Trust Fund or (ii) prior to the expiration of two
years following the date the Offered Certificates are initially issued,         
substitute therefor an Eligible Substitute Mortgage Loan, in each case in the   
manner described below.                                                         

     Any Mortgage Loan required to be repurchased by the Seller as a result of a
defect, omission or breach of representation or warranty will be repurchased at 
a price (the "Purchase Price") equal to the sum of (i) the Loan Balance of such 
Mortgage Loan as of the last day of the Collection Period ended immediately     
preceding the date of repurchase, (ii) accrued and unpaid interest at the       
applicable Loan Rate, (iii) any delinquent interest on such Mortgage Loan as to 
which no monthly advance has been made, and (iv) all unreimbursed advances      
relating to such Mortgage Loan. The Purchase Price will be deposited into the   
Collection Account on the second Business Day next preceding the Distribution   
Date in the month following expiration of the related cure period. "Business    
Day" means any day other than (i) a Saturday or a Sunday or (ii) a day on which 
(x) banking institutions in the State of North Carolina, the State of Minnesota 
or the State of Maryland or (y) any depository holding certificates issued by   
the Depositor are required or authorized by law or executive order to be closed.

   As to any Eligible Substitute Mortgage Loan, the Seller will deposit into
the Collection Account the amount, if any, by which the conveyed balance of such
Eligible Substitute Mortgage Loan at the end of the Collection Period in which  
the events giving rise to the related substitution occurred is less than the    
Loan Balance of the related Mortgage Loan being removed from the Trust Fund at  
the end of such Collection Period (the "Substitution Adjustment Amount"). The   
Seller will substitute any Eligible Substitute Mortgage Loan, and deposit any   
such Substitution Adjustment Amount into the Collection Account, on the second  
Business Day next preceding the Distribution Date in the month following such   
Collection Period. Upon substitution, an Eligible Substitute Mortgage Loan will 
be subject to the terms of the Pooling and Servicing Agreement and the Seller   
will be deemed to have made, with respect to such Eligible Substitute Mortgage  
Loan, as of the date of substitution, the representations and warranties made by
the Seller with respect to all other Mortgage Loans in the Trust Fund. Upon     
receipt by the Trustee of written notification of any such repurchase or        
substitution, subject to certain conditions set forth in the Pooling and        
Servicing Agreement, the Document Custodian will execute and deliver an         
instrument of transfer or assignment necessary to vest in the Seller legal and  
beneficial ownership of such Mortgage Loan (including any property acquired in  
respect thereof or proceeds of any insurance policy with respect thereto). The  
obligation of the Seller to repurchase or                                       

S-50

P-->424B356th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 56th

replace any such Mortgage Loan will be the sole remedy against the Seller       
available to Certificateholders or the Trustee.                                 

   An "Eligible Substitute Mortgage Loan" is a Mortgage Loan that, as of the
substitution date, (i) has an outstanding Loan Balance not in excess of, and not
more than 10% less than, the Loan Balance of the Defective Mortgage Loan it     
replaces as of the substitution date; (ii) has a Loan Rate not less than the    
current Loan Rate of such Defective Mortgage Loan and not more than one percent 
in excess thereof; (iii) complies with each representation and warranty set     
forth in the Pooling and Servicing Agreement (deemed to be made as of the date  
of substitution); (iv) has a remaining term to maturity not later than nor more 
than six months earlier than the remaining term to maturity of such Defective   
Mortgage Loan (provided that a Mortgage Loan that meets all the other           
requirements of this definition, but has a remaining term to maturity that is   
(A) not more than one year longer than that of the Defective Mortgage Loan and  
(B) not later than the maturity date of the latest maturing Mortgage Loan then  
owned by the Trust Fund, will not fail to qualify as an Eligible Substitute     
Mortgage Loan if the Loan Balance of such Mortgage Loan on the date of such     
substitution, when added to the Loan Balances (determined as of the date of the 
substitution of such loan) that qualified as Eligible Substitute Mortgage Loans 
in reliance upon the provisions of this proviso clause, does not exceed an      
amount equal to $5,000,000); (v) has a Loan-to-Value Ratio not greater than that
of the Defective Mortgage Loan; and (vi) has an original principal balance of   
not more than $1,000,000. More than one Eligible Substitute Mortgage Loan may be
substituted for a Defective Mortgage Loan if such Eligible Substitute Mortgage  
Loans meet the foregoing attributes in the aggregate and such substitution is   
approved in writing in advance by the Rating Agencies.                          

In the event the Seller repurchases or substitutes a Mortgage Loan as 
provided above, there will be delivered to the Trustee an opinion of counsel as 
to whether the repurchase or substitution (i) will be subject to tax as a result
of being deemed a prohibited transaction under section 860F(a)(2) of the Code;  
(ii) will be deemed a contribution to the REMIC after the startup day that would
give rise to the tax specified under section 860G(d)(1) of the Code; or (iii)   
will cause any portion of the Trust Fund to fail to qualify as a REMIC at any   
time any Certificate is outstanding. The Seller will not be required to         
repurchase or replace any Defective Mortgage Loan in the event such repurchase  
or replacement, as evidenced by such opinion, would result in the imposition of 
a prohibited transaction tax or be deemed a contribution to the REMIC after the 
startup day, unless the Servicer has determined that there is an actual or      
imminent default by the borrower with respect to the affected Mortgage Loan. The
Seller will not be required or permitted to repurchase or replace any Defective 
Mortgage Loan if such repurchase or replacement, as evidenced by such opinion,  
will cause any portion of the Trust Fund to fail to qualify as a REMIC.         

   Mortgage Loans required to be repurchased or substituted by the Seller as
described in the preceding paragraphs as a result of a defect, omission or      
breach of a representation or warranty are referred to herein as "Defective     
Mortgage Loans".                                                                

   In the event any such repurchase results in a prohibited transaction tax,
such tax is required to be charged first against amounts otherwise distributable
to the Junior Subordinate Certificateholders and second, to the extent such     
amounts are insufficient, against amounts otherwise distributable to the Holders
of the Offered Certificates, in each case on a pro rata basis among             
Certificateholders of the applicable Class.                                     

PAYMENTS ON MORTGAGE LOANS; DEPOSITS TO COLLECTION AND DISTRIBUTION ACCOUNTS    

Collection Account.  The Servicer will, upon the occurrence and continuance
of the failure of any of the events described in clauses (i) or (ii) of the     
third following paragraph, establish and maintain in the name of the Trustee    
with an entity meeting the requirements of the definition of "Eligible Account,"
a separate trust account (the "Collection Account") for the benefit of the      
Holders of the Certificates. Upon receipt by the Servicer of amounts in respect 
of the Mortgage Loans (excluding amounts representing unreimbursed advances, the
Servicing Fee, Foreclosure Profits, fees or late charge penalties payable by    
Mortgagors, amounts received by the Servicer for the accounts of Mortgagors for 
application towards the payment of taxes, insurance premiums, assessments and   
similar items and Payaheads received during such Collection Period intended for 
application in subsequent Collection Periods), the Servicer will deposit such   
amounts in the                                                                  

S-51

P-->424B357th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 57th

Collection Account. Amounts so deposited may be invested in Eligible Investments
(as described in the Pooling and Servicing Agreement) maturing no later than one
Business Day prior to the date on which the amount on deposit therein is        
required to be deposited in the Distribution Account or on such Distribution    
Date if approved by the Rating Agencies and the Trustee. The Servicer shall     
retain all Foreclosure Profits.                                                 

 The Trustee will establish an account (the "Distribution Account") into
which will be deposited amounts withdrawn from the Collection Account for       
distribution to Certificateholders on a Distribution Date or, if the Servicer is
not required to make deposits to the Collection Account, amounts received from  
the Servicer. The Distribution Account will be an Eligible Account.             

An "Eligible Account" is an account that is (i) maintained with a     
depository institution whose debt obligations at the time of any deposit therein
have the highest short-term debt rating by S&P, (ii) one or more accounts with a
depository institution which accounts are fully insured by either the SAIF or   
the Bank Insurance Fund ("BIF") of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation    
established by such fund with a minimum long-term unsecured debt rating of BBB  
by S&P, (iii) a segregated trust account maintained with the corporate trust    
departments of (A) the Trustee or an affiliate of the Trustee in its fiduciary  
capacity or (B) an institution with capital and surplus of not less than        
$50,000,000 and with a minimum long-term secured debt rating of BBB by S&P or   
(iv) otherwise acceptable to each Rating Agency as evidenced by a letter from   
each Rating Agency to the Trustee, without reduction or withdrawal of their then
current ratings of the Certificates.                                            

Notwithstanding anything in the Pooling and Servicing Agreement to the
contrary, (i) for so long as (A) the Servicer remains an affiliate of the       
Seller, (B) no Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing and (C)   
the Seller maintains a short-term rating of at least A-1 by S&P, and for five   
Business Days following any reduction in either such rating, or (ii) following  
the occurrence and continuation of certain events described in the Pooling and  
Servicing Agreement, an arrangement is established that is satisfactory to the  
Rating Agencies and which does not in itself result in any reduction of (I) any 
rating issued in respect of the Offered Certificates or (II) any reduction below
investment grade of the Offered Certificates, the Servicer need not establish or
make the daily deposits to the Collection Account as provided herein, but may   
make a single deposit in the Distribution Account in immediately available funds
not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the second Business Day       
immediately preceding a Distribution Date in a net amount equal to the amount   
that would have been on deposit with respect to the immediately preceding       
Collection Period in the Collection Account.                                    

ADVANCES 

Not later than two Business Days prior to each Distribution Date, the 
Servicer will remit to the Trustee for deposit in the Distribution Account an   
amount, to be distributed on the related Distribution Date, equal to the sum of 
the scheduled payment of principal and interest due on each Mortgage Loan for   
the related Due Date but not received by the Servicer as of the close of        
business on such date and not previously advanced (net of the Servicing Fee)    
(the "Monthly Advance"). Such obligation of the Servicer continues with respect 
to each Mortgage Loan until such Mortgage Loan becomes a Liquidated Mortgage    
Loan. The Servicer may distribute Payaheads paid to the Servicer not yet due in 
lieu of a required advance of scheduled principal and interest, but must        
increase its advances in subsequent months for which such Payaheads are due to  
cover scheduled payments represented thereby.                                   

  In the course of performing its servicing obligations, the Servicer will
pay all reasonable and customary "out-of-pocket" costs and expenses incurred in 
the performance of its servicing obligations, including, but not limited to, the
cost of (i) the preservation, restoration and protection of the Mortgaged       
Properties, (ii) any enforcement or judicial proceedings, including             
foreclosures, and (iii) the management and liquidation of Mortgaged Properties  
acquired in satisfaction of the related Mortgage Loan. Each such expenditure    
will constitute a "Servicing Advance."                                          

    The Servicer's right to reimbursement for Servicing Advances is limited to
late collections on the related Mortgage Loan, including Liquidation Proceeds,  
related Mortgaged Property proceeds, Insurance Proceeds and such other amounts  
as may be collected by the Servicer from the related Mortgagor or otherwise     
relating                                                                        
S-52

P-->424B358th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 58th

to the Mortgage Loan in respect of which such unreimbursed amounts are owed. The
Servicer's right to reimbursement for Monthly Advances shall be limited to late 
collections of principal and interest on any Mortgage Loan and to Liquidation   
Proceeds and Insurance Proceeds on the related Mortgage Loan. The Servicer's    
right to such reimbursements is prior to the rights of Certificateholders.      

 Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Servicer is not required to make any
Monthly Advance or Servicing Advance if in the good faith judgment and sole     
discretion of the Servicer, the Servicer determines that such advance will not  
be ultimately recoverable from collections received from the Mortgagor in       
respect of the related Mortgage Loan or other recoveries in respect of such     
Mortgage Loan (a "Nonrecoverable Advance"). However, if any outstanding         
Servicing Advance or Monthly Advance is later determined by the Servicer to be  
nonrecoverable from such sources, the amount of such Nonrecoverable Advance may 
be reimbursed to the Servicer from other amounts on deposit in the Collection   
Account.                                                                        

DEPOSITS TO THE DISTRIBUTION ACCOUNT                                            

No later than two Business Days prior to each Distribution Date, the  
following amounts in respect of the previous Collection Period shall be         
deposited into the Distribution Account and shall constitute the "Available     
Funds" for such Distribution Date: (i)(a) payments of principal and interest on 
the Mortgage Loans received during such Collection Period (net of amounts       
representing the Servicing Fee with respect to each Mortgage Loan, the Trustee  
Fee for such Distribution Date, reimbursement for related Monthly Advances and  
Servicing Advances, and Payaheads received during such Collection Period        
intended for application in subsequent Collection Periods) and (b) Payaheads    
received in prior Collection Periods intended for application in such Collection
Period; (ii) Prepayments (including Curtailments and Payoffs) received during   
the such Collection Period; (iii) Net Liquidation Proceeds received during such 
Collection Period; (iv) the Purchase Price for repurchased Defective Mortgage   
Loans and any Substitution Adjustments Amounts in respect of such Collection    
Period; (v) any amounts required to be distributed to the Holders of the        
Certificates from amounts or deposit in the Pre-Funding Account, Capitalized    
Interest Account or Class A-7 Reserve Fund; and (vi) payments from the Servicer 
in connection with (a) Monthly Advances, (b) Compensating Interest and (c) the  
termination of the Trust Fund with respect to the Mortgage Loans as provided in 
the Pooling and Servicing Agreement.                                            

  A "Payahead" is a required monthly payment received by the Servicer with
the required monthly payment for the current Due Date, intended by the related  
Mortgagor to be applied on a subsequent Due Date (for example, because the      
Mortgagor intends to be on vacation the following month). Payaheads will be held
by the Servicer until deposited to the Distribution Account as part of the      
Available Funds for the Collection Period in which the Due Date that the        
Mortgagor designates for the application of monthly payment occurs.             

   The Servicer may distribute Payaheads paid to the Servicer not yet due in
lieu of a required advance of scheduled principal and interest, but must        
increase its advances in subsequent months for which such Payaheads are due to  
cover scheduled payments represented thereby.                                   

STATEMENTS TO CERTIFICATEHOLDERS                                                

    Concurrently with each distribution to the Certificateholders, the Trustee
will forward to each Certificateholder a statement (based on information        
received from the Servicer) setting forth among other items with respect to each
Distribution Date:                                                              

 (i) the aggregate amount of the distribution to each Class of
Certificateholders on such Distribution Date;                         

       (ii) the amount of distribution set forth in paragraph (i) above in
respect of interest;                                                  

        (iii) the amount of distribution set forth in paragraph (i) above in
respect of principal;                                                 

       (iv) the Available Distribution Amount for each Loan Group for such
Distribution Date;                                                    

(v) the aggregate Servicing Fee;                            

S-53

P-->424B359th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 59th

       (vi) the Aggregate Loan Balance, as of the close of business on the
last day of the preceding Collection Period;                          

        (vii) the Class Principal Balance for each Class after giving effect
to payments allocated to principal above;                             

          (viii) the number and aggregate Loan Balances of the Mortgage Loans as
    to which the scheduled monthly payment is delinquent for 30-59 days, 60-89
 days and 90 or more days, respectively, as of the end of the Collection
Period;                                                               

         (ix) the book value of any real estate which is acquired by the Trust
Fund through foreclosure or grant of deed in lieu of foreclosure;     

          (x) the aggregate amount of Prepayments received on the Mortgage Loans
during the previous Collection Period;                                

         (xi) the aggregate amount of scheduled principal payments received on
the Mortgage Loans during the previous Collection Period;             

       (xii) the weighted average maturity of the Mortgage Loans as of the
first day of the month prior to the Distribution Date;                

         (xiii) the weighted average Loan Rate on the Mortgage Loans as of the
first day of the month prior to the Distribution Date;                

 (xiv) the aggregate amount of Realized Losses related to such
Collection Period;                                                    

   (xv) the Group SA Aggregate Loan Balance, the Group SA Weighted
Average Loan Rate, the Group A Aggregate Loan Balance and the Group A 
Weighted Average Loan Rate; and                                       

        (xvi) the Notional Principal Amount of each of the Class SA-5, Class
SA-X, Class A-6 and Class A-X Certificates.                           

 In the case of information furnished pursuant to clauses (ii) and (iii)
above, the amounts shall be expressed as a dollar amount per Certificate with a 
$1,000 denomination.                                                            

Within 60 days after the end of each calendar year, the Trustee will  
forward to each person, if requested in writing by such person, who was a       
Certificateholder during the prior calendar year a statement containing the     
information set forth in clauses (ii) and (iii) above aggregated for such       
calendar year.                                                                  

PRIORITY OF DISTRIBUTIONS 

    Commencing in May 1998, on the 25th day of each month, or if such 25th day
is not a business day, on the immediately succeeding business day (each, a      
"Distribution Date"), prior to the Credit Support Depletion Date (as defined    
herein), distributions will be made concurrently between (a) and (b) in the     
order and priority as follows:                                                  

(a) with respect to the Class SA Certificates, Subordinate  
Certificates and Class R Certificates, to the extent of the Group SA  
Available Distribution Amount on such Distribution Date:              

          (i) first, to the Class SA Certificates and Class R Certificates
        then entitled to receive accrued and unpaid interest at their respective
 Certificate Rates on their respective Class Principal Balances or
Notional Principal Amounts, as the case may be (as described in 
"-- Distributions of Interest" below);                          

    (ii) second, to the Class SA Certificates then entitled to
principal and the Class R Certificates in the order described in
"-- Distributions of Principal -- Class SA Certificate Principal
Distributions" below;                                           

S-54

P-->424B360th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 60th

         (iii) third, to the Subordinate Certificates, interest and then
principal, as described in "-- Distributions of Interest" and   
      "-- Distribution of the Principal -- Subordinate Certificate Principal
Distributions" below; and                                       

             (iv) fourth, to the Class R-II Certificates, the remainder, if any,
   of the Group SA Available Distribution Amount for such Distribution
Date.                                                           

(b) with respect to the Class A Certificates and Subordinate
  Certificates, to the extent of the Group A Available Distribution Amount
for such Distribution Date:                                           

          (i) first, to the Class A Certificates, then entitled to receive
    accrued and unpaid interest at their respective Certificate Rates on
       their respective Class Principal Balances or Notional Principal Amounts
(as described in "-- Distributions of Interest" below);         

           (ii) second, to the Class A Certificates then entitled to receive
principal in the order described in "-- Distributions of
Principal -- Class A Certificate Principal Distributions" below;

         (iii) third, to the Subordinate Certificates, interest and then
principal, as described in "-- Distributions of Interest" and   
   "-- Distributions of Principal -- Subordinate Certificate Principal
Distributions" below; and                                       

             (iv) fourth, to the Class R-II Certificates, the remainder, if any,
        of the Group A Available Distribution Amount for such Distribution Date.

With respect to the Subordinate Certificates, notwithstanding the     
foregoing, on any Distribution Date on which the Subordination Level (as defined
herein) for any Class of Subordinate Certificates is less than the Subordination
Level as of the Closing Date, the portion of the Subordinate Principal          
Prepayments Distribution Amount (as defined herein) for each Certificate Group  
otherwise allocable to the Class or Classes of the Subordinate Certificates     
junior to such Class will be allocated to the most senior Class of Subordinate  
Certificates for which the Subordination Level is less than such percentage as  
the Closing Date and to the Class or Classes of Subordinate Certificates senior 
thereto, pro rata according to the Class Principal Balances of such Classes.    

   The "Subordination Level" on any specified date with respect to any Class
of Subordinate Certificates is the percentage obtained by dividing the sum of   
the Class Principal Balances of all Classes of Certificates which are           
subordinate in right of payment to such Class by the sum of the Class Principal 
Balances of all Classes of Certificates as of such date prior to giving effect  
to distributions or allocations of realized losses on the Mortgage Loans on such
date.                                                                           

  On each Distribution Date on or after the Credit Support Depletion Date,
distributions will be made in the order and priority as follows:                

(a) with respect to the Class SA Certificates and Class R   
   Certificates, to the extent of the Group SA Available Distribution Amount
on such Distribution Date:                                            

           (i) first, to the Class SA, Class R-I and Class R-II Certificates
       then entitled to receive interest, accrued and unpaid interest at their
respective Certificate Rates on their respective Class Principal
Balances or Class Notional Amounts;                             

(ii) second, to the Class SA, Class R-I and Class R-II
    Certificates, principal pro rata according to their respective Class
Principal Balances;                                             

           (iii) third, to the Class A Certificates then entitled to receive
interest, accrued and unpaid interest to the extent the Group A 
Available Distribution Amount for such Distribution Date was    
insufficient for such purpose;                                  

      (iv) fourth, to the Class A Certificates, principal pro rata
        according to their respective Class Principal Balances to the extent the
    Group A Available Distribution Amount for such Distribution Date was
insufficient for such purpose; and                              

S-55

P-->424B361st Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 61st

           (v) fifth, to the Class R-II Certificates, the remaining portion,
if any, of the Group SA Available Distribution Amount for such  
Distribution Date.                                              

      (b) with respect to the Class A Certificates, to the extent of the
Group A Available Distribution Amount on such Distribution Date:      

             (i) first, to the Class A Certificates, accrued and unpaid interest
at their respective Certificate Rates on their respective Class 
Principal Balances or Class Notional Amounts;                   

      (ii) second, to the Class A Certificates, principal pro rata
according to their respective Class Principal Balances;         

            (iii) third, to the Class SA Certificates then entitled to receive
interest, accrued and unpaid interest to the extent the Group SA
Available Distribution Amount for such Distribution Date was    
insufficient for such purpose;                                  

       (iv) fourth, to the Class SA Certificates, principal pro rata
        according to their respective Class Principal Balances to the extent the
     Group SA Available Distribution Amount for such Distribution Date was
insufficient for such purpose; and                              

           (v) fifth, to the Class R-II Certificates, the remaining portion,
if any, of the Group A Available Distribution Amount for such   
Distribution Date.                                              

     The "Credit Support Depletion Date" is the first Distribution Date on which
the aggregate of the Class Principal Balances of the Subordinate Certificates   
has been or will be reduced to zero.                                            

Cross-Collateralization Provisions.  In addition to the foregoing     
distributions, the Class SA or Class A Certificates may receive additional      
principal distributions on any Distribution Date prior to the Credit Support    
Depletion Date under the circumstances specified in (A) and (B) below:          

      (A) On any Distribution Date after the date on which the aggregate
Class Principal Balance of the Class SA Certificates or the Class A   
Certificates has been reduced to zero, all principal (in excess of the
  amount necessary to reduce such aggregate Class Principal Balance of the
Class SA Certificates or Class A Certificates to zero) on the Mortgage
   Loans in the Loan Group relating to such Certificates that have been paid
   in full will be paid as principal to the remaining Senior Certificates in
   the other Loan Group (other than Class R Certificates) in accordance with
the order set forth under "-- Distributions of Principal -- Class SA
Certificate Principal Distributions" or "-- Group A Certificate Principal
  Distributions", in reduction of the Principal Balances thereof, provided
that on such Distribution Date either (a) the Aggregate Subordinate   
Percentage for such Distribution Date is less than 200% of the initial
    Aggregate Subordinate Percentage, or (b) the average outstanding principal
  balance of the Mortgage Loans in either Loan Group delinquent 60 days or
   more over the last six months, as a percentage of the corresponding Group
  SA or Group A Subordinate Amount (as defined herein), is greater than or
 equal to 50%. For purposes of the foregoing, the "Aggregate Subordinate
Percentage" for any Distribution Date is equal to the aggregate of the
    Class Principal Balances of the Subordinate Certificates immediately prior
to such Distribution Date divided by the aggregate Scheduled Principal
     Balance of all of the Mortgage Loans immediately prior to such Distribution
Date.                                                                 

          (B) If on any Distribution Date on which the aggregate Class Principal
   Balance of the Class SA or Class A Certificates would be greater than the
    aggregate Scheduled Principal Balance of the Mortgage Loans in the related
Loan Group (the "Undercollateralized Group"), after giving effect to  
distributions to be made on such Distribution Date, the portion of    
    Available Funds in respect of principal on the Mortgage Loans in the other
Loan Group (the "Overcollateralized Group") otherwise allocable to the
     Subordinate Certificates will be distributed to the Classes of Certificates
of the Certificate Group relating to the Undercollateralized Group (in
     accordance with the priorities set forth herein), in reduction of the Class
    Principal Balances thereof, until the aggregate Class Principal Balance of
    the Certificates included in the Undercollateralized Group is equal to the
    aggregate Scheduled Principal Balance of the Mortgage Loans in the related
     Loan Group. Moreover, the Available Funds from the Overcollateralized Group
will be further reduced (after distributions of interest to Classes   
included in the Overcollateralized Group) in                          
S-56

P-->424B362nd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 62nd

an amount equal to one month's interest on the amount by which the    
    Undercollateralized Group is undercollateralized at 7% per annum, plus any
shortfall of such amounts from prior Distribution Dates, with accrued 
 interest thereon; provided, however, that in no case will the Available
    Funds from the Overcollateralized Group be so reduced by more than the sum
   of (a) the portion of the Available Funds in respect of principal on such
  Overcollateralized Group (after distributions of principal to the Senior
Certificates of such Overcollateralized Group) and (b) interest on its
   Senior Overcollateralized Amount at the weighted average Certificate Rate
   for such Overcollateralized Group (after distributions of interest to the
Senior Certificates of such Overcollateralized Group.)                

For each Loan Group on each Distribution Date, the "Senior            
Overcollateralized Amount" will equal the excess, if any, of the aggregate      
Scheduled Principal Balance of the Mortgage Loans in such Loan Group over the   
aggregate Class Principal Balance of the Senior Certificates of the related     
Certificate Group. Such amounts will be distributed to the applicable Classes of
Certificates in the priority of interest payable on such Distribution Date.     

   Except under the limited circumstances set forth herein, distributions of
interest and principal to the Class SA Certificates and the Class A Certificates
will be based solely on payments received with respect to the Group SA Mortgage 
Loans and the Group A Mortgage Loans, respectively. Except in the event of an   
Undercollateralized Group, distributions of interest and principal on the       
Subordinate Certificates will be based on payments received with respect to both
the Group SA Mortgage Loans and the Group A Mortgage Loans.                     

DISTRIBUTIONS OF INTEREST 

     With respect to each Class of Certificates, interest will be passed through
monthly on each Distribution Date, commencing in May 1998. With respect to each 
Distribution Date, an amount of interest will accrue on each Class of           
Certificates at a rate generally equal to 1/12th of the applicable Certificate  
Rate for such Class multiplied by the related Class Principal Balance or Class  
Notional Amount, as applicable. Interest to be distributed on the Certificates  
on any Distribution Date will consist of accrued and unpaid interest as of the  
previous Distribution Dates and interest accrued during the preceding calendar  
month. All distributions of interest for each Class of Certificates will        
generally be made only to the extent of the Available Distribution Amount for   
the related Loan Group as described herein under "-- Priority of Distributions".

    The Certificate Rates for the Offered Certificates are as set forth on the
cover page hereof.                                                              

     The "Class SA-5 Notional Amount" with respect to any Distribution Date will
equal the product of (x) the Class Principal Balance of the Class SA-2          
Certificates immediately prior to such Distribution Date and (y) approximately  
1.42857%. The Class SA-5 Notional Amount as of the Closing Date will be         
approximately $1,129,732.                                                       

     The "Class SA-X Notional Amount" with respect to any Distribution Date will
equal the aggregate Loan Balance of the Group SA Mortgage Loans as of the       
preceding Determination Date, or with respect to the initial Distribution Date, 
as of the Initial Cut-Off Date. The Class SA-X Notional Amount as of the Closing
Date will be approximately $162,984,201.                                        

    The "Class A-6 Notional Amount" with respect to any Distribution Date will
equal the product of (x) the Class Principal Balance of the Class A-1           
Certificates immediately prior to such Distribution Date and (y) approximately  
1.85714%. The Class A-6 Notional Amount as of the Closing Date will be          
approximately $2,352,122.                                                       

    The "Class A-X Notional Amount" with respect to any Distribution Date will
equal the aggregate Loan Balance of the Group A Mortgage Loans as of the        
preceding Determination Date, or with respect to the initial Distribution Date, 
as of the Initial Cut-Off Date. The Class A-X Notional Amount as of the Closing 
Date will be approximately $187,069,027.                                        

   The Class SA-5 Notional Amount, the Class SA-X Notional Amount, the Class
A-6 Notional Amount and the Class A-X Notional Amounts each constitute a        
"Notional Principal Amount" with respect to a Certificate and a "Class Notional 
Amount" with respect to a Class of Certificates.                                

S-57

P-->424B363rd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 63rd

Compensating Interest.  The Servicer, is obligated to remit Compensating
Interest to the Distribution Account on the second business day prior to each   
Distribution Date with respect to the Mortgage Loans in each Loan Group in an   
amount equal to the lesser of (a) any shortfall for the related month of        
interest collections resulting from (i) the timing of Payoffs made other than on
the first day of the month or (ii) Curtailments and (b) the applicable monthly  
Servicing Fee payable to the Servicer.                                          

DISTRIBUTIONS OF PRINCIPAL 

General.  On each Distribution Date, Certificateholders of each Certificate
Group will be entitled to receive principal distributions from the related      
Available Distribution Amount to the extent and in the priority described       
herein. See "-- Priority of Distributions" herein. Except in the limited        
circumstances described herein, the Class SA Certificates will receive principal
collected from Group SA Mortgage Loans and the Class A Certificates will receive
principal collected from the Group A Mortgage Loans. The Subordinate            
Certificates will receive principal collected from each Loan Group.             

   The Class SA-5, Class SA-X, Class A-6 and Class A-X Certificates will not
receive any distributions of principal.                                         

Class SA Certificate Principal Distributions                                

   On each Distribution Date prior to the Credit Support Depletion Date, the
Group SA Senior Principal Distribution Amount (as defined below) for such       
Distribution Date, will be distributed as principal from the Group SA Available 
Distribution Amount (after payments made in respect of interest to the Class SA 
and Class R Certificates) and, in certain limited circumstances set forth       
herein, from the Group A Available Distribution Amount to the following Classes 
of Class SA Certificates and Class R Certificates in the following order of     
priority:                                                                       

     (i) first, to the Class SA-4 Certificates, the Class SA-4 Lockout
Principal Distribution Amount (as defined below) for such Distribution
Date, until the Class SA-4 Principal Balance has been reduced to zero;

         (ii) second, to the Class R Certificates, the portion of the Group SA
Senior Principal Distribution Amount remaining after the distribution 
   described above, until the Class R-I Principal Balance and the Class R-II
Principal Balance have been reduced to zero; and                      

          (iii) third, the portion of the Group SA Senior Principal Distribution
   Amount remaining after the distributions described above, sequentially as
follows:                                                              

             (A) first, to the Class SA-1 and Class SA-2 Certificates, pro rata,
   until the Class SA-1 Principal Balance and the Class SA-2 Principal
Balance have been reduced to zero;                              

          (B) second, to the Class SA-3 Certificates, until the Class SA-3
Principal Balance has been reduced to zero; and                 

         (C) third, to the Class SA-4 Certificates, until the Class SA-4
Principal Balance has been reduced to zero.                     

   On each Distribution Date on and after the Credit Support Depletion Date,
an amount up to the Group SA Available Principal Distribution Amount for such   
Distribution Date will be distributed as provided above under "-- Priority of
Distributions."                                                                 

     The "Scheduled Principal Balance" of a Mortgage Loan as of any Distribution
Date is the unpaid principal balance of such Mortgage Loan as specified in the  
amortization schedule at the time relating thereto (before any adjustment to    
such schedule by reason of bankruptcy or similar proceeding or any moratorium or
similar waiver or grace period) as of the first day of the month preceding the  
month of such Distribution Date, after giving effect to any previously applied  
Curtailments, the payment of principal due on such first day of the month and   
any reduction of the principal balance of such Mortgage Loan by a bankruptcy    
court, irrespective of any delinquency in payment by the related Mortgagor.     

S-58

P-->424B364th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 64th

  The "Group SA Senior Principal Distribution Amount" for any Distribution
Date will equal the sum of (i) the Group SA Senior Percentage (as defined below)
of the Principal Payment Amount (as defined herein) for the Group SA Mortgage   
Loans, (ii) the Group SA Senior Prepayment Percentage (as defined under         
"-- Principal Prepayments" below) of the Principal Prepayment Amount for the    
Group SA Mortgage Loans, and (iii) the Group SA Senior Liquidation Amount (as   
defined below).                                                                 

   The "Group SA Senior Percentage" for any Distribution Date will equal the
lesser of (a) 100% and (b) the sum of the Class Principal Balances of the Class 
SA and Class R Certificates divided by the aggregate Scheduled Principal Balance
of the Group SA Mortgage Loans immediately preceding such Distribution Date. The
Group SA Senior Percentage as of the Closing Date will be approximately 95.50%. 

   The "Group SA Senior Liquidation Amount" is the aggregate, for each Group
SA Mortgage Loan which became a Liquidated Mortgage Loan during the calendar    
month preceding the month of the Distribution Date, of the lesser of (i) the    
Group SA Senior Percentage of the principal balance of such Mortgage Loan and   
(ii) the Group SA Senior Prepayment Percentage of the Liquidation Principal with
respect to such Mortgage Loan.                                                  

  "Liquidation Principal" is the principal portion of Liquidation Proceeds
received with respect to each Mortgage Loan which became a Liquidated Mortgage  
Loan (as defined herein) (but not in excess of the principal balance thereof)   
during the calendar month preceding the month of the Distribution Date. A       
"Liquidated Mortgage Loan" is a Mortgage Loan as to which the Servicer has      
determined that all amounts which it expects to recover from or on account of   
such Mortgage Loan, whether from Insurance Proceeds, Liquidation Proceeds or    
otherwise have been recovered.                                                  

     The "Class SA-4 Lockout Principal Distribution Amount" for any Distribution
Date will equal the sum of (i) the Class SA-4 Lockout Percentage of the         
Principal Payment Amount for the Group SA Mortgage Loans, (ii) the Class SA-4   
Lockout Prepayment Percentage (as defined herein) of the Principal Prepayment   
Amount for Group SA Mortgage Loans and (iii) the Class SA-4 Lockout Liquidation 
Amount (as defined below).                                                      

  The "Class SA-4 Lockout Percentage" for any Distribution Date will equal
the Class Principal Balance of the Class SA-4 Certificates divided by the       
aggregate Scheduled Principal Balance of all Group SA Mortgage Loans immediately
preceding such Distribution Date. The Class SA-4 Lockout Percentage as of the   
Closing Date will be approximately 9.36%.                                       

  The "Class SA-4 Lockout Liquidation Amount" for any Distribution Date is
the aggregate, for each Group SA Mortgage Loan which became a Liquidated        
Mortgage Loan during the calendar month preceding the month of the Distribution 
Date, of the lesser of (i) the Class SA-4 Lockout Percentage of the principal   
balance of such Mortgage Loan and (ii) the Class SA-4 Lockout Percentage on any 
Distribution Date occurring prior to the fifth anniversary of the first         
Distribution Date, and the Class SA-4 Lockout Prepayment Percentage (as defined 
herein) on any Distribution Date thereafter, in each case, of the Liquidation   
Principal with respect to such Mortgage Loan.                                   

  The "Class SA-4 Lockout Prepayment Percentage" will equal the product of
(a) the Class SA-4 Lockout Percentage and (b) the Class SA-4 Stepdown           
Percentage.                                                                     

     The "Class SA-4 Step Down Percentage" for any Distribution Date will be the
percentage indicated below:                                                     

                                                                [Download Table]

                                                              CLASS SA-4 
                                                               STEP-DOWN 
DISTRIBUTION DATE OCCURRING IN                                PERCENTAGE 
------------------------------                                -----------
                                                                         
May 1998 through April 2003.................................        0%   
May 2003 through April 2004.................................       30%   
May 2004 through April 2005.................................       40%   
May 2005 through April 2006.................................       60%   
May 2006 through April 2007.................................       80%   
May 2007 and thereafter.....................................      100%   

S-59

P-->424B365th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 65th

Class A Certificate Principal Distributions                                 

   On each Distribution Date prior to the Credit Support Depletion Date, the
Group A Senior Principal Distribution Amount (as defined below) for such        
Distribution Date, will be distributed as principal from the Group A Available  
Distribution Amount (after payments made in respect of interest to the Class A  
Certificates) and, in certain limited circumstances set forth herein, from the  
Group SA Available Distribution Amount to the following Classes of Class A      
Certificates in the following order of priority:                                

   (i) first, to the Class A-3 Certificates, the Class A-3 Lockout
Principal Distribution Amount (as defined below) for such Distribution
   Date, until the Class A-3 Principal Balance has been reduced to zero; and

         (ii) second, the portion of the Group A Senior Principal Distribution
  amount remaining after the distribution described above, sequentially as
follows:                                                              

       (A) first, to the Class A-1 Certificates, until the Class A-1
Principal Balance has been reduced to zero;                     

        (B) second, to the Class A-2 Certificates, until the Class A-2
Principal Balance has been reduced to zero;                     

           (C) third, to the Class A-4 and Class A-7 Certificates, pro rata,
     until the Class A-4 Principal Balance and Class A-7 Principal Balance
have been reduced to zero;                                      

        (D) fourth, to the Class A-5 Certificates, until the Class A-5
Principal Balance has been reduced to zero; and                 

       (E) fifth, to the Class A-3 Certificates, until the Class A-3
Principal Balance has been reduced to zero.                     

   On each Distribution Date on and after the Credit Support Depletion Date,
an amount up to the Group A Available Principal Distribution Amount for such    
Distribution Date will be distributed as provided above under "-- Priority of
Distributions."                                                                 

 The "Group A Senior Principal Distribution Amount" for any Distribution
Date will equal the sum of (i) the Group A Senior Percentage (as defined below) 
of the Principal Payment Amount (as defined herein) for the Group A Mortgage    
Loans, (ii) the Group A Senior Prepayment Percentage (as defined under          
"-- Principal Prepayments" below) of the Principal Prepayment Amount for the    
Group A Mortgage Loans, and (iii) the Group A Senior Liquidation Amount (as     
defined below).                                                                 

  The "Group A Senior Percentage" for any Distribution Date will equal the
lesser of (a) 100% and (b) the sum of the Class Principal Balances of the Class 
A Certificates divided by the sum of (i) the aggregate Scheduled Principal      
Balance of Group A Mortgage Loans immediately preceding such Distribution Date  
and (ii) the balance of the Pre-Funding Account immediately preceding such      
Distribution Date. The Group A Senior Percentage as of the Closing Date will be 
approximately 95.50%.                                                           

    The "Group A Senior Liquidation Amount" is the aggregate, for each Group A
Mortgage Loan which became a Liquidated Mortgage Loan during the calendar month 
preceding the month of the Distribution Date, of the lesser of (i) the Group A  
Senior Percentage of the principal balance of such Mortgage Loan and (ii) the   
Group A Senior Prepayment Percentage of the Liquidation Principal with respect  
to such Mortgage Loan.                                                          

    The "Class A-3 Lockout Principal Distribution Amount" for any Distribution
Date will equal the sum of (i) zero, on any Distribution Date occurring prior to
the fifth anniversary of the first Distribution Date, and on any Distribution   
Date thereafter, the Class A-3 Lockout Percentage (as defined below) of the     
Principal Payment Amount for Group A Mortgage Loans, (ii) the Class A-3 Lockout 
Prepayment Percentage (as defined herein) of the Principal Prepayment Amount for
the Group A Mortgage Loans and (iii) the Class A-3 Lockout Liquidation Amount   
(as defined below).                                                             

S-60

P-->424B366th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 66th

     The "Class A-3 Lockout Percentage" for any Distribution Date will equal the
Class A-3 Principal Balance divided by the sum of (i) the aggregate Scheduled   
Principal Balance of the Group A Mortgage Loans immediately preceding such      
Distribution Date and (ii) the balance of the Pre-Funding Account immediately   
preceding such Distribution Date. The Class A-3 Lockout Percentage as of the    
Closing Date will be approximately 9.69%.                                       

     The "Class A-3 Lockout Liquidation Amount" for any Distribution Date is the
aggregate, for each Group A Mortgage Loan which became a Liquidated Mortgage    
Loan during the calendar month preceding the month of the Distribution Date, of 
the lesser of (i) the Class A-3 Lockout Percentage of the principal balance of  
such Mortgage Loan and (ii) the Class A-3 Lockout Percentage (as defined herein)
on any Distribution Date occurring prior to the fifth anniversary of the first  
Distribution Date, and the Class A-3 Lockout Prepayment Percentage (as defined  
herein) on any Distribution Date thereafter, in each case, of the Liquidation   
Principal with respect to such Mortgage Loan.                                   

     The "Class A-3 Lockout Prepayment Percentage" will equal the product of (a)
the Class A-3 Lockout Percentage and (b) the Class A-3 Step Down Percentage.    

    The "Class A-3 Step Down Percentage" for any Distribution Date will be the
percentage indicated below:                                                     

                                                                [Download Table]

                                                              CLASS A-3 
                                                              STEP DOWN 
DISTRIBUTION DATE OCCURRING IN                                PERCENTAGE
------------------------------                                ----------
                                                                        
May 1998 through April 2003.................................       0%   
May 2003 through April 2004.................................      30%   
May 2004 through April 2005.................................      40%   
May 2005 through April 2006.................................      60%   
May 2006 through April 2007.................................      80%   
May 2007 and thereafter.....................................     100%   

Subordinate Certificate Principal Distributions

Subordinate Principal Distribution Amount.  On each Distribution Date, an
amount calculated for each Loan Group, up to the applicable Subordinate         
Principal Distribution Amount (as defined below) for such Distribution Date,    
will be distributed collectively as principal to the Subordinate Certificates.  
On each Distribution Date, except Distribution Dates on which the Subordination 
Level for any Class of Subordinate Certificates is less than such Subordination 
Level as of the Closing Date, each Class of the Subordinate Certificates will be
entitled to receive its pro rata (by Class Principal Balance) share of each     
subordinate Principal Distribution Amount, to the extent of the Available       
Distribution Amount for each Loan Group remaining after distributions of        
interest and principal to the applicable Senior Certificates, distributions of  
interest and principal to all Classes of Subordinate Certificates senior to such
Class and distributions of interest to such Class. See "-- Priority of
Distributions" herein. The relative seniority, from highest to lowest, of the   
Subordinate Certificates shall be as follows: Class M, Class B-1, Class B-2,    
Class B-3, Class B-4 and Class B-5.                                             

   The "Subordinate Principal Distribution Amount" for any Distribution Date
for each Loan Group will be equal to the sum of (i) the applicable Subordinate  
Percentage of the Principal Payment Amount for such Loan Group, (ii) the        
applicable Subordinate Principal Prepayments Distribution Amount (as defined    
below) and (iii) the applicable Subordinate Liquidation Amount (as defined      
below); provided, however, that the Subordinate Principal Distribution Amount   
for any Distribution Date shall be reduced (first as an offset to the amount    
calculated in clause (i) above, second clause (iii) above and then clause (ii)  
above) to the extent of any amounts required to be distributed to the Senior    
Certificates pursuant to the provisions described above under "-- Priority of
Distributions -- Cross-Collateralization Provisions". The "Subordinate Principal
Prepayments Distribution Amount" as of any Distribution Date is the Subordinate 
Prepayment Percentage of the Principal Prepayment Amount for such Loan Group.   

S-61

P-->424B367th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 67th

   The "Subordinate Percentage" as to each Loan Group is equal to 100% minus
the applicable Senior Percentage of such Loan Group. Initially, the Subordinate 
Percentage for the Group SA Mortgage Loans and the Group A Mortgage Loans will  
be approximately 4.50% and 4.50%, respectively.                                 

    The "Subordinate Liquidation Amount" will equal the excess, if any, of the
aggregate Liquidation Principal for the Mortgage Loans in each Loan Group which 
became Liquidate Mortgage Loans during the calendar month preceding the month of
the Distribution Date, over the applicable Senior Liquidation Amount for such   
Distribution Date.                                                              

   The "Subordinate Prepayment Percentage" for any Distribution Date will be
equal to 100% minus the applicable Senior Prepayment Percentage. Initially the  
Subordinate Prepayment Percentage for the Group SA Mortgage Loans and the Group 
A Mortgage Loans will be 0%.                                                    

The rights of the Holders of the Subordinate Certificates to receive  
distributions of interest and principal are subordinated to the rights of the   
Holders of the Class SA Certificates and Class A Certificates to receive        
scheduled distributions of interest and principal. See "-- Subordination and
Allocation of Losses" herein.                                                   

  For any Distribution Date and for any Loan Group, the "Principal Payment
Amount" is the sum with respect to the Mortgage Loans in such group of (i)      
scheduled principal payments on the Mortgage Loans due on the related Due Date, 
(ii) the principal portion of repurchase proceeds received with respect to any  
Mortgage Loan which was repurchased as permitted or required by the Pooling and 
Servicing Agreement during the calendar month preceding the month of the        
Distribution Date and (iii) any other unscheduled payments of principal which   
were received on the Mortgage Loans during the preceding calendar month, other  
than Payoffs, Curtailments or Liquidation Principal. For any Distribution Date  
and for any Loan Group, the "Principal Prepayment Amount" is the sum with       
respect to the Mortgage Loans in such group of all Curtailments and all Payoffs 
from the Mortgage Loans in such group which were received during the applicable 
Collection Period. Principal distributions to each of the Class SA Certificates,
the Class A Certificates and the Subordinate Certificates will be based on the  
Principal Payment Amounts, Principal Prepayment Amount and Liquidation Principal
for the related Loan Group.                                                     

PRINCIPAL PREPAYMENTS 

    The "Group SA Senior Prepayment Percentage" and "Group A Senior Prepayment
Percentage" for any Distribution Date occurring prior to the month of the fifth 
anniversary of the first Distribution Date will equal 100%. The "Group SA Senior
Prepayment Percentage" and "Group A Senior Prepayment Percentage" in each of the
months of the fifth through ninth anniversaries of the first Distribution Date  
will be as follows: for any Distribution Date in or after the month of the fifth
anniversary of the month of the first Distribution Date but before the sixth    
anniversary of the month of the first Distribution Date, the Group SA or Group A
Senior Percentage, as applicable, for such Distribution Date plus 70% of the    
related Group SA or Group A Subordinate Percentage for such Distribution Date;  
for any Distribution Date in or after the month of the sixth anniversary of the 
month of the first Distribution Date but before the seventh anniversary of the  
month of the first Distribution Date, the Group SA or Group A Senior Percentage,
as applicable, for such Distribution Date, plus 60% of the related Group SA or  
Group A Subordinate Percentage for such Distribution Date; for any Distribution 
Date in or after the month of the seventh anniversary of the month of the first 
Distribution Date but before the eighth anniversary of the month of the first   
Distribution Date, the Group SA or Group A Senior Percentage, as applicable, for
such Distribution Date plus 40% of the related Group SA or Group A Subordinate  
Percentage for such Distribution Date; and for any Distribution Date in or after
the month of the eighth anniversary of the month of the first Distribution Date 
but before the ninth anniversary of the month of the first Distribution Date,   
the Group SA or Group A Senior Percentage, as applicable, for such Distribution 
Date plus 20% of the related Group SA or Group A Subordinate Percentage for such
Distribution Date. For any Distribution Date in or after the month of the ninth 
anniversary of the month of the first Distribution Date, the Group SA or Group A
Senior Prepayment Percentage will be the Group SA or Group A Senior Percentage, 
respectively, for such Distribution Date.                                       

     Notwithstanding the foregoing, if on any Distribution Date either the Group
SA or Group A Senior Percentage for such Distribution Date exceeds the initial  
Group SA or Group A Senior Percentage,                                          
S-62

P-->424B368th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 68th

respectively, as of the Closing Date, then both the Group SA or Group A Senior  
Prepayment Percentage for such Distribution Date will equal 100%. The scheduled 
reductions in the Group SA and Group A Senior Prepayment Percentages for        
Distribution Dates occurring on or after the month of the fifth anniversary of  
the month of the first Distribution Date will be subject to certain conditions  
specified in the Pooling and Servicing Agreement. Such conditions may include   
requirements that no such reduction may occur if delinquencies or losses on the 
Mortgage Loans in the related Loan Group exceed specified limits at the time of,
or on a date preceding, the Distribution Date for which such reduction would    
otherwise be applicable. Notwithstanding the foregoing, on any Distribution Date
if the delinquencies or losses on the Mortgage Loans in a Loan Group exceed such
limits such that the Pooling and Servicing Agreement restricts a reduction of   
the Group SA or Group A Senior Prepayment Percentage, as applicable, then the   
Group SA and Group A Senior Prepayment Percentages for such Distribution Date   
will equal 100% for such Distribution Date. If on any Distribution Date the     
allocation to the Class SA or Class A Certificates in the percentage required   
would reduce the sum of the Class Principal Balances of such Certificates below 
zero, the Group SA or Group A Senior Prepayment Percentage, as applicable, for  
such Distribution Date will be limited to the percentage necessary to reduce    
such sum to zero.                                                               

SUBORDINATION AND ALLOCATION OF LOSSES 

     The Subordinate Certificates will be subordinate in right of payment to and
provide credit support to the Senior Certificates, the Junior Subordinate       
Certificates will be subordinate in right of payment to and provide credit      
support to the Senior Subordinate Certificates and each Class of Senior         
Subordinate Certificates will be subordinate in right or payment to and provide 
credit support to each Class of Senior Subordinate Certificates with a lower    
Class designation. The support provided by the Subordinate Certificates is      
intended to afford the Senior Certificates protection against certain losses.   
The protection afforded a Class of Senior Subordinate Certificates by the       
Classes of Senior Subordinate Certificates with higher Class designations will  
be accomplished by the preferential right of those Classes with lower Class     
designations to receive distributions of principal and interest prior to        
distributions of principal and interest to those Classes of Senior Subordinate  
Certificates with higher Class designations. The support provided by the Junior 
Subordinate Certificates to the Senior Subordinate Certificates is intended to  
enhance the likelihood of regular receipt by such Senior Subordinate            
Certificates of the full amount of monthly distributions of interest and        
principal to which they are entitled and to afford such Certificateholders      
protection against certain losses. The protection afforded to the Senior        
Subordinate Certificates by the Junior Subordinate Certificates will be         
accomplished by the preferential right on each Distribution Date of such Senior 
Subordinate Certificates to receive distributions of interest and principal,    
prior to distributions of interest and principal to such Junior Subordinate     
Certificates.                                                                   

 Except for Special Hazard Losses, Fraud Losses and Bankruptcy Losses in
excess of the designated amounts of the applicable Special Hazard Coverage,     
Fraud Coverage and Bankruptcy Coverage (each, as defined herein) for a Loan     
Group, any loss realized with respect to a Mortgage Loan will be allocated among
the Certificates related to such Mortgage Loan (i) for losses allocable to      
principal (a) first, to the Junior Subordinate Certificates, until the aggregate
of the Class Principal Balances thereof has been reduced to zero, (b) second, to
the Class B-2 Certificates, until the Class Principal Balance thereof has been  
reduced to zero, (c) third, to the Class B-1 Certificates, until the Class      
Principal Balance thereof has been reduced to zero, (d) fourth, to the Class M  
Certificates, until the Class Principal Balance thereof has been reduced to     
zero, (e) fifth, to the Senior Certificates related to such Mortgage Loan (other
than the Class SA-5, Class SA-X, Class A-6 and Class A-X Certificates), pro     
rata, according to their Class Principal Balances in reduction of their         
respective Class Principal Balances, as applicable; and (ii) for losses         
allocable to interest (a) first, to the Junior Subordinate Certificates, in     
reduction of accrued but unpaid interest thereon and then in reduction of the   
Class Principal Balances of such Certificates, (b) second, to the Class B-2     
Certificates, in reduction of accrued but unpaid interest thereon and then in   
reduction of the Class Principal Balance of such Certificates, (c) third, to the
Class B-1 Certificates, in reduction of accrued but unpaid interest thereon and 
then in reduction of the Class Principal Balance of such Certificates, (d)      
fourth, to the Class M Certificates, in reduction of accrued but unpaid interest
thereon and then in reduction of the Class Principal Balance of such            
Certificates, and (e) fifth, to the applicable Senior Certificates related to   
such Mortgage Loan, pro rata                                                    

S-63

P-->424B369th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 69th

according to accrued but unpaid interest thereon and then pro rata according to 
their Class Principal Balances in reduction of their respective Class Principal 
Balances, as applicable.                                                        

  The allocation of the principal portion of losses relating to a Mortgage
Loan in a given Loan Group to all Classes of Certificates in the related        
Certificate Group (other than the Class SA-5, Class SA-X, Class A-6 and Class   
A-X Certificates) and to the Subordinate Certificates (in the limited           
circumstances described below) pro rata according to their respective           
Certificate Principal Balances, and the allocation of the interest portion of   
such losses to the Certificates related to such Mortgage Loan pro rata according
to the amount of interest accrued but unpaid on each such Class in reduction    
thereof and then in reduction of their related Class Principal Balances, is     
hereinafter referred to as "Pro Rata Allocation." For purposes of any Pro Rata  
Allocation in part to the Subordinate Certificates, each Class of Subordinate   
Certificates will be deemed to have a Class Principal Balance (and to accrue    
interest thereon) equal to the actual Class Principal Balance thereof times a   
fraction, the numerator of which is the Group SA Subordinate Amount (for a loss 
on a Group SA Mortgage Loan) or the Group A Subordinate Amount (for a loss on a 
Group A Mortgage Loan), and the denominator of which is the aggregate of the    
Group SA Subordinate Amount and the Group A Subordinate Amount.                 

    The "Group SA Subordinate Amount" for any Distribution Date will equal the
excess of the aggregate Scheduled Principal Balance of the Group SA Mortgage    
Loans over the aggregate Class Principal Balance of the Class SA and Class R    
Certificates.                                                                   

   The "Group A Subordinate Amount" for any Distribution Date will equal the
excess of the aggregate Scheduled Principal Balance of the Group A Mortgage     
Loans over the aggregate Class Principal Balance of the Class A Certificates.   

    On each Distribution Date, if the aggregate Class Principal Balance of all
outstanding Classes of Certificates exceeds the aggregate principal balance of  
the Mortgage Loans in both Loan Groups (after giving effect to distributions of 
principal and the allocation of all losses on the Classes of Certificates in    
such Certificate Group on such Distribution Date), such excess will be deemed a 
principal loss and will be allocated to the most junior Class of Subordinate    
Certificates then outstanding.                                                  

Investors in the Senior Certificates should be aware that because the 
Subordinate Certificates represent interests in both Loan Groups, the           
Certificate Principal Balances of Subordinate Certificates could be reduced to  
zero as a result of a disproportionate amount of losses on the Mortgage Loans in
one Loan Group. Therefore, notwithstanding that losses on the Mortgage Loans in 
one Loan Group may only be allocated to the related Senior Certificates (except 
for Special Hazard Losses, Fraud Losses and Bankruptcy Losses in excess of the  
applicable coverage amounts), the allocation to the Subordinate Certificates of 
losses on the Mortgage Loans in the other Loan Group will increase the          
likelihood that losses may be allocated to such Senior Certificates.            

    In the event of a personal bankruptcy of a Mortgagor, the bankruptcy court
may establish the value of the Mortgaged Property at an amount less than the    
then outstanding Principal Balance of the Mortgage Loan secured by such         
Mortgaged Property (a "Deficient Valuation"). The amount of the secured debt    
could be reduced to such value, and the Holder of such Mortgage Loan thus would 
become an unsecured creditor to the extent the outstanding principal balance of 
such Mortgage Loan exceeds the value so assigned to the Mortgaged Property by   
the bankruptcy court. In addition, certain other modifications of the terms of a
Mortgage Loan can result from a bankruptcy proceeding, including the reduction  
of the amount of the Monthly Payment on the related Mortgage Loan (a "Debt      
Service Reduction," Debt Service Reductions and Deficient Valuations,           
collectively, are defined as "Bankruptcy Losses"). "Fraud Losses" are losses on 
Mortgage Loans arising from fraud, dishonesty or misrepresentation of the       
Mortgagor in the origination of such Mortgage Loans. "Special Hazard Losses" are
losses relating to Mortgage Loans that become liquidated and have been the      
subject of certain hazards (including earthquakes, tidal waves and related water
damage, war, civil insurrection, certain governmental actions, errors in design,
faulty workmanship or materials, nuclear reaction and chemical contamination)   
not insured against under any applicable insurance policy and not resulting from
reasonable wear and tear.                                                       

S-64

P-->424B370th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 70th

    Special Hazard Losses incurred on a Mortgage Loan in excess of the Special
Hazard Coverage will be allocated to the outstanding related Class or Classes of
Senior Certificates and to the Subordinate Certificates by Pro Rata Allocation. 
The "Special Hazard Coverage" is expected to equal approximately $2,941,436 as  
of the Initial Cut-Off Date. On each anniversary of the Initial Cut-Off Date,   
the Special Hazard Coverage will be reduced, but not increased, to an amount    
equal to the lesser of (i) the greatest of (a) the aggregate principal balance  
of the Mortgage Loans located in the single zip code area containing the largest
aggregate principal balance of such Mortgage Loans, (b) 1.0% of the aggregate   
unpaid principal balance of the Mortgage Loans and (c) twice the unpaid         
principal balance of the largest single Mortgage Loan, in each case calculated  
as of the Determination Date in the immediately preceding month and (ii) the    
Special Hazard Coverage as of the Initial Cut-Off Date as reduced by the Special
Hazard Losses allocated to the Certificates since the Initial Cut-Off Date.     

  Fraud Losses incurred on a Mortgage Loan in excess of the Fraud Coverage
will be allocated to the outstanding related Class or Classes of Senior         
Certificates and to the Subordinate Certificates by Pro Rata Allocation. The    
"Fraud Coverage" is expected to equal approximately $3,500,532 as of the Initial
Cut-Off Date. Fraud Coverage will be reduced, from time to time, by the amount  
of Fraud Losses allocated to the Certificates. As of any date of determination  
after the Initial Cut-Off Date, the Fraud Coverage will generally be equal to   
(a) prior to the second anniversary of the Initial Cut-Off Date, an amount equal
to 1.00% of the sum of (i) the Initial Cut-Off Date Aggregate Loan Balance and  
(ii) the original Pre-Funded Amount minus the aggregate amounts allocated to the
Certificates with respect to Fraud Losses on such Mortgage Loans up to such date
of determination and (b) from the second to the fifth anniversary of the Initial
Cut-Off Date, an amount equal to (i) 0.50% of the aggregate principal balance of
all of the Mortgage Loans as of the most recent anniversary of the Initial      
Cut-Off Date minus (ii) the aggregate amounts allocated to the Certificates with
respect to Fraud Losses on the Mortgage Loans since the most recent anniversary 
of the Initial Cut-Off Date up to such date of determination. On and after the  
fifth anniversary of the Initial Cut-Off Date, the Fraud Coverage will be zero. 

   Bankruptcy Losses incurred on a Mortgage Loan in excess of the Bankruptcy
Coverage will be allocated to the outstanding related Class or Classes of Senior
Certificates and to the Subordinate Certificates by Pro Rata Allocation. The    
"Bankruptcy Coverage" is expected to equal approximately $100,000 as of the     
Initial Cut-Off Date. Bankruptcy Coverage will be reduced, from time to time, by
the amount of Bankruptcy Losses allocated to the Certificates.                  

    Special Hazard Coverage, Fraud Coverage or Bankruptcy Coverage may also be
reduced upon written confirmation from the Rating Agencies that such reduction  
will not adversely affect the then current ratings assigned to the Offered      
Certificates by the Rating Agencies. Such a reduction, in the event of Special  
Hazard Losses, Fraud Losses or Bankruptcy Losses on the Mortgage Loans, could   
adversely affect the level of protection afforded the Senior Certificates by    
subordination of the Subordinate Certificates or the level of protection        
afforded the Senior Subordinate Certificates by subordination of the Junior     
Subordinate Certificates.                                                       

  Investors in the Senior Certificates should be aware that the applicable
coverages for such losses cover Mortgage Loans in both Loan Groups. Therefore,  
in the event Mortgage Loans in a Loan Group suffer a high level of Special      
Hazard Losses, Fraud Losses or Bankruptcy Losses, such losses will reduce the   
available coverage for the Senior Certificates in both Loan Groups and may cause
Senior Certificates relating to the other Loan Group to suffer losses in the    
event Mortgage Loans in either Loan Group suffer losses after the available     
coverage has been exhausted.                                                    

THE CLASS R CERTIFICATES 

The Class R Certificates consist of the Class R-I Certificates and the
Class R-II Certificates. The Class R-I Certificates represent the sole residual 
interest in REMIC I and the Class R-II Certificates represent the sole residual 
interest in REMIC II.                                                           

On each Distribution Date, in addition to payments of interest and    
principal to the Class R Certificates described herein, any amounts remaining   
(which are expected to be zero) in the Certificate Account from the             
S-65

P-->424B371st Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 71st

Available Distribution Amount for each Loan Group after distributions of        
interest and principal on the Certificates and payment of expenses, if any, of  
REMIC II will be distributed to the Class R-II Certificateholders, if any.      
Distributions of such remaining amounts with respect to the Class R-II          
Certificate will be subordinate to all payments required to be made with respect
to the other Offered Certificates on any Distribution Date.                     

Any amounts remaining in the Collection Account upon reduction of the 
aggregate Certificate Principal Balance of the Certificates to zero, payment of 
any outstanding expenses and termination of the REMIC II will be distributable  
to the Class R-II Certificateholder. Such remaining assets are expected to be   
minimal. See "-- Termination; Purchase of Mortgage Loans" herein.               

ADVANCES 

     With respect to each Mortgage Loan, the Servicer will make Monthly Advances
to the Collection Account not later than two Business Days prior to each        
Distribution Date to cover any shortfall between (i) payments scheduled to be   
received in respect of such Mortgage Loan and (ii) the amounts actually         
deposited in the Collection Account on account of such payments; provided that  
the Servicer determines, in good faith, on such date that such Monthly Advances 
will be recoverable from insurance proceeds, Liquidation Proceeds or other      
amounts received with respect to such Mortgage Loan. Monthly Advances are       
reimbursable to the Servicer from cash in the Collection Account with respect to
Mortgage Loans prior to payments to the Certificateholders if the Servicer      
determines that any such Monthly Advances previously made are not recoverable   
from Insurance Proceeds, Liquidation Proceeds or other amounts recoverable with 
respect to the applicable Mortgage Loan and so notifies the Trustee.            

AVAILABLE DISTRIBUTION AMOUNT 

On each Distribution Date, the Available Distribution Amount for any  
Distribution Date which will be determined separately with respect to each Loan 
Group, and, in each case, will generally include scheduled principal and        
interest payments due on the related Due Date, Curtailments received in the     
previous calendar month (as set forth below), Payoffs received in the applicable
Collection Period to the extent set forth below and amounts received with       
respect to liquidations of Mortgage Loans with respect to such Loan Group in the
previous calendar month, will be distributed by or on behalf of the Trustee to  
the Certificateholders, as specified herein.                                    

    The determination date (the "Determination Date") is the eighth day (or if
such day is not a Business Day, the Business Day immediately succeeding such    
eighth day) preceding the related Distribution Date in the month in which such  
Distribution Date occurs.                                                       

     The "Available Distribution Amount" for any Distribution Date for each Loan
Group (the "Group SA Available Distribution Amount" and the "Group A Available  
Distribution Amount", respectively) as more fully described in the Pooling and  
Servicing Agreement, will equal the sum, with respect to the Mortgage Loans in  
such Loan Group, of the following amounts:                                      

    (1) the total amount of all cash received by or on behalf of the
    Servicer with respect to such Mortgage Loans by the Determination Date for
such Distribution Date and not previously distributed (including      
Liquidation Proceeds), except:                                        

            (a) all scheduled payments of principal and interest collected but
due on a date subsequent to the related Due Date;               

            (b) all Curtailments received after the previous Collection Period
     (together with any interest payment received with such prepayments to
     the extent that it represents the payment of interest accrued on such
 Mortgage Loans for the period subsequent to the previous calendar
month);                                                         

       (c) all Payoffs received after the previous Collection Period
immediately preceding such Determination Date (together with any
interest payment received with such a Payoff to the extent      

S-66

P-->424B372nd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 72nd

 that it represents the payment of interest accrued on the related
        Mortgage Loan for the period subsequent to the previous calendar month);

          (d) Liquidation Proceeds and Insurance Proceeds received on such
Mortgage Loans after the previous calendar month;               

     (e) all amounts in the Collection Account which are due and
     reimbursable to the Servicer pursuant to the terms of the Pooling and
Servicing Agreement;                                            

           (f) the Servicing Fee for each such Mortgage Loan and the Trustee
Fee; and                                                        

           (g) the excess, if any, of aggregate Liquidation Proceeds on such
   Mortgage Loans received during the previous calendar month over the
  amount that would have been received if Payoffs had been made with
    respect to such Mortgage Loans on the date such Liquidation Proceeds
were received ("Excess Liquidation Proceeds");                  

   (2) the total, to the extent not previously distributed, of the
  following amounts, to the extent advanced or received, as applicable, by
the Servicer:                                                         

           (a) all Monthly Advances made by the Servicer to the Trustee with
      respect to such Distribution Date relating to such Mortgage Loans; and

             (b) any amounts payable as Compensating Interest by the Servicer on
such Distribution Date relating to such Mortgage Loans;         

   (3) the total amount of any cash received by the Trustee or the
    Servicer in respect of the obligation of the Seller to repurchase any such
Mortgage Loans; and                                                   

(4) with respect to Loan Group A, any amounts required to be
   distributed to the Holders of Certificates from amounts on deposit in the
Pre-Funding Account or the Capitalized Interest Account.              

LAST SCHEDULED DISTRIBUTION DATE 

     The "Last Scheduled Distribution Date" for the Class SA Certificates is the
Distribution Date in April 2025, which is the Distribution Date occurring in the
month after the scheduled maturity date for the latest maturing Group SA        
Mortgage Loan.                                                                  

  The "Last Scheduled Distribution Date" for the Class A Certificates, the
Subordinate Certificates and the Class R Certificates is the Distribution Date  
in August 2028, which is the distribution Date occurring in the month after the 
scheduled maturity date for the latest maturing Group A Mortgage Loan.          

  The actual last Distribution Date on the Certificates will depend on the
rate of payments of principal (including Prepayments) on the related Mortgage   
Loans which, in turn, may be influenced by a variety of economic, geographic and
social factors, as well as the level of prevailing interest rates. No assurance 
can be given as to the actual payment experience on the Mortgage Loans.         

CLASS A-7 RESERVE FUND 

    A reserve fund of approximately $12,500 (the "Class A-7 Reserve Fund") for
the benefit of the Holders of the Class A-7 Certificates, which will be part of 
the REMIC II, will be established at the time the Certificates are issued. No   
additional amounts will be deposited into the Class A-7 Reserve Fund after the  
initial deposit. The funds on deposit in the Class A-7 Reserve Fund will not be 
invested.                                                                       

  A withdrawal from the Class A-7 Reserve Fund will be made on each of the
first twelve Distribution Dates equal to the product of (i) the Certificate     
Principal Balance of the Class A-7 Certificates on the day immediately preceding
each such Distribution Date and (ii) 0.04167%. The Holders of the Class A-7     
Certificates will receive such amount as a distribution of interest on each of  
the first twelve Distribution Dates and zero thereafter.                        

S-67

P-->424B373rd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 73rd

Any amounts remaining in the Class A-7 Reserve Fund at the end of such
twelve month period will be distributed to the Holders of the Class R-II        
Certificate.                                                                    

SHIFTING OF INTERESTS                                                           

     The Senior Certificates of a Certificate Group entitled to principal, other
than the Class SA-4 and Class A-3 Certificates (the "Lockout Certificates")     
(unless the Credit Support Depletion Date has occurred or the related Senior    
Certificates have been retired), will receive 100% of Prepayments received with 
respect to the Mortgage Loans in the related Loan Group until the fifth         
anniversary of the first Distribution Date or until retired. During the next    
four years, such Senior Certificates, other than the related Lockout            
Certificates (unless the Credit Support Depletion Date has occurred), will      
receive a disproportionately large, but decreasing, share of Prepayments        
received with respect to the Mortgage Loans in the related Loan Group. This will
result in an acceleration of the amortization of such Senior Certificates,      
subject to the priorities described in "-- Distributions of Principal" herein,  
enhancing the likelihood that Holders of such Classes of Certificates will be   
paid the full amount of principal to which they are entitled.                   

     Although the Class A-3 Certificates are Senior Certificates, the Holders of
the Class A-3 Certificates will generally not be entitled to receive principal  
distributions (other than the Class A-3 Lockout Liquidation Amount) until the   
Distribution Date in May 2003 and thereafter will not be entitled to receive the
disproportionate allocation of Prepayments from Group A Mortgage Loans that the 
other Class A Certificates are entitled to receive.                             

See "-- Distributions of Principal" herein.                           

PRE-FUNDING ACCOUNT 

     On the Closing Date, the Pre-Funded Amount of $57,744,845 will be deposited
in the Pre-Funding Account, which account shall be in the name of and maintained
by the Trustee and shall be part of the Trust Fund, and may be used to acquire  
Subsequent Mortgage Loans. During the Funding Period, the Pre-Funded Amount will
be maintained in the Pre-Funding Account. The Pre-Funded Amount will be reduced 
during the Funding Period by the amount thereof used to purchase Subsequent     
Mortgage Loans in accordance with the Pooling and Servicing Agreement. Any      
Pre-Funded Amount remaining at the end of the Funding Period will be distributed
to the Holders of the Class or Classes of Class A Certificates entitled to      
receive principal distributions on the Distribution Date immediately following  
the end of such Funding Period, thus resulting in a partial principal prepayment
of certain Classes of Class A Certificates. See "Prepayment and Yield
Considerations -- Mandatory Prepayment" herein.                                 

    Amounts on deposit in the Pre-Funding Account will be invested in Eligible
Investments. All interest and any other investment earnings on amounts on       
deposit in the Pre-Funding Account will be deposited in the Distribution        
Account, as part of the funds to be paid to the Holders of Class A Certificates,
prior to each Distribution Date during the Funding Period. The Pre-Funding      
Account will not be an asset of either of the REMICs.                           

CAPITALIZED INTEREST ACCOUNT 

 On the Closing Date, cash will be deposited in the Capitalized Interest
Account which account shall be in the name of and maintained by the Trustee and 
shall be part of the Trust Fund. The amount on deposit in the Capitalized       
Interest Account, including reinvestment income thereon, will be used by the    
Trustee to fund the excess, if any, on any Distribution Date during the Funding 
Period and on the first Distribution Date following the end of the Funding      
Period, of (i) the product of (a) the balance of the Pre-Funding Account and (b)
the sum of (I) 1/12 of 7% plus (II) 1/12 of the Trustee Fee, over (ii) the      
amount of any reinvestment income earned on amounts in the Pre-Funding Account  
deposited to the Distribution Account since the previous Distribution Date. The 
Pooling and Servicing Agreement provides that certain amounts on deposit in the 
Capitalized Interest Account that are determined not to be required to fund such
payments will be periodically distributed to the Seller. In addition, any       
amounts remaining in the Capitalized Interest Account at the end of the         

S-68

P-->424B374th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 74th

Funding Period and not needed for such purpose will be paid to the Seller and   
will not thereafter be available for distribution to the Holders of any         
Certificates.                                                                   

    Amounts on deposit in the Capitalized Interest Account will be invested in
Eligible Investments. The Capitalized Interest Account will not be an asset of  
either of the REMICs.                                                           

SERVICING AND OTHER COMPENSATION AND PAYMENT OF EXPENSES 

The principal servicing compensation to be paid to the Servicer with  
respect to each Collection Period in respect of its servicing activities        
relating to the Certificates (the "Servicing Fee") will be retained by it from  
collections of interest on the Mortgage Loans in the Trust Fund at the time such
collections are required to be deposited into the Distribution Account (or the  
Collection Account, if the Servicer is required to make deposits therein) and   
will be equal to not more than 0.44% (the "Servicing Fee Rate") per annum       
(depending on the Mortgage Loan) of the outstanding Loan Balance of each such   
Mortgage Loan as of the first day of each such Collection Period. In addition,  
the Servicer will receive any net investment income from the investment of funds
in the Collection Account, if any, and the Servicer and the Trustee will be     
entitled to any net investment income from the investment of funds in the       
Distribution Account. All assumption fees and late payment charges, to the      
extent collected from borrowers shall be retained by the Servicer.              

  The Servicer will pay certain ongoing expenses associated with the Trust
Fund and incurred by it in connection with its responsibilities under the       
Pooling and Servicing Agreement. In addition, the Servicer will be entitled to  
reimbursement for certain expenses incurred by it in connection with defaulted  
Mortgage Loans and in connection with the restoration or maintenance of         
Mortgaged Properties or the lien of the Mortgage thereon, such right of         
reimbursement being prior to the rights of Certificateholders to receive any    
Liquidation Proceeds.                                                           

HAZARD INSURANCE AND FLOOD INSURANCE                                            

 The Servicer will cause to be maintained fire and hazard insurance with
extended coverage customary in the area where the Mortgaged Property is located,
in an amount which is at least equal to the lesser of (i) the outstanding Loan  
Balance on the Mortgage Loan, (ii) the full insurable value of the premises     
securing the Mortgage Loan and (iii) the minimum amount required to compensate  
for damage or loss on a replacement cost basis in each case in an amount not    
less than such amount as is necessary to avoid the application of any           
co-insurance clause contained in the related hazard insurance policy. If the    
Mortgaged Property is in an area identified in the Federal Register by the Flood
Emergency Management Agency as having special flood hazards and flood insurance 
has been made available, the Servicer will cause to be maintained a flood       
insurance policy with a generally acceptable insurance carrier, in an amount    
representing coverage not less than the least of (i) the outstanding principal  
balance of the Mortgage Loan, (ii) the maximum insurable value of the           
improvements securing such Mortgage Loan or (iii) the maximum amount of         
insurance which is available under the National Flood Insurance Act of 1968, as 
amended, and the Flood Disaster Protection Act of 1973, as amended. The Servicer
shall also maintain on the REO Property for the benefit of the Trust Fund, (x)  
fire and hazard insurance with extended coverage in an amount which is at least 
equal to the replacement cost of the improvements which are part of such        
property, (y) public liability insurance and, (z) to the extent required and    
available under the National Flood Insurance Act of 1968, as amended, and the   
Flood Disaster Protection Act of 1973, as amended, flood insurance in an amount 
as provided above. Any amounts collected by the Servicer under any such policies
(other than amounts to be applied to the restoration or repair of the Mortgaged 
Property, or to be released to the Mortgagor in accordance with customary       
mortgage servicing procedures) will be deposited in the Collection Account,     
subject to retention by the Servicer to the extent such amounts constitute      
servicing compensation or to withdrawal pursuant to the Pooling and Servicing   
Agreement.                                                                      

  In the event that the Servicer obtains and maintains a blanket policy as
provided in the Pooling and Servicing Agreement insuring against fire and       
hazards of extended coverage on all of the Mortgage Loans, then, to the extent  
such policy names the Servicer as loss payee and provides coverage in an amount 
equal to the aggregate unpaid principal balance of the Mortgage Loans without   
coinsurance, and otherwise complies                                             

S-69

P-->424B375th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 75th

with the requirements of the first paragraph of this subsection, the Servicer   
will be deemed conclusively to have satisfied its obligations with respect to   
fire and hazard insurance coverage.                                             

REALIZATION UPON DEFAULTED MORTGAGE LOANS                                       

The Servicer will foreclose upon or otherwise comparably convert to   
ownership Mortgaged Properties securing such of the Mortgage Loans as come into 
default when, in accordance with applicable servicing procedures under the      
Pooling and Servicing Agreement, no satisfactory arrangements can be made for   
the collection of delinquent payments. In connection with such foreclosure or   
other conversion, the Servicer will follow such practices as it deems necessary 
or advisable and as are in keeping with its general mortgage servicing          
activities, provided the Servicer will not be required to expend its own funds  
in connection with foreclosure or other conversion, or restoration of any       
property unless, in its sole judgment, such foreclosure or restoration will     
increase Net Liquidation Proceeds. The Servicer will be reimbursed out of       
Liquidation Proceeds for advances of its own funds as liquidation expenses      
before any Net Liquidation Proceeds are distributed to Certificateholders.      

     "Insurance Proceeds" means any proceeds paid by any insurer pursuant to any
insurance policy covering a Mortgage Loan, net of any component thereof (i)     
covering any expenses incurred by or on behalf of the Servicer in connection    
with obtaining such proceeds, (ii) that is applied to the restoration or repair 
of the related Mortgaged Property, or (iii) released to the Mortgagor in        
accordance with the Servicer's normal servicing procedures.                     

"Liquidation Expenses" means all out-of-pocket expenses (exclusive of 
overhead) which are incurred by the Servicer in connection with the liquidation 
of any Mortgage Loan and not recovered under any insurance policy, such expenses
including, without limitation, legal fees and expenses, any unreimbursed        
Servicing Advances respecting the related Mortgage Loan and any related and     
unreimbursed expenditures for real estate property taxes or for property        
restoration, preservation or insurance against casualty loss or damage.         

  "Liquidation Proceeds" means all proceeds (including Insurance Proceeds)
received in connection with the liquidation of any Mortgage Loan or related REO 
or any condemnation or taking by eminent domain, whether through trustee's sale,
foreclosure sale or otherwise (including rental income).                        

   "Net Liquidation Proceeds" means, with respect to any Liquidated Mortgage
Loan, Liquidation Proceeds net of Liquidation Expenses.                         

"REO" means any Mortgaged Property that is acquired by the Trustee in 
foreclosure or by deed in lieu of foreclosure.                                  

     "Foreclosure Profit" means, with respect to a Liquidated Mortgage Loan, the
amount, if any, by which (i) the aggregate of its Net Liquidation Proceeds      
exceeds (ii) the related Loan Balance (plus accrued and unpaid interest thereon 
at the applicable Loan Rate from the date interest was last paid through the    
date of receipt of the final Liquidation Proceeds) of such Liquidated Mortgage  
Loan immediately prior to the initial recovery of its Liquidation Proceeds.     

EVIDENCE AS TO COMPLIANCE                                                       

    The Pooling and Servicing Agreement provides for delivery on or before the
last day of the fifth month following the end of the Servicer's fiscal year,    
beginning in 1999, to the Trustee, the Depositor and the Rating Agencies of an  
annual statement signed by an officer of the Servicer to the effect that the    
Servicer has fulfilled its material obligations under the Pooling and Servicing 
Agreement throughout the preceding fiscal year, except as specified in such     
statement.                                                                      

On or before the last day of the fifth month following the end of the 
Servicer's fiscal year, beginning in 1999, the Servicer will furnish a report   
prepared by a firm of nationally recognized independent public accountants (who 
may also render other services to the Servicer or the Depositor) to the Trustee,
the Depositor and the Rating Agencies to the effect that such firm has examined 
certain documents and the                                                       

S-70

P-->424B376th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 76th

records relating to servicing of the Mortgage Loans under the Uniform Single    
Attestation Program for Mortgage Bankers and such firm's conclusion with respect
thereto.                                                                        

The Servicer's fiscal year is the calendar year.                      

CERTAIN MATTERS REGARDING THE SERVICER                                          

The Pooling and Servicing Agreement provides that the Servicer may not
resign from its obligations and duties thereunder, except in connection with a  
permitted transfer of servicing, unless (i) such duties and obligations are no  
longer permissible under applicable law or are in material conflict by reason of
applicable law with any other activities of a type and nature presently carried 
on by it or its affiliate or (ii) upon the satisfaction of the following        
conditions: (a) the Servicer has proposed a successor servicer to the Trustee in
writing and such proposed successor servicer is reasonably acceptable to the    
Trustee; and (b) the Rating Agencies have confirmed to the Trustee that the     
appointment of such proposed successor servicer as the Servicer will not result 
in the reduction or withdrawal of the then current rating of the Certificates.  
No such resignation will become effective until the Trustee or a successor      
servicer has assumed the Servicer's obligations and duties under the Pooling and
Servicing Agreement.                                                            

The Servicer may perform any of its duties and obligations under the  
Pooling and Servicing Agreement through one or more subservicers or delegates,  
which may be affiliates of the Servicer. Notwithstanding any such arrangement,  
the Servicer will remain liable and obligated to the Trustee and the            
Certificateholders for the Servicer's duties and obligations under the Pooling  
and Servicing Agreement, without any diminution of such duties and obligations  
and as if the Servicer itself were performing such duties and obligations.      

The Servicer may agree to changes in the terms of a Mortgage Loan,    
provided, however, that such changes (i) will not cause any REMIC of the Trust  
Fund to fail to qualify as a REMIC and do not adversely affect the interests of 
the Certificateholders, (ii) are consistent with prudent business practices and 
(iii) do not change the Loan Rate of such Mortgage Loan or extend the maturity  
date of such Mortgage Loans in excess of one year. Any changes to the terms of a
Mortgage Loan that would cause any REMIC of the Trust Fund to fail to qualify as
a REMIC, however, may be agreed to by the Servicer, provided the Servicer has   
determined such changes are necessary to avoid a prepayment of such Mortgage    
Loans, such changes are in accordance with prudent business practices and the   
Servicer purchases such Mortgage Loan in accordance with the terms of the       
Pooling and Servicing Agreement.                                                

The Pooling and Servicing Agreement provides that the Servicer will   
indemnify the Trust Fund and the Trustee from and against any loss, liability,  
expense, damage or injury suffered or sustained as a result of the Servicer's   
actions or omissions in connection with the servicing and administration of the 
Mortgage Loans which are not in accordance with the provisions of the Pooling   
and Servicing Agreement. The Pooling and Servicing Agreement provides that      
neither the Depositor nor the Servicer nor their directors, officers, employees 
or agents will be under any other liability to the Trust Fund, the Trustee, the 
Certificateholders or any other person for any action taken or for refraining   
from taking any action pursuant to the Pooling and Servicing Agreement. However,
neither the Depositor nor the Servicer will be protected against any liability  
which would otherwise be imposed by reason of willful misconduct, bad faith or  
gross negligence of the Depositor or the Servicer in the performance of its     
duties under the Pooling and Servicing Agreement or by reason of reckless       
disregard of its obligations thereunder. In addition, the Pooling and Servicing 
Agreement provides that the Servicer will not be under any obligation to appear 
in, prosecute or defend any legal action which is not incidental to its         
servicing responsibilities under the Pooling and Servicing Agreement. The       
Servicer may, in its sole discretion, undertake any such legal action which it  
may deem necessary or desirable with respect to the Pooling and Servicing       
Agreement and the rights and duties of the parties thereto and the interest of  
the Certificateholders thereunder.                                              

   Any corporation into which the Servicer may be merged or consolidated, or
any corporation resulting from any merger, conversion or consolidation to which 
the Servicer shall be a party, or any corporation succeeding to the business of 
the Servicer shall be the successor of the Servicer hereunder, without the      
execution or filing of any paper or any further act on the part of any of the   
parties hereto, anything in the Pooling and Servicing Agreement to the contrary 
notwithstanding.                                                                
S-71

P-->424B377th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 77th

EVENTS OF DEFAULT 
"Events of Default" will consist of (i) (A) any failure by the Servicer to
make any required Monthly Advance or (B) any other failure of the Servicer to   
deposit in the Collection Account or Distribution Account any deposit required  
to be made under the Pooling and Servicing Agreement, which failure continues   
unremedied for two Business Days after the giving of written notice of such     
failure to the Servicer by the Trustee, or to the Servicer and the Trustee by   
any Certificateholder; (ii) any failure by the Servicer duly to observe or      
perform in any material respect any other of its covenants or agreements, or the
breach of certain representations and warranties of the Servicer, in the Pooling
and Servicing Agreement which, in each case, materially and adversely affects   
the interests of the Certificateholders and continues unremedied for 60 days    
after the giving of written notice of such failure to the Servicer by the       
Trustee, or to the Servicer and the Trustee by any Certificateholder; (iii) any 
failure by the Servicer to make any required Servicing Advance, which failure   
continues unremedied for a period of 30 days after the giving of written notice 
of such failure to the Servicer by the Trustee, or to the Servicer and the      
Trustee by any Certificateholder; (iv) the loss and delinquency experience with 
respect to the Mortgage Loans exceeds certain specified levels; or (v) certain  
events of insolvency, readjustment of debt, marshalling of assets and           
liabilities or similar proceedings relating to the Servicer and certain actions 
by the Servicer indicating insolvency, reorganization or inability to pay its   
obligations (an "Insolvency Event").                                            

    Upon the occurrence and continuation beyond the applicable grace period of
the event described in clause (i)(A) above, if any Monthly Advance is not made  
by 4:00 P.M. New York time on the second Business Day following written notice  
to the Servicer of such event, the Trustee or a successor servicer will         
immediately assume the duties of the Servicer.                                  

Upon removal or resignation of the Servicer, the Trustee will be the  
Successor Servicer (the "Successor Servicer"). The Trustee, as Successor        
Servicer, will be obligated to make Monthly Advances and Servicing Advances and 
certain other advances unless it determines reasonably and in good faith that   
such advances would not be recoverable. If, however, the Trustee is unwilling or
unable to act as Successor Servicer, or if the majority of Certificateholders so
requests, the Trustee may appoint, or petition a court of competent jurisdiction
to appoint, any established mortgage loan servicing institution having a net    
worth of not less than $50,000,000 as the Successor Servicer in the assumption  
of all or any part of the responsibilities, duties or liabilities of the        
Servicer.                                                                       

 Notwithstanding the foregoing, a delay in or failure of the performance
referred to under clause (i) above for a period of ten Business Days or referred
to under clause (ii) above for a period of 30 Business Days, shall not          
constitute an Event of Default if such delay or failure could not be prevented  
by the exercise of reasonable diligence by the Servicer and such delays or      
failure was caused by an act of God or other similar occurrence. Upon the       
occurrence of any such event the Servicer shall not be relieved from using its  
best efforts to perform its obligations in a timely manner in accordance with   
the terms of the Pooling and Servicing Agreement and the Servicer shall provide 
the Trustee, the Depositor and the Certificateholders prompt notice of such     
failure or delay by it, together with a description of its efforts to so perform
its obligations.                                                                

RIGHTS UPON AN EVENT OF SERVICING TERMINATION                                   

  So long as an Event of Default remains unremedied, any of the Trustee or
Certificateholders holding Certificates evidencing at least 51% of the          
Percentage Interests in the Trust Fund, may terminate all of the rights and     
obligations of the Servicer under the Pooling and Servicing Agreement and in and
to the Mortgage Loans, whereupon the Trustee will succeed to all the            
responsibilities, duties and liabilities of the Servicer under the Pooling and  
Servicing Agreement and will be entitled to similar compensation arrangements.  
In the event that the Trustee would be obligated to succeed the Servicer but is 
unwilling or unable so to act, it may appoint, or petition a court of competent 
jurisdiction for the appointment of, a housing and home finance institution or  
other mortgage loan servicer with all licenses and permits required to perform  
its obligations under the Pooling and Servicing Agreement and having a net worth
of at least $50,000,000 to act as successor to the Servicer under the Pooling   
and Servicing Agreement. Pending such appointment, the Trustee will be obligated
to act in such capacity unless prohibited by law. Such successor will be        
entitled to receive the same                                                    

S-72

P-->424B378th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 78th

compensation that the Servicer would otherwise have received (or such lesser    
compensation as the Trustee and such successor may agree). A receiver or        
conservator for the Servicer may be empowered to prevent the termination and    
replacement of the Servicer if the only Event of Default that has occurred is an
Insolvency Event.                                                               

AMENDMENT                                                                       

     The Pooling and Servicing Agreement may be amended from time to time by the
Seller, the Servicer, the Depositor, the Document Custodian and the Trustee, but
without the consent of the Certificateholders, to cure any ambiguity, to correct
or supplement any provisions therein which may be inconsistent with any other   
provisions of the Pooling and Servicing Agreement, to add to the duties of the  
Depositor or the Servicer, to comply with any requirements imposed by the       
Internal Revenue Code or any regulation thereunder, or to add or amend any      
provisions of the Pooling and Servicing Agreement as required by the Rating     
Agencies in order to maintain or improve any rating of the Offered Certificates 
(it being understood that, after obtaining the ratings in effect on the Closing 
Date, neither the Depositor, the Trustee nor the Servicer is obligated to       
obtain, maintain or improve any such rating) or to add any other provisions with
respect to matters or questions arising under the Pooling and Servicing         
Agreement which shall not be inconsistent with the provisions of the Pooling and
Servicing Agreement, provided that such action will not, as evidenced by an     
opinion of counsel, materially and adversely affect the interests of any        
Certificateholder; provided, that any such amendment will not be deemed to      
materially and adversely affect the Certificateholders and no such opinion will 
be required to be delivered if the person requesting such amendment obtains a   
letter from each of the Rating Agencies stating that such amendment would not   
result in a downgrading of the then current rating of the Offered Certificates. 
The Pooling and Servicing Agreement may also be amended from time to time by the
Seller, the Servicer, the Depositor, the Document Custodian and the Trustee,    
with the consent of Certificateholders evidencing at least 51% of the Percentage
Interests of each Class affected thereby for the purpose of adding any          
provisions to or changing in any manner or eliminating any of the provisions of 
the Pooling and Servicing Agreement or of modifying in any manner the rights of 
the Certificateholders, provided that no such amendment will (i) reduce in any  
manner the amount of, or delay the timing of, collections of payments on the    
Certificates without the consent of each of the affected Certificateholders or  
(ii) reduce the aforesaid percentage required to consent to any such amendment, 
without the consent of the Holders of all Certificates then outstanding.        

TERMINATION; PURCHASE OF MORTGAGE LOANS 

The Trust Fund will terminate on the Distribution Date following the  
earliest of (i) the Distribution Date on which the aggregate Class Principal    
Balance of all Certificates has been reduced to zero, (ii) the final payment or 
other liquidation of the last Mortgage Loan in the Trust Fund, (iii) the        
optional purchase by the Servicer of the Mortgage Loans, as described below and 
(iv) the Distribution Date in May, 2029.                                        

 Subject to provisions in the Pooling and Servicing Agreement concerning
adopting a plan of complete liquidation, the Servicer may, at its option,       
terminate the Pooling and Servicing Agreement on any date on which the Aggregate
Loan Balance is less than 5% of the sum of (i) the Initial Cut-Off Date         
Aggregate Loan Balance and (ii) the original Pre-Funded Amount, by purchasing,  
on the next succeeding Distribution Date, all of the outstanding Mortgage Loans 
at a price equal to the sum of the outstanding Class Principal Balance of all   
Certificates (subject to reduction as provided in the Pooling and Servicing     
Agreement if the purchase price is based in part on the appraised value of any  
REO Property included in the Trust Fund and such appraised value is less than   
the Loan Balance of the related Mortgage Loan) and accrued and unpaid interest  
thereon at the weighted average of the Loan Rates through the end of the        
Collection Period preceding the final Distribution Date.                        

  Any such purchase shall be accomplished by deposit into the Distribution
Account of the purchase price specified above.                                  

S-73

P-->424B379th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 79th

DESCRIPTION OF THE MORTGAGE LOAN PURCHASE AGREEMENT 

 The Mortgage Loans to be transferred to the Trust Fund by the Depositor
will be purchased by the Depositor from First Union National Bank (the "Seller")
pursuant to the Mortgage Loan Purchase Agreement to be entered into between the 
Depositor, as purchaser of the Mortgage Loans, and the Seller, as seller of the 
Mortgage Loans (the "Mortgage Loan Purchase Agreement"). Under the Mortgage Loan
Purchase Agreement, the Seller will agree to transfer the Mortgage Loans to the 
Depositor. Pursuant to the Pooling and Servicing Agreement, the Mortgage Loans  
will be immediately transferred by the Depositor to the Trust Fund, and the     
Depositor will assign its rights in, to and under the Mortgage Loan Purchase    
Agreement, to the Trust Fund. The following summary describes certain terms of  
the form of the Mortgage Loan Purchase Agreement and is qualified in its        
entirety by reference to the form of Mortgage Loan Purchase Agreement.          

TRANSFER OF MORTGAGE LOANS                                                      

    Pursuant to the Mortgage Loan Purchase Agreement, the Seller will transfer
and assign to the Depositor all of its right, title and interest in and to the  
Mortgage Loans and the Mortgage Files. The purchase price of the Mortgage Loans 
is a specified percentage of the face amount thereof as of the time of transfer 
and is payable by the Depositor, as applicable, in cash.                        

REPRESENTATIONS AND WARRANTIES                                                  

  The Seller will represent and warrant to the Depositor that, among other
things, as of the Closing Date, it is duly organized and in good standing and   
that it has the authority to consummate the transactions contemplated by the    
Mortgage Loan Purchase Agreement.                                               

 The Seller will also represent and warrant to the Depositor that, among
other things, (a) the information with respect to the applicable Mortgage Loan  
set forth in the schedule attached to the Mortgage Loan Purchase Agreement is   
true and correct in all material respects, (b) immediately prior to the sale of 
the Mortgage Loans to the Depositor, the Seller was the sole owner and holder of
the Mortgage Loans free and clear of any and all liens and security interests,  
and (c) each Mortgage Loan complied at the time of origination, in all material 
respects, with applicable state and federal laws. The Seller will make similar  
representations and warranties in the Pooling and Servicing Agreement. The      
Seller will also represent and warrant to the Depositor, that, among other      
things, as of the Closing Date, the Mortgage Loan Purchase Agreement constitutes
a legal, valid and binding obligation of the Seller. In the event of a breach of
any such representations and warranties which has a material adverse effect on  
the interests of the Certificateholders, the Seller will repurchase or          
substitute for the Mortgage Loans as described herein under "Description of the
Certificates -- Assignment of Mortgage Loans."                                  

  The Seller has also agreed to indemnify the Depositor and the Trust Fund
from and against certain losses, liabilities and expenses (including reasonable 
attorneys' fees) suffered or sustained pursuant to the Mortgage Loan Purchase   
Agreement.                                                                      

ASSIGNMENT TO THE TRUST FUND                                                    

    The Seller expressly acknowledges and consents to the Depositor's transfer
of its rights relating to the Mortgage Loans under the Mortgage Loan Purchase   
Agreement to the Trust Fund. The Seller also agrees to perform its obligations  
under the Mortgage Loan Purchase Agreement for the benefit of the Trust Fund.   

TERMINATION                                                                     

     The Mortgage Loan Purchase Agreement will terminate upon the termination of
the Trust Fund.                                                                 

S-74

P-->424B380th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 80th

THE TRUSTEE 

Norwest Bank Minnesota, National Association, a national banking      
association, has been named Trustee pursuant to the Pooling and Servicing       
Agreement. The Trustee's "Corporate Trust Office" for purposes of the           
presentment and surrender of the Offered Certificates for the final distribution
thereon and for all other purposes is located at Sixth Street and Marquette     
Avenue, Minneapolis, Minnesota 55479, Attention: Corporate Trust Services (FURST
98-A), or such other address as the Trustee may designate from time to time by  
notice to the Certificateholders, the Depositor and the Servicer. The Trustee   
also maintains operations offices in Columbia, Maryland and Frederick, Maryland.

   The Trustee will at all times be required to be either a national banking
association or a corporation incorporated and doing business under the laws of  
the United States of America or any state authorized under such laws to exercise
corporate trust powers, having a combined capital and surplus of at least       
$50,000,000, subject to supervision or examination by federal or state authority
and having (or in the case of a corporation including a bank holding company    
system, the related bank holding company shall have) a rating with respect to   
its long-term unsecured debt obligations of at least BBB- by S&P (or such lower 
rating as such rating agency may from time to time agree). If at any time the   
Trustee shall cease to be eligible in accordance with the provisions described  
in this paragraph, it will be required to resign immediately in the manner      
described below.                                                                

    No resignation or removal of the Trustee and no appointment of a successor
trustee shall become effective until the acceptance of appointment by a         
successor trustee.                                                              

In addition to being required to resign in the circumstances described
above, the Trustee, or any trustee or trustees hereafter appointed, may resign  
at any time in the manner set forth in the Pooling and Servicing Agreement. Upon
receiving notice of resignation, the Seller is required promptly to appoint a   
successor trustee or trustees acceptable to the Servicer meeting the eligibility
requirements in the manner to be set forth in the Pooling and Servicing         
Agreement. If no successor trustee shall have been appointed and have accepted  
appointment within 30 days after the giving of such notice of resignation, the  
resigning Trustee may petition any court of competent jurisdiction for the      
appointment of a successor trustee. Such court may thereupon, after such notice,
if any, as it may deem proper and prescribe, appoint a successor trustee.       

    If the Trustee shall cease to be eligible and fail to resign after written
request by the Seller, or if the Trustee is legally unable to act or becomes    
insolvent or a tax is imposed or threatened with respect to the Trust Fund, the 
Seller may remove the Trustee. The Seller is required to promptly appoint a     
successor trustee.                                                              

     The Seller will be required to give notice of any removal of the Trustee to
the Certificateholders, which notice will be required to include the name of the
successor trustee and the address of its corporate trust office. The Seller also
will be required to give notice to the Certificateholders of the acceptance by a
successor of its appointment.                                                   

CERTAIN LEGAL ASPECTS OF THE MORTGAGE LOANS 
GENERAL -- LIEN PRIORITY                                                        

The Mortgage Loans will be secured by either deeds of trust, deeds to 
secure debt or mortgages (each, a "Security Instrument"), depending upon the    
prevailing practice in the state in which the Mortgaged Property is located. A  
mortgage creates a lien upon the real property described in the mortgage. It is 
not prior to the lien for real estate taxes and assessments. Priority between   
mortgages depends on their terms and generally on the order of recording with a 
state or county office. There are two parties to a mortgage, the mortgagor, who 
is the homeowner, and the mortgagee, who is the lender. Under the mortgage      
instrument, the mortgagor delivers to the mortgagee a note or bond and the      
mortgage. A deed of trust formally has three parties: the homeowner, called the 
grantor (similar to a mortgagor), a lender (similar to the mortgagee), called   
the beneficiary, and a third-party grantee, called the trustee. Under a deed of 
trust, the grantor grants the property, irrevocably until the debt is paid, "in 
trust, with the power of sale" to the trustee to secure payment of the          
obligation. The trustee's authority under a deed of trust and the mortgagee's   
authority under a mortgage are governed by law,                                 
S-75

P-->424B381st Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 81st

the express provisions of the deed of trust or the mortgage, and, in some cases 
under a deed of trust, the direction of the beneficiary.                        

  Priority between Security Instruments of record generally depends in the
first instance on the order of filing with the appropriate government records   
office. Priority also may be affected by the express terms of the Security      
Instrument or other documents, such as subordination agreements.                

    Therefore, since a title report or title policy only is accurate as of the
date it is issued, it provides no assurance that a Security Instrument will     
retain perpetually the lien priority it had when it was filed. The Security     
Instruments securing the Mortgage Loans include a requirement that each borrower
maintain the lien priority of each Security Instrument.                         

FORECLOSURE 

  If a borrower defaults under a loan secured by a Security Instrument the
lender generally may bring suit against the borrower. The lender generally also 
may attempt to collect the loan by causing the Security Instrument to be        
enforced against the property it encumbers.                                     

Foreclosure of a deed of trust or a deed to secure debt is generally  
accomplished by a non-judicial trustee's sale under a specific provision in the 
deed of trust or security deed which authorizes the sale of the property to a   
third party upon any default by the borrower under the terms of the note, deed  
of trust or security deed. In some states, the trustee must record a notice of  
default and send a copy to the borrower-grantor and to any person who has       
recorded a request for a copy of a notice of default and notice of sale. In     
addition, the trustee must provide notice in some states to any other individual
having an interest in the real property, including any junior lien Holders. The 
borrower, or any other person having a junior encumbrance on the real estate,   
may, during a reinstatement period, cure the default by paying the entire amount
in arrears plus the costs and expenses incurred in enforcing the obligations.   
Generally, state laws require that a through advertisements and other means,    
notice of the sale be given to all parties having an interest in the real       
property; in certain states such notice may include posting a copy of the notice
on the property.                                                                

     Foreclosure of a mortgage is generally accomplished by judicial action. The
action is initiated by the service of legal pleadings upon all parties having an
interest in the real property. Delays in completion of the foreclosure may      
occasionally result from difficulties in locating necessary parties defendant.  
Judicial foreclosure proceedings are sometimes not contested by any of the      
parties defendant.                                                              

 In the case of foreclosure under a Security Instrument, the sale by the
referee or other designated officer or by the trustee, as applicable, is a      
public sale. It is not uncommon for the lender to purchase the property at      
foreclosure. In many cases where the lender purchases at foreclosure, it usually
purchases the property for an amount equal to the principal amount of the       
Security Instrument, accrued and unpaid interest and the expense of foreclosure.

    Because (i) there may be no equity in the security property, (ii) there is
a requirement that the purchaser pay to bid for the property in cash or by      
cashiers check, (iii) a potential buyer at the sale may find it difficult to    
determine the exact status of title and other facts about the security property 
and (iv) the physical condition of the security property may have deteriorated, 
it generally is more common for the lender, rather than an unrelated third      
party, to purchase the security property at foreclosure. The lender (or other   
purchaser at the trustee's sale) will be subject to the burdens of ownership,   
including the obligations to obtain hazard insurance and to make such repairs at
its own expense as are necessary to render the security property suitable for   
resale. The lender commonly will attempt to resell the security property and    
obtain the services of a real estate broker and agree to pay the broker a       
commission in connection with the resale. Depending upon market conditions, the 
ultimate proceeds of the resale of the security property may not be high enough 
to equal the lender's investment. Property securing a Mortgage Loan that is     
acquired through a trustee's sale or judicial foreclosure must be sold by the   
Trustee within three years after the date on which it is acquired, in order to  
satisfy certain federal income tax requirements.                                

The proceeds received from the sale generally are applied first to the
costs, fees and expenses of sale and then in satisfaction of the indebtedness   
secured by the Security Instrument under which the sale was                     
S-76

P-->424B382nd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 82nd

conducted. Any remaining proceeds generally are payable to the holders of junior
Security Instruments and other liens and claims in order of their priority. Any 
balance remaining generally is payable to the grantor or mortgagor. Following   
the sale, if there are insufficient proceeds to repay the secured debt, the     
beneficiary under the foreclosed lien generally may obtain a deficiency judgment
against the grantor or mortgagor. See " -- Anti-Deficiency Legislation;
Bankruptcy and Consumer Protection Legislation" below.                          

Some courts have been faced with the issue of whether federal or state
constitutional due process requires that borrowers under deeds of trust receive 
notices in addition to the statutorily prescribed minimum. For the most part,   
the courts in these cases have upheld the notice provisions and procedures      
described above.                                                                

RIGHTS OF REDEMPTION 

    In some states, after sale pursuant to a deed of trust or foreclosure of a
mortgage, the borrower and foreclosed junior lienors are given a statutory      
period in which to redeem the property from the foreclosure sale. In some       
states, redemption may occur only upon payment of the entire principal balance  
of the loan, accrued interest and expenses of foreclosure. In other states,     
redemption may be authorized if the former borrower pays only a portion of the  
sums due. The effect of a statutory right of redemption is to diminish the      
ability of the lender to sell the foreclosed property. The rights of redemption 
would defeat the title of any purchaser from the lender subsequent to           
foreclosure or sale under a deed of trust. Consequently, the practical effect of
the redemption right is to force the lender to retain the property and pay the  
expenses of ownership until the redemption period has run.                      

ANTI-DEFICIENCY LEGISLATION; BANKRUPTCY AND CONSUMER PROTECTION LEGISLATION 

     Certain states have imposed statutory prohibitions which limit the remedies
of a beneficiary under a deed of trust or security deed or a mortgagee under a  
mortgage. In some states, statutes limit the right of the beneficiary or        
mortgagee to obtain, or prohibit the beneficiary or mortgagee from obtaining, a 
deficiency judgment against the borrower following foreclosure or sale under a  
deed of trust. A deficiency judgment would be a personal judgment against the   
former borrower equal in most cases to the difference between the net amount    
received upon the public sale of the real property and the amount due to the    
lender. Other statutes require the beneficiary or mortgagee to exhaust the      
security afforded under a Security Instrument by foreclosure in an attempt to   
satisfy the full debt before bringing a personal action against the borrower.   
Finally, other statutory provisions limit any deficiency judgment against the   
former borrower following a judicial sale to the excess of the outstanding debt 
over the fair market value of the property at the time of the public sale. The  
purpose of these statutes is generally to prevent a beneficiary or a mortgagee  
from obtaining a large deficiency judgment against the former borrower as a     
result of low or no bids at the judicial sale.                                  

    In addition to laws limiting or prohibiting deficiency judgments, numerous
other statutory provisions, including the federal bankruptcy laws and state laws
affording relief to debtors, may interfere with or affect the ability of the    
secured mortgage lender to realize upon the sale of the collateral and/or       
enforce a deficiency judgment. For example, with respect to federal bankruptcy  
law, a court with federal bankruptcy jurisdiction may permit a debtor through   
his or her Chapter 11 or Chapter 13 rehabilitative plan to cure a monetary      
default in respect of a mortgage loan on such debtor's residence by paying      
arrearages within a reasonable time period and reinstating the original mortgage
loan payment schedule even though the lender accelerated the mortgage loan and  
final judgment of foreclosure had been entered in state court (provided no sale 
of the residence had yet occurred) prior to the filing of the debtor's petition.
Some courts with federal bankruptcy jurisdiction have approved plans, based on  
the particular facts of the reorganization case, that effected the curing of a  
mortgage loan default by paying arrearages over a number of years.              

  Courts with federal bankruptcy jurisdiction have also indicated that the
terms of a mortgage loan secured by property of the debtor may be modified.     
These courts have suggested that such modifications may include reducing the    
amount of each monthly payment, changing the rate of interest, altering the     
repayment schedule, and reducing the lender's security interest to the value of 
the residence, thus leaving the lender as a general unsecured creditor for the  
difference between the value of the residence and the outstanding balance of the
loan.                                                                           

S-77

P-->424B383rd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 83rd

The Code provides priority to certain tax liens over the lien of the  
mortgage. In addition, substantive requirements are imposed upon mortgage       
lenders in connection with the origination and the servicing of mortgage loans  
by numerous federal and some state consumer protection laws. These laws include 
the federal Truth-in-Lending Act, Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act, Equal  
Credit Opportunity Act, Fair Credit Billing Act, Fair Credit Reporting Act, and 
related statutes and regulations. These federal laws and state laws impose      
specific statutory liabilities upon lenders who originate or service mortgage   
loans and who fail to comply with the provisions of the law. In some cases, this
liability may affect assignees of such loans.                                   

ENFORCEABILITY OF CERTAIN PROVISIONS 

   Upon foreclosure, courts have imposed general equitable principles. These
equitable principles are generally designed to relieve the borrower from the    
legal effect of his defaults under the loan documents. Examples of judicial     
remedies that have been fashioned include judicial requirements that the lender 
undertake affirmative and expensive actions to determine the causes for the     
borrower's default and the likelihood that the borrower will be able to         
reinstate the loan. In some cases, courts have substituted their judgment for   
the lender's judgment and have required that lenders reinstate loans or recast  
payment schedules in order to accommodate borrowers who are suffering from      
temporary financial disability. In other cases, courts have limited the right of
the lender to foreclose if the default under the mortgage instrument is not     
monetary, such as the borrower failing adequately to maintain the property or   
the borrower executing a second Security Instrument affecting the property.     
Finally, some courts have been faced with the issue of whether or not federal or
state constitutional provisions reflecting due process concerns for adequate    
notice require that borrowers under deeds of trust or mortgages receive notices 
in addition to the statutory prescribed minimum. For the most part, these cases 
have upheld the notice provisions as being reasonable or have found that the    
sale by a trustee under a deed of trust, or under a mortgage having a power of  
sale, does not involve sufficient state action to afford constitutional         
protections to the borrower.                                                    

To the extent that the Mortgage Loans contain due-on-sale clauses, the
Servicer may declare the unpaid amounts thereof due and payable upon the sale or
transfer of all or any part of the underlying Mortgaged Property without the    
Servicer's prior written consent. The enforceability of due-on-sale clauses in  
certain situations has been restricted by the laws of some states. However,     
federal law now preempts state statutory and case law which prohibits           
enforcement of due-on-sale clauses and permits the enforcement of due-on-sale   
clauses, subject to certain exceptions. The Servicer intends to enforce the     
due-on-sale clause contained in any Mortgage Loan to the extent that it has     
knowledge of the conveyance or proposed transfer of the underlying Mortgaged    
Property and it believes that it is entitled to do so under applicable federal  
laws and regulations.                                                           

APPLICABILITY OF USURY LAWS                                                     

  Title V of the Depository Institutions Deregulation and Monetary Control
Act of 1980, enacted in March 1980 ("Title V"), provides that state usury       
limitations shall not apply to certain types of residential first mortgage loans
originated by certain lenders after March 31, 1990. The statute authorized any  
state to reimpose interest rate limits by adopting, before April 1, 1983, a law 
or constitutional provision which expressly rejects application of the federal  
law. In addition, even where Title V is not so rejected, any state is authorized
by the law to adopt a provision limiting discount points or other charges on    
mortgage loans covered by Title V. Certain states have taken action to reimpose 
interest rate limits and/or to limit discount points or other charges. In the   
Pooling and Servicing Agreement, the Seller will represent and warrant that each
Mortgage Loan was originated in compliance with applicable state law in all     
material respects.                                                              

ENVIRONMENTAL LEGISLATION 

   Certain states impose a statutory lien for certain costs on property that
is the subject of a cleanup action by the state on account of hazardous wastes  
or hazardous substances released or disposed of on the property. Such a lien    
will generally have priority over all subsequent liens on the property and, in  
certain of these states, will have priority over prior recorded liens including 
the lien of a Security Instrument. In addition, under federal environmental     
legislation and possibly under state law in a number of states, a secured party 
which takes a deed in lieu of foreclosure or acquires a security property at a  
foreclosure sale may be liable for the                                          
S-78

P-->424B384th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 84th

costs of cleaning up a contaminated site. Although such costs could be          
substantial, it is unclear whether they would be imposed on a secured lender    
(such as the Trust Fund) without the presence of certain other facts.           

SOLDIERS' AND SAILORS' CIVIL RELIEF ACT OF 1940 

   Under the Soldiers' and Sailors' Civil Relief Act of 1940, members of all
branches of the military on active duty, including draftees and reservists in   
military service, (i) are entitled to have interest rates reduced and capped at 
6.00% per annum, on obligations (including mortgage loans) incurred prior to the
commencement of military service for the duration of military service, (ii) may 
be entitled to a stay of proceedings on any kind of foreclosure or repossession 
action in the case of defaults on such obligations entered into prior to        
military service and (iii) may have the maturity of such obligations incurred   
prior to military service extended, the payments lowered and the payment        
schedule readjusted for a period of time after the completion of military       
service. However, the benefits of (i), (ii), or (iii) above are subject to      
challenge by creditors and if, in the opinion of the court, the ability of a    
person to comply with such obligations is not materially impaired by military   
service, the court may apply equitable principles accordingly.                  

CERTAIN FEDERAL INCOME TAX CONSEQUENCES 

   The following is a general discussion of the material anticipated federal
income tax consequences of the purchase, ownership and disposition of the       
Offered Certificates prepared by Kilpatrick Stockton LLP, counsel to the Seller 
("Tax Counsel"). The discussion is based upon the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,
as amended (the "Code"), existing and proposed Treasury regulations thereunder, 
including regulations (the "REMIC Regulations" and the "OID Regulations")       
promulgated under the real estate mortgage investment conduit and original issue
discount provisions of the Code, published rulings and court decisions, any of  
which is subject to change, possibly with retroactive effect. The discussion    
does not purport to deal with all federal tax consequences applicable to all    
categories of investors, some of whom may be subject to special rules. Investors
should consult their tax advisors in determining the particular federal, state, 
local and any other tax consequences to them of the purchase, ownership and     
disposition of the Offered Certificates.                                        

REMIC ELECTION                                                                  

    Pursuant to the Pooling and Servicing Agreement, the Trustee will elect to
treat each of REMIC I and REMIC II as a REMIC for federal income tax purposes.  
Qualification as a REMIC requires ongoing compliance with certain conditions.   
Tax Counsel will advise the Seller that, in its opinion, for federal income tax 
purposes, assuming (i) the REMIC elections are properly made and (ii) the       
Pooling and Servicing Agreement is complied with, REMIC I and REMIC II will each
be treated as a REMIC, the Senior Certificates, other than the Class R-I and    
Class R-II Certificate, and the Subordinate Certificates (collectively, the     
"Regular Certificates") will be treated as regular interests in REMIC II and the
Class R-II Certificate will be treated as the sole residual interest in REMIC II
and the Class R-I Certificate will be treated as the sole residual interest in  
REMIC I.                                                                        

    As a REMIC, neither REMIC II nor REMIC I will be subject to federal income
tax except with respect to (i) any income from prohibited transactions, (ii) any
"Net Income from Foreclosure Property" and (iii) certain contributions, if any, 
to the Trust Fund after the Startup Day (see "--Taxes That May be Imposed on the
Trust Fund" below).                                                             

CERTAIN SPECIAL RULES RELATING TO THE REGULAR CERTIFICATES                      

Regular Certificates held by a thrift institution taxed as a "domestic
building and loan association" will constitute assets described in Section      
7701(a)(19)(C) of the Code and Regular Certificates held by a real estate       
investment trust will constitute "real estate assets" within the meaning of     
Section 856(c)(5)(A) of the Code. If less than 95% of the assets comprising a   
REMIC constitute assets qualifying under any of the foregoing sections of the   
Code, then the Regular Certificates will be qualifying assets under such        
sections only to the extent that the assets comprising the REMIC are qualifying 
assets. Owners of Regular Certificates should be aware that Regular Certificates
held by certain financial institutions will be "evidences of                    
S-79

P-->424B385th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 85th

indebtedness" within the meaning of Section 582(c) of the Code. Interest on the 
Regular Certificates will be interest described in Section 856(c)(3)(B) of the  
Code to the extent that the Regular Certificates are treated as "real estate    
assets" within the meaning of Section 856(c)(5)(A) of the Code. The Small       
Business Job Protection Act of 1996 (the "SBJPA") repealed the reserve method   
for bad debts of domestic building and loan associations and mutual savings     
banks, thus eliminating the asset category of "qualifying real property loans"  
in former Code Section 593(d) for taxable years beginning after December 31,
1995. The requirement in the SBJPA that applicable institutions must recapture a
portion of their existing bad debt reserves is suspended if a certain portion of
their assets are maintained in "residential loans" within the meaning of Code   
Section 7701(a)(19)(C)(v), but only if such loans were made to acquire,         
construct or improve the related real property, and generally not for the       
purpose of refinancing. No effort has been or will be made to identify the      
portion of the Mortgage Loans meeting this requirement, and no representation is
made in this regard.                                                            

INTEREST; ORIGINAL ISSUE DISCOUNT AND PREMIUM                                   

     For federal income tax purposes, regular interests in a REMIC generally are
treated as debt instruments issued by the REMIC, and not as ownership interests 
in the REMIC or its assets. Owners of Regular Certificates, including these that
otherwise report income under the cash method of accounting, will be required to
include in income all interest and original issue discount, if any, on such     
Certificates in accordance with accrual method of accounting.                   

The Class SA-5 Certificates, Class SA-X Certificates, Class A-6       
Certificates, and Class A-X Certificates will be (and certain other classes of  
Offered Certificates may be) issued with "original issue discount" ("OID")      
within the meaning of Section 1273(a) of the Code. The prepayment assumption    
that will be used in determining the rate of accrual of OID, and market discount
and premium, if any, for federal income tax purposes is 300% of the BPA for each
of the Group SA Loans and Group A Loans. No representation is made that the     
Mortgage Loans will prepay at any given percentage of the BPA. For federal      
income tax purposes, owners of Regular Certificates issued with OID must include
in gross income original issue discount on an economic accrual basis generally  
in advance of the receipt of the cash attributable to such income. Information  
with respect to the accrual of OID on Regular Certificates will be reported     
annually (or more often, if required) by the Trustee to the Internal Revenue    
Service (the "Service") and will also be provided, at such times and in the     
manner required by the Service, to owners of such Regular Certificates, and     
relevant brokers and middlemen.                                                 

Under current law, it is not entirely clear the manner in which income
should be accrued on regular interest Certificates, such as the Class SA-5,     
Class SA-X, Class A-6 and Class A-X Certificates, the payments on which consist 
solely of interest on a notional principal amount. The most reasonable method is
to treat all of the income derived from such Certificates as constituting OID.  
This is the position that will be taken by REMIC II. Among other possibilities, 
the Service could assert that these Classes of Certificates should instead be   
taxable under certain Treasury regulation provisions governing bonds issued with
contingent payments.                                                            

  If actual prepayments on the Mortgage Loans were to differ significantly
from the 300% BPA, the calculation of OID for certain Classes of Offered        
Certificates might produce a negative amount of OID for certain accrual periods 
("Negative OID"). In such event, Certificateholders of any Classes of           
Certificates giving rise to Negative OID likely will not be entitled to a       
deduction for the Negative OID amount, but instead will be required to carry    
such amount forward as an offset to OID, if any, accruing in future periods.    

Certain Classes of Certificates may be treated for federal income tax 
purposes as having been issued at a premium. Holders should consult their tax   
advisors regarding the possibility of making an election to amortize any such   
premium. See "Certain Federal Income Tax Consequences -- REMIC -- Regular
Certificates -- Premium" in the Prospectus.                                     

  For further information regarding the federal income tax consequences of
investing in the Certificates, see "Certain Federal Income Tax Consequences --  
REMIC -- Regular Certificates" in the Prospectus.                               

S-80

P-->424B386th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 86th
NEW WITHHOLDING REGULATIONS                                                     

    The Treasury Department has issued new regulations (the "New Regulations")
which make certain modifications to the withholding, backup withholding and     
information reporting rules described in the Prospectus. The New Regulations    
attempt to unify certification requirements and modify reliance standards. The  
New Regulations will be effective for payments made after December 31, 1998,    
subject to certain transition rules. Prospective investors are urged to consult 
their tax advisors regarding the New Regulations.                               

SPECIAL TAX CONSIDERATIONS APPLICABLE TO THE CLASS R-I AND CLASS R-II           
CERTIFICATES                                                                    

    The Class R Certificateholders likely will be required to report an amount
of taxable income (including excess inclusions, which generally may not be      
offset with any other losses of the Holder) in earlier accrual periods in       
respect of their Class R Certificates significantly in excess of cash           
distributions received on such Certificates for such periods. In addition, the  
inclusion of taxable income in respect of the ownership of Class R Certificates 
during earlier accrual periods and the deferral of corresponding tax losses or  
deductions on these Certificates until later accrual periods or until the       
ultimate sale or disposition of a Class R Certificate (or possibly even later   
pursuant to the application of the "wash sale" rules under Section 1091 of the  
Code) may cause the present value of a Class R Certificateholder's resulting tax
liabilities attributable to the ownership of a Class R Certificate to           
substantially exceed the sum of any tax benefits and any cash distributions on  
the Class R Certificate over its life.                                          

   Moreover, as discussed above and in the Prospectus, the rules for accrual
of original issue discount with respect to certain Classes of Offered           
Certificates (and other REMIC Certificates) are subject to significant          
complexity and uncertainty. Because original issue discount on applicable       
Certificates will be deducted in determining REMIC taxable income, any changes  
required by the Service in the application of the OID rules to such Certificates
may significantly affect the timing of the REMIC's original issue discount      
deductions and therefore the amount of taxable income allocable to Holders of   
Class R Certificates.                                                           

The REMIC Regulations impose certain restrictions on the transfer or  
acquisition of certain residual interests, including the Class R Certificates.  
In addition, the REMIC Regulations contain restrictions that apply to the       
transfer of "noneconomic" residual interest to United States persons.           

     The Pooling and Servicing Agreement generally prohibits the transfer of the
Class R Certificates to non-United States persons (as defined therein).         
Moreover, the REMIC Regulations provide that a transfer to a United States      
person of a "noneconomic" residual interest will be disregarded for all federal 
income tax purposes, and the purported transferor of the "noneconomic" residual 
interest will continue to remain liable for any taxes due with respect to the   
income on such residual interest, unless no significant purpose of the transfer 
was to impede the assessment or collection of tax. It is expected that the Class
R Certificates will constitute noneconomic residual interests at all times.     
Accordingly, any purported transfer of a Class R Certificate to a United States 
person will not be given effect for federal income tax purposes, and the        
purported transferor will remain liable for any taxes due with respect to the   
income on the Class R Certificate, unless no significant purpose of such a      
transfer is to impede the assessment or collection of tax. See also "Certain
Federal Income Tax Consequences -- REMIC -- Tax-Related Restrictions on
Transfers of Residual Certificates" in the Prospectus.                          

The SBJPA modified the rules for determining the effect of excess     
inclusions on the alternative minimum taxable income ("AMTI") of a residual     
interest Holder. Under these rules, in general, the AMTI of a residual interest 
Holder is determined without regard to the special REMIC rule that taxable      
income of a Holder of a residual interest for a taxable year cannot be less than
such Holder's excess inclusions for the year. In addition, the alternative      
minimum tax rules provide that a residual Holder's AMTI for a taxable year      
cannot be less than the Holder's excess inclusions for the year. Also, these    
rules provide that the amount of any alternative minimum tax net operating loss 
must be computed without regard to any excess inclusions. Purchasers of Class R 
Certificates are encouraged to consult their tax advisors with respect to the   
application of the alternative minimum tax to the purchase, ownership, and      
disposition of Class R Certificates.                                            

S-81

P-->424B387th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 87th

The Servicing Fees and Trustee Fees, and other administrative expenses
properly allocable to a REMIC will be allocated for federal income tax          
information reporting purposes entirely to the respective Class R Certificate.  
An individual, trust or estate that holds (whether directly or indirectly       
through certain pass-through entities) an interest in a Class R Certificate may 
be subject to certain limitations on the deductibility of these fees and        
expenses in computing such Certificateholder's regular tax liability. Moreover, 
such fees or expenses will not be deductible to any extent in computing such    
Certificateholder's alternative minimum tax liability. See "Certain Federal
Income Tax Consequences -- Residual Certificates" and "-- Taxation of the REMIC 
-- Net Losses of the REMIC" in the Prospectus.                                  

     PURCHASERS OF CLASS R CERTIFICATES ARE STRONGLY ENCOURAGED TO CONSULT THEIR
TAX ADVISORS AS TO THE ECONOMIC, TAX AND OTHER LEGAL CONSEQUENCES OF AN         
INVESTMENT IN THESE CERTIFICATES.                                               

  For further information regarding the federal income tax consequences of
investing in the Class R Certificates, see "Certain Federal Income Tax
Consequences -- Residual Certificates" and "-- Taxation of the REMIC" in the    
Prospectus. For further information regarding the federal income tax            
consequences of investing in the Certificates, see "Certain Federal Income Tax
Consequences" in the Prospectus.                                                

STATE, LOCAL AND OTHER TAXES

     The foregoing does not address any aspect of state, local, foreign or other
tax consequences to an investor from the purchase, ownership or disposition of a
Certificate, and the Depositor makes no representation in this regard. All      
investors should consult their tax advisors regarding the particular federal,   
state, local, foreign or other tax consequences to them from the purchase,      
ownership and disposition of the Certificates.                                  

ERISA CONSIDERATIONS

GENERAL 

    The Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended ("ERISA"),
imposes certain restrictions on employee benefit plans subject to ERISA ("ERISA 
Plans") and on persons who have certain specified relationships with respect to 
such Plans. Certain employee benefit plans, such as governmental plans (as      
defined in Section 3(32) of ERISA) and church plans (as defined in Section 3(33)
of ERISA, provided no election has been made under Section 410(b) of the Code), 
are not subject to ERISA, and assets of such plans may be invested in the       
Certificates without regard to the mandatory application of the ERISA           
restrictions described below, but may be subject to restrictions imposed under  
other applicable federal and state law. However, any such governmental or church
plan which is qualified under Section 401(a) of the Code and exempt from        
taxation under Section 501(a) of the Code is subject to the prohibited          
transaction rules set forth in Section 503(b) of the Code.                      

INVESTMENTS BY ERISA PLANS ARE SUBJECT TO ERISA AND ERISA'S GENERAL   
FIDUCIARY REQUIREMENTS. ACCORDINGLY, BEFORE INVESTING IN AN OFFERED CERTIFICATE,
AN ERISA PLAN FIDUCIARY SHOULD DETERMINE WHETHER SUCH AN INVESTMENT IS PERMITTED
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE DOCUMENTS GOVERNING THE ERISA PLAN AND IS PRUDENT FOR THE
ERISA PLAN IN VIEW OF ITS OVERALL INVESTMENT POLICY AND THE COMPOSITION AND     
DIVERSIFICATION OF ITS PORTFOLIO AND IS OTHERWISE CONSISTENT WITH THE           
REQUIREMENTS OF ERISA.                                                          

PROHIBITED TRANSACTIONS 

   In addition to imposing general fiduciary standards, provisions of ERISA,
and the corresponding provisions of the Code, prohibit a broad range of         
transactions involving assets of ERISA Plans, individual retirement accounts,   
Keogh plans covering only a sole proprietor or partners (collectively, the      
"Plans") and persons having certain specified relationships to such a Plan      
("parties in interest" and "disqualified persons"). Such transactions are       
treated as "prohibited transactions" under Sections 406 and 407 of ERISA and    
excise                                                                          

S-82

P-->424B388th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 88th

taxes are imposed on such persons under Section 4975 of the Code (and, in some  
cases, a civil penalty may be assessed pursuant to Section 502 (i) of ERISA)    
unless a statutory or administrative exemption applies to the transaction.      

  The Department of Labor ("DOL") has issued a final regulation (29 C.F.R.
Section 2510.3-101) concerning the definition of what constitutes the assets of 
a Plan. This regulation provides that, as a general rule, the underlying assets 
and properties of corporations, partnerships, trusts, and certain other entities
in which a Plan makes an "equity investment" will be deemed for purposes of     
ERISA to be assets of the investing Plan unless certain exceptions apply.       

 Under the terms of the regulation, the Trust Fund may be deemed to hold
plan assets by reason of a Plan's investment in an Offered Certificate, and such
plan assets would include an undivided interest in the Mortgage Loans and any   
other assets held by the Trust Fund. In such an event, the Seller, Servicer,    
Trustee, and other persons or affiliates, might be considered parties in        
interest or disqualified persons with respect to a Plan, subject to the         
fiduciary responsibility provisions of ERISA, including the prohibited          
transaction provisions of Section 406 of ERISA (and of Section 4975 of the      
Code), with respect to transactions involving the assets of the Trust Fund      
unless a statutory or administrative exemption is available.                    

     The regulation provides that the underlying assets of an entity will not be
considered plan assets if the aggregate equity participation in the entity by   
Plans is not "significant" (i.e., less than 25% of the value of each class of   
equity interest is held in the aggregate by "benefit plan investors," which     
includes Plans and certain other employee benefit plans not subject to ERISA).  
Plan investors should be aware, however, that the Pooling and Servicing         
Agreement contains no restrictions on the ownership of Class SA or Class A      
Certificates by benefit plan investors.                                         

Whether or not a Plan's assets would be deemed to include an undivided
ownership interest in the Mortgage Loans and any other assets held by the Trust 
Fund, the DOL has issued an administrative exemption, Prohibited Transaction    
Class Exemption 83-1 (48 Fed. Reg. 895, January 7, 1983) ("PTE 83-1") which     
exempts from the application of the prohibited transaction rules certain        
transactions relating to (1) the creation, maintenance, and termination of      
certain residential mortgage pool investment trusts, (2) the acquisition and    
holding of certain residential mortgage pool pass-through certificates, and (3) 
the servicing, operation, and management of such residential mortgage pool      
investment trusts; provided that the general conditions and certain other       
conditions set forth in PTE 83-1 are satisfied. Although the Seller believes    
that the certificates and the residential mortgage pool investment trust        
described in PTE 83-1 would include the Class SA and Class A Certificates and   
the Trust Fund, respectively, there can be no assurances that the exemptive     
relief of PTE 83-1 will apply or if it applies, will protect a Plan investor    
from the unfavorable application of the prohibited transaction rules of ERISA   
and the Code.                                                                   

REVIEW BY PLAN FIDUCIARIES                                                      

    Any Plan fiduciary considering whether to purchase any Class SA or Class A
Certificates on behalf of a Plan should consult with its counsel regarding the  
applicability of the fiduciary responsibility and prohibited transaction        
provisions of ERISA and the Code to such investment. Among other things, before 
purchasing any Class SA or Class A Certificates, a fiduciary of a Plan subject  
to the fiduciary responsibility provisions of ERISA or an employee benefit plan 
subject to the prohibited transaction provisions of the Code should make its own
determination as to the availability of the exemptive relief provided in PTE    
83-1, and also consider the availability of any other prohibited transaction    
exemptions. THERE CAN BE NO ASSURANCE THAT ANY EXEMPTION FROM THE UNFAVORABLE   
APPLICATION OF THE PROHIBITED TRANSACTION RULES WILL BE AVAILABLE TO A PLAN     
INVESTOR.                                                                       

EXEMPTION 

   The DOL has granted to First Union Corporation, the parent of First Union
Capital Markets ("FCM"), an administrative exemption (the "Exemption") from     
certain of the prohibited transaction provisions of Sections 406(a) and (b) and 
407(a) of ERISA, and the excise taxes imposed on such prohibited transactions   
pursuant to Sections 4975(a) and (b) of the Code with respect to the initial    
purchase, the holding and the                                                   
S-83

P-->424B389th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 89th

subsequent resale by Plans of certificates representing interests in            
asset-backed pass-through trusts that consist of certain receivables, loans, and
other obligations that meet the conditions and requirements of the Exemption.   
The receivables covered by the Exemption apply to mortgage loans such as the    
Mortgage Loans in the Trust Fund. The Exemption will apply to the acquisition,  
holding and resale of the Class SA and Class A Certificates, underwritten by an 
"Underwriter," as hereinafter defined, provided that certain conditions set     
forth in the Exemption application are satisfied. For purposes of this          
discussion, the term "Underwriter" shall include (a) FCM and DLJ, (b) any person
directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controlling,        
controlled by, or under common control with FCM or DLJ and (c) any member of the
underwriting syndicate or selling group of which FCM or DLJ or a person         
described in (b) is a manager or co-manager with respect to the Class SA and    
Class A Certificates.                                                           

     The Exemption sets forth six general conditions which must be satisfied for
a transaction involving the purchase, sale, and holding of the Class SA and     
Class A Certificates to be eligible for exemptive relief under the Exemption.   
First, the acquisition of the Class SA and Class A Certificates by a Plan must  
be on terms that are at least as favorable to the Plan as they would be in an   
arm's length transaction with an unrelated party. Second, the rights and        
interests evidenced by the Class SA and Class A Certificates must not be        
subordinated to the rights and interests evidenced by the other certificates of 
the same trust. Third, the Class SA and Class A Certificates at the time of     
acquisition by the Plan must be rated in one of the three highest generic rating
categories by S&P, Moody's Investors Service, Inc., DCR or Fitch Investors      
Service, Inc. Fourth, the Trustee cannot be an affiliate of any other member of 
the "restricted group," which consists of any Underwriter, the Depositor, the   
Servicer, any subservicer, the Trustee, the provider of any credit enhancement, 
any borrower with respect to Mortgage Loans constituting more than 5% of the    
Initial Cut-Off Date Aggregate Loan Balance and their affiliates. Fifth, the sum
of all payments made to and retained by the Underwriter must represent not more 
than reasonable compensation for underwriting or placing the Class SA and Class 
A Certificates; the sum of all payments made to and retained by the Depositor   
pursuant to the assignment of the Mortgage Loans to the Trust Fund must         
represent not more than the fair market value of such Mortgage Loans; and the   
sum of all payments made to and retained by the Servicer and any subservicer    
must represent not more than reasonable compensation for such person's services 
under the Pooling and Servicing Agreement and reimbursement of such person's    
reasonable expenses in connection therewith. Sixth, the investing Plan must be  
an accredited investor as defined in Rule 501(a)(1) of Regulation D of the      
Securities and Exchange Commission under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.

   Because the Class SA and Class A Certificates are not subordinated to any
other Class of Certificates, the second general condition set forth above is    
satisfied with respect to the Class SA and Class A Certificates. It is a        
condition of the issuance of the Class SA and Class A Certificates that they be 
rated not lower than "AAA" by S&P and DCR; thus, the third general condition set
forth above is satisfied with respect to the Class SA and Class A Certificates  
as of the Closing Date. In addition, the fourth general condition set forth     
above concerning the Trustee not being an affiliate of any other member of the  
restricted group is also satisfied as of the Closing Date. A fiduciary of a Plan
contemplating purchasing a Class SA and Class A Certificate in the secondary    
market must make its own determination that, at the time of such purchase, the  
Class SA and Class A Certificates continue to satisfy the third and fourth      
general conditions set forth above. A fiduciary of a Plan contemplating any     
purchase of a Class SA or Class A Certificate must make its own determination   
that the first, fifth and sixth general conditions set forth above will be      
satisfied with respect to such Class SA or Class A Certificate as of the date of
such purchase.                                                                  

   Employee benefit plans that are governmental plans (as defined in Section
3(32) of ERISA) and church plans (as defined in Section 3(33) of ERISA, provided
no election has been made under Section 410(b) of the Code) are not subject to  
ERISA requirements. Accordingly, assets of such plans may be invested in the    
Class SA or Class A Certificates without regard to the mandatory application of 
the ERISA restrictions described above, including the duty of care and          
prohibited transaction restrictions subject to applicable provisions of other   
federal and state laws.                                                         

 Any Plan fiduciary who proposes to cause a Plan to purchase Class SA or
Class A Certificates should consult with its own counsel with respect to the    
potential consequences under ERISA and the Code of the Plan's acquisition and   
ownership of Class SA or Class A Certificates. Assets of a Plan or individual   
retirement                                                                      
S-84

P-->424B390th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 90th

account should not be invested in the Class SA or Class A Certificates unless it
is clear that the assets of the Trust Fund will not be plan assets or unless it 
is clear that the Exemption or another prohibited transaction exemption will    
apply and exempt all potential prohibited transactions.                         

USE OF PROCEEDS 

   Substantially all of the net proceeds to be received from the sale of the
Offered Certificates will be applied by the Depositor to the purchase price of  
the Mortgage Loans and expenses connected with pooling the Mortgage Loans and   
issuing the Certificates, including funding the Pre-Funding Account and the     
Capitalized Interest Account.                                                   

LEGAL INVESTMENT CONSIDERATIONS 

The Offered Certificates (other than the Class B-1 and Class B-2      
Certificates) will constitute "mortgage related securities" for purposes of the 
Secondary Mortgage Market Enhancement Act of 1984 ("SMMEA") so long as they are 
rated in one of the two highest rating categories by at least one nationally    
recognized statistical rating organization. As such, the Offered Certificates   
(other than the Class B-1 and Class B-2 Certificates) are legal investments for 
certain entities to the extent provided in the SMMEA. The Depositor makes no    
representation as to the ability of particular investors to purchase the Offered
Certificates under applicable legal investment or other restrictions. All       
institutions whose investment activities are subject to legal investment laws   
and regulations, regulatory capital requirements of review by regulatory        
authorities should consult with their own legal advisors in determining whether 
and to what extent the Offered Certificates constitute legal investments for    
them or are subject to investment, capital or other restrictions. It should also
be noted that certain states recently have enacted, or have proposed enacting,  
legislation limiting to varying extents the ability of certain entities (in     
particular insurance companies) to invest in mortgage related securities.       
Investors should consult with their own legal advisors in determining whether   
and to what extent the Offered Certificates constitute legal investments for    
such investors. See "Legal Investment" in the Prospectus.                       

UNDERWRITING

  First Union Capital Markets and DLJ (the "Underwriters") have agreed, on
the terms and conditions of the Underwriting Agreement (the "Underwriting       
Agreement") relating to the Offered Certificates, to purchase all the Offered   
Certificates offered hereby if any Offered Certificates are purchased.          

 The distribution of the Offered Certificates by the Underwriters may be
effected from time to time in one or more negotiated transactions, or otherwise,
at varying prices to be determined, in each case, at the time of sale. This     
Prospectus Supplement and the Prospectus may be used by First Union Capital     
Markets in connection with offers and sales related to market-making            
transactions in the Offered Certificates. First Union Capital Markets may act as
principal or agent in such transactions.                                        

The Underwriters may effect such transactions by selling the Offered  
Certificates to or through dealers, and such dealers may receive compensation in
the form of underwriting discounts, concessions or commissions from the         
Underwriters. In connection with the sale of the Offered Certificates, the      
Underwriters may be deemed to have received compensation from the Depositor in  
the form of underwriting compensation. The Underwriters and any dealers that    
participate with the Underwriters in the distribution of the Offered            
Certificates may be deemed to be underwriters and any commissions received by   
them and any profit on the resale of the Offered Certificates positioned by them
may be deemed to be underwriting discounts and commissions under the Securities 
Act of 1933, as amended.                                                        

The Depositor has agreed to indemnify the Underwriters against certain
liabilities, including liabilities under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.

 Upon receipt of a request by an investor who has received an electronic
Prospectus Supplement and Prospectus from the Underwriters or by such investor's
representative within the period during which there is                          
S-85

P-->424B391st Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 91st

an obligation to deliver a Prospectus Supplement and Prospectus, the applicable 
Underwriter will promptly deliver to such investor a paper copy of the          
Prospectus Supplement and Prospectus.                                           

The Depositor, the Seller and the Servicer are all affiliates of First
Union Capital Markets. The Underwriters or agents and their associates may be   
customers of (including borrowers from), engage in transactions with, and/or    
perform services for the Depositor, its affiliates, and the Trustee in the      
ordinary course of business.                                                    

LEGAL MATTERS 

Certain legal matters with respect to the Offered Certificates will be
passed upon for the Depositor by Kilpatrick Stockton LLP, Charlotte, North      
Carolina. Certain legal matters will be passed upon for the Underwriters by     
Kennedy Covington Lobdell & Hickman, L.L.P., Charlotte, North Carolina.         

CERTIFICATE RATING

It is a condition to the issuance of the Offered Certificates that the
Senior Certificates each be rated "AAA" (except for the Class SA-5, Class SA-X, 
Class A-6 and Class A-X Certificates, which will be rated "AAAr") by Standard & 
Poor's Rating Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc. ("S&P")   
and "AAA" by Duff & Phelps Credit Rating Co. ("DCR"), that the Class M          
Certificates be rated not less than "AA" by DCR, that the Class B-1 Certificates
be rated not less than "A" by DCR, that the Class B-2 Certificates be rated not 
less than "BBB" by DCR, that the Class B-3 Certificates be rated not less than  
"BB" by DCR, and that the Class B-4 Certificates be rated not less than "B" by  
DCR. A security rating is not a recommendation to buy, sell or hold securities  
and may be subject to revision or withdrawal at any time by the assigning Rating
Agency. The ratings assigned to the Offered Certificates address the likelihood 
of the receipt of distributions due on the Offered Certificates according to    
their terms. The ratings take into consideration, among other things, the credit
quality of the Mortgage Loans and the structural and legal aspects associated   
with the Offered Certificates. An adverse change in any of such factors or in   
other factors may be a basis for the downward revision or withdrawal of the     
rating of the Offered Certificates affected by such change. The ratings assigned
to the Offered Certificates do not represent any assessment of the likelihood   
that principal prepayments might differ from those originally anticipated. The  
rating does not address the possibility that the Holders of the Offered         
Certificates might suffer a lower than anticipated yield. There can be no       
assurance as to whether any other rating agency will rate the Offered           
Certificates, or if it does, what rating it will assign to the Offered          
Certificates.                                                                   

S-86

P-->424B392nd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 92nd

INDEX OF PRINCIPAL TERMS

                                                                [Download Table]

                                                              PAGE
                                                              ----
                                                                  
1934 Act....................................................    iv
Aggregate Loan Balance......................................   S-1
Aggregate Subordinate Percentage............................  S-56
AMTI........................................................  S-81
Appraised Values............................................  S-24
Available Distribution Amount...............................  S-66
Available Funds.............................................  S-53
Bankruptcy Coverage.........................................  S-65
Bankruptcy Losses...........................................  S-64
Basic Prepayment Assumption.................................  S-41
BIF.........................................................  S-52
Book-Entry Certificates.....................................  S-21
BPA.........................................................  S-41
Business Day................................................  S-50
Cede........................................................  S-47
Certificate Group...........................................  S-47
Certificate Principal Balance...............................  S-47
Certificate Rate............................................   S-3
Certificateholders..........................................    ii
Certificates................................................     i
Class A Certificates........................................     i
Class A-3 Lockout Liquidation Amount........................  S-61
Class A-3 Lockout Percentage................................  S-61
Class A-3 Lockout Prepayment Percentage.....................  S-61
Class A-3 Lockout Principal Distribution Amount.............  S-60
Class A-3 Step Down Percentage..............................  S-61
Class A-6 Notional Amount...................................     i
Class A-7 Reserve Fund......................................  S-14
Class A-X Notional Amount...................................     i
Class B Certificates........................................     i
Class Notional Amounts......................................  S-57
Class Principal Balance.....................................  S-47
Class R Certificates........................................   S-2
Class SA Certificates.......................................     i
Class SA-4 Lockout Liquidation Amount.......................  S-59
Class SA-4 Lockout Percentage...............................  S-59
Class SA-4 Lockout Prepayment Percentage....................  S-59
Class SA-4 Lockout Principal Distribution Amount............  S-59
Class SA-4 Step Down Percentage.............................  S-59
Class SA-5 Notional Amount..................................     i
Class SA-X Notional Amount..................................     i
Closing Date................................................     i
Code........................................................  S-16
Collection Account..........................................  S-51
Collection Period...........................................   S-1
Compensating Interest.......................................   S-9
Credit Support Depletion Date...............................   S-8
Curtailments................................................  S-10
Cut-Off Date................................................    ii

S-87

P-->424B393rd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 93rd

                                                                [Download Table]

                                                              PAGE
                                                              ----
                                                                  
Cut-Off Date Aggregate Loan Balance.........................    ii
Cut-Off Date Loan Balance...................................   S-1
DCR.........................................................    iv
Debt Service Reduction......................................  S-64
Defective Mortgage Loans....................................  S-51
Deficient Valuation.........................................  S-64
Definitive Certificates.....................................  S-49
Depositor...................................................    ii
Determination Date..........................................  S-66
Distribution Account........................................  S-52
Distribution Date...........................................   S-7
DLJ.........................................................     i
Document Custodian..........................................    ii
DOL.........................................................  S-83
DTC.........................................................  S-18
DTC Participants............................................  S-48
Due Date....................................................  S-36
Eligible Account............................................  S-51
Eligible Substitute Mortgage Loan...........................  S-51
ERISA.......................................................  S-16
ERISA Plan..................................................  S-16
Events of Default...........................................  S-72
Excess Liquidation Proceeds.................................  S-67
Exemption...................................................  S-83
FCM.........................................................  S-83
First Union.................................................   S-1
First Union Capital Markets.................................     i
Foreclosure Profit..........................................  S-70
Fraud Coverage..............................................  S-65
Fraud Losses................................................  S-64
Funding Period..............................................   S-7
FURST.......................................................   S-1
Group A Available Distribution Amount.......................  S-66
Group A Loans...............................................     i
Group A Mortgage Loans......................................    ii
Group A Senior Liquidation Amount...........................  S-60
Group A Senior Percentage...................................  S-60
Group A Senior Prepayment Percentage........................  S-62
Group A Senior Principal Distribution Amount................  S-60
Group A Subordinate Amount..................................  S-64
Group A Weighted Average Rate...............................     i
Group SA Available Distribution Amount......................  S-66
Group SA Mortgage Loans.....................................    ii
Group SA Senior Liquidation Amount..........................  S-59
Group SA Senior Percentage..................................  S-59
Group SA Senior Prepayment Percentage.......................  S-62
Group SA Senior Principal Distribution Amount...............  S-59
Group SA Subordinate Amount.................................  S-64
Group SA Weighted Average Rate..............................     i
Holders.....................................................    ii
Indirect DTC Participants...................................  S-48

S-88

P-->424B394th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 94th

                                                                [Download Table]

                                                              PAGE
                                                              ----
                                                                  
Initial Cut-off Date........................................    ii
Initial Cut-off Date Aggregate Loan Balance.................    ii
Initial Mortgage Loans......................................    ii
Insolvency Event............................................  S-72
Insurance Proceeds..........................................  S-70
Junior Subordinate Certificates.............................     i
Liquidated Mortgage Loan....................................  S-59
Liquidation Expenses........................................  S-70
Liquidation Principal.......................................  S-59
Liquidation Proceeds........................................  S-70
Loan Balance................................................   S-1
Loan Group..................................................    ii
Loan Group A................................................    ii
Loan Group SA...............................................    ii
Loan Rate...................................................   S-1
Loan-to-Value Ratio.........................................  S-26
Lockout Certificates........................................  S-68
Modeling Assumptions........................................  S-42
Monthly Advance.............................................  S-52
Mortgage....................................................  S-24
Mortgage Files..............................................  S-49
Mortgage Loan Purchase Agreement............................  S-74
Mortgage Loans..............................................    ii
Mortgage Notes..............................................  S-24
Mortgaged Properties........................................   S-1
Negative OID................................................  S-80
Net Liquidation Proceeds....................................  S-70
Net Loan Rate...............................................     i
New Regulations.............................................  S-81
Nonrecoverable Advance......................................  S-53
Notional Principal Amount...................................  S-57
Offered Certificates........................................     i
OID.........................................................  S-80
OID Regulations.............................................  S-79
Overcollateralized Group....................................  S-56
Payahead....................................................  S-53
Payoffs.....................................................  S-10
Percentage Interest.........................................    iv
Plans.......................................................  S-82
Pooling and Servicing Agreement.............................    ii
Pre-Funding Account.........................................    ii
Pre-Funded Amount...........................................    ii
Prepayments.................................................  S-20
Principal Balance...........................................  S-47
Principal Payment Amount....................................  S-62
Principal Prepayment Amount.................................  S-62
Pro Rata Allocation.........................................  S-64
Prospectus..................................................    ii
PTE 83-1....................................................  S-83
Purchase Price..............................................  S-50
Rating Agencies.............................................    iv

S-89

P-->424B395th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 95th

                                                                [Download Table]

                                                              PAGE
                                                              ----

Regular Certificates........................................  S-76
Regular Interest............................................   iii
Related Documents...........................................  S-49
REMIC.......................................................   iii
REMIC I.....................................................   iii
REMIC II....................................................   iii
REMIC Regulations...........................................  S-79
REO.........................................................  S-70
Residual Certificates.......................................     i
Residual Interest...........................................   iii
Rules.......................................................  S-48
SBJPA.......................................................  S-80
S&P.........................................................    iv
Scheduled Principal Balance.................................  S-58
Security Instrument.........................................  S-75
Seller......................................................    ii
Senior Certificates.........................................     i
Senior Overcollaterized Amount..............................  S-57
Senior Subordinate Certificates.............................     i
Service.....................................................  S-80
Servicer....................................................    ii
Servicing Advance...........................................  S-49
Servicing Fee...............................................  S-15
Servicing Fee Rate..........................................  S-69
SMMEA.......................................................  S-17
Special Hazard Coverage.....................................  S-65
Special Hazard Losses.......................................  S-64
Startup Day.................................................  S-24
Subordinate Certificates....................................     i
Subordination Level.........................................  S-55
Subordinate Liquidation Amount..............................  S-62
Subordinate Percentage......................................  S-62
Subordinate Prepayment Percentage...........................  S-62
Subordinate Principal Distribution Amount...................  S-61
Subordinate Principal Prepayments Distribution Amount.......  S-61
Subsequent Cut-off Date.....................................   S-7
Subsequent Mortgage Loans...................................    ii
Subsequent Transfer Date....................................   S-7
Subservicer.................................................  S-37
Substitution Adjustment Amount..............................  S-50
Successor Servicer..........................................  S-72
Tax Counsel.................................................  S-79
Title V.....................................................  S-78
Transfer Date...............................................   S-7
Trust Fund..................................................    ii
Trustee.....................................................  S-15
Trustee Fee.................................................  S-14
Undercollateralized Group...................................  S-56
Underwriters................................................     i
Underwriting Agreement......................................  S-85
Weighted Average Life.......................................   S-3

S-90

P-->424B396th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 96th

 APPENDIX A

PERCENT OF INITIAL CLASS PRINCIPAL BALANCE
OUTSTANDING AT VARIOUS PERCENTAGES OF THE 
BASIC PREPAYMENT ASSUMPTION 
CLASS SA-1

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

DISTRIBUTION DATE                                             0%   100%  300%  350%  500%
-----------------                                            ----  ----  ----  ----  ----
                                                                                         
Initial.....................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 1999.................................................   98   91    76    72    61 
April, 2000.................................................   96   82    57    51    35 
April, 2001.................................................   94   74    41    34    17 
April, 2002.................................................   92   67    29    21     4 
April, 2003.................................................   89   59    19    12     0 
April, 2004.................................................   87   53    11     5     0 
April, 2005.................................................   84   47     6     0     0 
April, 2006.................................................   80   42     2     0     0 
April, 2007.................................................   77   37     0     0     0 
April, 2008.................................................   73   32     0     0     0 
April, 2009.................................................   69   28     0     0     0 
April, 2010.................................................   65   24     0     0     0 
April, 2011.................................................   60   20     0     0     0 
April, 2012.................................................   55   17     0     0     0 
April, 2013.................................................   50   13     0     0     0 
April, 2014.................................................   44   10     0     0     0 
April, 2015.................................................   37    7     0     0     0 
April, 2016.................................................   30    4     0     0     0 
April, 2017.................................................   23    1     0     0     0 
April, 2018.................................................   14    0     0     0     0 
April, 2019.................................................    8    0     0     0     0 
April, 2020.................................................    1    0     0     0     0 
April, 2021.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
April, 2022.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
April, 2023.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
April, 2024.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
April, 2025.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
April, 2026.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
April, 2027.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
April, 2028.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
Weighted Average Life (Years)(1)............................ 13.8  7.6   2.9   2.5   1.7 

(1) The weighted average life of any Class of Certificates is determined by (i) 
   multiplying the amount of each assumed principal distribution on such Class
of Certificates by the number of years from the date of issuance of the 
    Certificates to the related Distribution Date, (ii) summing the results, and
   (iii) dividing the sum by the total amount of principal distributed on such
Class of Certificates.                                                  

 A-1

P-->424B397th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 97th
CLASS SA-2

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

DISTRIBUTION DATE                                             0%   100%  300%  350%  500%
-----------------                                            ----  ----  ----  ----  ----
                                                                                         
Initial.....................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 1999.................................................   98   91    76    72    61 
April, 2000.................................................   96   82    57    51    35 
April, 2001.................................................   94   74    41    34    17 
April, 2002.................................................   92   67    29    21     4 
April, 2003.................................................   89   59    19    12     0 
April, 2004.................................................   87   53    11     5     0 
April, 2005.................................................   84   47     6     0     0 
April, 2006.................................................   80   42     2     0     0 
April, 2007.................................................   77   37     0     0     0 
April, 2008.................................................   73   32     0     0     0 
April, 2009.................................................   69   28     0     0     0 
April, 2010.................................................   65   24     0     0     0 
April, 2011.................................................   60   20     0     0     0 
April, 2012.................................................   55   17     0     0     0 
April, 2013.................................................   50   13     0     0     0 
April, 2014.................................................   44   10     0     0     0 
April, 2015.................................................   37    7     0     0     0 
April, 2016.................................................   30    4     0     0     0 
April, 2017.................................................   23    1     0     0     0 
April, 2018.................................................   14    0     0     0     0 
April, 2019.................................................    8    0     0     0     0 
April, 2020.................................................    1    0     0     0     0 
April, 2021.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
April, 2022.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
April, 2023.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
April, 2024.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
April, 2025.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
April, 2026.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
April, 2027.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
April, 2028.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
Weighted Average Life (Years)(1)............................ 13.8  7.6   2.9   2.5   1.7 

(1) The weighted average life of any Class of Certificates is determined by (i) 
   multiplying the amount of each assumed principal distribution on such Class
of Certificates by the number of years from the date of issuance of the 
    Certificates to the related Distribution Date, (ii) summing the results, and
   (iii) dividing the sum by the total amount of principal distributed on such
Class of Certificates.                                                  

 A-2

P-->424B398th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 98th
CLASS SA-3

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

DISTRIBUTION DATE                                             0%   100%  300%  350%  500%
-----------------                                            ----  ----  ----  ----  ----
                                                                                         
Initial.....................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 1999.................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 2000.................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 2001.................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 2002.................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 2003.................................................  100  100   100   100    45 
April, 2004.................................................  100  100   100   100     0 
April, 2005.................................................  100  100   100   100     0 
April, 2006.................................................  100  100   100    68     0 
April, 2007.................................................  100  100   100    47     0 
April, 2008.................................................  100  100    79    35     0 
April, 2009.................................................  100  100    61    26     0 
April, 2010.................................................  100  100    48    20     0 
April, 2011.................................................  100  100    36    15     0 
April, 2012.................................................  100  100    28    11     0 
April, 2013.................................................  100  100    21     8     0 
April, 2014.................................................  100  100    15     5     0 
April, 2015.................................................  100  100    11     4     0 
April, 2016.................................................  100  100     7     2     0 
April, 2017.................................................  100  100     5     2     0 
April, 2018.................................................  100   78     3     1     0 
April, 2019.................................................  100   51     2     0     0 
April, 2020.................................................  100   27     1     0     0 
April, 2021.................................................   50   11     0     0     0 
April, 2022.................................................   23    5     0     0     0 
April, 2023.................................................    7    1     0     0     0 
April, 2024.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
April, 2025.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
April, 2026.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
April, 2027.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
April, 2028.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
Weighted Average Life (Years)(1)............................ 23.3  21.3  12.7  10.0  5.0 

(1) The weighted average life of any Class of Certificates is determined by (i) 
   multiplying the amount of each assumed principal distribution on such Class
of Certificates by the number of years from the date of issuance of the 
    Certificates to the related Distribution Date, (ii) summing the results, and
   (iii) dividing the sum by the total amount of principal distributed on such
Class of Certificates.                                                  

 A-3

P-->424B399th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 99th
CLASS SA-4

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

DISTRIBUTION DATE                                             0%   100%  300%  350%  500%
-----------------                                            ----  ----  ----  ----  ----
                                                                                         
Initial.....................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 1999.................................................   98   98    98    98    98 
April, 2000.................................................   96   96    96    96    96 
April, 2001.................................................   94   94    94    94    94 
April, 2002.................................................   92   92    92    92    92 
April, 2003.................................................   90   90    90    90    90 
April, 2004.................................................   88   86    82    82    72 
April, 2005.................................................   85   81    74    72    43 
April, 2006.................................................   82   76    63    60    26 
April, 2007.................................................   79   69    52    48    16 
April, 2008.................................................   75   62    41    36    11 
April, 2009.................................................   71   55    32    27     7 
April, 2010.................................................   67   49    25    20     5 
April, 2011.................................................   63   43    19    15     3 
April, 2012.................................................   58   38    14    11     2 
April, 2013.................................................   53   32    11     8     1 
April, 2014.................................................   48   27     8     6     1 
April, 2015.................................................   41   22     6     4     0 
April, 2016.................................................   35   18     4     3     0 
April, 2017.................................................   28   13     3     2     0 
April, 2018.................................................   20    9     2     1     0 
April, 2019.................................................   14    6     1     1     0 
April, 2020.................................................    8    3     0     0     0 
April, 2021.................................................    3    1     0     0     0 
April, 2022.................................................    2    1     0     0     0 
April, 2023.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
April, 2024.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
April, 2025.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
April, 2026.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
April, 2027.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
April, 2028.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
Weighted Average Life (Years)(1)............................ 14.5  12.2  9.6   9.2   7.1 

(1) The weighted average life of any Class of Certificates is determined by (i) 
   multiplying the amount of each assumed principal distribution on such Class
of Certificates by the number of years from the date of issuance of the 
    Certificates to the related Distribution Date, (ii) summing the results, and
   (iii) dividing the sum by the total amount of principal distributed on such
Class of Certificates.                                                  

 A-4

P-->424B3100th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 100th
CLASS A-1 

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

DISTRIBUTION DATE                                             0%   100%  300%  350%  500%
-----------------                                            ----  ----  ----  ----  ----
                                                                                         
Initial.....................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 1999.................................................   99   95    86    84    78 
April, 2000.................................................   97   86    66    61    47 
April, 2001.................................................   96   77    45    38    18 
April, 2002.................................................   94   68    27    19     0 
April, 2003.................................................   92   60    13     4     0 
April, 2004.................................................   90   53     3     0     0 
April, 2005.................................................   89   46     0     0     0 
April, 2006.................................................   86   40     0     0     0 
April, 2007.................................................   84   35     0     0     0 
April, 2008.................................................   82   30     0     0     0 
April, 2009.................................................   79   25     0     0     0 
April, 2010.................................................   76   21     0     0     0 
April, 2011.................................................   73   16     0     0     0 
April, 2012.................................................   70   13     0     0     0 
April, 2013.................................................   67    9     0     0     0 
April, 2014.................................................   63    5     0     0     0 
April, 2015.................................................   59    2     0     0     0 
April, 2016.................................................   54    0     0     0     0 
April, 2017.................................................   49    0     0     0     0 
April, 2018.................................................   44    0     0     0     0 
April, 2019.................................................   38    0     0     0     0 
April, 2020.................................................   32    0     0     0     0 
April, 2021.................................................   25    0     0     0     0 
April, 2022.................................................   18    0     0     0     0 
April, 2023.................................................   10    0     0     0     0 
April, 2024.................................................    2    0     0     0     0 
April, 2025.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
April, 2026.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
April, 2027.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
April, 2028.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
Weighted Average Life (Years)(1)............................ 17.2  7.3   2.9   2.6   2.0 

(1) The weighted average life of any Class of Certificates is determined by (i) 
   multiplying the amount of each assumed principal distribution on such Class
of Certificates by the number of years from the date of issuance of the 
    Certificates to the related Distribution Date, (ii) summing the results, and
   (iii) dividing the sum by the total amount of principal distributed on such
Class of Certificates.                                                  

 A-5

P-->424B3101st Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 101st
CLASS A-2 

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

DISTRIBUTION DATE                                             0%   100%  300%  350%  500%
-----------------                                            ----  ----  ----  ----  ----
                                                                                         
Initial.....................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 1999.................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 2000.................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 2001.................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 2002.................................................  100  100   100   100    88 
April, 2003.................................................  100  100   100   100     0 
April, 2004.................................................  100  100   100    65     0 
April, 2005.................................................  100  100    69    18     0 
April, 2006.................................................  100  100    33     0     0 
April, 2007.................................................  100  100     8     0     0 
April, 2008.................................................  100  100     0     0     0 
April, 2009.................................................  100  100     0     0     0 
April, 2010.................................................  100  100     0     0     0 
April, 2011.................................................  100  100     0     0     0 
April, 2012.................................................  100  100     0     0     0 
April, 2013.................................................  100  100     0     0     0 
April, 2014.................................................  100  100     0     0     0 
April, 2015.................................................  100  100     0     0     0 
April, 2016.................................................  100   92     0     0     0 
April, 2017.................................................  100   73     0     0     0 
April, 2018.................................................  100   54     0     0     0 
April, 2019.................................................  100   36     0     0     0 
April, 2020.................................................  100   19     0     0     0 
April, 2021.................................................  100    3     0     0     0 
April, 2022.................................................  100    0     0     0     0 
April, 2023.................................................  100    0     0     0     0 
April, 2024.................................................  100    0     0     0     0 
April, 2025.................................................   53    0     0     0     0 
April, 2026.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
April, 2027.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
April, 2028.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
Weighted Average Life (Years)(1)............................ 27.1  20.3  7.6   6.4   4.4 

(1) The weighted average life of any Class of Certificates is determined by (i) 
   multiplying the amount of each assumed principal distribution on such Class
of Certificates by the number of years from the date of issuance of the 
    Certificates to the related Distribution Date, (ii) summing the results, and
   (iii) dividing the sum by the total amount of principal distributed on such
Class of Certificates.                                                  

 A-6

P-->424B3102nd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 102nd
CLASS A-3 

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

DISTRIBUTION DATE                                             0%   100%  300%  350%  500%
-----------------                                            ----  ----  ----  ----  ----
                                                                                         
Initial.....................................................  100   100   100   100  100 
April, 1999.................................................  100   100   100   100  100 
April, 2000.................................................  100   100   100   100  100 
April, 2001.................................................  100   100   100   100  100 
April, 2002.................................................  100   100   100   100  100 
April, 2003.................................................  100   100   100   100  100 
April, 2004.................................................   99    97    93    92   89 
April, 2005.................................................   97    93    84    82   71 
April, 2006.................................................   95    88    74    70   45 
April, 2007.................................................   93    82    62    57   30 
April, 2008.................................................   91    75    49    44   20 
April, 2009.................................................   89    69    40    34   14 
April, 2010.................................................   87    63    32    26   10 
April, 2011.................................................   84    58    25    20    6 
April, 2012.................................................   81    53    20    15    4 
April, 2013.................................................   78    48    16    12    3 
April, 2014.................................................   75    43    12     9    2 
April, 2015.................................................   72    38    10     7    1 
April, 2016.................................................   68    34     8     5    1 
April, 2017.................................................   64    30     6     4    1 
April, 2018.................................................   59    26     4     3    0 
April, 2019.................................................   55    23     3     2    0 
April, 2020.................................................   49    19     2     1    0 
April, 2021.................................................   44    16     2     1    0 
April, 2022.................................................   38    13     1     1    0 
April, 2023.................................................   31    10     1     0    0 
April, 2024.................................................   24     7     1     0    0 
April, 2025.................................................   16     5     0     0    0 
April, 2026.................................................    9     3     0     0    0 
April, 2027.................................................    3     1     0     0    0 
April, 2028.................................................    0     0     0     0    0 
Weighted Average Life (Years)(1)............................ 20.6  15.5  11.0  10.4  8.5 

(1) The weighted average life of any Class of Certificates is determined by (i) 
   multiplying the amount of each assumed principal distribution on such Class
of Certificates by the number of years from the date of issuance of the 
    Certificates to the related Distribution Date, (ii) summing the results, and
   (iii) dividing the sum by the total amount of principal distributed on such
Class of Certificates.                                                  

 A-7

P-->424B3103rd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 103rd
CLASS A-4 

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

DISTRIBUTION DATE                                             0%   100%  300%  350%  500%
-----------------                                            ----  ----  ----  ----  ----
                                                                                         
Initial.....................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 1999.................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 2000.................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 2001.................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 2002.................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 2003.................................................  100  100   100   100    92 
April, 2004.................................................  100  100   100   100    14 
April, 2005.................................................  100  100   100   100     0 
April, 2006.................................................  100  100   100    81     0 
April, 2007.................................................  100  100   100    52     0 
April, 2008.................................................  100  100    86    35     0 
April, 2009.................................................  100  100    64    22     0 
April, 2010.................................................  100  100    47    12     0 
April, 2011.................................................  100  100    33     4     0 
April, 2012.................................................  100  100    21     0     0 
April, 2013.................................................  100  100    12     0     0 
April, 2014.................................................  100  100     5     0     0 
April, 2015.................................................  100  100     0     0     0 
April, 2016.................................................  100  100     0     0     0 
April, 2017.................................................  100  100     0     0     0 
April, 2018.................................................  100  100     0     0     0 
April, 2019.................................................  100  100     0     0     0 
April, 2020.................................................  100  100     0     0     0 
April, 2021.................................................  100  100     0     0     0 
April, 2022.................................................  100   81     0     0     0 
April, 2023.................................................  100   58     0     0     0 
April, 2024.................................................  100   36     0     0     0 
April, 2025.................................................  100   15     0     0     0 
April, 2026.................................................   94    0     0     0     0 
April, 2027.................................................   12    0     0     0     0 
April, 2028.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
Weighted Average Life (Years)(1)............................ 28.6  25.4  12.2  9.6   5.5 

(1) The weighted average life of any Class of Certificates is determined by (i) 
   multiplying the amount of each assumed principal distribution on such Class
of Certificates by the number of years from the date of issuance of the 
    Certificates to the related Distribution Date, (ii) summing the results, and
   (iii) dividing the sum by the total amount of principal distributed on such
Class of Certificates.                                                  

 A-8

P-->424B3104th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 104th
CLASS A-5 

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

DISTRIBUTION DATE                                             0%   100%  300%  350%  500%
-----------------                                            ----  ----  ----  ----  ----
                                                                                         
Initial.....................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 1999.................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 2000.................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 2001.................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 2002.................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 2003.................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 2004.................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 2005.................................................  100  100   100   100     0 
April, 2006.................................................  100  100   100   100     0 
April, 2007.................................................  100  100   100   100     0 
April, 2008.................................................  100  100   100   100     0 
April, 2009.................................................  100  100   100   100     0 
April, 2010.................................................  100  100   100   100     0 
April, 2011.................................................  100  100   100   100     0 
April, 2012.................................................  100  100   100    89     0 
April, 2013.................................................  100  100   100    68     0 
April, 2014.................................................  100  100   100    51     0 
April, 2015.................................................  100  100    95    39     0 
April, 2016.................................................  100  100    74    29     0 
April, 2017.................................................  100  100    57    22     0 
April, 2018.................................................  100  100    43    16     0 
April, 2019.................................................  100  100    33    12     0 
April, 2020.................................................  100  100    24     8     0 
April, 2021.................................................  100  100    18     6     0 
April, 2022.................................................  100  100    13     4     0 
April, 2023.................................................  100  100     9     3     0 
April, 2024.................................................  100  100     5     2     0 
April, 2025.................................................  100  100     3     1     0 
April, 2026.................................................  100   90     1     0     0 
April, 2027.................................................  100   25     0     0     0 
April, 2028.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
Weighted Average Life (Years)(1)............................ 29.5  28.7  20.3  17.0  6.6 

(1) The weighted average life of any Class of Certificates is determined by (i) 
   multiplying the amount of each assumed principal distribution on such Class
of Certificates by the number of years from the date of issuance of the 
    Certificates to the related Distribution Date, (ii) summing the results, and
   (iii) dividing the sum by the total amount of principal distributed on such
Class of Certificates.                                                  

 A-9

P-->424B3105th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 105th
CLASS A-7 

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

DISTRIBUTION DATE                                             0%   100%  300%  350%  500%
-----------------                                            ----  ----  ----  ----  ----
                                                                                         
Initial.....................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 1999.................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 2000.................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 2001.................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 2002.................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 2003.................................................  100  100   100   100    92 
April, 2004.................................................  100  100   100   100    14 
April, 2005.................................................  100  100   100   100     0 
April, 2006.................................................  100  100   100    81     0 
April, 2007.................................................  100  100   100    52     0 
April, 2008.................................................  100  100    86    35     0 
April, 2009.................................................  100  100    64    22     0 
April, 2010.................................................  100  100    47    12     0 
April, 2011.................................................  100  100    33     4     0 
April, 2012.................................................  100  100    21     0     0 
April, 2013.................................................  100  100    12     0     0 
April, 2014.................................................  100  100     5     0     0 
April, 2015.................................................  100  100     0     0     0 
April, 2016.................................................  100  100     0     0     0 
April, 2017.................................................  100  100     0     0     0 
April, 2018.................................................  100  100     0     0     0 
April, 2019.................................................  100  100     0     0     0 
April, 2020.................................................  100  100     0     0     0 
April, 2021.................................................  100  100     0     0     0 
April, 2022.................................................  100   81     0     0     0 
April, 2023.................................................  100   58     0     0     0 
April, 2024.................................................  100   36     0     0     0 
April, 2025.................................................  100   15     0     0     0 
April, 2026.................................................   94    0     0     0     0 
April, 2027.................................................   12    0     0     0     0 
April, 2028.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
Weighted Average Life (Years)(1)............................ 28.6  25.4  12.2  9.6   5.5 

(1) The weighted average life of any Class of Certificates is determined by (i) 
   multiplying the amount of each assumed principal distribution on such Class
of Certificates by the number of years from the date of issuance of the 
    Certificates to the related Distribution Date, (ii) summing the results, and
   (iii) dividing the sum by the total amount of principal distributed on such
Class of Certificates.                                                  

A-10

P-->424B3106th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 106th
CLASS M, CLASS B-1 AND CLASS B-2

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

DISTRIBUTION DATE                                             0%   100%  300%  350%  500%
-----------------                                            ----  ----  ----  ----  ----
                                                                                         
Initial.....................................................  100  100   100   100   100 
April, 1999.................................................   99   99    99    99    99 
April, 2000.................................................   97   97    97    97    97 
April, 2001.................................................   96   96    96    96    96 
April, 2002.................................................   94   94    94    94    94 
April, 2003.................................................   92   92    92    92    92 
April, 2004.................................................   90   89    85    84    81 
April, 2005.................................................   88   85    77    75    69 
April, 2006.................................................   86   80    67    64    54 
April, 2007.................................................   84   74    55    51    40 
April, 2008.................................................   81   67    44    39    27 
April, 2009.................................................   78   61    35    30    18 
April, 2010.................................................   75   55    27    23    12 
April, 2011.................................................   72   49    21    17     8 
April, 2012.................................................   68   44    17    13     5 
April, 2013.................................................   64   39    13    10     4 
April, 2014.................................................   60   34    10     7     2 
April, 2015.................................................   56   30     8     5     2 
April, 2016.................................................   51   25     6     4     1 
April, 2017.................................................   45   21     4     3     1 
April, 2018.................................................   39   18     3     2     0 
April, 2019.................................................   34   14     2     1     0 
April, 2020.................................................   29   11     1     1     0 
April, 2021.................................................   24    9     1     1     0 
April, 2022.................................................   20    7     1     0     0 
April, 2023.................................................   16    5     0     0     0 
April, 2024.................................................   12    4     0     0     0 
April, 2025.................................................    8    2     0     0     0 
April, 2026.................................................    5    1     0     0     0 
April, 2027.................................................    1    0     0     0     0 
April, 2028.................................................    0    0     0     0     0 
Weighted Average Life (Years)(1)............................ 17.2  13.5  10.1  9.6   8.6 

(1) The weighted average life of any Class of Certificates is determined by (i) 
   multiplying the amount of each assumed principal distribution on such Class
of Certificates by the number of years from the date of issuance of the 
    Certificates to the related Distribution Date, (ii) summing the results, and
   (iii) dividing the sum by the total amount of principal distributed on such
Class of Certificates.                                                  

A-11

P-->424B3107th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 107th

PROSPECTUS 
FIRST UNION RESIDENTIAL SECURITIZATION TRANSACTIONS, INC.,
Depositor 

RESIDENTIAL MORTGAGE PASS-THROUGH CERTIFICATES
(ISSUABLE IN SERIES)

 This Prospectus relates to Residential Mortgage Pass-Through Certificates
(the "Certificates"), which may be sold from time to time in one or more Series 
(each, a "Series") by First Union Residential Securitization Transactions, Inc. 
(the "Depositor") on terms determined at the time of sale and described in this 
Prospectus and the related Prospectus Supplement. The Certificates of a Series  
will evidence interests in a trust fund (a "Trust Fund"). As specified in the   
related Prospectus Supplement, the Trust Fund for a Series of Certificates will 
include certain mortgage related assets (the "Mortgage Assets") consisting of   
(i) promissory notes or other evidences of indebtedness secured by first, second
or more junior liens on fee simple or leasehold interests in one- to four-family
properties, including participations in any of the foregoing ("Mortgage Loans"),
(ii) mortgage pass-through securities (the "Agency Securities") issued or       
guaranteed by the Government National Mortgage Association ("GNMA"), the Federal
National Mortgage Association ("FNMA") or the Federal Home Loan Mortgage        
Corporation ("FHLMC") or (iii) mortgage-backed securities that are not          
guaranteed by GNMA, FNMA or FHLMC ("Private Mortgage-Backed Securities").       
Private Mortgage-Backed Securities will have been previously offered and sold   
pursuant to an effective registration statement under the Securities Act of     
1933. The Mortgage Assets will be acquired by the Depositor from one or more    
institutions (each, a "Seller"), which may be affiliates of the Depositor, and  
conveyed by the Depositor to the related Trust Fund. A Trust Fund also may      
include insurance policies, cash accounts, reserve funds, reinvestment income,  
guaranties, letters of credit or other forms of credit enhancement described    
herein and in the related Prospectus Supplement, or any combination thereof. In 
addition, if so specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, the property of 
the Trust Fund will include monies on deposit in a trust account (the           
"Pre-Funding Account") to be established with the Trustee, which will be used to
purchase at a predetermined price additional Mortgage Assets (the "Subsequent   
Mortgage Assets") from the Depositor from time to time within three months after
the issuance of the Certificates.                                               

Each Series of Certificates will be issued in one or more classes. Each 
class of Certificates of a Series will evidence beneficial ownership of a       
specified percentage (which may be 0%) or portion of future interest payments   
and a specified percentage (which may be 0%) or portion of future principal     
payments on the Mortgage Assets in the related Trust Fund. A Series of          
Certificates may include one or more classes that are senior or subordinate in  
right of payment to one or more other classes of Certificates of such Series.   
One or more classes of Certificates of a Series may be entitled to receive      
principal distributions with disproportionate, nominal or no interest           
distributions or interest distributions with disproportionate, nominal or no    
principal distributions or any combination thereof prior to one or more other   
classes of Certificates of such Series or after the occurrence of specified     
events, in each case as specified in the related Prospectus Supplement.         
Distributions among classes of Certificates in a Series may differ as to timing,
sequential order and priority.                                                  

  THESE SECURITIES HAVE NOT BEEN APPROVED OR DISAPPROVED BY THE SECURITIES
AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION OR ANY STATE SECURITIES COMMISSION NOR HAS THE          
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION OR ANY STATE SECURITIES COMMISSION PASSED    
UPON THE ACCURACY OR ADEQUACY OF THIS PROSPECTUS OR THE RELATED PROSPECTUS      
SUPPLEMENT. ANY REPRESENTATION TO THE CONTRARY IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE.           

    Prior to issuance there will have been no market for the Certificates of any
Series, and there can be no assurance that a secondary market for any           
Certificates will develop or, if it does develop, that it will provide          
Certificateholders with liquidity of investment continue for the life of the    
Certificates. This Prospectus may not be used to consummate sales of a Series of
Certificates unless accompanied by a Prospectus Supplement.                     

Offers of the Certificates may be made through one or more different    
methods, including offerings through underwriters, including First Union Capital
Markets, a division of Wheat First Securities, Inc. ("First Union Capital
Markets") an affiliate of the Depositor, as more fully described under "Method
of Distribution" herein and "Underwriting" in the related Prospectus Supplement.

Distributions to Certificateholders will be made monthly, quarterly,    
semi-annually or at such other intervals and on the dates specified in the      
related Prospectus Supplement. Distributions on the Certificates of a Series    
will be made from the assets of the related Trust Fund or Funds or other assets 
pledged for the benefit of the Certificateholders as specified in the related   
Prospectus Supplement.                                                          

The Certificates of any Series will not represent an obligation of or   
interest in the Depositor or any affiliate thereof, including, without          
limitation, First Union National Bank, and will not be insured or guaranteed by 
any governmental agency or instrumentality or, unless otherwise specified in the
related Prospectus Supplement, by any other person. Unless otherwise specified  
in the related Prospectus Supplement, the only obligations of the Depositor with
respect to a Series of Certificates will be to obtain certain representations   
and warranties from each Seller and to assign to the Trustee for the related    
Series of Certificates the Depositor's rights with respect to such              
representations and warranties. The principal obligations of the Master Servicer
named in the related Prospectus Supplement with respect to the related Series of
Certificates will be limited to obligations pursuant to certain representations 
and warranties and to its contractual servicing obligations, including any      
obligation it may have to advance delinquent payments on the Mortgage Assets in 
the related Trust Fund.                                                         

The yield on each class of Certificates of a Series will be affected by,
among other things, the rate of payment of principal (including prepayments) on 
the Mortgage Assets in the related Trust Fund and the timing of receipt of such 
payments as described herein and in the related Prospectus Supplement. A Trust  
Fund may be subject to early termination under the circumstances described      
herein and in the related Prospectus Supplement.                                

   If specified in a Prospectus Supplement, an election may be made to treat a
Trust Fund or specified portion thereof as one or more "real estate mortgage    
investment conduits" ("REMICs") for federal income tax purposes. See "Certain
Federal Income Tax Consequences."                                               

                                                        (continued on next page)

The date of this Prospectus is April 24, 1998.                                  

P-->424B3108th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 108th
(cover continued from previous page)                                            

   This Prospectus and the related Prospectus Supplements may be used by First
Union Capital Markets in connection with offers and sales related to            
market-making transactions in any Series of the Certificates. First Union       
Capital Markets may act as principal or agent in such transactions. Such sales  
will be made at prices related to prevailing market prices at the time of the   
sale.                                                                           

Until 90 days after the date of each Prospectus Supplement, all dealers 
effecting transactions in the securities covered by such Prospectus Supplement, 
whether or not participating in the distribution thereof, may be required to    
deliver such Prospectus Supplement and this Prospectus. This is in addition to  
the obligation of dealers to deliver a Prospectus and Prospectus Supplement when
acting as underwriters and with respect to their unsold allotments or           
subscriptions.                                                                  

PROSPECTUS SUPPLEMENT 

   The Prospectus Supplement relating to the Certificates of each Series to be
offered hereunder will, among other things, set forth with respect to such      
Certificates, as appropriate: (i) a description of the class or classes of      
Certificates and the related Pass-Through Rate or method of determining the     
amount of interest, if any, to be passed through to each such class; (ii) the   
initial aggregate Certificate Balance (which may be a notional principal amount)
of each class of Certificates included in such Series, Distribution Dates       
relating to such Series and, if applicable, the initial and final scheduled     
Distribution Dates for each class; (iii) information as to the assets comprising
the Trust Fund, including the general characteristics of the Mortgage Assets    
included therein and, if applicable, the insurance, surety bonds, guaranties,   
letters of credit or other instruments or agreements included in the Trust Fund,
and the amount and source of any Reserve Fund; (iv) the circumstances, if any,  
under which the Trust Fund may be subject to early termination; (v) the method  
used to calculate the amount of principal, if any, to be distributed with       
respect to each class of Certificates; (vi) the order of application of         
distributions to each of the classes within such Series, whether sequential, pro
rata, or otherwise; (vii) the Distribution Dates with respect to such Series;   
(viii) additional information with respect to the plan of distribution of such  
Certificates; (ix) whether one or more REMIC elections will be made and         
designation of the regular interests and residual interests; (x) the aggregate  
original percentage ownership interest in the Trust Fund to be evidenced by each
class of Certificates; (xi) information as to the nature and extent of          
subordination with respect to any class of Certificates that is subordinate in  
right of payment to any other class; and (xii) information as to the Seller, the
Master Servicer and the Trustee.                                                

AVAILABLE INFORMATION 

The Depositor has filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the
"Commission") a Registration Statement under the Securities Act of 1933, as     
amended, with respect to the Certificates. This Prospectus, which forms a part  
of the Registration Statement, and the Prospectus Supplement relating to each   
Series of Certificates contains summaries of the material terms of the documents
referred to herein and therein, but do not contain all of the information set   
forth in the Registration Statement pursuant to the Rules and Regulations of the
Commission. For further information, reference is made to such Registration     
Statement and the exhibits thereto. Such Registration Statement and exhibits can
be inspected and copied at prescribed rates at the public reference facilities  
maintained by the Commission at its Public Reference Section, 450 Fifth Street, 
N.W., Washington, D.C. 20549, and at its Regional Offices located as follows:   
Chicago Regional Office, Suite 1400, Citicorp Center, 500 West Madison Street,  
Chicago, Illinois 60661-2511; and New York Regional Office, Suite 1300 Seven    
World Trade Center, New York, New York 10048. Publicly filed information,       
including information regarding the Depositor, is available at the Commission's 
web site at www.sec.gov.                                                        

No person has been authorized to give any information or to make any    
representation other than those contained in this Prospectus and any Prospectus 
Supplement with respect hereto and, if given or made, such information or       
representations must not be relied upon. This Prospectus and any Prospectus     
Supplement with respect hereto do not constitute an offer to sell or a          
solicitation of an offer to buy any securities other than the Certificates      
offered hereby and thereby nor an offer of the Certificates to any person in any
state or other jurisdiction in which such offer would be unlawful. The delivery 
of this Prospectus at any time does not imply that information herein is correct
as of any time subsequent to its date.                                          

REPORTS TO CERTIFICATEHOLDERS 

  Periodic and annual reports concerning the related Trust Fund for a Series
of Certificates are required under the related Agreement to be forwarded to     
Certificateholders. Unless otherwise specified in the related Prospectus        
Supplement, such reports will not be examined and reported on by an independent 
public accountant. See "Description of the Certificates -- Reports to
Certificateholders."

INCORPORATION OF CERTAIN INFORMATION BY REFERENCE 

  There are incorporated herein by reference all documents and reports filed
or caused to be filed by the Depositor with respect to a Trust Fund pursuant to 
Section 13(a), 13(c), 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act, prior to the termination 
of an offering of Certificates evidencing interests therein. Upon request the   
Depositor will provide or cause to be provided without charge to each person to 
whom this Prospectus is delivered in connection with the offering of one or more
classes of Certificates, a list identifying all filings with respect to the     
related Trust Fund pursuant to Section 13(a), 13(c), 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange
Act, since the Depositor's latest fiscal year covered by its annual report on   
Form 10-K and a copy of any or all documents or reports incorporated herein by  
reference, in each case to the extent such documents or reports relate to one or
more of such classes of such Certificates, other than the exhibits to such      
documents (unless such exhibits are specifically incorporated by reference in   
such documents). Requests to the Depositor should be directed to: First Union   
Residential Securitization Transactions, Inc., 301 South College Street,        
Charlotte, North Carolina 28288-0600, telephone number (704) 383-3624.          

                                                        (continued on next page)

(ii)

P-->424B3109th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 109th

SUMMARY OF TERMS

This summary is qualified in its entirety by reference to the detailed
information appearing elsewhere in this Prospectus and in the related Prospectus
Supplement with respect to the Series offered thereby. The Prospectus Supplement
for each Series will specify the extent (if any) to which the terms of such     
Series or the related Trust Fund vary from the general description of the       
Certificates and Trust Funds which is contained in this Prospectus. Capitalized 
terms used herein shall have the respective meanings assigned them in the "Index
to Defined Terms."                                                              

Title of Securities........  Residential Mortgage Pass-Through Certificates (the
                      "Certificates"), issuable in series (each, a
                       "Series"). Each Series will be issued under a
                            separate Pooling and Servicing Agreement (each, an
                         "Agreement") to be entered into with respect to
each such Series.     

Depositor..................  First Union Residential Securitization             
                           Transactions, Inc., a North Carolina corporation.
                          The Depositor is a wholly-owned, limited purpose
                             subsidiary of First Union National Bank ("FUNB"), a
                      national banking association (a wholly-owned
                        subsidiary of First Union Corporation, a North
                    Carolina corporation). Neither First Union
                          Corporation nor any of its affiliates, including
                         the Depositor, has guaranteed, or is or will be
                  otherwise obligated with respect to, the
     Certificates of any Series.

Trustee....................  The trustee (the "Trustee") for each Series of     
                       Certificates will be specified in the related
                     Prospectus Supplement. See "The Pooling and
Servicing Agreement" herein for a description of
               the Trustee's rights and obligations.

Master Servicer............  The entity or entities named as Master Servicer    
                           (the "Master Servicer") in the related Prospectus
                             Supplement, one of which may be an affiliate of the
                   Depositor. See "The Pooling and Servicing
Agreement -- Certain Matters Regarding the Master
Servicer and the Depositor."

Sub-Servicer...............  A "Sub-Servicer" may be specified in the related   
                             Prospectus Supplement, which may be an affiliate of
the Depositor.        

Closing Date...............  The date (the "Closing Date") of initial issuance  
                          of a Series of Certificates, as specified in the
        related Prospectus Supplement.

Trust Fund Assets..........  The Trust Fund for a Series of Certificates will   
                      include certain mortgage related assets (the
                        "Mortgage Assets") consisting of (a) a pool (a
                        "Mortgage Pool") of Mortgage Loans, (b) Agency
                   Securities or (c) Private Mortgage-Backed
                          Securities, together with payments in respect of
                          such Mortgage Assets and certain other accounts,
                    obligations or agreements, in each case as
                            specified in the related Prospectus Supplement. To
                       the extent provided in the related Prospectus
                     Supplement, the Depositor will be obligated
                            (subject only to the availability thereof) to sell
                            at a predetermined price, and the Trust Fund for a
                     Series of Certificates will be obligated to
                          purchase (subject to the satisfaction of certain
                            conditions described in the applicable Agreement),
                     additional Mortgage Assets (the "Subsequent
                            Mortgage Assets") from time to time (as frequently
                             as daily) within three months after the issuance of
                        the Certificates having an aggregate principal
                      balance approximately equal to the amount on
                             deposit in the Pre-Funding Account (the "Pre-Funded
        Amount") on such Closing Date.

A. Single Family Loans.....  Unless otherwise specified in the related          
                       Prospectus Supplement, Mortgage Loans will be
                          secured by first, second or more junior liens on
fee                   

 1

P-->424B3110th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 110th

                  simple or leasehold interests in one- to
                      four-family properties. If so specified, the
                          Mortgage Loans may include cooperative apartment
                         loans ("Cooperative Loans") secured by security
                           interests in shares issued by private, nonprofit,
                           cooperative housing corporations ("Cooperatives")
                            and in the related proprietary leases or occupancy
                        agreements granting exclusive rights to occupy
                       specific dwelling units in such Cooperatives'
                   buildings. If so specified in the related
                           Prospectus Supplement, the Mortgage Assets of the
                 related Trust Fund may include mortgage
                            participation certificates evidencing interests in
                    Mortgage Loans. Such Mortgage Loans may be
                      conventional loans (i.e., loans that are not
                            insured or guaranteed by any governmental agency),
                             insured by the Federal Housing Authority ("FHA") or
               partially guaranteed by the Veterans'
                           Administration ("VA") as specified in the related
                            Prospectus Supplement. If specified in the related
                          Prospectus Supplement, the Mortgage Loans may be
                      comprised of home equity loans ("Home Equity
Loans"). Such Home Equity Loans will be secured by
                            first or second or more junior liens on fee simple
                       or leasehold interests in one- to four-family
        properties. See "Mortgage Loan
Program -- Underwriting Standards." The payment
                         terms of the Mortgage Loans to be included in a
                     Trust Fund will be described in the related
                          Prospectus Supplement and may include any of the
                             following features or combinations thereof or other
                      features described in the related Prospectus
                            Supplement: (a) Interest may be payable at a fixed
                      rate, a rate adjustable from time to time in
                          relation to an index (which will be specified in
                            the related Prospectus Supplement), a rate that is
                     fixed for a period of time or under certain
                        circumstances and is followed by an adjustable
                         rate, a rate that otherwise varies from time to
                     time, or a rate that is convertible from an
                           adjustable rate to a fixed rate or to a different
                            adjustable rate. Changes to an adjustable rate may
                            be subject to periodic limitations, maximum rates,
                             minimum rates or a combination of such limitations.
                           Accrued interest may be deferred and added to the
                             principal of a loan for such periods and under such
                          circumstances as may be specified in the related
                           Prospectus Supplement. Mortgage Loans may provide
                          for the payment of interest at a rate lower than
                             the specified Mortgage Rate for a period of time or
                         for the life of the loan, and the amount of any
                           difference may be contributed from funds supplied
                             by a third party. (b) Principal may be payable on a
                             level debt service basis to fully amortize the loan
                             over its term, may be calculated on the basis of an
                             assumed amortization schedule that is significantly
                            longer than the original term to maturity or on an
                           interest rate that is different from the interest
                           rate on the Mortgage Loan or may not be amortized
                       during all or a portion of the original term.
                        Payment of all or a substantial portion of the
                    principal may be due on maturity ("balloon
                             payments"). Principal may include interest that has
                             been deferred and added to the principal balance of
                    the Mortgage Loan. (c) Monthly payments of
                             principal and interest may be fixed for the life of
                           the loan, may increase over a specified period of
                            time or may change from period to period. Mortgage
                           Loans may include limits on periodic increases or
                             decreases in the amount of monthly payments and may
                       include maximum or minimum amounts of monthly
                           payments. (d) The Mortgage Loans generally may be
                    prepaid at any time without payment of any
                        prepayment fee. If so specified in the related
                             Prospectus Supplement, prepayments of principal may
                            be subject to a prepayment fee, which may be fixed
                       for the life of any such Mortgage Loan or may

 2

P-->424B3111th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 111th

                          decline over time, and may be prohibited for the
                       life of any such Mortgage Loan or for certain
                             periods ("lockout periods"). Certain Mortgage Loans
                        may permit prepayments after expiration of the
                       applicable lockout period and may require the
                            payment of a prepayment fee in connection with any
                          such subsequent prepayment. Other Mortgage Loans
                         may permit prepayments without payment of a fee
                            unless the prepayment occurs during specified time
                     periods. (e) The Mortgage Loans may include
                             "due-on-sale" clauses which permit the mortgagee to
                       demand payment of the entire Mortgage Loan in
                          connection with the sale or certain transfers of
                        the related Mortgaged Property. Other Mortgage
                            Loans may be assumable by persons meeting the then
                          applicable underwriting standards of the Seller.
                         (f) Certain Mortgage Loans may be originated or
                         acquired in connection with employee relocation
                           programs. The real property constituting security
                            for repayment of a Mortgage Loan may be located in
                      any one of the fifty states, the District of
                            Columbia, Guam, Puerto Rico or any other territory
                    of the United States. (g) Unless otherwise
                             specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, all
                           of the Mortgage Loans will be covered by standard
                           hazard insurance policies insuring against losses
                            due to fire and various other causes. The Mortgage
                             Loans will be covered by primary mortgage insurance
                        policies to the extent provided in the related
                             Prospectus Supplement. All Mortgage Loans will have
                             been purchased by the Depositor, either directly or
                         through an affiliate, from one or more Sellers.

B. Agency Securities.......  The Agency Securities evidenced by a Series of     
                   Certificates will consist of (i) mortgage
                             participation certificates issued and guaranteed as
                             to timely payment of interest and, unless otherwise
                         specified in the related Prospectus Supplement,
                           ultimate payment of principal by the Federal Home
                           Loan Mortgage Corporation ("FHLMC Certificates"),
                            (ii) Guaranteed Mortgage Pass-Through Certificates
                       issued and guaranteed as to timely payment of
                        principal and interest by the Federal National
                           Mortgage Association ("FNMA Certificates"), (iii)
                     fully modified pass-through mortgage-backed
                         certificates guaranteed as to timely payment of
                           principal and interest by the Government National
                          Mortgage Association ("GNMA Certificates"), (iv)
                             stripped mortgage-backed securities representing an
                           undivided interest in all or a part of either the
                       principal distributions (but not the interest
                           distributions) or the interest distributions (but
                     not the principal distributions) or in some
                         specified portion of the principal and interest
                           distributions (but not all of such distributions)
                          on certain FHLMC, FNMA or GNMA Certificates and,
                   unless otherwise specified in the related
                       Prospectus Supplement, guaranteed to the same
                          extent as the underlying securities, (v) another
                    type of pass-through certificate issued or
                            guaranteed by GNMA, FNMA or FHLMC and described in
                      the related Prospectus Supplement, or (vi) a
                         combination of such Agency Securities. All GNMA
                           Certificates will be backed by the full faith and
                       credit of the United States. No FHLMC or FNMA
                  Certificates will be backed, directly or
                         indirectly, by the full faith and credit of the
                             United States. The Agency Securities may consist of
                           pass-through securities issued under FHLMC's Cash
                            or Guarantor Program, the GNMA I Program, the GNMA
                        II Program or another program specified in the
            related Prospectus Supplement. The

 3

P-->424B3112th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 112th

                       payment characteristics of the Mortgage Loans
                            underlying the Agency Securities will be described
               in the related Prospectus Supplement.

C. Private Mortgage-Backed                                                      
  Securities..............  Private Mortgage-Backed Securities may include (a)
                         mortgage pass-through certificates representing
                        beneficial interests in a Mortgage Pool or (b)
                        collateralized mortgage obligations secured by
                            Mortgage Loans. Private Mortgage-Backed Securities
                         may include stripped mortgage-backed securities
                             representing an undivided interest in all or a part
                            of either the principal distributions (but not the
                 interest distributions) or the interest
                             distributions (but not the principal distributions)
                           or in some specified portion of the principal and
                     interest distributions (but not all of such
                            distributions) on certain Mortgage Loans. Although
                        individual Mortgage Loans underlying a Private
                    Mortgage-Backed Security may be insured or
                         guaranteed by the United States or an agency or
                            instrumentality thereof, they need not be, and the
                            Private Mortgage-Backed Securities themselves will
                            not be so insured or guaranteed. Private Mortgage-
                             Backed Securities will have been previously offered
                        and sold pursuant to an effective registration
                        statement under the Securities Act of 1933, as
                   amended, or were exempt from registration
                       thereunder. Unless otherwise specified in the
                            related Prospectus Supplement relating to a Series
                  of Certificates, payments on the Private
                        Mortgage-Backed Securities will be distributed
                             directly to the Trustee as registered owner of such
                            Private Mortgage-Backed Securities. See "The Trust
                             Fund -- Private Mortgage-Backed Securities" herein.

Description of the                                                              
Certificates...............  Each Certificate will represent the interest       
                             specified in the related Prospectus Supplement in a
                            Trust Fund created by the Depositor pursuant to an
                            Agreement among the Depositor, the Master Servicer
                     and the Trustee for the related Series. The
                            Certificates of any Series may be issued in one or
                             more classes as specified in the related Prospectus
                          Supplement. A Series of Certificates may include
                    one or more classes of senior Certificates
                           (collectively, the "Senior Certificates") and one
                     or more classes of subordinate Certificates
                          (collectively, the "Subordinated Certificates").
                          Certain Series or classes of Certificates may be
                         covered by insurance policies or other forms of
                       credit enhancement, in each case as described
                          herein and in the related Prospectus Supplement.
                            One or more classes of Certificates of each Series
                      (i) may be entitled to receive distributions
                             allocable only to principal, only to interest or to
                          any combination thereof; (ii) may be entitled to
                      receive distributions only of prepayments of
                            principal throughout the lives of the Certificates
                   or during specified periods; (iii) may be
                            subordinated in the right to receive distributions
                            of scheduled payments of principal, prepayments of
                           principal, interest or any combination thereof to
                           one or more other classes of Certificates of such
                            Series throughout the lives of the Certificates or
                           during specified periods; (iv) may be entitled to
                   receive such distributions only after the
                       occurrence of events specified in the related
                       Prospectus Supplement; (v) may be entitled to
                             receive distributions in accordance with a schedule
                        or formula or on the basis of collections from
                          designated portions of the assets in the related
                         Trust Fund; (vi) as to Certificates entitled to
                     distributions allocable to interest, may be
                           entitled to receive interest at a fixed rate or a
                           rate that is subject to change from time to time;
                  and (vii) as to Certificates entitled to
                     distributions allocable to interest, may be
                         entitled to distributions allocable to interest

 4

P-->424B3113th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 113th

                          only after the occurrence of events specified in
                          the related Prospectus Supplement and may accrue
                           interest until such events occur, in each case as
                             specified in the related Prospectus Supplement. The
                           timing, amounts, sequential order and priority of
                         such distributions may vary among classes, over
                        time, or otherwise as specified in the related
Prospectus Supplement.

Distributions on the                                                            
 Certificates.............  Distributions on the Certificates entitled thereto
                           will be made monthly, quarterly, semi-annually or
                            at such other intervals and on the dates specified
                       in the related Prospectus Supplement (each, a
                           "Distribution Date") out of the payments received
                            in respect of the assets of the related Trust Fund
                        or other assets pledged for the benefit of the
                             Certificates as specified in the related Prospectus
                         Supplement. The amount allocable to payments of
                         principal and interest on any Distribution Date
                        will be determined as specified in the related
                           Prospectus Supplement. Unless otherwise specified
                   in the related Prospectus Supplement, all
                distributions will be made pro rata to
                           Certificateholders of the class entitled thereto.
                   Unless otherwise specified in the related
                       Prospectus Supplement, the aggregate original
                            Certificate Balance of the Certificates will equal
                            the aggregate distributions allocable to principal
                             that such Certificates will be entitled to receive.
                            If specified in the related Prospectus Supplement,
                          the Certificates will have an aggregate original
                           Certificate Balance equal to the aggregate unpaid
                            principal balance of the Mortgage Assets as of the
                         first day of the month of creation of the Trust
                           Fund and will bear interest in the aggregate at a
                      rate equal to the interest rate borne by the
                          underlying Mortgage Loans (the "Mortgage Rate"),
                      Agency Securities or Private Mortgage-Backed
                             Securities, net of the aggregate servicing fees and
                    any other amounts specified in the related
                          Prospectus Supplement (the "Pass-Through Rate").
                           The rate at which interest will be passed through
                           to holders of each class of Certificates entitled
                       thereto may be a fixed rate or a rate that is
                           subject to change from time to time from the time
                            and for the periods, in each case, as specified in
                          the related Prospectus Supplement. Any such rate
                       may be calculated on a loan-by-loan, weighted
                           average or other basis, in each case as described
               in the related Prospectus Supplement.

Credit Enhancement.........  The assets in a Trust Fund or the Certificates of  
                            one or more classes in the related Series may have
                    the benefit of one or more types of credit
                         enhancement described herein and in the related
                       Prospectus Supplement. The protection against
                           losses afforded by any such credit support may be
                          limited. The type, characteristics and amount of
                            credit enhancement will be determined based on the
                             characteristics of the Mortgage Loans underlying or
                          comprising the Mortgage Assets and other factors
                 and will be established on the basis of
                       requirements of each Rating Agency rating the
                           Certificates of such Series. One or more forms of
                            credit enhancement may be provided by an affiliate
                     or affiliates of the Depositor. See "Credit
Enhancement" herein. Credit enhancement for a
                         Series may include one or more of the following
                             types or such other credit enhancement specified in
            the related Prospectus Supplement:

A. Subordination...........  A Series of Certificates may consist of one or more
                        classes of Senior Certificates and one or more
                             classes of Subordinated Certificates. The rights of
                           the holders of the Subordinated Certificates of a
Series to             

 5

P-->424B3114th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 114th

                             receive distributions with respect to the assets in
                             the related Trust Fund will be subordinated to such
                             rights of the holders of the Senior Certificates of
                        the same Series to the extent described in the
                           related Prospectus Supplement. This subordination
                          is intended to enhance the likelihood of regular
                          receipt by holders of Senior Certificates of the
                            full amount of their scheduled monthly payments of
                            principal and interest. The protection afforded to
                           the holders of Senior Certificates of a Series by
                    means of the subordination feature will be
                            accomplished by (i) the preferential right of such
                             holders to receive, prior to any distribution being
                     made in respect of the related Subordinated
                             Certificates, the amounts of principal and interest
                             due them on each Distribution Date out of the funds
                        available for distribution on such date in the
                       related Collection Account and, to the extent
                            described in the related Prospectus Supplement, by
                     the right of such holders to receive future
                          distributions on the assets in the related Trust
                            Fund that would otherwise have been payable to the
                             holders of Subordinated Certificates; (ii) reducing
                            the ownership interest of the related Subordinated
                          Certificates; (iii) a combination of clauses (i)
                           and (ii) above; or (iv) as otherwise described in
                            the related Prospectus Supplement. If so specified
                             in the related Prospectus Supplement, subordination
                         may apply only in the event of certain types of
                     losses not covered by other forms of credit
                       support, such as hazard losses not covered by
                             standard hazard insurance policies or losses due to
                      the bankruptcy or fraud of the borrower. The
                      related Prospectus Supplement will set forth
                         information concerning, among other things, the
                          amount of subordination of a class or classes of
                    Subordinated Certificates in a Series, the
                           circumstances in which such subordination will be
                          applicable, and the manner, if any, in which the
                          amount of subordination will decrease over time.

B. Reserve Fund............  One or more reserve funds (each, a "Reserve Fund") 
                            may be established and maintained for each Series.
                        The related Prospectus Supplement will specify
                      whether or not any such Reserve Fund will be
                           included in the corpus of the Trust Fund for such
                            Series and will also specify the manner of funding
                           the related Reserve Fund and the conditions under
                            which the amounts in any such Reserve Fund will be
                  used to make distributions to holders of
                             Certificates of a particular class or released from
 the related Trust Fund.

C. Mortgage Pool Insurance                                                      
Policy................  A mortgage pool insurance policy or policies  
                            ("Mortgage Pool Insurance Policy") may be obtained
                             and maintained for a Series, which shall be limited
                             in scope, covering defaults on the related Mortgage
                         Loans in an initial amount equal to a specified
                          percentage of the aggregate principal balance of
                             all Mortgage Loans included in the Mortgage Pool as
                          of the first day of the month of issuance of the
                           related Series of Certificates or such other date
                   as is specified in the related Prospectus
          Supplement (the "Cut-off Date").

D. Special Hazard Insurance                                                     
Policy................  A special hazard insurance policy or policies 
                             ("Special Hazard Insurance Policy") may be obtained
                       and maintained for a Series, covering certain
                       physical risks that are not otherwise insured
                             against by standard hazard insurance policies. Each
                            Special Hazard Insurance Policy will be limited in
                     scope and will cover losses pursuant to the
provisions of each    

 6

P-->424B3115th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 115th

                           such Special Hazard Insurance Policy as described
               in the related Prospectus Supplement.

E. Bankruptcy Bond.........  A bankruptcy bond or bonds ("Bankruptcy Bonds") may
                            be obtained covering certain losses resulting from
                           action that may be taken by a bankruptcy court in
                       connection with a Mortgage Loan. The level of
                       coverage and the limitations in scope of each
                          Bankruptcy Bond will be specified in the related
Prospectus Supplement.

F. FHA Insurance and VA                                                         
Guarantee.............  All or a portion of the Mortgage Loans in a   
                             Mortgage Pool may be insured by FHA insurance ("FHA
                            Insurance") and may be partially guaranteed by the
VA ("VA Insurance").  

G. Cross Support...........  If specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, 
                        the beneficial ownership of separate groups of
                             assets included in a Trust Fund may be evidenced by
                   separate classes of the related Series of
                           Certificates. In such case, credit support may be
                            provided by a cross-support feature which requires
                    that distributions be made with respect to
                             Certificates evidencing beneficial ownership of one
                        or more asset groups prior to distributions to
                           Subordinated Certificates evidencing a beneficial
                             ownership interest in other asset groups within the
same Trust Fund.      

H. Limited Guarantee.......  If specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, 
                             credit enhancement may be provided in the form of a
                           limited financial guarantee ("Limited Guarantee")
              issued by a guarantor named therein.

I. Letter of Credit........  Alternative credit support with respect to a Series
                            of Certificates may be provided by the issuance of
                             a letter of credit ("Letter of Credit") by the bank
                           or financial institution specified in the related
                         Prospectus Supplement. The coverage, amount and
                            frequency of any reduction in coverage provided by
                            a Letter of Credit issued with respect to a Series
                          of Certificates will be set forth in the related
Prospectus Supplement.

J. Surety Bonds............  If specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, 
                            credit support with respect to one or more classes
                            of Certificates of a Series may be provided by the
                             issuance of a surety bond ("Surety Bond") issued by
                           a financial guarantee insurance company specified
                             in the related Prospectus Supplement. The coverage,
                           amount and frequency of any reduction in coverage
                            provided by a Surety Bond will be set forth in the
        related Prospectus Supplement.

K. Overcollateralization...  If specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, 
                             credit support may consist of overcollateralization
                       whereby the aggregate principal amount of the
                            Mortgage Assets, including any Subsequent Mortgage
                           Assets, exceeds the aggregate Certificate Balance
                             of the Certificates. Such overcollateralization may
                            exist on the Closing Date or develop thereafter as
                         a result of the application of certain interest
                            collections, in excess of amounts necessary to pay
                             the Pass-Through Rate on the Certificates, received
                           in connection with the Mortgage Assets, including
                          any Subsequent Mortgage Assets. The existence of
                           any overcollateralization and the manner, if any,
                         by which it increases or decreases, will be set
                     forth in the related Prospectus Supplement.

Advances...................  Unless otherwise specified in the related          
                            Prospectus Supplement, the Master Servicer and, if
                         applicable, each mortgage servicing institution
                             that services a Mortgage Loan in a Mortgage Pool on
behalf of the         

 7

P-->424B3116th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 116th

                    Master Servicer (a "Sub-Servicer") will be
                           obligated to advance amounts (each, an "Advance")
                            corresponding to delinquent principal and interest
                         payments (or, in the case of Home Equity Loans,
                       interest payments only) on such Mortgage Loan
                       (including, in the case of Cooperative Loans,
                            unpaid maintenance fees or other charges under the
                           related proprietary lease) until the first day of
                           the month following the date on which the related
                             Mortgaged Property is sold at a foreclosure sale or
                            the related Mortgage Loan is otherwise liquidated,
                      or until such other time as specified in the
                          related Prospectus Supplement. Any obligation to
                        make Advances may be subject to limitations as
                         specified in the related Prospectus Supplement.
                     Advances will be reimbursable to the extent
                        described herein and in the related Prospectus
Supplement.           

Optional Termination.......  The Servicer, the Depositor or, if specified in the
                          related Prospectus Supplement, the holder of the
                             residual interest in a REMIC may have the option to
                             effect early retirement of a Series of Certificates
                         through the purchase of the Mortgage Assets and
                          other assets in the related Trust Fund under the
                           circumstances and in the manner described in "The
Pooling and Servicing Agreement -- Termination;
Optional Termination" herein and in the related
                            Prospectus Supplement. In addition, if the related
                             Prospectus Supplement provides that the property of
                             a Trust Fund will include a Pre-Funding Account (as
                        such term is defined in the related Prospectus
                           Supplement, the "Pre-Funding Account"), a portion
                        of a Series of Certificates will be subject to
                          early retirement on or immediately following the
                            end of the Funding Period (as such term is defined
                            in the related Prospectus Supplement, the "Funding
                           Period") in an amount and manner specified in the
        related Prospectus Supplement.

Legal Investment...........  The Prospectus Supplement for each series of       
                         Certificates will specify which, if any, of the
                      Classes of Certificates offered thereby will
                      constitute "mortgage related securities" for
                   purposes of the Secondary Mortgage Market
                       Enhancement Act of 1984 ("SMMEA"). Classes of
                        Certificates that qualify as "mortgage related
                           securities" will be legal investments for certain
                        types of institutional investors to the extent
                         provided in SMMEA, subject, in any case, to any
                          other regulations that may govern investments by
                          such institutional investors. Institutions whose
                        investment activities are subject to review by
                          federal or state authorities should consult with
                        their counsel or the applicable authorities to
                         determine whether an investment in a particular
                          class of Certificates (whether or not such class
                             constitutes a "mortgage related security") complies
                          with applicable guidelines, policy statements or
               restrictions. See "Legal Investment."

Certain Federal Income Tax                                                      
Consequences.............  The federal income tax consequences to           
                           Certificateholders will vary depending on whether
                           one or more elections are made to treat the Trust
                       Fund or specified portions thereof as a "real
                             estate mortgage investment conduit" ("REMIC") under
                        the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of
                       1986, as amended (the "Code"). The Prospectus
                         Supplement for each Series of Certificates will
                            specify whether such an election will be made. See
                    "Certain Federal Income Tax Consequences."

ERISA Considerations.......  A fiduciary of any employee benefit plan or other  
                       retirement plan or arrangement subject to the
                             Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as
                         amended ("ERISA"), or the Code should carefully
review                

 8

P-->424B3117th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 117th

                         with its legal advisors whether the purchase or
                      holding of Certificates could give rise to a
                             transaction prohibited or not otherwise permissible
             under ERISA or the Code. See "ERISA
Considerations." Certain classes of Certificates
                           may not be transferred unless the Trustee and the
                  Depositor are furnished with a letter of
                         representations or an opinion of counsel to the
                        effect that such transfer will not result in a
                            violation of the prohibited transaction provisions
                        of ERISA and the Code and will not subject the
                          Trustee, the Depositor or the Master Servicer to
                         additional obligations. See "Description of the
Certificates -- General" and "ERISA
Considerations."      

Rating.....................  It is a condition to the issuance of the           
                             Certificates of any Series offered hereby that they
                    be rated in one of the four highest rating
                          categories by at least one nationally recognized
                    statistical rating organization (a "Rating
Agency").             

 9

P-->424B3118th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 118th

RISK FACTORS

Limited Liquidity.  Although the Prospectus Supplement for a Series of
Certificates may indicate that the underwriter intends to make a market in such 
Certificates, it is under no obligation to do so. There can be no assurance that
a secondary market will develop or, if a secondary market does develop, that it 
will provide holders of such Certificates with liquidity of investment or that  
it will continue for the lives of such Certificates. The Certificates will not  
be listed on any securities exchange.                                           

     General Economic Conditions.  General economic conditions have an impact on
the ability of borrowers to repay mortgage loans. Loss of earnings, illness and 
other similar factors may lead to an increase in delinquencies and bankruptcy   
filings by borrowers. In the event of personal bankruptcy of a borrower under a 
Mortgage Loan (a "Mortgagor"), it is possible that the holders of the related   
Certificates could experience a loss with respect to such Mortgagor's Mortgage  
Loan. In conjunction with a Mortgagor's bankruptcy, a bankruptcy court may      
suspend or reduce the payments of principal and interest to be paid with respect
to such Mortgage Loan, thus delaying or reducing the amount received by the     
holders of the related Certificates with respect to such Mortgage Loan.         
Moreover, if a bankruptcy court prevents the transfer of the related Mortgaged  
Property to the related Trust Fund, any remaining balance on such Mortgage Loan 
may not be recoverable. See "Mortgage Loan Program" herein and "The Seller and
the Servicer -- Delinquency, Loan Loss and Foreclosure Information" in the      
related Prospectus Supplement for further information regarding the rates of    
delinquency and net losses experienced on the mortgage loans included in FUNB's 
servicing portfolio.                                                            

Local Real Estate Markets.  An overall decline in the residential real
estate markets in the states in which the Mortgaged Properties are located could
adversely affect the values of the Mortgaged Properties such that the aggregate 
outstanding balance of the Mortgage Loans equals or exceeds the value of the    
Mortgaged Properties. The Depositor can neither predict such declines nor       
quantify the impact of such declines in property values nor predict how long and
in which states such declines may occur. During a period of such declines, the  
rates of delinquencies, foreclosures and losses on the Mortgage Loans would be  
expected to be higher than those experienced in the mortgage lending industry in
general.                                                                        

Yield and Prepayment Considerations.  The yield on the Certificates of each
Series will depend on the rate of principal payment (including prepayments,     
liquidations due to defaults and repurchases) on the Mortgage Loans and the     
price paid by Certificateholders. Such yield may be adversely affected by a     
higher or lower than anticipated rate of prepayments on the related Mortgage    
Loans. In addition, unless otherwise specified in the related Prospectus        
Supplement, the yield to investors may be adversely affected by shortfalls which
may result from the timing of the receipt of partial prepayments or liquidations
as well as shortfalls not covered by the Master Servicing Fee related to a      
particular Distribution Date and which shortfalls result from the timing of the 
receipt of full prepayments. The yield on Certificates entitling the holders    
thereof primarily or exclusively to payments of interest on the Mortgage Loans  
will be extremely sensitive to the rate of prepayments on the related Mortgage  
Loans. In addition, the yield on certain other types of classes of Certificates 
may be relatively more sensitive to the rate of prepayment of the related       
Mortgage Loans than other classes of Certificates. Prepayments are influenced by
a number of factors, including prevailing mortgage market interest rates, local 
and national economic conditions and homeowner mobility. See "Yield and
Prepayment Considerations."                                                     

 Limited Obligations.  Except for any related insurance policies and any
reserve fund or credit enhancement described in the applicable Prospectus       
Supplement, the Mortgage Assets included in the related Trust Fund will be the  
sole source of payments on the Certificates of a Series. The Certificates of any
Series will not represent an interest in or obligation of the Depositor, the    
Seller, the Master Servicer, the Trustee or any of their affiliates, except for 
the Depositor's and the Seller's limited obligations with respect to certain    
breaches of their respective representations and warranties. The Certificates of
any Series will not be guaranteed or insured by any governmental agency or      
instrumentality, the Depositor, the Master Servicer, the Trustee, any of their  
affiliates or any other person. Consequently, in the event that payments on the 
Mortgage Assets are insufficient or otherwise unavailable to make all payments  
required on the Certificates, there will be no recourse to the Depositor, the   
Master Servicer, the Trustee or, except as specified in the applicable          
Prospectus Supplement, any other entity.                                        

Limitations, Reduction and Substitution of Credit Enhancement.  With  
respect to each Series of Certificates, credit enhancement may be provided in   
limited amounts to cover certain types of losses on the                         

10

P-->424B3119th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 119th

underlying Mortgage Loans. Credit enhancement will be provided in one or more of
the forms referred to herein, including, but not limited to: subordination of   
other classes of Certificates of the same Series; a limited guarantee; a letter 
of credit; a pool insurance policy; a special hazard insurance policy; a        
mortgagor bankruptcy bond; a reserve fund; cross support; FHA Insurance and VA  
Guarantee; a surety bond; and any combination thereof. See "Credit Enhancement" 
herein. Regardless of the form of credit enhancement provided, the amount of    
coverage will be limited in amount and in most cases will be subject to periodic
reduction in accordance with a schedule or formula. Furthermore, such credit    
enhancements may provide only very limited coverage as to certain types of      
losses, and may provide no coverage as to certain other types of losses. All or 
a portion of the credit enhancement for any Series of Certificates will         
generally be permitted to be reduced, terminated or substituted for, if each    
applicable rating agency confirms that the then current rating thereof will not 
be adversely affected. See "Credit Enhancement."                                

   Realization Upon Nonperforming Loans; Delays and Expenses Associated with
Legal Actions.  An action to foreclose a Mortgage Loan is regulated by statutes 
and rules and is subject to a court's equitable powers. A foreclosure action is 
subject to many of the delays and expenses of other lawsuits if defenses or     
counterclaims are interposed, sometimes requiring several years to complete.    
Furthermore, an action to obtain a deficiency judgment also is regulated by     
statutes and rules, and the amount of a deficiency judgment may be limited by   
law. In the event of a default by a borrower, these restrictions, among others, 
may impede the ability of the Master Servicer to foreclose on or to sell the    
Mortgaged Property or to obtain a deficiency judgment in connection therewith.  
If the protection afforded the Certificateholders of a Series by the credit     
enhancement, if any, for such Series is exhausted, such restrictions may delay  
distributions to such Certificateholders and may ultimately limit the amounts   
distributed with respect to such defaulted Mortgage Loans and result in a loss  
to such Certificateholders on their investments. See "Certain Legal Aspects of
the Mortgage Loans."                                                            

    Junior Liens.  Mortgages securing Home Equity Loans are often junior liens
subordinate to the rights of the mortgagee under the related senior mortgage or 
mortgages. The proceeds from any liquidation, insurance or condemnation         
proceedings will be available to satisfy the outstanding balance of such junior 
mortgage only to the extent that the claims of such senior mortgagees have been 
satisfied in full, including any related foreclosure costs. In addition, a      
junior mortgagee may not foreclose on the property securing a junior mortgage   
unless it forecloses subject to the senior mortgages, in which case it must     
either pay the entire amount due on the senior mortgages to the senior          
mortgagees at or prior to the foreclosure sale or undertake the obligation to   
make payments on the senior mortgages in the event the mortgagor is in default  
thereunder. The Trust Fund will not have any source of funds to satisfy the     
senior mortgages to make payments due to the senior mortgagees.                 

Subordinated Certificates.  A Series of Certificates may consist of one or
more classes of Senior Certificates and one or more classes of Subordinated     
Certificates. The rights of the holders of Subordinated Certificates to receive 
distributions from the related Trust Fund will be subordinated to the rights of 
the holders of Senior Certificates of the same Series to receive such           
distributions. The effect of such subordination generally is that holders of    
Subordinated Certificates may experience losses on the underlying Mortgage      
Assets before or to a greater extent than holders of Senior Certificates. The   
Prospectus Supplement for each Series will specify the rights of holders of     
Subordinated Certificates in relation to the holders of Senior Certificates as  
well as the extent and circumstances of any such subordination. See "Credit
Enhancement -- Subordination."                                                  

Other Legal Considerations.  Applicable state laws generally regulate 
interest rates and other charges, and require certain disclosures to borrowers. 
In addition, many states have other laws, such as consumer protection laws,     
unfair and deceptive practices acts and debt collection practices acts which may
apply to the origination or collection of the Mortgage Loans. Depending on the  
provisions of the applicable law, violations of these laws may limit the ability
of the Master Servicer to collect all or part of the principal of, or interest  
on, the Mortgage Loans, may entitle the borrower to a refund of amounts         
previously paid and, in addition, could subject the related Trust Fund to       
damages and administrative enforcement. See "Certain Legal Aspects of the
Mortgage Loans."                                                                

11

P-->424B3120th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 120th
THE TRUST FUND* 

    The Trust Fund for each Series will be held by the Trustee for the benefit
of the related Certificateholders. Each Trust Fund will consist of certain      
mortgage-related assets (the "Mortgage Assets") consisting of (A) a mortgage    
pool (a "Mortgage Pool") comprised of Mortgage Loans, (B) Agency Securities or  
(C) Private Mortgage-Backed Securities, in each case as specified in the related
Prospectus Supplement, together with payments in respect of such Mortgage Assets
and certain other accounts, obligations or agreements, in each case as specified
in the related Prospectus Supplement.                                           

     The Certificates will be entitled to payment from the assets of the related
Trust Fund or Funds or other assets pledged for the benefit of the              
Certificateholders as specified in the related Prospectus Supplement and will   
not be entitled to payments in respect of the assets of any other trust fund    
established by the Depositor. Unless otherwise specified in the related         
Prospectus Supplement, the Mortgage Assets of any Trust Fund will consist of    
Mortgage Loans, Agency Securities or Private Mortgage-Backed Securities but not 
a combination thereof.                                                          

  The Mortgage Assets may be acquired by the Depositor, either directly or
through affiliates, in the open market or in privately negotiated transactions, 
from originators or sellers that may be affiliates of the Depositor (the        
"Sellers") and conveyed by the Depositor to the related Trust Fund. The Sellers 
may have originated the Mortgage Assets or acquired the Mortgage Assets from the
originators or other entities. See "Mortgage Loan Program -- Underwriting
Standards."                                                                     

    The following is a brief description of the Mortgage Assets expected to be
included in the Trust Funds. If specific information respecting the Mortgage    
Assets is not known at the time the related Series of Certificates initially is 
offered, more general information of the nature described below will be provided
in the related Prospectus Supplement, and final specific information will be set
forth in a Current Report on Form 8-K to be available to investors on the date  
of issuance thereof and to be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission 
within fifteen days after the initial issuance of such Certificates (the        
"Detailed Description"). A schedule of the Mortgage Assets relating to such     
Series will be attached to the Agreement delivered to the Trustee upon delivery 
of the Certificates.                                                            

THE MORTGAGE LOANS -- GENERAL 

For purposes hereof, the real property that secures repayment of the  
Mortgage Loans are collectively referred to as "Mortgaged Properties." The      
Mortgaged Properties may be located in any one of the fifty states, the District
of Columbia, Guam, Puerto Rico or any other territory of the United States.     
Mortgage Loans with certain Loan-to-Value Ratios and/or certain principal       
balances may be covered wholly or partially by primary mortgage guaranty        
insurance policies (each, a "Primary Mortgage Insurance Policy"). The existence,
extent and duration of any such coverage will be described in the applicable    
Prospectus Supplement. No Primary Mortgage Insurance Policy will be required for
any home equity loan.                                                           

  The Mortgage Loans in a Mortgage Pool will have monthly payment dates as
set forth in the related Prospectus Supplement. The payment terms of the        
Mortgage Loans to be included in a Trust Fund will be described in the related  
Prospectus Supplement and may include any of the following features or          
combination thereof or other features described in the related Prospectus       
Supplement:                                                                     

       (a) Interest may be payable at a fixed rate, a rate adjustable from
time to time in relation to an index (which will be specified in the  
   related Prospectus Supplement), a rate that is fixed for a period of time
 or under certain circumstances and is followed by an adjustable rate, a
     rate that otherwise varies from time to time, or a rate that is convertible
    from an adjustable rate to a fixed rate. Changes to an adjustable rate may
be subject to periodic limitations, maximum rates, minimum rates or a 
     combination of such limitations. Accrued interest may be deferred and added
to the principal of a loan for such periods                           

---------------                                                                 

* Whenever the terms "Mortgage Pool" and "Certificates" are used in this        
Prospectus, such terms will be deemed to apply, unless the context indicates
otherwise, to one specific Mortgage Pool and the Certificates relating to a 
single trust fund (the "Trust Fund") consisting primarily of the Mortgage   
Loans in such Mortgage Pool. Similarly, the term "Pass-Through Rate" will   
refer to the Pass- Through Rate borne by the Certificates of one specific   
Series and the term "Trust Fund" will refer to one specific Trust Fund.     

12

P-->424B3121st Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 121st

    and under such circumstances as may be specified in the related Prospectus
 Supplement. Mortgage Loans may provide for the payment of interest at a
     rate lower than the specified interest rate borne by such Mortgage Loan for
a period of time or for the life of the loan, and the amount of any   
difference may be contributed from funds supplied by the seller of the
Mortgaged Property or another source.                                 

       (b) Principal may be payable on a level debt service basis to fully
amortize the loan over its term, may be calculated on the basis of an 
assumed amortization schedule that is significantly longer than the   
     original term to maturity or on an interest rate that is different from the
    interest rate on the Mortgage Loan or may not be amortized during all or a
  portion of the original term. Payment of all or a substantial portion of
  the principal may be due on maturity ("balloon payments"). Principal may
    include interest that has been deferred and added to the principal balance
of the Mortgage Loan.                                                 

       (c) Monthly payments of principal and interest may be fixed for the
life of the loan, may increase over a specified period of time or may 
change from period to period. Loans may include limits on periodic    
  increases or decreases in the amount of monthly payments and may include
maximum or minimum amounts of monthly payments.                       

       (d) The Mortgage Loans generally may be prepaid at any time without
the payment of any prepayment fee. If so specified in the related     
  Prospectus Supplement, some prepayments of principal may be subject to a
   prepayment fee, which may be fixed for the life of any such Mortgage Loan
  or may decline over time, and may be prohibited for the life of any such
    Mortgage Loan or for certain periods ("lockout periods"). Certain Mortgage
 Loans may permit prepayments after expiration of the applicable lockout
   period and may require the payment of a prepayment fee in connection with
     any such subsequent prepayment. Other Mortgage Loans may permit prepayments
     without payment of a fee unless the prepayment occurs during specified time
periods.                                                              

    (e) The loans may include "due-on-sale" clauses which permit the
    mortgagee to demand payment of the entire mortgage loan in connection with
the sale or certain transfers of the related Mortgaged Property. Other
Mortgage Loans may be assumable by persons meeting the then applicable
underwriting standards of the Seller.                                 

   A Trust Fund may contain certain Mortgage Loans, which include provisions
whereby a third party partially subsidizes the borrower's monthly payments      
during the early years of the Mortgage Loan ("Buydown Loans"), the difference to
be made up from a fund (a "Buydown Fund") contributed by such third party at the
time of origination of the Mortgage Loan. A Buydown Fund will be in an amount   
equal either to the discounted value or full aggregate amount of future payment 
subsidies. The underlying assumption of buydown plans is that the income of the 
borrower will increase during the buydown period as a result of normal increases
in compensation and of inflation, so that the borrower will be able to meet the 
full mortgage payments at the end of the buydown period. To the extent that this
assumption as to increased income is not fulfilled, the possibility of defaults 
on Buydown Loans is increased. The related Prospectus Supplement will contain   
information with respect to any Buydown Loan concerning limitations on the      
interest rate paid by the borrower initially, on annual increases in the        
interest rate and on the length of the buydown period.                          

     Each Prospectus Supplement will contain information, as of the date of such
Prospectus Supplement and to the extent then specifically known to the          
Depositor, with respect to the Mortgage Loans contained in the related Mortgage 
Pool, including (i) the aggregate outstanding principal balance and the average 
outstanding principal balance of the Mortgage Loans as of the applicable Cut-off
Date, (ii) the type of property securing the Mortgage Loans (e.g., separate     
residential properties, individual units in condominiums in buildings owned by  
cooperative housing corporations, vacation and second homes, or other similar   
real property), (iii) the original terms to maturity of the Mortgage Loans, (iv)
the largest principal balance and the smallest principal balance of any of the  
Mortgage Loans, (v) the earliest origination date and latest maturity date of   
any of the Mortgage Loans, (vi) the aggregate principal balance of Mortgage     
Loans having Loan-to-Value Ratios or Combined Loan-to-Value Ratios at           
origination exceeding 80%, (vii) the maximum and minimum per annum rates at     
which the related Mortgage Notes accrue interest (the "Mortgage Rate"), and     
(viii) the geographical distribution of the Mortgage Loans.                     

13

P-->424B3122nd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 122nd

The "Loan-to-Value Ratio" of a Mortgage Loan at any given time is the 
fraction, expressed as a percentage, the numerator of which is the original     
principal balance of the related Mortgage Loan and the denominator of which is  
the Collateral Value of the related Mortgaged Property. Unless otherwise        
specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, the "Collateral Value" of a     
Mortgaged Property is the lesser of (a) the appraised value determined in an    
appraisal obtained by the originator at origination of such Mortgage Loan and   
(b) the sales price for such property.                                          

 The "Combined Loan-to-Value Ratio" of any Home Equity Loan is the ratio
(expressed as a percentage) of (i) the sum of (a) the original principal balance
of such Mortgage Loan at the date of origination (which for purposes of the     
related Prospectus Supplement includes certain financed fees and insurance      
premiums) plus (b) the outstanding balance of the senior liens, if any, divided 
by (ii) the lesser of (a) the value of the related Mortgaged Property, based    
upon the appraisal, if any, or drive-by evaluation made at the time of          
origination of the Mortgage Loan and (b) the purchase price of the Mortgaged    
Property if the Mortgage Loan proceeds were used to purchase the Mortgaged      
Property. For Mortgage Loans having low original principal balances, the        
Combined Loan-to-Value Ratios of the Mortgage Loans will reflect certain        
judgments of the Seller's underwriters with respect to the value of the         
Mortgaged Property made at the time the Mortgage Loans were originated or       
acquired. See "Mortgage Loan Program -- Underwriting Standards."                

   The Depositor will cause the Mortgage Loans comprising each Mortgage Pool
to be assigned to the Trustee named in the related Prospectus Supplement for the
benefit of the holders of the Certificates of the related Series. Unless        
otherwise specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, the only obligations  
of the Depositor with respect to a Series of Certificates will be to obtain     
certain representations and warranties from the Sellers and to assign to the    
Trustee for such Series of Certificates the Depositor's rights with respect to  
such representations and warranties. See "The Pooling and Servicing
Agreement -- Assignment of Mortgage Assets."                                    

     The Master Servicer named in the related Prospectus Supplement will service
the Mortgage Loans, either directly or through other mortgage servicing         
institutions (each, a "Sub-Servicer"), pursuant to a Pooling and Servicing      
Agreement (each, an "Agreement"). The Master Servicer and any Sub-Servicers will
each receive a fee for such services. See "Mortgage Loan Program" and "The
Pooling and Servicing Agreement." With respect to Mortgage Loans serviced by the
Master Servicer through a Sub-Servicer, the Master Servicer will remain liable  
for its servicing obligations under the related Agreement as if the Master      
Servicer alone were servicing such Mortgage Loans. The obligations of the Master
Servicer with respect to the Mortgage Loans will consist principally of its     
contractual servicing obligations under the related Agreement (including its    
obligation to enforce the obligations of the Sub-Servicers or Sellers, or both, 
as more fully described herein under "Mortgage Loan Program -- Representations
by Sellers; Repurchases" and "The Pooling and Servicing Agreement -- Assignment
of Mortgage Assets") and its obligation to make certain cash advances in the    
event of delinquencies in payments on or with respect to the Mortgage Loans in  
the amounts described herein under "Description of the
Certificates -- Advances." The obligations of the Master Servicer to make       
advances may be subject to limitations, to the extent provided herein and in the
related Prospectus Supplement.                                                  

 Single Family and Cooperative Loans.  Unless otherwise specified in the
related Prospectus Supplement, Mortgage Loans will consist of mortgage loans,   
deeds of trust or participations or other beneficial interests therein, secured 
by first, second or more junior liens on single family (i.e., one-to            
four-family) residential properties. If so specified, the Mortgage Loans may    
include cooperative apartment loans ("Cooperative Loans") secured by security   
interests in shares issued by private, non-profit, cooperative housing          
corporations ("Cooperatives") and in the related proprietary leases or occupancy
agreements granting exclusive rights to occupy specific dwelling units in such  
Cooperatives' buildings. If so specified in the related Prospectus Supplement,  
the Mortgage Assets of the related Trust Fund may include mortgage participation
certificates evidencing interests in Mortgage Loans. Such loans may be          
conventional loans (i.e., loans that are not insured or guaranteed by any       
governmental agency) or loans insured by the FHA or partially guaranteed by the 
VA, as specified in the related Prospectus Supplement.                          

The Mortgaged Properties relating to single family Mortgage Loans will
consist of detached or semi-detached one-family dwelling units, two- to         
four-family dwelling units, townhouses, rowhouses, individ-                     

14

P-->424B3123rd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 123rd

ual condominium units, individual units in planned unit developments, and       
certain other dwelling units. Such Mortgaged Properties may include vacation and
second homes, investment properties and leasehold interests. In the case of     
leasehold interests, the term of the leasehold will exceed the scheduled        
maturity of the Mortgage Loan by at least five years, unless otherwise specified
in the related Prospectus Supplement. Certain Mortgage Loans may be originated  
or acquired in connection with corporate programs, including employee relocation
programs. In limited instances, a borrower who uses the dwelling unit as a      
primary residence may also make some business use of the property.              

Home Equity Loans.  As described more fully in the related Prospectus 
Supplement, the Mortgage Loans constituting a Trust Fund may comprise a pool of 
home equity loans ("Home Equity Loans"). Home Equity Loans are mortgage loans   
made for purposes that include: purchase money transactions, refinancings (both 
cash-out and no-cash-out), home improvements and construction-to-permanent      
financing. Unless otherwise specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, Home
Equity Loans will generally be secured by a lien on the related Mortgaged       
Property of a first or second priority. Unless otherwise specified in the       
related Prospectus Supplement, Home Equity Loans are generally made to          
Mortgagors with credit grades (as determined by the Seller from time to time) A2
and below. The Mortgaged Properties securing the Home Equity Loans may          
constitute single-family dwellings, mobile and manufactured housing and, in     
limited cases, other types of residential property as described in the related  
Prospectus Supplement.                                                          

AGENCY SECURITIES 

     Government National Mortgage Association.  GNMA is a wholly-owned corporate
instrumentality of the United States with the United States Department of       
Housing and Urban Development. Section 306(g) of Title II of the National       
Housing Act of 1934, as amended (the "Housing Act"), authorizes GNMA to         
guarantee the timely payment of the principal of and interest on certificates   
which represent an interest in a pool of mortgage loans insured by the Federal  
Housing Authority ("FHA") under the Housing Act, or Title V of the Housing Act  
of 1949 ("FHA Loans"), or partially guaranteed by the VA under the Servicemen's 
Readjustment Act of 1944, as amended, or Chapter 37 of Title 38, United States  
Code ("VA Loans").                                                              

    Section 306(g) of the Housing Act provides that "the full faith and credit
of the United States is pledged to the payment of all amounts which may be      
required to be paid under any guaranty under this subsection." In order to meet 
its obligations under any such guarantee, GNMA may, under Section 306(d) of the 
Housing Act, borrow from the United States Treasury in an unlimited amount which
is at any time sufficient to enable GNMA to perform its obligations under its   
guarantee.                                                                      

GNMA Certificates.  Each GNMA Certificate held in a Trust Fund (which may
be issued under either the GNMA I program or the GNMA II program) will be a     
"fully modified pass-through" mortgage-backed certificate issued and serviced by
a mortgage banking company or other financial concern ("GNMA Issuer") approved  
by GNMA or approved by FNMA as a seller-servicer of FHA Loans and/or VA Loans.  
The mortgage loans underlying the GNMA Certificates will consist of FHA Loans   
and/or VA Loans. Each such mortgage loan is secured by a one- to four-family    
residential property. GNMA will approve the issuance of each such GNMA          
Certificate in accordance with a guaranty agreement (a "Guaranty Agreement")    
between GNMA and the GNMA Issuer. Pursuant to its Guaranty Agreement, a GNMA    
Issuer will be required to advance its own funds in order to make timely        
payments of all amounts due on each such GNMA Certificate, even if the payments 
received by the GNMA Issuer on the FHA Loans or VA Loans underlying each such   
GNMA Certificate are less than the amounts due on each such GNMA Certificate.   

The full and timely payment of principal of and interest on each GNMA 
Certificate will be guaranteed by GNMA, which obligation is backed by the full  
faith and credit of the United States. Each such GNMA Certificate will have an  
original maturity of not more than 40 years (but may have original maturities of
substantially less than 40 years). Each such GNMA Certificate will be based on  
and backed by a pool of FHA Loans or VA Loans secured by one- to four-family    
residential properties and will provide for the payment by or on behalf of the  
GNMA Issuer to the registered holder of such GNMA Certificate of scheduled      
monthly payments of principal and interest equal to the registered holder's     
proportionate interest in the aggregate amount of the monthly principal and     
interest payment on each FHA Loan or VA Loan underlying such                    

15

P-->424B3124th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 124th

GNMA Certificate, less the applicable servicing and guarantee fee which together
equal the difference between the interest on the FHA Loan or VA Loan and the    
pass-through rate on the GNMA Certificate. In addition, each payment will       
include proportionate pass-through payments of any prepayments of principal on  
the FHA Loans or VA Loans underlying such GNMA Certificate and liquidation      
proceeds in the event of a foreclosure or other disposition of any such FHA     
Loans or VA Loans.                                                              

     If a GNMA Issuer is unable to make the payments on a GNMA Certificate as it
becomes due, it must promptly notify GNMA and request GNMA to make such payment.
Upon notification and request, GNMA will make such payments directly to the     
registered holder of such GNMA Certificate. In the event no payment is made by a
GNMA Issuer and the GNMA Issuer fails to notify and request GNMA to make such   
payment, the holder of such GNMA Certificate will have recourse only against    
GNMA to obtain such payment. The Trustee or its nominee, as registered holder of
the GNMA Certificates held in a Trust Fund, will have the right to proceed      
directly against GNMA under the terms of the Guaranty Agreements relating to    
such GNMA Certificates for any amounts that are not paid when due.              

     All mortgage loans underlying a particular GNMA I Certificate must have the
same interest rate (except for pools of mortgage loans secured by manufactured  
homes) over the term of the loan. The interest rate on such GNMA I Certificate  
will equal the interest rate on the mortgage loans included in the pool of      
mortgage loans underlying such GNMA I Certificate, less one-half percentage     
point per annum of the unpaid principal balance of the mortgage loans.          

 Mortgage loans underlying a particular GNMA II Certificate may have per
annum interest rates that vary from each other by up to one percentage point.   
The interest rate on each GNMA II Certificate will be between one-half          
percentage point and one and one-half percentage points lower than the highest  
interest rate on the mortgage loans included in the pool of mortgage loans      
underlying such GNMA II Certificate (except for pools of mortgage loans secured 
by manufactured homes).                                                         

 Regular monthly installment payments on each GNMA Certificate held in a
Trust Fund will be comprised of interest due as specified on such GNMA          
Certificate plus the scheduled principal payments on the FHA Loans or VA Loans  
underlying such GNMA Certificate due on the first day of the month in which the 
scheduled monthly installments on such GNMA Certificate are due. Such regular   
monthly installments on each such GNMA Certificate are required to be paid to   
the Trustee as registered holder by the 15th day of each month in the case of a 
GNMA I Certificate and are required to be mailed to the Trustee by the 20th day 
of each month in the case of a GNMA II Certificate. Any principal prepayments on
any FHA Loans or VA Loans underlying a GNMA Certificate held in a Trust Fund or 
any other early recovery of principal on such loan will be passed through to the
Trustee as the registered holder of such GNMA Certificate.                      

   GNMA Certificates may be backed by graduated payment mortgage loans or by
"buydown" mortgage loans for which funds will have been provided (and deposited 
into escrow accounts) for application to the payment of a portion of the        
borrowers' monthly payments during the early years of such mortgage loan.       
Payments due the registered holders of GNMA Certificates backed by pools        
containing "buydown" mortgage loans will be computed in the same manner as      
payments derived from other GNMA Certificates and will include amounts to be    
collected from both the borrower and the related escrow account. The graduated  
payment mortgage loans will provide for graduated interest payments that, during
the early years of such mortgage loans, will be less than the amount of stated  
interest on such mortgage loans. The interest not so paid will be added to the  
principal of such graduated payment mortgage loans and, together with interest  
thereon, will be paid in subsequent years. The obligations of GNMA and of a GNMA
Issuer will be the same irrespective of whether the GNMA Certificates are backed
by graduated payment mortgage loans or "buydown" mortgage loans. No statistics  
comparable to the FHA's prepayment experience on level payment, non-"buydown"   
mortgage loans are available in respect of graduated payment or "buydown"       
mortgages. GNMA Certificates related to a Series of Certificates may be held in 
book-entry form.                                                                

     As described above, the GNMA Certificates included in a Trust Fund, and the
related underlying mortgage loans, may have characteristics and terms different 
from those described above. Any such different characteristics and terms will be
described in the related Prospectus Supplement.                                 

16

P-->424B3125th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 125th

Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation.  FHLMC is a shareholder-owned 
corporation that was created pursuant to Title III of the Emergency Home Finance
Act of 1970, as amended (the "FHLMC Act"). FHLMC was established primarily for  
the purpose of increasing the availability of mortgage credit for the financing 
of urgently needed housing. It seeks to provide an enhanced degree of liquidity 
for residential mortgage investments primarily by assisting in the development  
of secondary markets for conventional mortgages. The principal activity of FHLMC
currently consists of the purchase of first lien conventional mortgage loans or 
participation interests in such mortgage loans and the sale of the mortgage     
loans or participations so purchased in the form of mortgage securities,        
primarily FHLMC Certificates. FHLMC is confined to purchasing, so far as        
practicable, mortgage loans that it deems to be of such quality, type and class 
as to meet generally the purchase standards imposed by private institutional    
mortgage investors.                                                             

FHLMC Certificates.  Each FHLMC Certificate represents an undivided   
interest in a pool of mortgage loans that may consist of first lien conventional
loans, FHA Loans or VA Loans (a "FHLMC Certificate Group"). FHLMC Certificates  
are sold under the terms of a Mortgage Participation Certificate Agreement. A   
FHLMC Certificate may be issued under either FHLMC's Cash Program or Guarantor  
Program.                                                                        

    Mortgage loans underlying the FHLMC Certificates held by a Trust Fund will
consist of mortgage loans with original terms to maturity of between 10 and 30  
years. Each such mortgage loan must meet the applicable standards set forth in  
the FHLMC Act. A FHLMC Certificate Group may include whole loans, participation 
interests in whole loans and undivided interests in whole loans and/or          
participations comprising another FHLMC Certificate Group. Under the Guarantor  
Program, any such FHLMC Certificate Group may include only whole loans or       
participation interests in whole loans.                                         

FHLMC guarantees to each registered holder of a FHLMC Certificate the 
timely payment of interest on the underlying mortgage loans to the extent of the
applicable Certificate rate on the registered holder's pro rata share of the    
unpaid principal balance outstanding on the underlying mortgage loans in the    
FHLMC Certificate Group represented by such FHLMC Certificate, whether or not   
received. FHLMC also guarantees to each registered holder of a FHLMC Certificate
collection by such holder of all principal on the underlying mortgage loans,    
without any offset or deduction, to the extent of such holder's pro rata share  
thereof, but does not, except if and to the extent specified in the related     
Prospectus Supplement for a Series of Certificates, guarantee the timely payment
of scheduled principal. Under FHLMC's Gold PC Program, FHLMC guarantees the     
timely payment of principal based on the difference between the pool factor,    
published in the month preceding the month of distribution and the pool factor  
published in such month of distribution. Pursuant to its guarantees, FHLMC      
indemnifies holders of FHLMC Certificates against any diminution in principal by
reason of charges for property repairs, maintenance and foreclosure. FHLMC may  
remit the amount due on account of its guaranty of collection of principal at   
any time after default on an underlying mortgage loan, but not later than (i) 30
days following foreclosure sale, (ii) 30 days following payment of the claim by 
any mortgage insurer or (iii) 30 days following the expiration of any right of  
redemption, whichever occurs later, but in any event no later than one year     
after demand has been made upon the mortgagor for accelerated payment of        
principal. In taking actions regarding the collection of principal after default
on the mortgage loans underlying FHLMC Certificates, including the timing of    
demand for acceleration, FHLMC reserves the right to exercise its judgment with 
respect to the mortgage loans in the same manner as for mortgage loans that it  
has purchased but not sold. The length of time necessary for FHLMC to determine 
that a mortgage loan should be accelerated varies with the particular           
circumstances of each mortgagor, and FHLMC has not adopted standards which      
require that the demand be made within any specified period.                    

FHLMC Certificates are not guaranteed by the United States or by any  
Federal Home Loan Bank and do not constitute debts or obligations of the United 
States or any Federal Home Loan Bank. The obligations of FHLMC under its        
guarantee are obligations solely of FHLMC and are not backed by, or entitled to,
the full faith and credit of the United States. If FHLMC were unable to satisfy 
such obligations, distributions to Holders of FHLMC Certificates would consist  
solely of payments and other recoveries on the underlying mortgage loans and,   
accordingly, monthly distributions to holders of FHLMC Certificates would be    
affected by delinquent payments and defaults on such mortgage loans.            

17

P-->424B3126th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 126th

Registered holders of FHLMC Certificates are entitled to receive their
monthly pro rata share of all principal payments on the underlying mortgage     
loans received by FHLMC, including any scheduled principal payments, full and   
partial repayments of principal and principal received by FHLMC by virtue of    
condemnation, insurance, liquidation or foreclosure, and repurchases of the     
mortgage loans by FHLMC or the seller thereof. FHLMC is required to remit each  
registered FHLMC certificateholder's pro rata share of principal payments on the
underlying mortgage loans, interest at the FHLMC pass-through rate and any other
sums such as prepayment fees, within 60 days of the date on which such payments 
are deemed to have been received by FHLMC.                                      

   Under FHLMC's Cash Program, there is no limitation on the amount by which
interest rates on the mortgage loans underlying a FHLMC Certificate may exceed  
the pass-through rate on the FHLMC Certificate. Under such program, FHLMC       
purchases groups of whole mortgage loans from sellers at specified percentages  
of their unpaid principal balances, adjusted for accrued or prepaid interest,   
which when applied to the interest rate of the mortgage loans and participations
purchased results in the yield (expressed as a percentage) required by FHLMC.   
The required yield, which includes a minimum servicing fee retained by the      
servicer, is calculated using the outstanding principal balance. The range of   
interest rates on the mortgage loans and participations in a FHLMC Certificate  
Group under the Cash Program will vary since mortgage loans and participations  
are purchased and assigned to a FHLMC Certificate Group based upon their yield  
to FHLMC rather than on the interest rate on the underlying mortgage loans.     
Under FHLMC's Guarantor Program, the pass-through rate on a FHLMC Certificate is
established based upon the lowest interest rate on the underlying mortgage      
loans, minus a minimum servicing fee and the amount of FHLMC's management and   
guaranty income as agreed upon between the seller and FHLMC.                    

FHLMC Certificates duly presented for registration of ownership on or 
before the last business day of a month are registered effective as of the first
day of the month. The first remittance to a registered holder of a FHLMC        
Certificate will be distributed so as to be received normally by the 15th day of
the second month following the month in which the purchaser became a registered 
holder of the FHLMC Certificates. Thereafter, such remittance will be           
distributed monthly to the registered holder so as to be received normally by   
the 15th day of each month. The Federal Reserve Bank of New York maintains      
book-entry accounts with respect to FHLMC Certificates sold by FHLMC on or after
January 2, 1985, and makes payments of principal and interest each month to the 
registered holders thereof in accordance with such holders' instructions.       

   Federal National Mortgage Association.  FNMA is a federally chartered and
privately owned corporation organized and existing under the Federal National   
Mortgage Association Charter Act, as amended (the "Charter Act"). FNMA was      
originally established in 1938 as a United States government agency to provide  
supplemental liquidity to the mortgage market and was transformed into a        
stockholder-owned and privately managed corporation by legislation enacted in   
1968.                                                                           

     FNMA provides funds to the mortgage market primarily by purchasing mortgage
loans from lenders, thereby replenishing their funds for additional lending.    
FNMA acquires funds to purchase mortgage loans from many capital market         
investors that may not ordinarily invest in mortgages, thereby expanding the    
total amount of funds available for housing. Operating nationwide, FNMA helps to
redistribute mortgage funds from capital-surplus to capital-short areas.        

FNMA Certificates.  FNMA Certificates are Guaranteed Mortgage Pass-Through
Certificates representing fractional undivided interests in a pool of mortgage  
loans formed by FNMA. Each mortgage loan must meet the applicable standards of  
the FNMA purchase program. Mortgage loans comprising a pool are either provided 
by FNMA from its own portfolio or purchased pursuant to the criteria of the FNMA
purchase program.                                                               

Mortgage loans underlying FNMA Certificates held by a Trust Fund will 
consist of conventional mortgage loans, FHA Loans or VA Loans. Original         
maturities of substantially all of the conventional, level payment mortgage     
loans underlying a FNMA Certificate are expected to be between either 8 to 15   
years or 20 to 30 years. The original maturities of substantially all of the    
fixed rate level payment FHA Loans or VA Loans are expected to be 30 years.     

18

P-->424B3127th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 127th

     Mortgage loans underlying a FNMA Certificate may have annual interest rates
that vary by as much as two percentage points from each other. The rate of      
interest payable on a FNMA Certificate is equal to the lowest interest rate of  
any mortgage loan in the related pool, less a specified minimum annual          
percentage representing servicing compensation and FNMA's guaranty fee. Under a 
regular servicing option (pursuant to which the mortgagee or each other servicer
assumes the entire risk of foreclosure losses), the annual interest rates on the
mortgage loans underlying a FNMA Certificate will be between 50 basis points and
250 basis points greater than its annual pass-through rate and under a special  
servicing option (pursuant to which FNMA assumes the entire risk for foreclosure
losses), the annual interest rates on the mortgage loans underlying a FNMA      
Certificate will generally be between 55 basis points and 255 basis points      
greater than the annual FNMA Certificate pass-through rate. If specified in the 
related Prospectus Supplement, FNMA Certificates may be backed by adjustable    
rate mortgages.                                                                 

 FNMA guarantees to each registered holder of a FNMA Certificate that it
will distribute amounts representing such holder's proportionate share of       
scheduled principal and interest payments at the applicable pass-through rate   
provided for by such FNMA Certificate on the underlying mortgage loans, whether 
or not received, and such holder's proportionate share of the full principal    
amount of any foreclosed or other finally liquidated mortgage loan, whether or  
not such principal amount is actually recovered. The obligations of FNMA under  
its guarantees are obligations solely of FNMA and are not backed by, or entitled
to, the full faith and credit of the United States. Although the Secretary of   
the Treasury of the United States has discretionary authority to lend FNMA up to
$2.25 billion outstanding at any time, neither the United States nor any agency 
thereof is obligated to finance FNMA's operations or to assist FNMA in any other
manner. If FNMA were unable to satisfy its obligations, distributions to holders
of FNMA Certificates would consist solely of payments and other recoveries on   
the underlying mortgage loans and, accordingly, monthly distributions to holders
of FNMA Certificates would be affected by delinquent payments and defaults on   
such mortgage loans.                                                            

     FNMA Certificates evidencing interests in pools of mortgage loans formed on
or after May 1, 1985 (other than FNMA Certificates backed by pools containing   
graduated payment mortgage loans or mortgage loans secured by multifamily       
projects) are available in book-entry form only. Distributions of principal and 
interest on each FNMA Certificate will be made by FNMA on the 25th day of each  
month to the persons in whose name the FNMA Certificate is entered in the books 
of the Federal Reserve Banks (or registered on the FNMA Certificate register in 
the case of fully registered FNMA Certificates) as of the close of business on  
the last day of the preceding month. With respect to FNMA Certificates issued in
book-entry form, distributions thereon will be made by wire, and with respect to
fully registered FNMA Certificates, distributions thereon will be made by check.

     As described above, the FNMA Certificates included in a Trust Fund, and the
related underlying mortgage loans, may have characteristics and terms different 
from those described above. Any such different characteristics and terms will be
described in the related Prospectus Supplement.                                 

    Stripped Mortgage-Backed Securities.  Agency Securities may consist of one
or more stripped mortgage-backed securities, each as described herein and in the
related Prospectus Supplement. Each such Agency Security will represent an      
undivided interest in all or part of either the principal distributions (but not
the interest distributions) or the interest distributions (but not the principal
distributions), or in some specified portion of the principal and interest      
distributions (but not all of such distributions) on certain FHLMC, FNMA or GNMA
Certificates. The underlying securities will be held under a trust agreement by 
FHLMC, FNMA or GNMA, each as trustee, or by another trustee named in the related
Prospectus Supplement. FHLMC, FNMA or GNMA will guaranty each stripped Agency   
Security to the same extent as such entity guarantees the underlying securities 
backing such stripped Agency Security, unless otherwise specified in the related
Prospectus Supplement.                                                          

Other Agency Securities.  If specified in the related Prospectus      
Supplement, a Trust Fund may include other mortgage pass-through certificates   
issued or guaranteed by GNMA, FNMA or FHLMC. The characteristics of any such    
mortgage pass-through certificates will be described in such Prospectus         
Supplement. If so specified, a combination of different types of Agency         
Securities may be held in a Trust Fund.                                         

19

P-->424B3128th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 128th

PRIVATE MORTGAGE-BACKED SECURITIES 

General.  Private Mortgage-Backed Securities may consist of (a) mortgage
pass-through certificates or participation certificates evidencing an undivided 
interest in a Mortgage Pool or (b) collateralized mortgage obligations secured  
by Mortgage Loans. Private Mortgage-Backed Securities may include stripped      
mortgage-backed securities representing an undivided interest in all or a part  
of either the principal distributions (but not the interest distributions) or   
the interest distributions (but not the principal distributions) or in some     
specified portion of the principal and interest distributions (but not all of   
such distributions) on certain Mortgage Loans. Private Mortgage-Backed          
Securities will have been publicly issued pursuant to a pooling and servicing   
agreement, an indenture or similar agreement (a "PMBS Agreement"). Unless       
otherwise specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, the seller/servicer of
the underlying Mortgage Loans will have entered into the PMBS Agreement with the
trustee under such PMBS Agreement (the "PMBS Trustee"). The PMBS Trustee or its 
agent, or a custodian, will possess the Mortgage Loans underlying such Private  
Mortgage-Backed Securities. Mortgage Loans underlying a Private Mortgage-Backed 
Security will be serviced by a servicer (the "PMBS Servicer") directly or by one
or more subservicers who may be subject to the supervision of the PMBS Servicer.

  The issuer of the Private Mortgage-Backed Securities (the "PMBS Issuer")
will be a financial institution or other entity engaged generally in the        
business of mortgage lending, a public agency or instrumentality of a state,    
local or federal government, or a limited purpose corporation organized for the 
purpose of, among other things, establishing trusts and acquiring and selling   
housing loans to such trusts and selling beneficial interests in such trusts. If
so specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, the PMBS Issuer may be an    
affiliate of the Depositor. The obligations of the PMBS Issuer will generally be
limited to certain representations and warranties with respect to the assets    
conveyed by it to the related trust. Unless otherwise specified in the related  
Prospectus Supplement, the PMBS Issuer will not have guaranteed any of the      
assets conveyed to the related trust or any of the Private Mortgage-Backed      
Securities issued under the PMBS Agreement. Additionally, although the Mortgage 
Loans underlying the Private Mortgage-Backed Securities may be guaranteed by an 
agency or instrumentality of the United States, the Private Mortgage-Backed     
Securities themselves will not be so guaranteed.                                

Distributions of principal and interest will be made on the Private   
Mortgage-Backed Securities on the dates specified in the related Prospectus     
Supplement. The Private Mortgage-Backed Securities may be entitled to receive   
nominal or no principal distributions or nominal or no interest distributions.  
Principal and interest distributions will be made on the Private Mortgage-Backed
Securities by the PMBS Trustee or the PMBS Servicer. The PMBS Issuer or the PMBS
Servicer may have the right to repurchase assets underlying the Private         
Mortgage-Backed Securities after a certain date or under other circumstances    
specified in the related Prospectus Supplement.                                 

Underlying Loans.  The Mortgage Loans underlying the Private          
Mortgage-Backed Securities may consist of fixed rate, level payment, fully      
amortizing loans or graduated payment mortgage loans, Buydown Loans, adjustable 
rate mortgage loans, or loans having balloon or other special payment features. 
Such Mortgage Loans may be secured by single family property or by an assignment
of the proprietary lease or occupancy agreement relating to a specific dwelling 
within a Cooperative and the related shares issued by such Cooperative.         

   Additional Information.  The Prospectus Supplement for a Series for which
the Trust Fund includes Private Mortgage-Backed Securities will specify, to the 
extent known to the Depositor, (i) the aggregate approximate principal amount   
and type of the Private Mortgage-Backed Securities to be included in the Trust  
Fund, (ii) certain characteristics of the Mortgage Loans which comprise the     
underlying assets for the Private Mortgage-Backed Securities including (A) the  
payment features of such Mortgage Loans, (B) the approximate aggregate principal
balance of underlying Mortgage Loans insured or guaranteed by a governmental    
entity, (C) the servicing fee or range of servicing fees with respect to the    
Mortgage Loans and (D) the minimum and maximum stated maturities of the         
underlying Mortgage Loans at origination, (iii) the maximum original            
term-to-stated maturity of the Private Mortgage-Backed Securities, (iv) the     
weighted average term-to-stated maturity of the Private Mortgage-Backed         
Securities, (v) the pass-through or                                             

20

P-->424B3129th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 129th

certificate rate of the Private Mortgage-Backed Securities, (vi) the weighted   
average pass-through or certificate rate of the Private Mortgage-Backed         
Securities, (vii) the PMBS Issuer, the PMBS Servicer (if other than the PMBS    
Issuer) and the PMBS Trustee for such Private Mortgage-Backed Securities, (viii)
certain characteristics of credit support, if any, such as reserve funds,       
insurance policies, surety bonds, letters of credit or guaranties relating to   
the Mortgage Loans underlying the Private Mortgage-Backed Securities or to such 
Private Mortgage-Backed Securities themselves, (ix) the term on which the       
underlying Mortgage Loans for such Private Mortgage-Backed Securities may, or   
are required to, be purchased prior to their stated maturity or the stated      
maturity of the Private Mortgage-Backed Securities and (x) the terms on which   
Mortgage Loans may be substituted for those originally underlying the Private   
Mortgage-Backed Securities.                                                     

SUBSTITUTION OF MORTGAGE ASSETS 

    Substitution of Mortgage Assets will be permitted in the event of breaches
of representations and warranties with respect to any original Mortgage Asset or
in the event the documentation with respect to any Mortgage Asset is determined 
by the Trustee or a custodian appointed by the Trustee to be incomplete. The    
period during which such substitution will be permitted generally will be       
indicated in the related Prospectus Supplement. The related Prospectus          
Supplement will describe any other conditions upon which Mortgage Assets may be 
substituted for Mortgage Assets initially included in the Trust Fund.           

USE OF PROCEEDS 

Unless otherwise specified in the applicable Prospectus Supplement,   
substantially all of the net proceeds from the sale of each Series of           
Certificates will be used by the Depositor for the purchase of the Mortgage     
Assets represented by the Certificates of such Series or to reimburse amounts   
previously used to effect such a purchase, the costs of carrying the related    
Mortgage Assets until the sale of the Certificates and other expenses connected 
with pooling the related Mortgage Assets and issuing the Certificates. The      
Depositor expects to sell Certificates in Series from time to time, but the     
timing and amount of offerings of Certificates will depend on a number of       
factors, including, among others, the volume of Mortgage Assets acquired by the 
Depositor, prevailing interest rates, availability of funds and general market  
conditions.                                                                     

THE DEPOSITOR 

     First Union Residential Securitization Transactions, Inc. (the "Depositor")
was incorporated in the State of North Carolina on February 27, 1996, as a      
wholly-owned, limited purpose subsidiary of First Union National Bank, a        
national banking association (a subsidiary of First Union Corporation, a North  
Carolina corporation). The Depositor maintains its principal executive office at
301 South College Street, Charlotte, North Carolina 28202-0600. Its telephone   
number is (704) 383-3624.                                                       

As described herein under "Mortgage Loan Program -- Representations by
Sellers; Repurchases," the only obligations, if any, of the Depositor with      
respect to a Series of Certificates may be pursuant to certain limited          
representations and warranties and limited undertakings to repurchase or        
substitute Mortgage Loans under certain circumstances. The Depositor will have  
no ongoing servicing obligations or responsibilities with respect to any        
Mortgage Pool. The Depositor does not have, nor is it expected in the future to 
have, any significant assets.                                                   

     As specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, the Master Servicer with
respect to any Series of Certificates evidencing interests in Mortgage Loans may
be an affiliate of the Depositor. As described under "The Trust Fund -- The
Mortgage Loans -- General," "-- Agency Securities" and "-- Private Mortgage-
Backed Securities," the Depositor anticipates that it will acquire Mortgage     
Loans, Agency Securities and Private Mortgage-Backed Securities in the open     
market or in privately negotiated transactions, which may be through or from an 
affiliate.                                                                      

Neither the Depositor nor First Union Corporation nor any of its      
affiliates, including First Union Capital Markets and First Union National Bank,
will insure or guarantee the Certificates of any Series.                        

21

P-->424B3130th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 130th

MORTGAGE LOAN PROGRAM 

The Mortgage Loans will have been purchased by the Depositor, either  
directly or through affiliates, from one or more Sellers, which may be          
affiliates of the Depositor. Unless otherwise specified in the related          
Prospectus Supplement, the Mortgage Loans so acquired by the Depositor will have
been originated in accordance with the underwriting criteria specified below    
under "-- Underwriting Standards." See the Prospectus Supplement for each Series
of Certificates for a more detailed description of the mortgage loan program of 
the Sellers.                                                                    

UNDERWRITING STANDARDS 

Unless otherwise specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, each 
Seller will represent and warrant that all Mortgage Loans originated or acquired
by it and sold to the Depositor will have been underwritten in accordance with  
standards consistent with those utilized by mortgage lenders generally during   
the period of origination for similar types of loans. As to any Mortgage Loan   
insured by the FHA or partially guaranteed by the VA, the Seller will represent 
that it has complied with underwriting policies of the FHA or the VA, as the    
case may be.                                                                    

    Underwriting standards are applied by or on behalf of a lender to evaluate
the borrower's credit standing and repayment ability, and the value and adequacy
of the Mortgaged Property as collateral. In general, a prospective borrower     
applying for a Mortgage Loan is required to fill out a detailed application     
designed to provide to the underwriting officer pertinent credit information. As
part of the description of the borrower's financial condition, the borrower     
generally is required to provide a current list of assets and liabilities and a 
statement of income and expenses, as well as an authorization to apply for a    
credit report which summarizes the borrower's credit history. In addition, an   
employment verification may be requested from an independent source (typically  
the borrower's employer) or, in lieu thereof, verbal verification is obtained if
the applicant has supplied a copy of a current pay stub along with personal tax 
returns. In the case of Home Equity Loans, a pay stub is required of the        
borrower and either independent employment verification, tax returns or verbal  
confirmation of employment is obtained. Self-employed applicants typically      
submit the last two years' employment history and business tax returns. Upon    
receipt of the application package, a Seller usually conducts its own review of 
the application package and may, in some instances, obtain additional           
information concerning the prospective borrower prior to approving the loan.    
Along with obtaining a credit report, such Seller may solicit a written         
verification of the applicant's existing first mortgage balance, if any, and    
payment history from the first mortgage lender, if appropriate. If such lender  
does not respond in writing, verbal verification is attempted and the applicant 
generally is required to submit the prior year's mortgage statements which      
generally reflect a monthly payment history. In the case of those Home Equity   
Loans which are subordinate to a first lien mortgage loan, the Seller also      
obtains one of the following: (i) a credit report covering the preceding twelve 
months, (ii) written or verbal verification of the applicant's first mortgage   
balance, if any, (iii) written confirmation from a first mortgagee, if any, of  
the prospective borrower's most recent twelve-month payment history, (iv)       
canceled mortgage payment checks for the preceding twelve months, (v) a         
combination of items from clauses (i) through (iv) above that establish a       
payment history on the first mortgage for the prior twelve months, or (vi) if   
the first mortgage is privately held, twelve cancelled payment checks and a copy
of the executed first mortgage note.                                            

 In determining the adequacy of the Mortgaged Property as collateral, an
appraisal is made of each property considered for financing (except in the case 
of low balance Home Equity Loans). The appraiser is required to inspect the     
property and verify that it is in good repair and that construction, if new, has
been completed. The appraisal is based on the market value of comparable homes, 
the estimated rental income (if considered applicable by the appraiser) and the 
cost of replacing the home.                                                     

Once all applicable employment, credit and property information is    
received, a determination generally is made as to whether the prospective       
borrower has sufficient monthly income available (i) to meet the borrower's     
monthly obligations on the proposed mortgage loan, and on any senior mortgage   
loan, in the case of a proposed Home Equity Loan (generally determined on the   
basis of the monthly payments due in the year of origination), and other        
expenses related to the Mortgaged Property (such as property taxes and hazard   

22

P-->424B3131st Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 131st

insurance) and (ii) to meet monthly housing expenses and other financial        
obligations and monthly living expenses. In connection with the origination of a
Mortgage Loan, the Seller evaluates each obligor's credit quality and assigns a 
credit grade of A, B, C or D to each such borrower. Certain credit grades may   
have sub-grades. The obligors of Home Equity Loans have generally been assigned 
credit grades of A2 or lower. Mortgage Loans other than Home Equity Loans       
generally have a credit grade of A. The underwriting standards applied by       
Sellers, particularly with respect to the level of loan documentation and the   
mortgagor's income and credit history, may be varied in appropriate cases where 
factors such as low Loan-to-Value Ratios or other favorable credit exist.       

Unless otherwise specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, the  
Mortgage Loans are secured by a mortgage on property located in any of the 50   
states or the District of Columbia. Mortgage Loans may be secured by leases on  
real property under guidelines that a Seller determines in its discretion are   
acceptable to institutional mortgage investors. Generally, a loan will be       
secured by a lease only if the use of leasehold estates as security for mortgage
loans is common and customary in the area, the lease is not subject to any prior
lien that could result in termination of the lease and the term of the lease    
ends five years beyond the maturity date of the related Mortgage Loan.          

Unless otherwise provided in the applicable Prospectus Supplement, all
Mortgage Loans will be covered by an appropriate standard form American Land    
Title Association ("ALTA") title insurance policy, or a substantially similar   
policy or form of insurance acceptable to the Federal National Mortgage         
Association ("FNMA") or the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation ("FHLMC"), or
an attorney's title opinion.                                                    

     If so specified in the applicable Prospectus Supplement, Mortgage Loans may
be subject to temporary interest subsidy agreements ("Subsidy Loans") pursuant  
to which the monthly payments made by the related mortgagors will be less than  
the scheduled monthly payments on such Mortgage Loans with the present value of 
the resulting difference in payment ("Subsidy Payments") being provided by the  
employer of the mortgagor generally on an annual basis. Unless otherwise        
specified in the applicable Prospectus Supplement, Subsidy Payments will be     
placed in a custodial account ("Subsidy Account") by the Servicer. Despite the  
existence of a subsidy program, a mortgagor remains primarily liable for making 
all scheduled payments on a Subsidy Loan and for all other obligations provided 
for in the related Mortgage Note and Mortgage Loan.                             

     If so specified in the applicable Prospectus Supplement, the Trust Fund may
contain Mortgage Loans subject to temporary Buydown Loans pursuant to which the 
monthly payments made by the mortgagor during the early years of the Mortgage   
Loan will be less than the scheduled monthly payments on the Mortgage Loan. The 
resulting difference in payment will be compensated for from an amount          
contributed by the seller of the related Mortgaged Property or another source,  
including the originator of the Mortgage Loan (generally on a present value     
basis) and, if so specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, placed in a   
Buydown Fund by the Master Servicer.                                            

     If so specified in the applicable Prospectus Supplement, the Trust Fund may
include Mortgage Loans which are amortized over 30 years but which have shorter 
terms to maturity (each such Mortgage Loan, a "Balloon Loan") that causes the   
outstanding principal balance of the related Mortgage Loan to be due and payable
at the end of a certain specified period (the "Balloon Period"). Unless         
otherwise specified in the applicable Prospectus Supplement, the borrower of    
such Balloon Loan will be obligated to pay the entire outstanding principal     
balance of the Balloon Loan at the end of the related Balloon Period.           

     Certain of the types of Mortgage Loans that may be included in a Trust Fund
are recently developed and may involve additional uncertainties not present in  
traditional types of loans. For example, certain of such Mortgage Loans may     
provide for escalating or variable payments by the mortgagor or obligor. These  
types of Mortgage Loans are underwritten on the basis of a judgment that        
mortgagors or obligors will have the ability to make monthly payments required  
initially. In some instances, however, a mortgagor's or obligor's income may not
be sufficient to permit continued loan payments as such payments increase. These
types of Mortgage Loans may also be underwritten primarily upon the basis of    
Loan-to-Value Ratios or other favorable credit factors.                         

23

P-->424B3132nd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 132nd
QUALIFICATIONS OF SELLERS                                                       

Unless otherwise specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, each 
Seller will be required to satisfy the qualifications set forth herein. Each    
Seller must be an institution experienced in originating and servicing Mortgage 
Loans of the type contained in the related Mortgage Pool in accordance with     
accepted practices and prudent guidelines, and must maintain satisfactory       
facilities to originate and service those Mortgage Loans. Each Seller must be a 
seller/servicer approved by either FNMA or FHLMC. Each Seller must be a         
mortgagee approved by the FHA or an institution the deposit accounts in which   
are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (the "FDIC").          

REPRESENTATIONS BY SELLERS; REPURCHASES 

     Each Seller will have made representations and warranties in respect of the
Mortgage Loans sold by such Seller and evidenced by a Series of Certificates.   
Such representations and warranties unless otherwise provided in the related    
Prospectus Supplement generally include, among other things, that (i)           
immediately prior to the transfer and assignment of the Mortgage Loans, the     
seller had good title to, and was the sole owner of, each Mortgage Loan and     
there had been no other sale or assignment thereof, (ii) as of the date of such 
transfer, the Mortgage Loans are subject to no offsets, defenses or             
counterclaims, (iii) each Mortgage Loan at the time it was made complied in all 
material respects with applicable state and federal laws, including usury, equal
credit opportunity and disclosure laws, (iv) a lender's policy of title         
insurance or an attorney's title opinion was issued on the date of the          
origination of each Mortgage Loan and each such policy is valid and remains in  
full force and effect, (v) as of the date of such transfer, each Mortgage       
subject to the Agreement is a valid lien on the related Mortgaged Property      
(subject only to (a) permitted senior liens on such Mortgaged Property and (b)  
the exceptions to title set forth in the related title insurance policy or      
attorney's opinion, which exceptions are generally acceptable to mortgage       
lending companies, and such other exceptions to which similar properties are    
commonly subject and which do not individually, or in the aggregate, materially 
and adversely affect the benefits of the security intended to be provided by    
such Mortgage), and to the best knowledge of the Seller, such property is free  
of material damage and is in good repair, (vi) as of the date of such transfer, 
no Mortgage Loan is more than 30 days delinquent in payment and there are no    
delinquent tax or assessment liens against the related Mortgaged Property, and  
(vii) with respect to each Mortgage Loan, if the Mortgaged Property is located  
in an area identified by the Federal Emergency Management Agency as having      
special flood hazards and subject in certain circumstances to the availability  
of flood insurance under the National Flood Insurance Act of 1968, as amended,  
such Mortgaged Property is covered by flood insurance.                          

   If so specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, the representations
and warranties of a Seller in respect of a Mortgage Loan will be made not as of 
the Cut-off Date but as of the date on which such Seller sold the Mortgage Loan 
to the Depositor or one of its affiliates. Under such circumstances, a          
substantial period of time may have elapsed between such date and the date of   
initial issuance of the Series of Certificates evidencing an interest in such   
Mortgage Loan. Since the representations and warranties of a Seller do not      
address events that may occur following the sale of a Mortgage Loan by such     
Seller, its repurchase obligation described below will not arise if the relevant
event that would otherwise have given rise to such an obligation with respect to
a Mortgage Loan occurs after the date of sale of such Mortgage Loan by such     
Seller to the Depositor or its affiliates. If the Master Servicer is also a     
Seller of Mortgage Loans with respect to a particular Series, such              
representations will be in addition to the representations and warranties made  
by the Master Servicer in its capacity as a Master Servicer.                    

   The Master Servicer or the Trustee, if the Master Servicer is the Seller,
will promptly notify the relevant Seller of any breach of any representation or 
warranty made by it in respect of a Mortgage Loan which materially and adversely
affects the interests of the Certificateholders in such Mortgage Loan. Unless   
otherwise specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, if such Seller cannot 
cure such breach within 90 days after notice from the Master Servicer or the    
Trustee, as the case may be, then such Seller will be obligated to repurchase   
such Mortgage Loan from the Trust Fund at a price (the "Purchase Price") equal  
to 100% of the Principal Balance thereof as of the date of the repurchase plus  
accrued interest thereon to the first day of the month in which the Purchase    
Price is to be distributed at the Mortgage Rate (less any                       

24

P-->424B3133rd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 133rd

unreimbursed Advances or amount payable as related servicing compensation if the
Seller is the Master Servicer with respect to such Mortgage Loan). If a REMIC   
election is to be made with respect to a Trust Fund, unless otherwise provided  
in the related Prospectus Supplement, holders of Subordinated Certificates or a 
holder of the related residual certificate will be obligated to pay any         
prohibited transaction tax which may arise in connection with any such          
repurchase. If the Master Servicer advances any such payment, it will be        
entitled to reimbursement from the assets of the related Trust Fund or from any 
holder of the related residual certificate, unless otherwise specified in the   
related Prospectus Supplement. See "Description of the Certificates -- General."
Except in those cases in which the Master Servicer is the Seller, the Master    
Servicer will be required under the applicable Agreement to enforce this        
obligation for the benefit of the Trustee and the holders of the Certificates,  
following the practices it would employ in its good faith business judgment were
it the owner of such Mortgage Loan. This repurchase obligation will constitute  
the sole remedy available to holders of Certificates or the Trustee for a breach
of representation by a Seller.                                                  

   Neither the Depositor nor the Master Servicer (unless the Master Servicer
is the Seller) will be obligated to purchase a Mortgage Loan if a Seller        
defaults on its obligation to do so, and no assurance can be given that Sellers 
will carry out their respective repurchase obligations with respect to Mortgage 
Loans. See "The Trust Fund -- Substitution of Mortgage Assets."

DESCRIPTION OF THE CERTIFICATES 

    Each Series of Certificates will be issued pursuant to an Agreement, dated
as of the related Cut-off Date, among the Depositor, the Master Servicer and the
Trustee for the benefit of the holders of the Certificates of such Series. The  
provisions of each Agreement will vary depending upon the nature of the         
Certificates to be issued thereunder and the nature of the related Trust Fund.  
Forms of Agreements are exhibits to the Registration Statement of which this    
Prospectus is a part. The following summaries describe certain provisions that  
may appear in each Agreement. The Prospectus Supplement for a Series of         
Certificates will describe any provision of the Agreement relating to such      
Series that materially differs from the description thereof contained in this   
Prospectus. The summaries do not purport to be complete and are subject to, and 
are qualified in their entirety by reference to, all of the provisions of the   
Agreement for each Series of Certificates and the applicable Prospectus         
Supplement. The Depositor will provide a copy of the Agreement (without         
exhibits) relating to any Series without charge upon written request of a holder
of record of a Certificate of such Series addressed to First Union Residential  
Securitization Transactions, Inc., 301 South College Street, Charlotte, North
Carolina 28288-0600.                                                            

GENERAL 

   Unless otherwise specified in the Prospectus Supplement, the Certificates
of each Series will be issued in either fully registered or book-entry form, in 
the authorized denominations specified in the related Prospectus Supplement,    
will evidence specified beneficial ownership interests in the related Trust Fund
created pursuant to each Agreement and will not be entitled to payments in      
respect of the assets included in any other Trust Fund established by the       
Depositor. The Certificates will not represent obligations of the Depositor or  
any affiliate of the Depositor. The Mortgage Loans will not be insured or       
guaranteed by any governmental entity or other person, unless otherwise         
specified in the related Prospectus Supplement. Each Trust Fund will consist of,
to the extent provided in the Agreement, (i) the Mortgage Assets, that from time
to time are subject to the related Agreement (exclusive of any amounts specified
in the related Prospectus Supplement ("Retained Interest")); (ii) such assets as
from time to time are required to be deposited in the related Collection        
Account, as defined below under "The Pooling and Servicing Agreement -- Payments
on Mortgage Loans; Deposits to Collection Account"; (iii) property which secured
a Mortgage Loan and which is acquired on behalf of the Certificateholders by    
foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure; and (iv) any Primary Mortgage       
Insurance Policies, FHA Insurance and VA Guarantees, and any other insurance    
policies or other forms of credit enhancement required to be maintained pursuant
to the Agreement. If so specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, a Trust 
Fund may also include one or more of the following: reinvestment income on      
payments received on the Mortgage Assets, a reserve fund, a mortgage pool       
insurance policy, a special hazard                                              

25

P-->424B3134th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 134th

insurance policy, a bankruptcy bond, one or more letters of credit, a surety    
bond, guaranties or similar instruments or other agreements.                    

 Each Series of Certificates will be issued in one or more classes. Each
class of Certificates of a Series will evidence beneficial ownership of a       
specified percentage (which may be 0%) or portion of future interest payments   
and a specified percentage (which may be 0%) or portion of future principal     
payments on the Mortgage Assets in the related Trust Fund. A Series of          
Certificates may include one or more classes that are senior or subordinate in  
right to payment to one or more other classes of Certificates of such Series.   
Certain Series or classes of Certificates may be covered by insurance policies, 
surety bonds or other forms of credit enhancement, in each case as described    
herein and in the related Prospectus Supplement. One or more classes of         
Certificates of a Series may be entitled to receive principal distributions,    
with disproportionate, nominal or no interest distributions or to interest      
distributions, with disproportionate, nominal or no principal distributions or  
any combination thereof. Distributions on one or more classes of a Series of    
Certificates may be made prior to one or more other classes, after the          
occurrence of specified events, in accordance with a schedule or formula, on the
basis of collections from designated portions of the Mortgage Assets in the     
related Trust Fund, or on a different basis, in each case as specified in the   
related Prospectus Supplement. The timing, amounts, sequential order and        
priority of payment of such distributions may vary among classes or over time as
specified in the related Prospectus Supplement.                                 

Unless otherwise specified in the related Prospectus Supplement,      
distributions of principal and interest (or, where applicable, of principal only
or interest only) on the related Certificates will be made by the Trustee on    
each Distribution Date (i.e., monthly, quarterly, semi-annually or at such other
intervals and on the dates as are specified in the Prospectus Supplement) in    
proportion to the percentages specified in the related Prospectus Supplement.   
Distributions will be made to the persons in whose names the Certificates are   
registered at the close of business on the dates specified in the related       
Prospectus Supplement (each, a "Record Date"). Distributions will be made by    
check or money order mailed to the persons entitled thereto at the address      
appearing in the register maintained for holders of Certificates (the           
"Certificate Register") or, if specified in the related Prospectus Supplement,  
in the case of Certificates that are of a certain minimum denomination, upon    
written request by the Certificateholder, by wire transfer or by such other     
means as are described therein; provided, however, that the final distribution  
in retirement of the Certificates will be made only upon presentation and       
surrender of the Certificates at the office or agency of the Trustee or other   
person specified in the notice to Certificateholders of such final distribution.

The Certificates will be freely transferable and exchangeable at the  
Corporate Trust Office of the Trustee as set forth in the related Prospectus    
Supplement. No service charge will be made for any registration of exchange or  
transfer of Certificates of any Series but the Trustee may require payment of a 
sum sufficient to cover any related tax or other governmental charge.           

    Under current law the purchase and holding by or on behalf of any employee
benefit plan or other retirement arrangement (including individual retirement   
accounts and annuities, Keogh plans and collective investment funds in which    
such plans, accounts or arrangements are invested) subject to provisions of     
ERISA or the Code of a class of Certificates entitled only to a specified       
percentage of payments of either interest or principal or a notional amount of  
either interest or principal on the related Mortgage Loans or a class of        
Certificates entitled to receive payments of interest and principal on the      
Mortgage Loans only after payments to other classes or after the occurrence of  
certain specified events may result in "prohibited transactions" within the     
meaning of ERISA and the Code. See "ERISA Considerations." Unless otherwise     
specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, transfer of Certificates of such
a class will not be registered unless the transferee (i) represents that it is  
not, and is not purchasing on behalf of, any such plan, account or arrangement  
or (ii) provides an opinion of counsel satisfactory to the Trustee and the      
Depositor that the purchase of Certificates of such a class by or on behalf of  
such plan, account or arrangement is permissible under applicable law and will  
not subject the Trustee, the Master Servicer or the Depositor to any obligation 
or liability in addition to those undertaken in the Agreement.                  

    As to each Series, an election may be made to treat the related Trust Fund
or designated portions thereof as one or more "real estate mortgage investment  
conduits" (each, a "REMIC") as defined in the Code. The                         

26

P-->424B3135th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 135th

related Prospectus Supplement will specify whether a REMIC election is to be    
made. Alternatively, the Agreement for a Series may provide that a REMIC        
election may be made at the discretion of the Depositor or the Seller and may be
made only if certain conditions are satisfied. As to any such Series, the terms 
and provisions applicable to the making of a REMIC election, as well as any     
material federal income tax consequences to Certificateholders not otherwise    
described herein, will be set forth in the related Prospectus Supplement. If    
such an election is made with respect to a Series, one of the classes will be   
designated as evidencing the sole class of "residual interests" in the related  
REMIC, as defined in the Code. All other classes of Certificates in such a      
Series will constitute "regular interests" in the related REMIC, as defined in  
the Code. As to each Series with respect to which a REMIC election is to be     
made, holders of Subordinated Certificates or a holder of the related residual  
certificate will be obligated to take all actions required in order to comply   
with applicable laws and regulations and will be obligated to pay any prohibited
transaction taxes. The Master Servicer, unless otherwise specified in the       
related Prospectus Supplement, will be entitled to reimbursement for any such   
payment from the assets of the Trust Fund or from any holder of the related     
residual certificate.                                                           

   Unless otherwise specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, upon the
conversion of such Mortgage Loan from an adjustable interest rate to a fixed    
interest rate, the Seller or its successor will be obligated to purchase such   
related Mortgage Loan from the related Trust Fund.                              

DISTRIBUTIONS ON CERTIFICATES                                                   

General.  In general, the method of determining the amount of distributions
on a particular Series of Certificates will depend on the type of credit        
support, if any, that is used with respect to such Series. See "Credit
Enhancement." Set forth below are descriptions of various methods that may be   
used to determine the amount of distributions on the Certificates of a          
particular Series. The Prospectus Supplement for each Series of Certificates    
will describe the method to be used in determining the amount of distributions  
on the Certificates of such Series. Distributions allocable to principal of and 
interest on the Certificates will be made by the Trustee out of, and only to the
extent of, funds in the related Collection Account, including any funds         
transferred from any Reserve Fund. As between Certificates of different classes 
and as between distributions of principal (and, if applicable, between          
distributions of Principal Prepayments, as defined below, and scheduled payments
of principal) and interest, distributions made on any Distribution Date will be 
applied as specified in the related Prospectus Supplement. Unless otherwise     
specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, distributions to any class of   
Certificates will be made pro rata to all Certificateholders of that class.     

Available Distribution Amount.  Unless otherwise specified in the related
Prospectus Supplement, all distributions on the Certificates of each Series on  
each Distribution Date will be made from the Available Distribution Amount      
described below, in accordance with the terms described in the related          
Prospectus Supplement and specified in the Agreement. Unless otherwise provided 
in the related Prospectus Supplement, the "Available Distribution Amount" for   
each Distribution Date will equal the sum of the following amounts:             

         (i) the aggregate of all previously undistributed payments on account
of principal (including Principal Prepayments, if any, and prepayment 
penalties, if so provided in the related Prospectus Supplement) and   
interest on the Mortgage Loans in the related Trust Fund (including   
     Liquidation Proceeds and Insurance Proceeds and amounts drawn under letters
   of credit or other credit enhancement instruments as permitted thereunder
   and as specified in the related Agreement) received by the Servicer after
 the Cut-off Date and on or prior to the day of the month of the related
Distribution Date specified in the related Prospectus Supplement (the 
"Determination Date") except:                                         

       (a) all payments that were due on or before the Cut-off Date;

      (b) all Liquidation Proceeds and all Insurance Proceeds, all
 Principal Prepayments and all other proceeds of any Mortgage Loan
      purchased by the Depositor, any Sub-Servicer or any Seller pursuant to
      the Agreement that were received after the prepayment period specified
in the related Prospectus Supplement and all related payments of
   interest representing interest for any period after such prepayment
period;                                                         

27

P-->424B3136th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 136th

            (c) all scheduled payments of principal and interest due on a date
  or dates subsequent to the first day of the month of distribution;

            (d) amounts received on particular Mortgage Loans as late payments
of principal or interest or other amounts required to be paid by
 Mortgagors, but only to the extent of any unreimbursed advance in
  respect thereof made by the Master Servicer (including the related
Sub-Servicers);                                                 

            (e) amounts representing reimbursement, to the extent permitted by
      the Agreement and as described under "-- Advances" below, for advances
     made by the Master Servicer or Sub-Servicers that were deposited into
  the Collection Account, and amounts representing reimbursement for
        certain other losses and expenses incurred by the Master Servicer or the
Depositor and described below;                                  

         (f) that portion of each collection of interest on a particular
        Mortgage Loan in such Trust Fund that represents credit enhancement fees
or servicing compensation payable to the Master Servicer or any 
  Sub-Servicer or Retained Interest that is to be retained from such
collection or is permitted to be retained from related Insurance
      Proceeds, Liquidation Proceeds or proceeds of Mortgage Loans purchased
pursuant to the Agreement;                                      

 (ii) the amount of any advance made by the Master Servicer or
    Sub-Servicer as described under "-- Advances" below and deposited by it in
the Collection Account; and                                           

(iii) if applicable, amounts withdrawn from a Reserve Fund. 

Distributions of Interest.  Unless otherwise specified in the related 
Prospectus Supplement, interest will accrue on the aggregate Certificate Balance
(or, in the case of Certificates entitled only to distributions allocable to    
interest, the aggregate notional amount) of each class of Certificates entitled 
to interest at the Pass-Through Rate (which may be a fixed rate or rate         
adjustable as specified in such Prospectus Supplement) from the date, and for   
the periods, specified in such Prospectus Supplement. To the extent funds are   
available therefor, interest accrued during each such specified period on each  
class of Certificates entitled to interest (other than a class of Certificates  
that provides for interest that accrues, but is not currently payable, referred 
to hereafter as "Accrual Certificates") will be distributable on the            
Distribution Dates specified in the related Prospectus Supplement until the     
aggregate Certificate Balance of the Certificates of such class has been        
distributed in full or, in the case of Certificates entitled only to            
distributions allocable to interest, until the aggregate notional amount of such
Certificates is reduced to zero or for the period of time designated in the     
related Prospectus Supplement. The original Certificate Balance of each         
Certificate will equal the aggregate distributions allocable to principal to    
which such Certificate is entitled. Unless otherwise specified in the related   
Prospectus Supplement, distributions allocable to interest on each Certificate  
that is not entitled to distributions allocable to principal will be calculated 
based on the notional amount of such Certificate. The notional amount of a      
Certificate will not evidence an interest in or entitlement to distributions    
allocable to principal but will be used solely for convenience in expressing the
calculation of interest and for certain other purposes.                         

With respect to any class of Accrual Certificates, if specified in the
related Prospectus Supplement, any interest that has accrued but is not paid on 
a given Distribution Date will be added to the aggregate Certificate Balance of 
such class of Certificates on that Distribution Date. Unless otherwise specified
in the related Prospectus Supplement, distributions of interest on each class of
Accrual Certificates will commence only after the occurrence of the events      
specified in such Prospectus Supplement. Unless otherwise specified in the      
related Prospectus Supplement, prior to such time, the beneficial ownership     
interest of such class of Accrual Certificates in the Trust Fund, as reflected  
in the aggregate Certificate Balance of such class of Accrual Certificates, will
increase on each Distribution Date by the amount of interest that accrued on    
such class of Accrual Certificates during the preceding interest accrual period 
but that was not required to be distributed to such class on such Distribution  
Date. Any such class of Accrual Certificates will thereafter accrue interest on 
its outstanding Certificate Balance as so adjusted.                             

Distributions of Principal.  Unless otherwise specified in the related
Prospectus Supplement, the aggregate "Certificate Balance" of any class of      
Certificates entitled to distributions of principal will be the                 

28

P-->424B3137th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 137th

aggregate original Certificate Balance of such class of Certificates specified  
in such Prospectus Supplement, reduced by all distributions reported to the     
holders of such Certificates as allocable to principal and (i) in the case of   
Accrual Certificates, if so specified in the related Prospectus Supplement,     
increased by all interest accrued but not then distributable on such Accrual    
Certificates and (ii) in the case of adjustable rate Certificates, if so        
specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, subject to the effect of        
negative amortization. The related Prospectus Supplement will specify the method
by which the amount of principal to be distributed on the Certificates on each  
Distribution Date will be calculated and the manner in which such amount will be
allocated among the classes of Certificates entitled to distributions of        
principal. A class of interest-only Certificates will not be entitled to        
distributions of principal and will have a notional principal balance on which  
interest will accrue.                                                           

     If so provided in the related Prospectus Supplement, one or more classes of
Senior Certificates will be entitled to receive all or a disproportionate       
percentage of the payments of principal that are received from borrowers in     
advance of their scheduled due dates and are not accompanied by amounts         
representing scheduled interest due after the month of such payments ("Principal
Prepayments") in the percentages and under the circumstances or for the periods 
specified in such Prospectus Supplement. Any such allocation of Principal       
Prepayments to such class or classes of Certificateholders will have the effect 
of accelerating the amortization of such Senior Certificates while increasing   
the interests evidenced by the Subordinated Certificates in the Trust Fund.     
Increasing the interests of the Subordinated Certificates relative to that of   
the Senior Certificates is intended to preserve the availability of the         
subordination provided by the Subordinated Certificates. See "Credit
Enhancement -- Subordination."                                                  

Unscheduled Distributions.  To the extent specified in the related    
Prospectus Supplement relating to a Series of Certificates which have less      
frequent than monthly Distribution Dates, the Certificates will be subject to   
receipt of distributions before the next scheduled Distribution Date under the  
circumstances and in the manner described below and in such Prospectus          
Supplement. If applicable, the Trustee will be required to make such unscheduled
distributions on the day and in the amount specified in the related Prospectus  
Supplement if, due to substantial payments of principal (including Principal    
Prepayments) on the Mortgage Assets, the Trustee or the Master Servicer         
determines that the funds available or anticipated to be available from the     
Collection Account and, if applicable, any Reserve Fund, may be insufficient to 
make required distributions on the Certificates on such Distribution Date.      
Unless otherwise specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, the amount of  
any such unscheduled distribution that is allocable to principal will not exceed
the amount that would otherwise have been required to be distributed as         
principal on the Certificates on the next Distribution Date. Unless otherwise   
specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, all unscheduled distributions   
will include interest at the applicable Pass-Through Rate (if any) on the amount
of the unscheduled distribution allocable to principal for the period and to the
date specified in such Prospectus Supplement. See "Yield and Prepayment
Considerations."                                                                

Unless otherwise specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, all  
distributions allocable to principal in any unscheduled distribution will be    
made in the same priority and manner as distributions of principal on the       
Certificates would have been made on the next Distribution Date, and with       
respect to Certificates of the same class, unscheduled distributions of         
principal will be made on a pro rata basis.                                     

   Notice of any unscheduled distribution will be given by the Trustee prior
to the date of such distribution.                                               

ADVANCES 

 Generally, the Master Servicer will be required to advance on or before
each Distribution Date (from its own funds, funds advanced by Sub-Servicers or  
funds held in the Collection Account for future distributions to the holders of 
such Certificates), an amount equal to the aggregate of payments of principal   
and interest (or, in the case of Home Equity Loans, payments of interest only)  
that were delinquent on the related Determination Date, subject to the Master   
Servicer's determination that such advances will be recoverable out of late     
payments by Mortgagors, Liquidation Proceeds, Insurance Proceeds or otherwise,  
and net of applicable servicing compensation. In the case of Cooperative Loans, 
the Master Servicer also will be required to advance any unpaid maintenance fees
and other charges under the related proprietary leases as specified in the      

29

P-->424B3138th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 138th

related Prospectus Supplement. The Prospectus Supplement for a Series of        
Certificates will specify the nature and timing of amounts to be advanced to the
holders of such Certificates and the manner in which Advances may be recovered  
by the Master Servicer. Funds so advanced are reimbursable to the Master        
Servicer to the extent permitted by the related Agreement. The Master Servicer's
obligation to make Advances will not guarantee or insure against losses to      
holders of the Certificates.                                                    

REPORTS TO CERTIFICATEHOLDERS 

    Prior to or concurrently with each distribution on a Distribution Date and
except as otherwise set forth in an applicable Prospectus Supplement, the Master
Servicer or the Trustee will furnish to each Certificateholder of record of the 
related Series a statement setting forth, to the extent applicable to such      
Series of Certificates, among other things:                                     

          (i) the amount of such distribution allocable to principal, separately
 identifying the aggregate amount of any Principal Prepayments and if so
specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, prepayment penalties  
included therein;                                                     

(ii) the amount of such distribution allocable to interest; 

(iii) the amount of any Advance;                            

       (iv) the outstanding Certificate Balance or notional amount of each
class of the related Series after giving effect to the distribution of
principal on such Distribution Date;                                  

    (v) the related amount of the servicing compensation retained or
withdrawn from the Collection Account by the Master Servicer;         

          (vi) the number and aggregate principal balances of Mortgage Loans (A)
delinquent (exclusive of Mortgage Loans in foreclosure) and (B) in    
 foreclosure as of the close of business on the last day of the calendar
month preceding such Distribution Date;                               

        (vii) the book value of any real estate acquired through foreclosure
or grant of a deed in lieu of foreclosure;                            

         (viii) if applicable, the amount remaining in any Reserve Fund at the
close of business on the Distribution Date;                           

     (ix) the Pass-Through Rate as of the day prior to the immediately
preceding Distribution Date; and                                      

       (x) any amounts remaining under letters of credit, pool policies or
other forms of credit enhancement.                                    

   Where applicable, any amount set forth above may be expressed as a dollar
amount per single Certificate of the relevant class having the Percentage       
Interest specified in the related Prospectus Supplement. The report to          
Certificateholders for any Series of Certificates may include additional or     
other information of a similar nature to that specified above.                  

In addition, within a reasonable period of time after the end of each 
calendar year, the Master Servicer or the Trustee will mail to each             
Certificateholder of record at any time during such calendar year a report (a)  
as to the aggregate of amounts reported pursuant to (i) and (ii) for such       
calendar year or, in the event such person was a Certificateholder of record    
during a portion of such calendar year, for the applicable portion of such year 
and (b) such other customary information as may be deemed necessary or desirable
for Certificateholders to prepare their tax returns.                            

BOOK-ENTRY REGISTRATION 

If so specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, a class of      
Certificates may be book-entry Certificates (the "Book-Entry Certificates").    
Persons acquiring beneficial ownership interests in such Certificates           
("Certificate Owners") will hold their Certificates through the Depository Trust
Company ("DTC") in the United States, or Cedel Bank, societe anonyme ("CEDEL")  
or the Euroclear System                                                         

30

P-->424B3139th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 139th

("Euroclear") in Europe if they are participants of such systems, or indirectly 
through organizations which are participants in such systems (each, a           
"Participant"). The Book-Entry Certificates will be issued in one or more       
certificates which equal the aggregate principal balance of such class of       
Certificates and will initially be registered in the name of Cede & Co.         
("Cede"), the nominee of DTC. CEDEL and Euroclear will hold omnibus positions on
behalf of their participants through customers' securities accounts in CEDEL's  
and Euroclear's names on the books of their respective depositaries, which in   
turn will hold such positions in customers' securities accounts in the          
depositaries' names on the books of DTC. Citibank N.A. will act as depositary   
for CEDEL, and Morgan Guaranty Trust Company of New York ("Morgan") will act as 
depositary for Euroclear (in such capacities, individually the "Relevant        
Depositary" and collectively, the "European Depositaries"). Except as described 
below, no person acquiring a Book-Entry Certificate (each, a "beneficial owner")
will be entitled to receive a physical certificate representing such Certificate
(a "Definitive Certificate"). Unless and until Definitive Certificates are      
issued, it is anticipated that the only "Certificateholder" of such Certificates
will be Cede, as nominee of DTC. Certificate Owners will not be                 
Certificateholders as that term is used in the Agreement. Certificate Owners are
only permitted to exercise their rights indirectly through Participants and DTC.

The beneficial owner's ownership of a Book-Entry Certificate will be  
recorded on the records of the brokerage firm, bank, thrift institution or other
financial intermediary (each, a "Financial Intermediary") that maintains the    
beneficial owner's account for such purpose. In turn, the Financial             
Intermediary's ownership of such Book-Entry Certificate will be recorded on the 
records of DTC (or of a participating firm that acts as agent for the Financial 
Intermediary, whose interest will in turn be recorded on the records of DTC, if 
the beneficial owner's Financial Intermediary is not a DTC participant, and on  
the records of CEDEL or Euroclear, as appropriate).                             

   Certificate Owners of a class of Book-Entry Certificates will receive all
distributions of principal of, and interest on, such Certificates from the      
Trustee through DTC and DTC participants. While such Certificates are           
outstanding (except under the circumstances described below), under the rules,  
regulations and procedures creating and affecting DTC and its operations (the   
"Rules"), DTC is required to make book-entry transfers among participants on    
whose behalf it acts with respect to such class of Certificates and is required 
to receive and transmit distributions of principal of, and interest on, such    
Certificates. Participants and indirect participants with whom Certificate      
Owners have accounts with respect to such Certificates are similarly required to
make book-entry transfers and receive and transmit such distributions on behalf 
of their respective Certificate Owners. Accordingly, although Certificate Owners
will not possess certificates, the Rules provide a mechanism by which           
Certificate Owners will receive distributions and will be able to transfer their
interest.                                                                       

    Certificate Owners will not receive or be entitled to receive certificates
representing their respective interests in such Certificates, except under the  
limited circumstances described below. Unless and until Definitive Certificates 
are issued, Certificate Owners who are not Participants may transfer ownership  
of such Certificates only through Participants and indirect participants by     
instructing such Participants and indirect participants to transfer such        
Certificates, by book-entry transfer, through DTC for the account of the        
purchasers of such Certificates, which account is maintained with their         
respective Participants. Under the Rules and in accordance with DTC's normal    
procedures, transfers of ownership of a class of Book-Entry Certificates will be
executed through DTC, and the accounts of the respective Participants at DTC    
will be debited and credited. Similarly, the Participants and indirect          
participants will make debits or credits, as the case may be, on their records  
on behalf of the selling and purchasing Certificate Owners.                     

   Because of time zone differences, credits of securities received in CEDEL
or Euroclear as a result of a transaction with a Participant will be made during
subsequent securities settlement processing and dated the business day following
the DTC settlement date. Such credits or any transactions in such securities    
settled during such processing will be reported to the relevant Euroclear or    
CEDEL Participants on such business day. Cash received in CEDEL or Euroclear as 
a result of sales of securities by or through a CEDEL participant (as defined   
below) or Euroclear Participant (as defined below) to a DTC Participant will be 
received with value on the DTC settlement date but will be available in the     
relevant CEDEL or Euroclear cash account only as of the business day following  
settlement in DTC. For information with respect to tax documentation procedures 
relating to the Certificates, see "Certain Federal Income Tax Consequences --   

31

P-->424B3140th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 140th

Non-U.S. Persons" and "-- Information Reporting and Backup Withholding" herein  
and "Global Clearance, Settlement and Tax Documentation Procedures -- Certain
U.S. Federal Income Tax Documentation Requirements" in Annex I hereto.          

 Transfers between Participants will occur in accordance with DTC rules.
Transfers between CEDEL Participants and Euroclear Participants will occur in   
accordance with their respective rules and operating procedures.                

Cross-market transfers between persons holding directly or indirectly 
through DTC, on the one hand, and directly or indirectly through CEDEL          
Participants or Euroclear Participants, on the other, will be effected in DTC in
accordance with DTC rules on behalf of the relevant European international      
clearing system by the Relevant Depositary; however, such cross-market          
transactions will require delivery of instructions to the relevant European     
international clearing system by the counterparty in such system in accordance  
with its rules and procedures and within its established deadlines (European    
time).                                                                          

The relevant European international clearing system will, if the      
transaction meets its settlement requirements, deliver instructions to the      
Relevant Depositary to take action to effect final settlement on its behalf by  
delivering or receiving securities in DTC, and making or receiving payment in   
accordance with normal procedures for same day funds settlement applicable to   
DTC. CEDEL Participants and Euroclear Participants may not deliver instructions 
directly to the European Depositaries.                                          

    DTC, which is a New York-chartered limited purpose trust company, performs
services for its participants, some of which (and/or their representatives) own 
DTC. In accordance with its normal procedures, DTC is expected to record the    
positions held by each DTC participant in the Book-Entry Certificates, whether  
held for its own account or as a nominee for another person. In general,        
beneficial ownership of Book-Entry Certificates will be subject to the rules,   
regulations and procedures governing DTC and DTC participants as in effect from 
time to time.                                                                   

CEDEL is incorporated under the laws of Luxembourg as a professional  
depository. CEDEL holds securities for its participating organizations ("CEDEL  
Participants") and facilitates the clearance and settlement of securities       
transactions between CEDEL participants through electronic book-entry changes in
accounts of CEDEL Participants, thereby eliminating the need for physical       
movement of certificates. Transactions may be settled in CEDEL in any of 28     
currencies, including United States dollars. CEDEL provides to its CEDEL        
Participants, among other things, services for safekeeping, administration,     
clearance and settlement of internationally traded securities and securities    
lending and borrowing. CEDEL interfaces with domestic markets in several        
countries. As a professional depository, CEDEL is subject to regulation by the  
Luxembourg Monetary Institute. CEDEL participants are recognized financial      
institutions around the world, including underwriters, securities brokers and   
dealers, banks, trust companies, clearing corporations and certain other        
organizations. Indirect access to CEDEL is also available to others, such as    
banks, brokers, dealers and trust companies that clear through or maintain a    
custodial relationship with a CEDEL participant, either directly or indirectly. 

Euroclear was created in 1968 to hold securities for its participants 
("Euroclear Participants") and to clear and settle transactions between         
Euroclear Participants through simultaneous electronic book-entry delivery      
against payment, thereby eliminating the need for physical movement of          
certificates and any risk from lack of simultaneous transfers of securities and 
cash. Transactions may be settled in any of 32 currencies, including United     
States dollars. Euroclear includes various other services, including securities 
lending and borrowing and interfaces with domestic markets in several countries 
generally similar to the arrangements for cross-market transfers with DTC       
described above. Euroclear is operated by the Brussels, Belgium, office of      
Morgan (the "Euroclear Operator"), under contract with Euroclear Clearance      
Systems S.C., a Belgian cooperative corporation (the "Cooperative"). All        
operations are conducted by the Euroclear Operator, and all Euroclear securities
clearance accounts and Euroclear cash accounts are accounts with the Euroclear  
Operator, not the Cooperative. The Cooperative establishes policy for Euroclear 
on behalf of Euroclear Participants. Euroclear Participants include banks       
(including central banks), securities brokers and dealers and other professional
financial intermediaries. Indirect access to Euroclear is also available to     
other firms that clear through or maintain a custodial relationship with a      
Euroclear Participant, either directly or indirectly.                           

32

P-->424B3141st Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 141st

The Euroclear Operator is the Belgian branch of a New York banking    
corporation which is a member bank of the Federal Reserve System. As such, it is
regulated and examined by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System  
and the New York State Banking Department, as well as the Belgian Banking       
Commission.                                                                     

     Securities clearance accounts and cash accounts with the Euroclear Operator
are governed by the Terms and Conditions Governing Use of Euroclear and the     
related Operating Procedures of the Euroclear System and applicable Belgian law 
(collectively, the "Terms and Conditions"). The Terms and Conditions govern     
transfers of securities and cash within Euroclear, withdrawals of securities and
cash from Euroclear, and receipts of payments with respect to securities in     
Euroclear. All securities in Euroclear are held on a fungible basis without     
attribution of specific certificates to specific securities clearance accounts. 
The Euroclear Operator acts under the Terms and Conditions only on behalf of    
Euroclear Participants, and has no record of or relationship with persons       
holding through Euroclear Participants.                                         

Distributions on the Book-Entry Certificates will be made on each     
Distribution Date by the Trustee to DTC. DTC will be responsible for crediting  
the amount of such payments to the accounts of the applicable DTC Participants  
in accordance with DTC's normal procedures. Each DTC participant will be        
responsible for disbursing such payments to the beneficial owners of the        
Book-Entry Certificates that it represents and to each Financial Intermediary   
for which it acts as agent. Each such Financial intermediary will be responsible
for disbursing funds to the beneficial owners of the Book-Entry Certificates    
that it represents.                                                             

     Under a book-entry format, beneficial owners of the Book-Entry Certificates
may experience some delay in their receipt of payments, since such payments will
be forwarded by the Trustee to Cede. Distributions with respect to Certificates 
held through CEDEL or Euroclear will be credited to cash accounts of CEDEL      
Participants or Euroclear Participants in accordance with the relevant system's 
rules and procedures, to the extent received by the Relevant Depositary. Such   
distributions will be subject to tax reporting in accordance with relevant      
United States tax laws and regulations. See "Certain Federal Income Tax
Consequences -- Non-U.S. Persons" and " -- Information Reporting and Backup
Withholding" herein. Because DTC can only act on behalf of Financial            
Intermediaries, the ability of a beneficial owner to pledge Book-Entry          
Certificates to persons or entities that do not participate in the Depository   
system, or otherwise take actions in respect of such Book-Entry Certificates,   
may be limited due to the lack of physical certificates for such Book-Entry     
Certificates. In addition, issuance of the Book-Entry Certificates in book-entry
form may reduce the liquidity of such Certificates in the secondary market since
certain potential investors may be unwilling to purchase Certificates for which 
they cannot obtain physical certificates.                                       

   Monthly and annual reports on the Trust Fund will be provided to Cede, as
nominee of DTC, and may be made available by Cede to beneficial owners upon     
request, in accordance with the rules, regulations and procedures creating and  
affecting the Depository, and to the Financial Intermediaries to whose DTC      
accounts the Book-Entry Certificates of such beneficial owners are credited.    

    With respect to each class of Book-Entry Certificates, DTC will advise the
Trustee that, unless and until Definitive Certificates are issued, DTC will take
any action permitted to be taken by the holders of such Book-Entry Certificates 
under the related Agreement only at the direction of one or more Financial      
Intermediaries to whose DTC accounts the Book-Entry Certificates are credited,  
to the extent that such actions are taken on behalf of Financial Intermediaries 
whose holdings include such Book-Entry Certificates. CEDEL or the Euroclear     
Operator, as the case may be, will take any other action permitted to be taken  
by a Certificateholder under such Agreement on behalf of a CEDEL Participant or 
Euroclear Participant only in accordance with its relevant rules and procedures 
and subject to the ability of the Relevant Depositary to effect such actions on 
its behalf through DTC. DTC may take actions, at the direction of the related   
Participants, with respect to some Certificates of a class of Book-Entry        
Certificates which conflict with actions taken with respect to other            
Certificates of such class.                                                     

   Definitive Certificates will be issued to beneficial owners of Book-Entry
Certificates, or their nominees, rather than to DTC, only if (a) DTC or the     
Depositor advises the related Trustee in writing that DTC is no longer willing, 
qualified or able to discharge properly its responsibilities as nominee and     
depository with respect to such Book-Entry Certificates and the Depositor or    
such Trustee is unable to locate a qualified                                    

33

P-->424B3142nd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 142nd

successor, (b) the Depositor, at its sole option, with the consent of such      
Trustee, elects to terminate a book-entry system through DTC, or (c) after the  
occurrence of an Event of Default (as defined in the related Prospectus         
Supplement), beneficial owners having Percentage Interests aggregating not less 
than 50% of the aggregate current principal amount of such Book-Entry           
Certificates advise the Trustee and DTC through the Financial Intermediaries and
the DTC Participants in writing that the continuation of a book-entry system    
through DTC (or a successor thereto) is no longer in the best interests of      
beneficial owners.                                                              

Upon the occurrence of any of the events described in the immediately 
preceding paragraph, the Trustee for such a Series will be required to notify   
all beneficial owners of the occurrence of such event and the availability      
through DTC of Definitive Certificates. Upon surrender by DTC of the global     
certificate or certificates representing the Book-Entry Certificates and        
instructions for re-registration, the Trustee will issue Definitive             
Certificates, and thereafter the Trustee will recognize the holders of such     
Definitive Certificates as Certificateholders of such Series under the related  
Agreement.                                                                      

   Although DTC, CEDEL and Euroclear have agreed to the foregoing procedures
in order to facilitate transfers of Certificates among participants of DTC,     
CEDEL and Euroclear, they are under no obligation to perform or continue to     
perform such procedures, and such procedures may be discontinued at any time.   

  Neither the Depositor, the Master Servicer nor the Trustee will have any
responsibility for any aspect of the records relating to or payments made on    
account of beneficial ownership interests of any class of Book-Entry            
Certificates held by Cede, as nominee for DTC, or for maintaining, supervising  
or reviewing any records relating to such beneficial ownership interests.       

CREDIT ENHANCEMENT

GENERAL 

     Credit enhancement may be provided with respect to one or more classes of a
Series of Certificates or with respect to the Mortgage Assets in the related    
Trust Fund. Credit enhancement may be in the form of a limited financial        
guaranty policy issued by an entity named in the related Prospectus Supplement, 
the subordination of one or more classes of the Certificates of such Series, the
establishment of one or more reserve funds, the use of a cross-support feature, 
use of a mortgage pool insurance policy, bankruptcy bond, special hazard        
insurance policy, surety bond or letters of credit described herein and in the  
related Prospectus Supplement, or any combination of the foregoing. Unless      
otherwise specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, any credit enhancement
will not provide protection against all risks of loss and will not guarantee    
repayment of the entire principal balance of the Certificates and interest      
thereon. If losses occur which exceed the amount covered by credit enhancement  
or which are not covered by the credit enhancement, Certificateholders will bear
their allocable share of deficiencies.                                          

SUBORDINATION 

   If so specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, protection afforded
to holders of one or more classes of Certificates of a Series (the "Subordinated
Certificates") by means of the subordination feature will be accomplished by the
preferential right of holders of one or more other classes of such Series (the  
"Senior Certificates") to distributions in respect of scheduled principal,      
Principal Prepayments, interest or any combination thereof that otherwise would 
have been payable to holders of Subordinated Certificates under the             
circumstances and to the extent specified in the related Prospectus Supplement. 
If specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, delays in receipt of         
scheduled payments on the Mortgage Loans and losses on defaulted Mortgage Loans 
will be borne first by the various classes of Subordinated Certificates and     
thereafter by the various classes of Senior Certificates, in each case under the
circumstances and subject to the limitations specified in such related          
Prospectus Supplement. The aggregate distributions in respect of delinquent     
payments on the Mortgage Loans over the lives of the Certificates or at any     
time, the aggregate losses in respect of defaulted Mortgage Loans which must be 
borne by the Subordinated Certificates by virtue of subordination and the amount
of the distributions otherwise distributable to the Subordinated                
Certificateholders that will be distributable to Senior Certificateholders on   
any Distribution Date may be limited as                                         

34

P-->424B3143rd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 143rd

specified in the related Prospectus Supplement. If aggregate distributions in   
respect of delinquent payments on the Mortgage Loans or aggregate losses in     
respect of such Mortgage Loans were to exceed an amount specified in the related
Prospectus Supplement, holders of Senior Certificates would experience losses on
the Certificates.                                                               

    In addition to or in lieu of the foregoing, if so specified in the related
Prospectus Supplement, all or any portion of distributions otherwise payable to 
holders of Subordinated Certificates on any Distribution Date may instead be    
deposited into one or more Reserve Funds established with the Trustee. If so    
specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, such deposits may be made on    
each Distribution Date, for specified periods or until the balance in the       
Reserve Funds has reached a specified amount and, following payments from the   
Reserve Fund to holders of Senior Certificates or otherwise, thereafter to the  
extent necessary to restore the balance in the Reserve Fund to required levels, 
in each case as specified in the related Prospectus Supplement. If so specified 
in the related Prospectus Supplement, amounts on deposit in the Reserve Fund may
be released to the holders of the class of Certificates specified in such       
Prospectus Supplement at the times and under the circumstances specified in such
Prospectus Supplement.                                                          

If specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, various classes of 
Senior Certificates and Subordinated Certificates may themselves be subordinate 
in their right to receive certain distributions to other classes of Senior and  
Subordinated Certificates, respectively, through a cross support mechanism or   
otherwise.                                                                      

As between classes of Senior Certificates and as between classes of   
Subordinated Certificates, distributions may be allocated among such classes (i)
in the order of their scheduled final distribution dates, (ii) in accordance    
with a schedule or formula, (iii) in relation to the occurrence of events, or   
(iv) otherwise, in each case as specified in the related Prospectus Supplement. 
As between classes of Subordinated Certificates, payments to holders of Senior  
Certificates on account of delinquencies or losses and payments to any Reserve  
Fund will be allocated as specified in the related Prospectus Supplement.       

MORTGAGE POOL INSURANCE POLICIES                                                

  If specified in the related Prospectus Supplement relating to a Mortgage
Pool, a separate mortgage pool insurance policy ("Mortgage Pool Insurance       
Policy") will be obtained for the Mortgage Pool and issued by the insurer (the  
"Pool Insurer") named in such Prospectus Supplement. Each Mortgage Pool         
Insurance Policy will, subject to the limitations described below, cover loss by
reason of default in payment on Mortgage Loans in the Mortgage Pool in an amount
equal to a percentage specified in such Prospectus Supplement of the aggregate  
principal balance of such Mortgage Loans on the Cut-off Date which are not      
covered as to their entire outstanding principal balances by Primary Mortgage   
Insurance Policies. As more fully described below, the Servicer will present    
claims thereunder to the Pool Insurer on behalf of itself, the Trustee and the  
holders of the Certificates. The Mortgage Pool Insurance Policies, however, are 
not blanket policies against loss, since claims thereunder may be made only     
respecting particular defaulted Mortgage Loans and only upon satisfaction of    
certain conditions precedent described below. Unless otherwise specified in the 
related Prospectus Supplement, the Mortgage Pool Insurance Policies will not    
cover losses due to a failure to pay or denial of a claim under a Primary       
Mortgage Insurance Policy.                                                      

Unless otherwise specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, each 
Mortgage Pool Insurance Policy will provide that no claims may be validly       
presented unless (i) any required Primary Mortgage Insurance Policy is in effect
for the defaulted Mortgage Loan and a claim thereunder has been submitted and   
settled; (ii) hazard insurance on the related Mortgaged Property has been kept  
in force and real estate taxes and other protection and preservation expenses   
have been paid; (iii) if there has been physical loss or damage to the Mortgaged
Property, it has been restored to its physical condition (reasonable wear and   
tear excepted) at the time of issuance of the policy; and (iv) the insured has  
acquired good and merchantable title to the Mortgaged Property free and clear of
liens except certain permitted encumbrances. Upon satisfaction of these         
conditions, the Pool Insurer will have the option either (a) to purchase the    
property securing the defaulted Mortgage Loan at a price equal to the principal 
balance thereof plus accrued and unpaid interest at the Mortgage Rate to the    
date of purchase and certain expenses incurred by the Master Servicer on behalf 
of the Trustee and Certificateholders or (b) to pay the amount by which the sum 
of the principal balance of the defaulted                                       

35

P-->424B3144th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 144th

Mortgage Loan plus accrued and unpaid interest at the Mortgage Rate to the date 
of payment of the claim and the aforementioned expenses exceeds the proceeds    
received from an approved sale of the Mortgaged Property, in either case net of 
certain amounts paid or assumed to have been paid under the related Primary     
Mortgage Insurance Policy. If any property securing a defaulted Mortgage Loan is
damaged and proceeds, if any, from the related hazard insurance policy or the   
applicable Special Hazard Insurance Policy are insufficient to restore the      
damaged property to a condition sufficient to permit recovery under the Mortgage
Pool Insurance Policy, the Master Servicer will not be required to expend its   
own funds to restore the damaged property unless it determines that (i) such    
restoration will increase the proceeds to Certificateholders on liquidation of  
the Mortgage Loan after reimbursement of the Master Servicer for its expenses   
and (ii) such expenses will be recoverable by it through proceeds of the sale of
the property or proceeds of the related Mortgage Pool Insurance Policy or any   
related Primary Mortgage Insurance Policy.                                      

Unless otherwise specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, no   
Mortgage Pool Insurance Policy will insure (and many Primary Mortgage Insurance 
Policies do not insure) against loss sustained by reason of a default arising   
from, among other things, (i) fraud or negligence in the origination or         
servicing of a Mortgage Loan, including misrepresentation by the Mortgagor, the 
originator or persons involved in the origination thereof or (ii) failure to    
construct a Mortgaged Property in accordance with plans and specifications. A   
failure of coverage attributable to one of the foregoing events might result in 
a breach of the related Seller's representations described above and, in such   
event, might give rise to an obligation on the part of such Seller to purchase  
the defaulted Mortgage Loan if the breach cannot be cured by such Seller. No    
Mortgage Pool Insurance Policy will cover (and many Primary Mortgage Insurance  
Policies do not cover) a claim in respect of a defaulted Mortgage Loan occurring
when the servicer of such Mortgage Loan, at the time of default or thereafter,  
was not approved by the applicable insurer.                                     

Unless otherwise specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, the  
original amount of coverage under each Mortgage Pool Insurance Policy will be   
reduced over the life of the related Certificates by the aggregate dollar amount
of claims paid less the aggregate of the net amounts realized by the Pool       
Insurer upon disposition of all foreclosed properties. The amount of claims paid
will include certain expenses incurred by the Master Servicer as well as accrued
interest on delinquent Mortgage Loans to the date of payment of the claim,      
unless otherwise specified in the related Prospectus Supplement. Accordingly, if
aggregate net claims paid under any Mortgage Pool Insurance Policy reach the    
original policy limit, coverage under that Mortgage Pool Insurance Policy will  
be exhausted and any further losses will be borne by the Certificateholders.    

SPECIAL HAZARD INSURANCE POLICIES 

If specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, a separate Special 
Hazard Insurance Policy will be obtained for the Mortgage Pool and will be      
issued by the insurer (the "Special Hazard Insurer") named in such Prospectus   
Supplement. Each Special Hazard Insurance Policy will, subject to limitations   
described below, protect holders of the related Certificates from (i) loss by   
reason of damage to Mortgaged Properties caused by certain hazards (including   
earthquakes and, to a limited extent, tidal waves and related water damage or as
otherwise specified in the related Prospectus Supplement) not insured against   
under the standard form of hazard insurance policy for the respective states in 
which the Mortgaged Properties are located or under a flood insurance policy if 
the Mortgaged Property is located in a federally designated flood area, and (ii)
loss caused by reason of the application of the coinsurance clause contained in 
hazard insurance policies. See "The Pooling and Servicing Agreement -- Hazard
Insurance." Each Special Hazard Insurance Policy will not cover losses          
occasioned by fraud or conversion by the Trustee or Master Servicer, war,       
insurrection, civil war, certain governmental action, errors in design, faulty  
workmanship or materials (except under certain circumstances), nuclear or       
chemical reaction, flood (if the Mortgaged Property is located in a federally   
designated flood area), nuclear or chemical contamination and certain other     
risks. The amount of coverage under any Special Hazard Insurance Policy will be 
specified in the related Prospectus Supplement. Each Special Hazard Insurance   
Policy will provide that no claim may be paid unless hazard and, if applicable, 
flood insurance on the property securing the Mortgage Loan have been kept in    
force and other protection and preservation expenses have been paid.            

36

P-->424B3145th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 145th

     Subject to the foregoing limitations, and unless otherwise specified in the
related Prospectus Supplement, each Special Hazard Insurance Policy will provide
that where there has been damage to property securing a foreclosed Mortgage Loan
(title to which has been acquired by the insured) and to the extent such damage 
is not covered by the hazard insurance policy or flood insurance policy, if any,
maintained by the Mortgagor or the Master Servicer, the Special Hazard Insurer  
will pay the lesser of (i) the cost of repair or replacement of such property or
(ii) upon transfer of the property to the Special Hazard Insurer, the unpaid    
principal balance of such Mortgage Loan at the time of acquisition of such      
property by foreclosure or deed in lieu of foreclosure, plus accrued interest to
the date of claim settlement and certain expenses incurred by the Master        
Servicer with respect to such property. If the unpaid principal balance of a    
Mortgage Loan plus accrued interest and certain expenses is paid by the Special 
Hazard Insurer, the amount of further coverage under the related Special Hazard 
Insurance Policy will be reduced by such amount less any net proceeds from the  
sale of the property. Any amount paid as the cost of repair of the property will
further reduce coverage by such amount. So long as a Mortgage Pool Insurance    
Policy remains in effect, the payment by the Special Hazard Insurer of the cost 
of repair or of the unpaid principal balance of the related Mortgage Loan plus  
accrued interest and certain expenses will not affect the total insurance       
proceeds paid to Certificateholders, but will affect the relative amounts of    
coverage remaining under the related Special Hazard Insurance Policy and        
Mortgage Pool Insurance Policy.                                                 

To the extent and in the manner specified in an applicable Prospectus 
Supplement, the Master Servicer may deposit cash, an irrevocable letter of      
credit or any other instrument acceptable to each nationally recognized rating  
agency rating the Certificates of the related Series in a special trust account 
to provide protection in lieu of or in addition to that provided by a Special   
Hazard Insurance Policy. The amount of any Special Hazard Insurance Policy or of
the deposit to the special trust account relating to such Certificates in lieu  
thereof may be reduced so long as any such reduction will not result in a       
downgrading of the rating of such Certificates by any such rating agency.       

BANKRUPTCY BONDS 

If specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, a bankruptcy bond  
("Bankruptcy Bond") for proceedings under the federal Bankruptcy Code will be   
issued by an insurer named in such Prospectus Supplement. Each Bankruptcy Bond  
will cover, to the extent specified in the related Prospectus Supplement,       
certain losses resulting from a reduction by a bankruptcy court of scheduled    
payments of principal and interest on a Mortgage Loan or a reduction by such    
court of the principal amount of a Mortgage Loan and will cover certain unpaid  
interest on the amount of such a principal reduction from the date of the filing
of a bankruptcy petition. The required amount of coverage under each Bankruptcy 
Bond will be set forth in the related Prospectus Supplement. Coverage under a   
Bankruptcy Bond may be cancelled or reduced if such cancellation or reduction   
would not adversely affect the then current rating or ratings of the related    
Certificates. See "Certain Legal Aspects of the Mortgage
Loans -- Anti-Deficiency Legislation and Other Limitations on Lenders."         

    To the extent specified in an applicable Prospectus Supplement, the Seller
may deposit cash, an irrevocable letter of credit or any other instrument       
acceptable to each nationally recognized rating agency rating the Certificates  
of the related Series in a special trust account to provide protection in lieu  
of or in addition to that provided by a Bankruptcy Bond. The amount of any      
Bankruptcy Bond or of the deposit to the special trust account relating to such 
Certificates in lieu thereof may be reduced so long as any such reduction will  
not result in a downgrading of the rating of such Certificates by any such      
rating agency.                                                                  

RESERVE FUNDS 

   If so specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, credit support with
respect to a Series of Certificates may be provided by the establishment and    
maintenance with the Trustee for such Series of Certificates, in trust, of one  
or more Reserve Funds for such Series. The related Prospectus Supplement will   
specify whether or not such Reserve Funds will be included in the Trust Fund for
such Series.                                                                    

37

P-->424B3146th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 146th

    The Reserve Fund for a Series will be funded (i) by the deposit therein of
cash, U.S. Treasury securities, instruments evidencing ownership of principal or
interest payments thereon, letters of credit, demand notes, certificates of     
deposit or a combination thereof in the aggregate amount specified in the       
related Prospectus Supplement, (ii) by the deposit therein from time to time of 
certain amounts, as specified in the related Prospectus Supplement to which the 
Subordinated Certificateholders, if any, would otherwise be entitled or (iii) in
such other manner as may be specified in the related Prospectus Supplement.     

  Any amounts on deposit in the Reserve Fund and the proceeds of any other
instrument upon maturity will be held in cash or will be invested in Permitted  
Investments which, unless otherwise specified in the related Prospectus         
Supplement, will include obligations of the United States and certain agencies  
thereof, certificates of deposit, certain commercial paper, time deposits and   
bankers acceptances sold by eligible commercial banks and certain repurchase    
agreements of United States government securities with eligible commercial      
banks. If a letter of credit is deposited with the Trustee, such letter of      
credit will be irrevocable. Unless otherwise specified in the related Prospectus
Supplement, any instrument deposited therein will name the Trustee, in its      
capacity as trustee for the holders of the Certificates, as beneficiary and will
be issued by an entity acceptable to each rating agency that rates the          
Certificates. Additional information with respect to such instruments deposited 
in the Reserve Funds will be set forth in the related Prospectus Supplement.    

   Any amounts so deposited and payments on instruments so deposited will be
available for withdrawal from the Reserve Account for distribution to the       
holders of Certificates for the purposes, in the manner and at the times        
specified in the related Prospectus Supplement.                                 

CROSS SUPPORT                                                                   

     If specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, the beneficial ownership
of separate groups of assets included in a Trust Fund may be evidenced by       
separate classes of the related Series of Certificates. In such case, credit    
support may be provided by a cross support feature which requires that          
distributions be made with respect to Certificates evidencing a beneficial      
ownership interest in other asset groups within the same Trust Fund. The related
Prospectus Supplement for a Series which includes a cross-support feature will  
describe the manner and conditions for applying such cross support feature.     

     If specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, the coverage provided by
one or more forms of credit support may apply concurrently to two or more       
related Trust Funds. If applicable, the related Prospectus Supplement will      
identify the Trust Funds to which such credit support relates and the manner of 
determining the amount of the coverage provided thereby and of the application  
of such coverage to the identified Trust Funds.                                 

LIMITED GUARANTEE 

If specified in the Prospectus Supplement with respect to a Series of 
Certificates, credit enhancement may be provided in the form of a Limited       
Guarantee issued by a guarantor named therein. If specified in the related      
Prospectus Supplement, a Limited Guarantee may be provided by an affiliate or   
affiliates of the Depositor.                                                    

LETTER OF CREDIT 

    Alternative credit support with respect to a Series of Certificates may be
provided by the issuance of a Letter of Credit by the bank or financial         
institution specified in the applicable Prospectus Supplement. The coverage,    
amount and frequency of any reduction in coverage provided by a Letter of Credit
issued with respect to a Series of Certificates will be set forth in the related
Prospectus Supplement.                                                          

SURETY BONDS 

If specified in the Prospectus Supplement relating to a Series of     
Certificates, credit support with respect to one or more Classes of Certificates
of a Series may be provided by the issuance of a Surety Bond issued by a        
financial guarantee insurance company specified in the applicable Prospectus    
Supplement. The coverage,                                                       

38

P-->424B3147th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 147th

amount and frequency of any reduction in coverage provided by a Surety Bond will
be set forth in the related Prospectus Supplement.                              

OVERCOLLATERALIZATION                                                           

If specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, credit support may 
consist of overcollateralization whereby the aggregate principal amount of the  
Mortgage Assets, including any Subsequent Mortgage Assets, exceeds the aggregate
Certificate Balance of the Certificates. Such overcollateralization may exist on
the Closing Date or develop thereafter as a result of the application of certain
interest collections, in excess of amounts necessary to pay the Pass-Through    
Rate on the Certificates, received in connection with the Mortgage Assets,      
including any Subsequent Mortgage Assets. The existence of any                  
overcollateralization and the manner, if any, by which it increases or          
decreases, will be set forth in the related Prospectus Supplement.              

YIELD AND PREPAYMENT CONSIDERATIONS 

    The yields to maturity and weighted average lives of the Certificates will
be affected primarily by the amount and timing of principal payments received on
or in respect of the Mortgage Assets included in the related Trust Fund. The    
original terms to maturity of the Mortgage Loans in a given Mortgage Pool will  
vary depending upon the type of Mortgage Loans included therein. Each Prospectus
Supplement will contain information with respect to the type and maturities of  
the Mortgage Loans in the related Mortgage Pool. Unless otherwise specified in  
the related Prospectus Supplement, Mortgage Loans may be prepaid without penalty
in full or in part at any time. The prepayment experience on the Mortgage Loans 
in a Mortgage Pool will affect the life of the related Series of Certificates.  

 A number of factors, including, but not limited to, homeowner mobility,
economic conditions, the presence and enforceability of due-on-sale clauses,    
mortgage market interest rates and the availability of mortgage funds, may      
affect prepayment experience of Mortgage Loans.                                 

Unless otherwise provided in the related Prospectus Supplement, all   
conventional Mortgage Loans will contain due-on-sale provisions permitting the  
mortgagee to accelerate the maturity of the loan upon sale or certain transfers 
by the mortgagor of the underlying Mortgaged Property. Mortgage Loans insured by
the FHA, and Mortgage Loans partially guaranteed by the VA, are assumable with  
the consent of the FHA and the VA, respectively. Thus, the rate of prepayments  
on such Mortgage Loans may be lower than that of conventional Mortgage Loans    
bearing comparable interest rates. Unless otherwise provided in the related     
Prospectus Supplement, the Master Servicer generally will enforce any           
due-on-sale or due-on-encumbrance clause, to the extent it has knowledge of the 
conveyance or further encumbrance or the proposed conveyance or proposed further
encumbrance of the Mortgaged Property and reasonably believes that it is        
entitled to do so under applicable law; provided, however, the Master Servicer  
will not take any enforcement action that would impair or threaten to impair any
recovery under any related insurance policy. See "The Pooling and Servicing
Agreement -- Collection Procedures" and "Certain Legal Aspects of the Mortgage
Loans" for a description of certain provisions of each Agreement and certain    
legal developments that may affect the prepayment experience on the Mortgage    
Loans.                                                                          

 The rate of prepayments with respect to conventional mortgage loans has
fluctuated significantly in recent years. In general, if prevailing rates fall  
significantly below the Mortgage Rates borne by the Mortgage Loans, such        
Mortgage Loans are likely to be subject to higher prepayment rates than if      
prevailing interest rates remain at or above such Mortgage Rates. Conversely, if
prevailing interest rates rise appreciably above the Mortgage Rates borne by the
Mortgage Loans, such Mortgage Loans are likely to experience a lower prepayment 
rate than if prevailing rates remain at or below such Mortgage Rates. However,  
there can be no assurance that such will be the case.                           

     When a full prepayment is made on a Mortgage Loan, the Mortgagor is charged
interest on the principal amount of the Mortgage Loan so prepaid only for the   
number of days in the month actually elapsed up to the date of the prepayment   
rather than for a full month. If so specified in the related Prospectus         
Supplement, the effect of prepayments in full will be to reduce the amount of   
interest passed through in the following month to                               

39

P-->424B3148th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 148th

holders of Certificates because interest on the principal amount of any Mortgage
Loan so prepaid will be paid only to the date of prepayment. Partial prepayments
in a given month may be applied to the outstanding principal balances of the    
Mortgage Loans so prepaid on the first day of the month of receipt or the month 
following receipt. In the latter case, partial prepayments will not reduce the  
amount of interest passed through in such month. Unless otherwise specified in  
the related Prospectus Supplement, both full and partial prepayments will not be
passed through until the month following receipt.                               

   The effective yield to Certificateholders will be slightly lower than the
yield otherwise produced by the applicable Pass-Through Rate and purchase price 
because while interest will accrue on each Mortgage Loan from the first day of  
the month (unless otherwise provided in the related Prospectus Supplement), the 
distribution of such interest will not be made earlier than the Distribution    
Date in the month following the month of accrual.                               

  Under certain circumstances, the Master Servicer or the holder(s) of the
residual interest(s) in a REMIC may have the option to purchase the assets of a 
Trust Fund thereby effecting earlier retirement of the related Series of        
Certificates. See "The Pooling and Servicing Agreement -- Termination; Optional
Termination."                                                                   

 If so specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, upon notification
from a Mortgagor of such Mortgagor's intent to convert from an adjustable       
interest rate to a fixed interest rate, and prior to the conversion of such     
Mortgage Loan, the Seller will be obligated to purchase such related Mortgage   
Loan. Any such purchase of a Mortgage Loan would have the effect of a prepayment
in full of the Mortgage Loan.                                                   

   From time to time, a Seller or its affiliates may solicit the refinancing
of loans (including the Mortgage Loans) by offering a new loan to the borrower. 
Any such refinancing of a Mortgage Loan would have the effect of a prepayment in
full of the Mortgage Loan.                                                      

  Factors other than those identified herein and in the related Prospectus
Supplement could significantly affect principal prepayments at any time and over
the lives of the Certificates. The relative contribution of the various factors 
affecting prepayment may also vary from time to time. There can be no assurance 
as to the rate of payment of principal of the Mortgage Assets at any time or    
over the lives of the Certificates.                                             

     The Prospectus Supplement relating to a Series of Certificates will discuss
in greater detail the effect of the rate and timing of principal payments       
(including prepayments), delinquencies and losses on the yield, weighted average
lives and maturities of such Certificates.                                      

THE POOLING AND SERVICING AGREEMENT 

    Set forth below is a summary of certain provisions of each Agreement which
are not described elsewhere in this Prospectus. Where particular provisions or  
terms used in the Agreements are referred to, such provisions or terms are as   
specified in the Agreements.                                                    

ASSIGNMENT OF MORTGAGE ASSETS 

Assignment of the Mortgage Loans.  Unless otherwise specified in the  
related Prospectus Supplement, at the time of issuance of the Certificates of a 
Series, the Depositor will cause the Mortgage Loans comprising the related Trust
Fund to be assigned to the Trustee, together with all principal and interest    
received by or on behalf of the Depositor on or with respect to such Mortgage   
Loans after the Cut-off Date, other than principal and interest due on or before
the Cut-off Date and other than any Retained Interest specified in the related  
Prospectus Supplement. The Trustee will, concurrently with such assignment,     
deliver the Certificates to the Depositor in exchange for the Mortgage Loans.   
Each Mortgage Loan will be identified in a schedule appearing as an exhibit to  
the related Agreement. Such schedule will include information as to the         
outstanding principal balance of each Mortgage Loan after application of        
payments due on the Cut-off Date, as well as information regarding the Mortgage 
Rate, the current scheduled monthly payment of principal and interest, the      
maturity of the loan, the Loan-to-Value Ratio (or, in the case of Home Equity   
Loans, the Combined Loan-to-Value Ratio) at origination and certain other       
information. If specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, the             

40

P-->424B3149th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 149th

Depositor will deliver or cause to be delivered to the Trustee loans at a       
predetermined price for inclusion in the Trust Fund within three months after   
the issuance of the Certificates. The related Prospectus Supplement for the     
Trust Fund will specify whether, and the terms, conditions and manner under     
which Subsequent Mortgage Assets will be sold to the Trust Fund within such     
three month period.                                                             

 In addition, the Depositor will deliver or cause to be delivered to the
Trustee (or to the custodian hereinafter referred to) as to each Mortgage Loan, 
among other things, (i) the mortgage note (the "Mortgage Note") endorsed without
recourse in blank or to the order of the Trustee, (ii) the mortgage, deed of    
trust or similar instrument (a "Mortgage") with evidence of recording indicated 
thereon (except for any Mortgage not returned from the public recording office, 
in which case the Depositor will unless otherwise specified in the related      
Prospectus Supplement, deliver or cause to be delivered a copy of such Mortgage 
together with a certificate that the original of such Mortgage was delivered to 
such recording office), (iii) an assignment of the Mortgage to the Trustee,     
which assignment will be in recordable form, and (iv) such other security       
documents as may be specified in the related Prospectus Supplement or the       
related Agreement. Unless otherwise specified in the related Prospectus         
Supplement, the Depositor will promptly cause the assignments of the related    
loans to be recorded in the appropriate public office for real property records,
except in states in which, in the opinion of counsel acceptable to the Trustee, 
such recording is not required to protect the Trustee's interest in such loans  
against the claim of any subsequent transferee or any successor to or creditor  
of the Depositor or the originator of such loans.                               

With respect to any Mortgage Loans which are Cooperative Loans, the   
Depositor will cause to be delivered to the Trustee, the related original       
cooperative note endorsed without recourse in blank or to the order of the      
Trustee, the original security agreement, the proprietary lease or occupancy    
agreement, the recognition agreement, an executed financing agreement and the   
relevant stock certificate, related blank stock powers and any other document   
specified in the related Prospectus Supplement. The Depositor will cause to be  
filed in the appropriate office an assignment and a financing statement         
evidencing the Trustee's security interest in each Cooperative Loan.            

 The Trustee (or the custodian hereinafter referred to) will review such
Mortgage Loan documents within the time period specified in the related         
Prospectus Supplement after receipt thereof, and the Trustee will hold such     
documents in trust for the benefit of the Certificateholders. Unless otherwise  
specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, if any such document is found to
be missing or defective in any material respect, the Trustee (or such custodian)
will notify the Master Servicer and the Depositor, and the Master Servicer will 
notify the related Seller. If the Seller cannot cure the omission or defect     
within the time period specified in the related Prospectus Supplement after     
receipt of such notice, the Seller will be obligated to purchase the related    
Mortgage Loan from the Trustee at the Purchase Price or, if so specified in the 
related Prospectus Supplement, replace such Mortgage Loan with another mortgage 
loan that meets certain requirements set forth therein. There can be no         
assurance that a Seller will fulfill this purchase obligation. Although the     
Master Servicer may be obligated to enforce such obligation to the extent       
described above under "Mortgage Loan Program -- Representations by Sellers;
Repurchases," neither the Master Servicer nor the Depositor will be obligated to
purchase such Mortgage Loan if the Seller defaults on its purchase obligation,  
unless such breach also constitutes a breach of the representations or          
warranties of the Seller or the Depositor, as the case may be. Unless otherwise 
specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, this purchase obligation        
constitutes the sole remedy available to the Certificateholders or the Trustee  
for omission of, or a material defect in, a constituent document.               

A custodian may maintain possession of, and, if applicable, review the
documents relating to, the Mortgage Loans as agent of the Trustee pursuant      
either to the terms of an Agreement or a separate custodial agreement.          

    Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions, with respect to a Trust Fund for
which a REMIC election is to be made, unless the related Prospectus Supplement  
otherwise provides, no purchase of a Mortgage Loan will be made if such purchase
would result in a prohibited transaction tax under the Code.                    

Assignment of Agency Securities.  The Depositor will cause the Agency 
Securities to be registered in the name of the Trustee or its nominee, and the  
Trustee concurrently will execute, countersign and deliver the                  

41

P-->424B3150th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 150th

Certificates. Each Agency Security will be identified in a schedule appearing as
an exhibit to the Agreement, which will specify as to each Agency Security the  
original principal amount and outstanding principal balance as of the Cut-off   
Date, the annual pass-through rate (if any) and the maturity date.              

     Assignment of Private Mortgage-Backed Securities.  The Depositor will cause
Private Mortgage-Backed Securities to be registered in the name of the Trustee. 
The Trustee (or the custodian) will have possession of any certificated Private 
Mortgage-Backed Securities. Unless otherwise specified in the related Prospectus
Supplement, the Trustee will not be in possession of or be assignee of record of
any underlying assets for a Private Mortgage-Backed Security. See "The Trust    
Fund -- Private Mortgage-Backed Securities" herein. Each Private Mortgage-Backed
Security will be identified in a schedule appearing as an exhibit to the related
Agreement which will specify the original principal amount, outstanding         
principal balance as of the Cut-off Date, annual pass-through rate or interest  
rate and maturity date and certain other pertinent information for each Private 
Mortgage-Backed Security conveyed to the Trustee.                               

PAYMENTS ON MORTGAGE LOANS; DEPOSITS TO COLLECTION ACCOUNT 

    The Master Servicer will establish and maintain or cause to be established
and maintained with respect to the related Trust Fund a separate account or     
accounts for the collection of payments on the related Mortgage Assets in the   
Trust Fund (the "Collection Account"), which unless otherwise specified in the  
related Prospectus Supplement, must be either (i) maintained with a depository  
institution the short-term debt obligations of which (or in the case of a       
depository institution that is the principal subsidiary of a holding company,   
the short-term debt obligations of which) are rated in the highest short-term   
rating category by the nationally recognized statistical rating organization(s) 
that rated one or more classes of the related Series of Certificates (each, a   
"Rating Agency"), (ii) an account or accounts the deposits in which are fully   
insured by either the BIF or SAIF, (iii) an account or accounts the deposits in 
which are insured by the BIF or SAIF (to the limits established by the FDIC),   
and the uninsured deposits in which are otherwise secured such that, as         
evidenced by an opinion of counsel, the Certificateholders have a claim with    
respect to the funds in the Collection Account or a perfected first priority    
security interest against any collateral securing such funds that is superior to
the claims of any other depositors or general creditors of the depository       
institution with which the Collection Account is maintained, (iv) a trust       
account or accounts maintained with the trust department of a federal or a state
chartered depository institution or trust company, acting in a fiduciary        
capacity or (v) an account or accounts otherwise acceptable to each Rating      
Agency. The Collection Account may be maintained at FUNB so long as it maintains
a long-term unsecured rating of at least A by Standard & Poor's Ratings Services
and A2 by Moody's Investor's Service, Inc., and a short-term rating of at least 
A-1 by Standard & Poor's Ratings Services and P-1 by Moody's Investor's Service,
Inc. Investments in which amounts in the Collection Account may be invested are 
limited to United States government securities and other high-quality           
investments ("Eligible Investments"). A Collection Account may be maintained as 
an interest bearing account or the funds held therein may be invested pending   
each succeeding Distribution Date in Eligible Investments. Unless otherwise     
specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, the Master Servicer or its      
designee will be entitled to receive any such interest or other income earned on
funds in the Collection Account as additional compensation and will be obligated
to deposit in the Collection Account the amount of any loss immediately as      
realized. The Collection Account may be maintained with the Master Servicer or  
with a depository institution that is an affiliate of the Master Servicer,      
provided it meets the standards set forth above.                                

     The Master Servicer will deposit or cause to be deposited in the Collection
Account for each Trust Fund on a daily basis, to the extent applicable and      
unless otherwise specified in the related Prospectus Supplement and provided in 
the Agreement, the following payments and collections received or advances made 
by or on behalf of it subsequent to the Cut-off Date (other than payments due on
or before the Cut-off Date and exclusive of any amounts representing Retained   
Interest):                                                                      

 (i) all payments on account of principal, including Principal
Prepayments and, if specified in the related Prospectus Supplement,   
prepayment penalties, on the Mortgage Loans;                          

42

P-->424B3151st Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 151st

          (ii) all payments on account of interest on the Mortgage Loans, net of
applicable servicing compensation;                                    

    (iii) (a) all proceeds (net of unreimbursed payments of property
    taxes, insurance premiums and similar items ("Insured Expenses") incurred,
and unreimbursed advances made, if any, by the Servicer or any        
 Sub-Servicer) of the hazard insurance policies and any Primary Mortgage
Insurance Policies, to the extent such proceeds are not applied to the
     restoration of the property or released to the Mortgagor in accordance with
     the Master Servicer's normal servicing procedures (collectively, "Insurance
    Proceeds") and (b) "Net Liquidation Proceeds" consisting of all other cash
amounts received and retained in connection with the liquidation of   
defaulted Mortgage Loans, by foreclosure or otherwise ("Liquidation   
Proceeds") net of unreimbursed expenses incurred in connection with   
liquidation or foreclosure ("Liquidation Expenses") and unreimbursed  
    advances made, if any, by the Master Servicer or any Sub-Servicer, and (c)
     any net proceeds received on a monthly basis with respect to any properties
     acquired on behalf of the Certificateholders by foreclosure or deed in lieu
of foreclosure;                                                       

         (iv) all proceeds of any Mortgage Loan or property in respect thereof
purchased by any Seller as described under "Mortgage Loan
Program -- Representations by Sellers; Repurchases" or " -- Assignment of
Mortgage Assets" above and all proceeds of any Mortgage Loan repurchased as
described under " -- Termination; Optional Termination" below;        

       (v) all payments required to be deposited in the Collection Account
with respect to any deductible clause in any blanket insurance policy 
described under " -- Hazard Insurance" below;                         

      (vi) any amount required to be deposited by the Master Servicer in
connection with losses realized on investments for the benefit of the 
    Master Servicer of funds held in the Collection Account and, to the extent
     specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, any payments required to be
made by the Master Servicer in connection with prepayment interest    
shortfalls; and                                                       

      (vii) all other amounts required to be deposited in the Collection
Account pursuant to the Agreement.                                    

     The Master Servicer (or the Depositor, as applicable) may from time to time
direct the institution which maintains the Collection Account, unless otherwise 
specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, to withdraw funds from the      
Collection Account for the following purposes:                                  

         (i) to pay to the Master Servicer the servicing fees described in the
    related Prospectus Supplement, the Master Servicing Fee and, as additional
  servicing compensation, earnings on or investment income with respect to
funds in the amounts in the Collection Account credited thereto;      

(ii) to reimburse the Master Servicer for Advances;         

      (iii) to reimburse the Master Servicer for any Advances previously
made which the Master Servicer has determined to be nonrecoverable;   

     (iv) to reimburse the Master Servicer from Insurance Proceeds for
expenses incurred by the Master Servicer and covered by the related   
insurance policies;                                                   

         (v) to reimburse the Master Servicer for unpaid Master Servicing Fees
  and unreimbursed out-of-pocket costs and expenses incurred by the Master
 Servicer in the performance of its servicing obligations, such right of
reimbursement being limited to amounts received representing late     
recoveries of the payments for which such advances were made;         

          (vi) to pay to the Master Servicer, with respect to each Mortgage Loan
or property acquired in respect thereof that has been purchased by the
     Master Servicer pursuant to the Agreement, all amounts received thereon and
     not taken into account in determining the related Principal Balance of such
repurchased Mortgage Loan;                                            

        (vii) to reimburse the Master Servicer or the Depositor for expenses
incurred and reimbursable pursuant to the Agreement;                  

43

P-->424B3152nd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 152nd

         (viii) to withdraw any amount deposited in the Collection Account and
not required to be deposited therein; and                             

          (ix) to clear and terminate the Collection Account upon termination of
the Agreement.                                                        

In addition, unless otherwise specified in the related Prospectus     
Supplement, on or prior to the Business Day immediately preceding each          
Distribution Date, the Master Servicer shall withdraw from the Collection       
Account the amount of Available Distribution Amount, to the extent on deposit,  
for deposit in an account maintained by the Trustee for the related Series of   
Certificates.                                                                   

PRE-FUNDING ACCOUNT 

 If so specified in the Prospectus Supplement, the related Agreement may
provide for the transfer by the Depositor of additional Mortgage Assets (the    
"Subsequent Mortgage Assets") to the related Trust Fund after the Closing Date  
for the related Certificates. Such Subsequent Mortgage Assets will be required  
to conform to the requirements set forth in the related Agreement providing for 
such transfer. As specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, such transfer 
may be funded by the establishment of a Pre-Funding Account (a "Pre-Funding
Account"). If a Pre-Funding Account is established, all or a portion of the     
proceeds of the sale of one or more classes of Certificates of the related      
Series will be deposited in such account (the "Pre-Funded Amount") to be        
released as additional Mortgage Assets are transferred to the Trust Fund. The   
related Agreement will establish a period of time (which will be no longer than 
three months following the related Closing Date) within which such transfers    
must be made (the "Funding Period"). Unless otherwise specified in the related  
Prospectus Supplement, amounts set aside to fund such transfers (whether in a   
Pre-Funding Account or otherwise) and not so applied within the Funding Period  
will be deemed to be principal prepayments and applied in the manner set forth  
in the Prospectus Supplement.                                                   

COLLECTION PROCEDURES 

The Servicer, directly or through one or more Sub-Servicers, will make
reasonable efforts to collect all payments called for under the Mortgage Loans  
and will, consistent with each Agreement and any Mortgage Pool Insurance Policy,
Primary Mortgage Insurance Policy, FHA Insurance, VA Guaranty Policy and        
Bankruptcy Bond or alternative arrangements, follow such collection procedures  
as are customary with respect to mortgage loans that are comparable to the      
Mortgage Loans. Consistent with the above, the Master Servicer may, in its      
discretion, (i) waive any assumption fee, late payment or other charge in       
connection with a Mortgage Loan and (ii) to the extent not inconsistent with the
coverage of such Mortgage Loan by a Mortgage Pool Insurance Policy, Primary     
Mortgage Insurance Policy, FHA Insurance, VA Guaranty or Bankruptcy Bond or     
alternative arrangements, if applicable, arrange with a Mortgagor a schedule for
the liquidation of delinquencies in a manner that is determined by the Master   
Servicer to be customary with respect to comparable mortgage loans. Such        
schedules for liquidation of delinquencies for Mortgage Loans other than Home   
Equity Loans generally do not exceed 180 days. To the extent the Master Servicer
is obligated to make or to cause to be made Advances, such obligation will      
remain during the period of any such arrangement.                               

 Unless otherwise specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, in any
case in which property securing a Mortgage Loan has been, or is about to be,    
conveyed by the mortgagor or obligor, the Master Servicer will, to the extent it
has knowledge of such conveyance or proposed conveyance, exercise or cause to be
exercised its rights to accelerate the maturity of such Mortgage Loan under any 
due-on-sale clause applicable thereto, but only if the exercise of such rights  
is permitted by applicable law; provided, however, the Master Servicer will not 
take any enforcement action that would impair or threaten to impair any recovery
under any related insurance policy. If these conditions are not met or if the   
Master Servicer reasonably believes it is unable under applicable law to enforce
such due-on-sale clause, or if such Mortgage Loan is insured by the FHA or      
partially guaranteed by the VA, the Master Servicer will enter into or cause to 
be entered into an assumption agreement or a substitution agreement with the    
person to whom such property has been or is about to be conveyed, pursuant to   
which such person becomes liable for repayment of the Mortgage Loan.            

44

P-->424B3153rd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 153rd

    Any fee collected by or on behalf of the Master Servicer for entering into
an assumption agreement will be retained by or on behalf of the Master Servicer 
as additional servicing compensation. See "Certain Legal Aspects of the Mortgage
Loans -- Due-on-Sale Clauses." In connection with any such assumption, the terms
of the related Mortgage Loan may not be changed.                                

HAZARD INSURANCE 

    The Master Servicer will require the mortgagor or obligor on each Mortgage
Loan to maintain a hazard insurance policy providing for no less than the       
coverage of the standard form of fire insurance policy with extended coverage   
customary for the type of Mortgaged Property in the state in which such         
Mortgaged Property is located. Such coverage will be in an amount not less than 
the replacement value of the improvements securing such Mortgage Loan or the    
principal balance owing on such Mortgage Loan, whichever is less. All amounts   
collected by the Master Servicer under any hazard policy (except for amounts to 
be applied to the restoration or repair of the Mortgaged Property or released to
the mortgagor or obligor in accordance with the Master Servicer's normal        
servicing procedures) will be deposited in the related Collection Account. In   
the event that the Master Servicer maintains a blanket policy insuring against  
hazard losses on all the Mortgage Loans comprising part of a Trust Fund, it will
conclusively be deemed to have satisfied its obligation relating to the         
maintenance of hazard insurance. Such blanket policy may contain a deductible   
clause, in which case the Master Servicer will be required to deposit from its  
own funds into the related Collection Account the amounts which would have been 
deposited therein but for such clause.                                          

   In general, the standard form of fire and extended coverage policy covers
physical damage to or destruction of the improvements securing a Mortgage Loan  
by fire, lightning, explosion, smoke, windstorm and hail, riot, strike and civil
commotion, subject to the conditions and exclusions particularized in each      
policy. Although the policies relating to the Mortgage Loans may have been      
underwritten by different insurers under different state laws in accordance with
different applicable forms and therefore may not contain identical terms and    
conditions, the basic terms thereof are dictated by respective state laws, and  
most such policies typically do not cover any physical damage resulting from the
following: war, revolution, governmental actions, floods and other water-related
causes, earth movement (including earthquakes, landslides and mud flows),       
nuclear reactions, wet or dry rot, vermin, rodents, insects or domestic animals,
theft and, in certain cases, vandalism. The foregoing list is merely indicative 
of certain kinds of uninsured risks and is not intended to be all inclusive. If 
the Mortgaged Property securing a Mortgage Loan is located in a federally       
designated special flood area, the Master Servicer will require the mortgagor or
obligor to obtain and maintain flood insurance, to the extent such insurance is 
available.                                                                      

 The hazard insurance policies covering properties securing the Mortgage
Loans typically contain a clause which in effect requires the insured at all    
times to carry insurance of a specified percentage (generally 80% to 90%) of the
full replacement value of the insured property in order to recover the full     
amount of any partial loss. If the insured's coverage falls below this specified
percentage, then the insurer's liability in the event of partial loss will not  
exceed the larger of (i) the actual cash value (generally defined as replacement
cost at the time and place of loss, less physical depreciation) of the          
improvements damaged or destroyed or (ii) such proportion of the loss as the    
amount of insurance carried bears to the specified percentage of the full       
replacement cost of such improvements. Since the amount of hazard insurance the 
Master Servicer may cause to be maintained on the improvements securing the     
Mortgage Loans declines as the principal balances owing thereon decrease, and   
since improved real estate generally has appreciated in value over time in the  
past, the effect of this requirement in the event of partial loss may be that   
hazard insurance proceeds will be insufficient to restore fully the damaged     
property. If specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, a special hazard   
insurance policy will be obtained to insure against certain of the uninsured    
risks described above. See "Credit Enhancement -- Special Hazard Insurance
Policies."                                                                      

The Master Servicer will not require that a standard hazard or flood  
insurance policy be maintained on the cooperative dwelling relating to any      
Cooperative Loan. Generally, the Cooperative itself is responsible for          
maintenance of hazard insurance for the property owned by the Cooperative and   
the tenant-stockholders of that Cooperative do not maintain individual hazard   
insurance policies. To the extent, however, that a Cooperative and the related  
borrower on a Cooperative Loan do not maintain such insurance or do not         

45

P-->424B3154th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 154th

maintain adequate coverage or any insurance proceeds are not applied to the     
restoration of damaged property, any damage to such borrower's cooperative      
dwelling or such Cooperative's building could significantly reduce the value of 
the collateral securing such Cooperative Loan to the extent not covered by other
credit support.                                                                 

REALIZATION UPON DEFAULTED MORTGAGE LOANS                                       

    Primary Mortgage Insurance Policies.  The Master Servicer will maintain or
cause to be maintained, as the case may be, in full force and effect, to the    
extent specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, a Primary Mortgage       
Insurance Policy with regard to each Mortgage Loan for which such coverage is   
required. Primary Mortgage Insurance Policies are not required for Home Equity  
Loans. The Master Servicer will not cancel or refuse to renew any such Primary  
Mortgage Insurance Policy in effect at the time of the initial issuance of a    
Series of Certificates that is required to be kept in force under the applicable
Agreement unless the replacement Primary Mortgage Insurance Policy for such     
cancelled or nonrenewed policy is maintained with an insurer whose claims-paying
ability is sufficient to maintain the current rating of the classes of          
Certificates of such Series that have been rated.                               

   Although the terms and conditions of primary mortgage insurance vary, the
amount of a claim for benefits under a Primary Mortgage Insurance Policy        
covering a Mortgage Loan will consist of the insured percentage of the unpaid   
principal amount of the covered Mortgage Loan and accrued and unpaid interest   
thereon and reimbursement of certain expenses, less (i) all rents or other      
payments collected or received by the insured (other than the proceeds of hazard
insurance) that are derived from or in any way related to the Mortgaged         
Property, (ii) hazard insurance proceeds in excess of the amount required to    
restore the Mortgaged Property and which have not been applied to the payment of
the Mortgage Loan, (iii) amounts expended but not approved by the issuer of the 
related Primary Mortgage Insurance Policy (the "Primary Insurer"), (iv) claim   
payments previously made by the Primary Insurer and (v) unpaid premiums.        

   Primary Mortgage Insurance Policies reimburse certain losses sustained by
reason of defaults in payments by borrowers. Primary Mortgage Insurance Policies
will not insure against, and exclude from coverage, a loss sustained by reason  
of a default arising from or involving certain matters, including (i) fraud or  
negligence in origination or servicing of the Mortgage Loans, including         
misrepresentation by the originator, borrower or other persons involved in the  
origination of the Mortgage Loan; (ii) failure to construct the Mortgaged       
Property subject to the Mortgage Loan in accordance with specified plans; (iii) 
physical damage to the Mortgaged Property; and (iv) the related Servicer not    
being approved as a servicer by the Primary Insurer.                            

Recoveries Under a Primary Mortgage Insurance Policy.  As conditions  
precedent to the filing of or payment of a claim under a Primary Mortgage       
Insurance Policy covering a Mortgage Loan, the insured will be required to (i)  
advance or discharge (a) all hazard insurance policy premiums and (b) as        
necessary and approved in advance by the Primary Insurer, (1) real estate       
property taxes, (2) all expenses required to maintain the related Mortgaged     
Property in at least as good a condition as existed at the effective date of    
such Primary Mortgage Insurance Policy, ordinary wear and tear excepted, (3)    
Mortgaged Property sales expenses, (4) any outstanding liens (as defined in such
Primary Mortgage Insurance Policy) on the Mortgaged Property and (5) foreclosure
costs, including court costs and reasonable attorneys' fees; (ii) in the event  
of any physical loss or damage to the Mortgaged Property, have the Mortgaged    
Property restored and repaired to at least as good a condition as existed at the
effective date of such Primary Mortgage Insurance Policy, ordinary wear and tear
excepted; and (iii) tender to the Primary Insurer good and merchantable title to
and possession of the Mortgaged Property.                                       

The Master Servicer, on behalf of itself, the Trustee and the         
Certificateholders, will present claims to the insurer under each Primary       
Mortgage Insurance Policy, and will take such reasonable steps as are necessary 
to receive payment or to permit recovery thereunder with respect to defaulted   
Mortgage Loans. As set forth above, all collections by or on behalf of the      
Master Servicer under any Primary Mortgage Insurance Policy and, when the       
Mortgaged Property has not been restored, the hazard insurance policy, are to be
deposited in the Collection Account, subject to withdrawal as heretofore        
described.                                                                      

     If the Mortgaged Property securing a defaulted Mortgage Loan is damaged and
proceeds, if any, from the related hazard insurance policy are insufficient to  
restore the damaged Mortgaged Property to a condition                           

46

P-->424B3155th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 155th

sufficient to permit recovery under the related Primary Mortgage Insurance      
Policy, if any, the Master Servicer is not required to expend its own funds to  
restore the damaged Mortgaged Property unless it determines (i) that such       
restoration will increase the proceeds to Certificateholders on liquidation of  
the Mortgage Loan after reimbursement of the Master Servicer for its expenses   
and (ii) that such expenses will be recoverable by it from related Insurance    
Proceeds or Liquidation Proceeds.                                               

     If recovery on a defaulted Mortgage Loan under any related Primary Mortgage
Insurance Policy is not available for the reasons set forth in the preceding    
paragraph, or if the defaulted Mortgage Loan is not covered by a Primary        
Mortgage Insurance Policy, the Master Servicer will be obligated to follow or   
cause to be followed such normal practices and procedures as it deems necessary 
or advisable to realize upon the defaulted Mortgage Loan. If the proceeds of any
liquidation of the Mortgaged Property securing the defaulted Mortgage Loan are  
less than the principal balance of such Mortgage Loan plus interest accrued     
thereon that is payable to Certificateholders, the Trust Fund will realize a    
loss in the amount of such difference plus the aggregate of any unpaid servicing
compensation and expenses incurred by the Master Servicer in connection with    
such proceedings and which are reimbursable under the Agreement. In the unlikely
event that any such proceedings result in a total recovery which is, after      
reimbursement to the Master Servicer of its expenses and any unpaid servicing   
compensation, in excess of the principal balance of such Mortgage Loan plus     
interest accrued thereon that is payable to Certificateholders, the Master      
Servicer will be entitled to withdraw or retain from the Collection Account,    
unless otherwise specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, amounts        
representing the balance of such excess, exclusive of any amount required by law
to be forwarded to the related Mortgagor, as additional servicing compensation. 

   If the Master Servicer or its designee recovers Insurance Proceeds which,
when added to any related Liquidation Proceeds and after deduction of certain   
expenses reimbursable to the Master Servicer, exceed the principal balance of   
such Mortgage Loan plus interest accrued thereon that is payable to             
Certificateholders, the Master Servicer will be entitled to withdraw or retain  
from the Collection Account amounts representing its normal servicing           
compensation with respect to such Mortgage Loan. In the event that the Master   
Servicer has expended its own funds to restore the damaged Mortgaged Property   
and such funds have not been reimbursed under the related hazard insurance      
policy, it will be entitled to withdraw from the Collection Account out of      
related Liquidation Proceeds or Insurance Proceeds an amount equal to such      
expenses incurred by it, in which event the Trust Fund may realize a loss up to 
the amount so charged. Since Insurance Proceeds cannot exceed deficiency claims 
and certain expenses incurred by the Master Servicer, no such payment or        
recovery will result in a recovery to the Trust Fund which exceeds the principal
balance of the defaulted Mortgage Loan together with accrued interest thereon.  
See "Credit Enhancement."                                                       

Junior Mortgages.  The Mortgage Loans underlying the Certificates of a
Series will be secured by mortgages or deeds of trust which may be second or    
more junior mortgages to other mortgages held by other lenders or institutional 
investors. The rights of the Trust Fund (and therefore the holders of the       
related Certificates), as mortgagee under a junior mortgage, are subordinate to 
those of the mortgagee under the senior mortgage, including the prior rights of 
the senior mortgagee to receive hazard insurance and condemnation proceeds and  
to cause the property securing the mortgage loan to be sold upon default of the 
mortgagor. If the property is sold, the junior mortgagee's lien will be         
extinguished unless the junior mortgagee asserts its subordinate interest in the
property in foreclosure litigation and, possibly, satisfies the defaulted senior
mortgage. A junior mortgagee may satisfy a defaulted senior loan in full and, in
some states, may cure such default and bring the senior loan current, in either 
event adding the amounts expended to the balance due on the junior loan. In most
states, absent a provision in the mortgage or deed of trust, no notice of       
default is required to be given to a junior mortgagee.                          

The standard form of the mortgage used by most institutional lenders  
confers on the mortgagee the right both to receive all proceeds collected under 
any hazard insurance policy and all awards made in connection with condemnation 
proceedings, and to apply such proceeds and awards to any indebtedness secured  
by the mortgage, in such order as the mortgagee may determine. Thus, in the     
event improvements on the property are damaged or destroyed by fire or other    
casualty, or in the event the property is taken by condemnation, the mortgagee  
or beneficiary under underlying senior mortgages will have the prior right to   
collect any insurance proceeds payable under a hazard insurance policy and any  
award of damages in connection with the                                         

47

P-->424B3156th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 156th

condemnation and to apply the same to the indebtedness secured by the senior    
mortgages. Proceeds in excess of the amount of senior mortgage indebtedness, in 
most cases, may be applied to the indebtedness of a junior mortgage.            

 FHA Insurance; VA Guarantees.  Mortgage Loans designated in the related
Prospectus Supplement as insured by the FHA will be insured by the FHA as       
authorized under the United States Housing Act of 1937, as amended. Such        
Mortgage Loans will be insured under various FHA programs including the standard
FHA 203(b) program to finance the acquisition of one- to four-family housing    
units and the FHA 245 graduated payment mortgage program. These programs        
generally limit the principal amount and interest rates of the mortgage loans   
insured. Mortgage Loans insured by the FHA generally require a minimum down     
payment of approximately 5% of the original principal amount of the loan. No    
FHA-insured Mortgage Loans relating to a Series may have an interest rate or    
original principal amount exceeding the applicable FHA limits at the time of    
origination of such loan.                                                       

    The insurance premiums for Mortgage Loans insured by the FHA are collected
by lenders approved by the Department of Housing and Urban Development ("HUD")  
or by the Master Servicer or any Sub-Servicers and are paid to the FHA. The     
regulations governing FHA single-family mortgage insurance programs provide that
insurance benefits are payable either upon foreclosure (or other acquisition of 
possession) and conveyance of the mortgaged premises to HUD or upon assignment  
of the defaulted Mortgage Loan to HUD. With respect to a defaulted FHA-insured  
Mortgage Loan, the Master Servicer or any Sub-Servicer is limited in its ability
to initiate foreclosure proceedings. When it is determined, either by the Master
Servicer or any Sub-Servicer or HUD, that default was caused by circumstances   
beyond the mortgagor's control, the Master Servicer or any Sub-Servicer is      
expected to make an effort to avoid foreclosure by entering, if feasible, into  
one of a number of available forms of forbearance plans with the mortgagor. Such
plans may involve the reduction or suspension of regular mortgage payments for a
specified period, with such payments to be made up on or before the maturity    
date of the mortgage, or the recasting of payments due under the mortgage up to 
or beyond the maturity date. In addition, when a default caused by such         
circumstances is accompanied by certain other criteria, HUD may provide relief  
by making payments to the Master Servicer or any Sub-Servicer in partial or full
satisfaction of amounts due under the Mortgage Loan (which payments are to be   
repaid by the mortgagor to HUD) or by accepting assignment of the loan from the 
Master Servicer or any Sub-Servicer. With certain exceptions, at least three    
full monthly installments must be due and unpaid under the Mortgage Loan, and   
HUD must have rejected any request for relief from the mortgagor before the     
Master Servicer or any Sub-Servicer may initiate foreclosure proceedings.       

  HUD has the option, in most cases, to pay insurance claims in cash or in
debentures issued by HUD. Currently, claims are being paid in cash, and claims  
have not been paid in debentures since 1965. HUD debentures issued in           
satisfaction of FHA insurance claims bear interest at the applicable HUD        
debentures interest rate.                                                       

    The amount of insurance benefits generally paid by the FHA is equal to the
entire unpaid principal amount of the defaulted Mortgage Loan adjusted to       
reimburse the Master Servicer or Sub-Servicer for certain costs and expenses and
to deduct certain amounts received or retained by the Master Servicer or        
Sub-Servicer after default. When entitlement to insurance benefits results from 
foreclosure (or other acquisition of possession) and conveyance to HUD, the     
Master Servicer or Sub-Servicer is compensated for no more than two-thirds of   
its foreclosure costs, and is compensated for interest accrued and unpaid prior 
to such date but in general only to the extent it was allowed pursuant to a     
forbearance plan approved by HUD. When entitlement to insurance benefits results
from assignment of the Mortgage Loan to HUD, the insurance payment includes full
compensation for interest accrued and unpaid to the assignment date. The        
insurance payment itself, upon foreclosure of an FHA-insured Mortgage Loan,     
bears interest from a date 30 days after the mortgagor's first uncorrected      
failure to perform any obligation to make any payment due under the Mortgage    
and, upon assignment, from the date of assignment to the date of payment of the 
claim, in each case at the same interest rate as the applicable HUD debenture   
interest rate as described above.                                               

48

P-->424B3157th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 157th

Mortgage Loans designated in the related Prospectus Supplement as     
guaranteed by the VA will be partially guaranteed by the VA under the           
Serviceman's Readjustment Act of 1944, as amended (a "VA Guaranty Policy"). The 
Serviceman's Readjustment Act of 1944, as amended, permits a veteran (or in     
certain instances the spouse of a veteran) to obtain a mortgage loan guarantee  
by the VA covering mortgage financing of the purchase of a one-to four-family   
dwelling unit at interest rates permitted by the VA. The program has no mortgage
loan limits, requires no down payment from the purchaser and permits the        
guarantee of mortgage loans of up to 30 years' duration.                        

  The maximum guarantee that may be issued by the VA under a VA guaranteed
mortgage loan depends upon the original principal amount of the mortgage loan,  
as further described in 38 United States Code Section 3703(a), as amended. As of
January 1, 1996, the maximum guarantee that may be issued by the VA under a VA  
guaranteed mortgage loan of more than $144,000 is the lesser of 25% of the      
original principal amount of the mortgage loan and $50,750. The liability on the
guarantee is reduced or increased pro rata with any reduction or increase in the
amount of indebtedness, but in no event will the amount payable on the guarantee
exceed the amount of the original guarantee. The VA may, at its option and      
without regard to the guarantee, make full payment to a mortgage holder of      
unsatisfied indebtedness on a mortgage upon its assignment to the VA.           

With respect to a defaulted VA guaranteed Mortgage Loan, the Master   
Servicer or Sub-Servicer is, absent exceptional circumstances, authorized to    
announce its intention to foreclose only when the default has continued for     
three months. Generally, a claim for the guarantee is submitted after           
liquidation of the Mortgaged Property.                                          

The amount payable under the guarantee will be the percentage of the  
VA-insured Mortgage Loan originally guaranteed applied to indebtedness          
outstanding as of the applicable date of computation specified in the VA        
regulations. Payments under the guarantee will be equal to the unpaid principal 
amount of the loan, interest accrued on the unpaid balance of the loan to the   
appropriate date of computation and limited expenses of the mortgagee, but in   
each case only to the extent that such amounts have not been recovered through  
liquidation of the Mortgaged Property. The amount payable under the guarantee   
may in no event exceed the amount of the original guarantee.                    

SERVICING AND OTHER COMPENSATION AND PAYMENT OF EXPENSES

   The principal servicing compensation to be paid to the Master Servicer in
respect of its master servicing activities for each series of Certificates will 
be equal to the percentage per annum described in the related Prospectus        
Supplement (which may vary under certain circumstances) of the outstanding      
principal balance of each Mortgage Loan, and such compensation will be retained 
by it from collections of interest on such Mortgage Loan in the related Trust   
Fund (the "Master Servicing Fee"). Unless otherwise specified in the related    
Prospectus Supplement, as compensation for its servicing duties, the Master     
Servicer will be entitled to a monthly servicing fee as described in the related
Prospectus Supplement. In addition, the Master Servicer or a Sub-Servicer will  
retain all prepayment charges, assumption fees and late payment charges, to the 
extent collected from Mortgagors, and any benefit which may accrue as a result  
of the investment of funds in the applicable Collection Account (unless         
otherwise specified in the related Prospectus Supplement). The Master Servicer  
will be responsible for the payment of any fees owing to any Sub-Servicer.      

   The Master Servicer will pay or cause to be paid certain ongoing expenses
associated with each Trust Fund and incurred by it in connection with its       
responsibilities under the related Agreement, including, without limitation,    
payment of any fee or other amount payable in respect of any credit enhancement 
arrangements, payment of the fees and disbursements of the Trustee, any         
custodian appointed by the Trustee, the Certificate Registrar and any Paying    
Agent, and payment of expenses incurred in enforcing the obligations of         
Sub-Servicers and Sellers. The Master Servicer will be entitled to reimbursement
of certain of these expenses. In addition, as indicated in the preceding        
section, the Master Servicer will be entitled to reimbursements for certain     
expenses incurred by it in connection with Liquidated Mortgage Loans and in     
connection with the restoration of Mortgaged Properties, such right of          
reimbursement being prior to the rights of Certificateholders to receive any    
related Liquidation Proceeds (including Insurance Proceeds).                    

49

P-->424B3158th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 158th
EVIDENCE AS TO COMPLIANCE                                                       

Each Agreement will provide that on or before a specified date in each
year, the Master Servicer will cause a firm of independent public accountants to
furnish a statement to the Trustee to the effect that, on the basis of the      
examination by such firm conducted substantially in compliance with the audit   
program applicable to the Master Servicer, the servicing by or on behalf of the 
Master Servicer of mortgage loans, private mortgage-backed securities or agency 
securities, under pooling and servicing agreements substantially similar to each
other (including the related Agreement) was conducted in compliance with such   
agreements except for any significant exceptions or errors in records that, in  
the opinion of the firm, such audit program requires it to report.              

    Each Agreement will also provide for delivery to the Trustee, on or before
a specified date in each year, of an annual statement signed by an officer or   
officers of the Master Servicer to the effect that the Master Servicer has      
fulfilled its obligations under the Agreement in all material respects          
throughout the preceding year or specifying any known failure to do so.         

   Copies of the annual accountants' statement and the statement of officers
of the Master Servicer may be obtained by Certificateholders of the related     
Series without charge upon written request to the Master Servicer or the Trustee
at the address set forth in the related Prospectus Supplement.                  

CERTAIN MATTERS REGARDING THE MASTER SERVICER AND THE DEPOSITOR 

The Master Servicer under each Agreement will be named in the related 
Prospectus Supplement. An entity serving as Master Servicer or Sub-Servicer may 
have normal business relationships with the Depositor or the Depositor's        
affiliates.                                                                     

     Each Agreement will provide that, subject to the Master Servicer's right to
assign its rights and delegate its duties as described below, the Master        
Servicer may not resign from its obligations and duties under the Agreement     
unless its duties thereunder are no longer permissible under applicable law or  
are in material conflict by reason of applicable law with any other activities  
of a type and nature presently carried on by it, except in connection with a    
permitted transfer of servicing. No such resignation will become effective until
the Trustee or a successor servicer has assumed the Master Servicer's           
obligations and duties under the Agreement.                                     

   Each Agreement will further provide that neither the Master Servicer, the
Depositor nor any director, officer, employee, or agent of the Master Servicer  
or the Depositor will be under any liability to the related Trust Fund or       
Certificateholders for any action taken or for refraining from the taking of any
action in good faith pursuant to the Agreement, or for errors in judgment;      
provided, however, neither the Master Servicer, the Depositor nor any such      
person will be protected against any liability which would otherwise be imposed 
by reason of any such breach of the terms and conditions of the Agreement. Each 
Agreement will further provide that the Master Servicer, the Depositor and any  
director, officer, employee or agent of the Master Servicer or the Depositor    
will be entitled to indemnification by the related Trust Fund and will be held  
harmless against any loss, liability or expense incurred in connection with any 
legal action relating to the Agreement or the Certificates, other than any loss,
liability or expense related to any specific Mortgage Loan or Mortgage Loans    
(except any such loss, liability or expense otherwise reimbursable pursuant to  
the Agreement) and any loss, liability or expense incurred by reason of any     
breach of the terms and conditions of the Agreement. In addition, each Agreement
will provide that neither the Master Servicer nor the Depositor will be under   
any obligation to appear in, prosecute or defend any legal action which is not  
incidental to its respective responsibilities under the Agreement and which in  
its opinion may involve it in any expense or liability. The Master Servicer or  
the Depositor may, however, in its discretion undertake any such action which it
may deem necessary or desirable with respect to the Agreement and the rights and
duties of the parties thereto and the interests of the Certificateholders       
thereunder. In such event, the legal expenses and costs of such action and any  
liability resulting therefrom will be expenses, costs and liabilities of the    
Trust Fund and the Master Servicer or the Depositor, as the case may be, will be
entitled to be reimbursed therefor out of funds otherwise distributable to      
Certificateholders.                                                             

50

P-->424B3159th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 159th

     Any person into which the Master Servicer may be merged or consolidated, or
any person resulting from any merger or consolidation to which the Master       
Servicer is a party, or any person succeeding to the business of the Master     
Servicer, will be the successor of the Master Servicer under each Agreement. In 
addition, the Master Servicer may assign its rights, and delegate its duties,   
pursuant to the terms of the Agreement.                                         

EVENTS OF DEFAULT 

    Unless otherwise specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, Events of
Default under each Agreement will generally consist of (i) any failure by the   
Master Servicer to distribute or cause to be distributed to Certificateholders  
of any class any required payment (other than an Advance) which continues       
unremedied for five business days after the giving of written notice of such    
failure to the Master Servicer by the Trustee or the Depositor, or to the Master
Servicer, the Depositor and the Trustee by the holders of Certificates of such  
class evidencing not less than 25% of the related Trust Fund (based on the      
outstanding principal balances of the Certificates); (ii) any failure by the    
Master Servicer to make an Advance as required under the Agreement, unless cured
as specified therein; (iii) any failure by the Master Servicer duly to observe  
or perform in any material respect any of its other covenants or agreements in  
the Agreement which continues unremedied for sixty days after the giving of     
written notice of such failure to the Servicer by the Trustee or the Depositor, 
or to the Master Servicer, the Depositor and the Trustee by the holders of      
Certificates evidencing not less than 25% of the related Trust Fund (based on   
the outstanding principal balances of the Certificates); and (iv) certain events
of insolvency, readjustment of debt, marshalling of assets and liabilities or   
similar proceeding and certain actions by or on behalf of the Master Servicer   
indicating its insolvency, reorganization or inability to pay its obligations.  

If specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, the Agreement will 
permit the Trustee to sell the Mortgage Assets and the other assets of the Trust
Fund in the event that payments in respect thereto are insufficient to make     
payments required in the Agreement. The assets of the Trust Fund will be sold   
only under the circumstances and in the manner specified in the related         
Prospectus Supplement.                                                          

RIGHTS UPON EVENT OF DEFAULT                                                    

   So long as an Event of Default under an Agreement remains unremedied, the
Trustee may, and at the direction of holders of Certificates having not less    
than 25% of the related Trust Fund (based on the outstanding principal balances 
of the Certificates) and under such other circumstances as may be specified in  
such Agreement, the Trustee shall, terminate all of the rights and obligations  
of the Master Servicer under the Agreement relating to such Trust Fund and in   
and to the Mortgage Loans, whereupon the Trustee will succeed to all of the     
responsibilities, duties and liabilities of the Master Servicer under the       
Agreement, including, if specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, the    
obligation to make advances, and will be entitled to similar compensation       
arrangements. In the event that the Trustee is unwilling or unable so to act, it
may appoint, or petition a court of competent jurisdiction for the appointment  
of, a Mortgage Loan servicing institution with a net worth of at least          
$10,000,000 to act as successor to the Master Servicer under the Agreement.     
Pending such appointment, the Trustee is obligated to act in such capacity. The 
Trustee and any such successor may agree upon the servicing compensation to be  
paid, which in no event may be greater than the compensation payable to the     
Master Servicer under the Agreement.                                            

No Certificateholder, solely by virtue of such holder's status as a   
Certificateholder, will have any right under any Agreement to institute any     
proceeding with respect to such Agreement, unless such holder previously has    
given to the Trustee written notice of default and unless the holders of        
Certificates of any Class of such Series evidencing not less than 25% of the    
related Trust Fund (based on the outstanding principal balances of the          
Certificates) have made written request upon the Trustee to institute such      
proceeding in its own name as Trustee thereunder and have offered to the Trustee
reasonable indemnity, and the Trustee for 60 days has neglected or refused to   
institute any such proceeding.                                                  

51

P-->424B3160th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 160th
AMENDMENT                                                                       

Unless otherwise specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, each 
Agreement may be amended by the Depositor, the Master Servicer and the Trustee, 
without the consent of any of the Certificateholders, (i) to cure any ambiguity 
or mistake; (ii) to correct or supplement any provision therein which may be    
defective or inconsistent with any other provision therein or with the related  
Prospectus Supplement or Prospectus or to correct any error or mistake; (iii) to
obtain, maintain or improve the rating of any class of Certificates (it being   
understood that after obtaining any rating required at the initial issuance of  
the related Series, none of the Depositor, Master Servicer or Trustee is        
obligated to obtain, maintain or improve the rating of any class of Certificates
of such Series); or (iv) to make any other revisions with respect to matters or 
questions arising under the Agreement which are not materially inconsistent with
the provisions thereof, provided that, in the case of clause (iv), such action  
will not adversely affect in any material respect the interests of any          
Certificateholder. An amendment will be deemed not to adversely affect in any   
material respect the interests of the Certificateholders if the person          
requesting such amendment obtains a letter from each rating agency requested to 
rate the class or classes of Certificates of such Series stating that such      
amendment will not result in the downgrading or withdrawal of the respective    
ratings then assigned to such Certificates. In addition, to the extent provided 
in the related Agreement, an Agreement may be amended without the consent of any
of the Certificateholders, to change the manner in which the Collection Account 
is maintained, provided that any such change does not adversely affect the then 
current rating on the class or classes of Certificates of such Series that have 
been rated. In addition, if a REMIC election is made with respect to a Trust    
Fund, the related Agreement may be amended to modify, eliminate or add to any of
its provisions to such extent as may be necessary to maintain the qualification 
of the related Trust Fund as a REMIC, provided that the Trustee has received an 
opinion of counsel to the effect that such action is necessary or helpful to    
maintain such qualification.                                                    

Unless otherwise specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, each 
Agreement may also be amended by the Depositor, the Master Servicer and the     
Trustee with consent of Holders of Certificates of such Series evidencing not   
less than 51% of the aggregate Percentage Interests of each class affected      
thereby for the purpose of adding any provisions to or changing in any manner or
eliminating any of the provisions of the Agreement or of modifying in any manner
the rights of the holders of the related Certificates; provided, however, no    
such amendment may (i) reduce in any manner the amount of or delay the timing   
of, payments received on Mortgage Loans which are required to be distributed on 
any Certificate without the consent of the holder of such Certificate, or (ii)  
reduce the aforesaid percentage of Certificates of any class of holders which   
are required to consent to any such amendment without the consent of the holders
of all Certificates of such class covered by such Agreement then outstanding. If
a REMIC election is made with respect to a Trust Fund, the Trustee will not be  
entitled to consent to an amendment to the related Agreement without having     
first received an opinion of counsel to the effect that such amendment will not 
cause such Trust Fund to fail to qualify as a REMIC.                            

TERMINATION; OPTIONAL TERMINATION 

Unless otherwise specified in the related Agreement, the obligations  
created by each Agreement for each Series of Certificates will terminate upon   
the payment to the related Certificateholders of all amounts held in the        
Collection Account or by the Master Servicer and required to be paid to them    
pursuant to such Agreement following the later of (i) the final payment or other
liquidation of the last of the Mortgage Assets subject thereto or the           
disposition of all property acquired upon foreclosure of any such Mortgage      
Assets remaining in the Trust Fund and (ii) the purchase by the Master Servicer,
the Depositor or, if REMIC treatment has been elected and if specified in the   
related Prospectus Supplement, by the holder of the residual interest in the    
REMIC (see "Certain Federal Income Tax Consequences" below), from the related   
Trust Fund of all of the remaining Mortgage Assets and all property acquired in 
respect of such Mortgage Assets.                                                

   Unless otherwise specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, any such
purchase of Mortgage Assets and property acquired in respect of Mortgage Assets 
evidenced by a Series of Certificates will be made at the option of the Master  
Servicer, the Depositor or, if applicable, such holder of the REMIC residual    
interest, at a price, and in accordance with the procedures, specified in the   
related Prospectus Supplement. The exercise of                                  

52

P-->424B3161st Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 161st

such right will effect early retirement of the Certificates of that Series, but 
the right of the Master Servicer, the Depositor or, if applicable, such holder  
of the REMIC residual interest, to so purchase is subject to the principal      
balance of the related Mortgage Assets being less than the percentage specified 
in the related Prospectus Supplement of the aggregate principal balance of the  
Mortgage Assets at the Cut-off Date for the Series. The foregoing is subject to 
the provision that if a REMIC election is made with respect to a Trust Fund, any
repurchase pursuant to clause (ii) above will be made only in connection with a 
"qualified liquidation" of the REMIC within the meaning of Section 860F(g)(4) of
the Code.                                                                       

THE TRUSTEE 

     The Trustee under each Agreement will be named in the applicable Prospectus
Supplement. The commercial bank or trust company serving as Trustee may have    
normal banking relationships with the Depositor, the Master Servicer and any of 
their respective affiliates.                                                    

CERTAIN LEGAL ASPECTS OF THE MORTGAGE LOANS 

   The following discussion contains summaries, which are general in nature,
of certain legal matters relating to the Mortgage Loans. Because such legal     
aspects are governed primarily by applicable state law (which laws may differ   
substantially), the summaries do not purport to be complete nor to reflect the  
laws of any particular state, nor to encompass the laws of all states in which  
the security for the Mortgage Loans is situated. The summaries are qualified in 
their entirety by reference to the appropriate laws of the states in which      
Mortgage Loans may be originated.                                               

GENERAL 

   The Mortgage Loans will be secured by deeds of trust, mortgages, security
deeds or deeds to secure debt, depending upon the prevailing practice in the    
state in which the property subject to the loan is located. Deeds of trust are  
used almost exclusively in California instead of mortgages. A mortgage creates a
lien upon the real property encumbered by the mortgage, which lien is generally 
not prior to the lien for real estate taxes and assessments. Priority between   
mortgages depends on their terms and generally on the order of recording with a 
state or county office. There are two parties to a mortgage, the mortgagor, who 
is the borrower and owner of the mortgaged property, and the mortgagee, who is  
the lender. Under the mortgage instrument, the mortgagor delivers to the        
mortgagee a note or bond and the mortgage. Although a deed of trust is similar  
to a mortgage, a deed of trust formally has three parties, the borrower-property
owner called the grantor/trustor (similar to a mortgagor), a lender called the  
beneficiary (similar to a mortgagee) and a third-party grantee called the       
trustee. Under a deed of trust, the borrower grants the property, irrevocably   
until the debt is paid, in trust, generally with a power of sale, to the trustee
to secure payment of the obligation. A security deed and a deed to secure debt  
are special types of deeds which indicate on their face that they are granted to
secure an underlying debt. By executing a security deed or deed to secure debt, 
the grantor conveys title to, as opposed to merely creating a lien upon, the    
subject property to the grantee until such time as the underlying debt is       
repaid. The trustee's authority under a deed of trust, the mortgagee's authority
under a mortgage and the grantee's authority under a security deed or deed to   
secure debt are governed by law and, with respect to some deeds of trust, the   
directions of the beneficiary.                                                  

HOME OWNERSHIP AND EQUITY PROTECTION ACT OF 1994                                

Violations of certain provisions of these federal laws may limit the  
ability of the Master Servicer to collect all or part of the principal of or    
interest on the Mortgage Loans and in addition could subject the Trust Fund to  
damages and administrative enforcement. The Mortgage Loans may be subject to the
Home Ownership and Equity Protection Act of 1994 ("Act") which amended the      
Truth-in-Lending Act as it applies to mortgages subject to the Act. The Act     
requires certain additional disclosures, specifies the timing of such           
disclosures and limits or prohibits inclusion of certain provisions in mortgages
subject to the Act. The Act also provides that any purchaser or assignee of a   
mortgage covered by the Act is subject to all of the claims and defenses which  
the borrower could assert against the original lender. The maximum damages that 
may be recovered under the                                                      

53

P-->424B3162nd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 162nd

Act from an assignee is the remaining amount of indebtedness plus the total     
amount paid by the borrower in connection with the mortgage loan. If the Trust  
Fund includes Mortgage Loans subject to the Act, it will be subject to all of   
the claims and defenses which the borrower could assert against a Seller. Any   
violation of the Act which would result in such liability would be a breach of  
such Seller's representations and warranties, and such Seller would be obligated
to cure, repurchase or, if permitted by the Agreement, substitute for the       
Mortgage Loan in question.                                                      

PREPAYMENT CHARGES                                                              

 Under certain state laws, prepayment charges may not be imposed after a
certain period of time following the origination of Mortgage Loans with respect 
to prepayments on loans secured by liens encumbering owner-occupied residential 
properties. Since many of the Mortgaged Properties will be owner-occupied, it is
anticipated that prepayment charges may not be imposed with respect to many of  
the Mortgage Loans. The absence of such a restraint on prepayment, particularly 
with respect to fixed rate Mortgage Loans having higher Mortgage Rates or APRs, 
may increase the likelihood of refinancing or other early retirement of such    
loans or contracts.                                                             

COOPERATIVES 

 Certain of the Mortgage Loans may be Cooperative Loans. The Cooperative
owns all the real property that comprises the project, including the land,      
separate dwelling units and all common areas. The Cooperative is directly       
responsible for project management and, in most cases, payment of real estate   
taxes and hazard and liability insurance. If there is a blanket mortgage on the 
Cooperative and/or underlying land, as is generally the case, the Cooperative,  
as project mortgagor, is also responsible for meeting these mortgage            
obligations. A blanket mortgage is ordinarily incurred by the Cooperative in    
connection with the construction or purchase of the Cooperative's apartment     
building. The interest of the occupant under proprietary leases or occupancy    
agreements to which that Cooperative is a party are generally subordinate to the
interest of the holder of the blanket mortgage in that building. If the         
Cooperative is unable to meet the payment obligations arising under its blanket 
mortgage, the mortgagee holding the blanket mortgage could foreclose on that    
mortgage and terminate all subordinate proprietary leases and occupancy         
agreements. In addition, the blanket mortgage on a Cooperative may provide      
financing in the form of a mortgage that does not fully amortize with a         
significant portion of principal being due in one lump sum at final maturity.   
The inability of the Cooperative to refinance this mortgage and its consequent  
inability to make such final payment could lead to foreclosure by the mortgagee 
providing the financing. A foreclosure in either event by the holder of the     
blanket mortgage could eliminate or significantly diminish the value of any     
collateral held by the lender who financed the purchase by an individual        
tenant-stockholder of Cooperative shares or, in the case of a Trust Fund        
including Cooperative Loans, the collateral securing the Cooperative Loans.     

   The Cooperative is owned by tenant-stockholders who, through ownership of
stock, shares or membership certificates in the corporation, receive proprietary
leases or occupancy agreements which confer exclusive rights to occupy specific 
units. Generally, a tenant-stockholder of a Cooperative must make a monthly     
payment to the Cooperative representing such tenant-stockholder's pro rata share
of the Cooperative's payments for its blanket mortgage, real property taxes,    
maintenance expenses and other capital or ordinary expenses. An ownership       
interest in a Cooperative and accompanying rights is financed through a         
Cooperative share loan evidenced by a promissory note and secured by a security 
interest in the occupancy agreement or proprietary lease and in the related     
Cooperative shares. The lender takes possession of the share certificate and a  
counterpart of the proprietary lease or occupancy agreement and a financing     
statement covering the proprietary lease or occupancy agreement and the         
Cooperative shares is filed in the appropriate state and local offices to       
perfect the lender's interest in its collateral. Subject to the limitations     
discussed below, upon default of the tenant-stockholder, the lender may sue for 
judgment on the promissory note, dispose of the collateral at a public or       
private sale or otherwise proceed against the collateral or tenant-stockholder  
as an individual as provided in the security agreement covering the assignment  
of the proprietary lease or occupancy agreement and the pledge of Cooperative   
shares.                                                                         

54

P-->424B3163rd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 163rd

     With respect to Cooperative Loans, any prospective purchaser will generally
have to obtain the approval of the board of directors of the relevant           
Cooperative before purchasing the shares and acquiring rights under the related 
proprietary lease or occupancy agreement. This approval is usually based on the 
purchaser's income and net worth and numerous other factors. Although the       
Cooperative's approval is unlikely to be unreasonably withheld or delayed, the  
necessity of acquiring such approval could limit the number of potential        
purchasers for those shares and otherwise limit the Trust Fund's ability to sell
and realize the value of those shares.                                          

   In general, a "tenant-stockholder" (as defined in Code Section 216(b)(2))
of a corporation that qualifies as a "cooperative housing corporation" within   
the meaning of Code Section 216(b)(1) is allowed a deduction for amounts paid or
accrued within his taxable year to the corporation representing his             
proportionate share of certain interest expenses and certain real estate taxes  
allowable as a deduction under Code Section 216(a) to the corporation under Code
Sections 163 and 164. In order for a corporation to qualify under Code Section  
216(b)(1) for its taxable year in which such items are allowable as a deduction 
to the corporation, such Section requires, among other things, that at least 80%
of the gross income of the corporation be derived from its tenant-stockholders  
(as defined in Code Section 216(b)(2)). By virtue of this requirement, the      
status of a corporation for purposes of Code Section 216(b)(1) must be          
determined on a year-to-year basis. Consequently, there can be no assurance that
Cooperatives relating to the Cooperative Loans will qualify under such Section  
for any particular year. In the event that such a Cooperative fails to qualify  
for one or more years, the value of the collateral securing any related         
Cooperative Loans could be significantly impaired because no deduction would be 
allowable to tenant-stockholders under Code Section 216(a) with respect to those
years. In view of the significance of the tax benefits accorded                 
tenant-stockholders of a corporation that qualifies under Code Section          
216(b)(1), the likelihood that such a failure would be permitted to continue    
over a period of years appears remote.                                          

FORECLOSURE/REPOSSESSION                                                        

     Deed of Trust.  Foreclosure of a deed of trust is generally accomplished by
a non-judicial sale under a specific provision in the deed of trust which       
authorizes the trustee to sell the property at public auction upon any default  
by the borrower under the terms of the note or deed of trust. In certain states,
such foreclosure also may be accomplished by judicial action in the manner      
provided for foreclosure of mortgages. In some states, such as California, the  
trustee must record a notice of default and send a copy to the borrower-trustor,
to any person who has recorded a request for a copy of any notice of default and
notice of sale. In addition, the trustee must provide notice in some states to  
any other individual having an interest of record in the real property,         
including any junior lienholder. If the deed of trust is not reinstated within  
any applicable cure period, a notice of sale must be posted in a public place   
and, in most states, including California, published for a specified period of  
time in one or more newspapers. In addition, these notice provisions require    
that a copy of the notice of sale be posted on the property and sent to all     
parties having an interest of record in the property. In California, the entire 
process from recording a notice of default to a non-judicial sale usually takes 
four to five months.                                                            

     In some states, including California, the borrower-trustor has the right to
reinstate the loan at any time following default until shortly before the       
trustee's sale. In general, the borrower, or any other person having a junior   
encumbrance on the real estate, may, during a reinstatement period, cure the    
default by paying the entire amount in arrears plus the costs and expenses      
incurred in enforcing the obligation. Certain state laws control the amount of  
foreclosure expenses and costs, including attorney's fees, which may be         
recoverable by a lender.                                                        

Mortgages.  Foreclosure of a mortgage is generally accomplished by judicial
action. The action is initiated by the service of legal pleadings upon all      
parties having an interest in the real property. Delays in completion of the    
foreclosure may occasionally result from difficulties in locating necessary     
parties. Judicial foreclosure proceedings sometimes are not contested by any of 
the parties. When the mortgagee's right to foreclosure is contested, the legal  
proceedings necessary to resolve the issue can be time consuming. After the     
completion of a judicial foreclosure proceeding, the court generally issues a   
judgment of foreclosure and appoints a referee or other court officer to conduct
the sale of the property. In general, the borrower, or any                      

55

P-->424B3164th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 164th

other person having a junior encumbrance on the real estate, may, during a      
statutorily prescribed reinstatement period, cure a monetary default by paying  
the entire amount in arrears plus other designated costs and expenses incurred  
in enforcing the obligation. Generally, state law controls the amount of        
foreclosure expenses and costs, including attorney's fees, which may be         
recovered by a lender. After the reinstatement period has expired without the   
default having been cured, the borrower or junior lienholder no longer has the  
right to reinstate the loan and must pay the loan in full to prevent the        
scheduled foreclosure sale. If the deed of trust is not reinstated, a notice of 
sale must be posted in a public place and, in most states, published for a      
specific period of time in one or more newspapers. In addition, some state laws 
require that a copy of the notice of sale be posted on the property and sent to 
all parties having an interest in the real property.                            

    Although foreclosure sales are typically public sales, frequently no third
party purchaser bids in excess of the lender's lien because of the absence of   
equity in the property, the difficulty of determining the exact status of title 
to the property, the possible deterioration of the property during the          
foreclosure proceedings and a requirement that the purchaser pay to bid for the 
property. Thus the foreclosing lender often purchases the property from the     
trustee or referee for an amount equal to the principal amount outstanding under
the loan, accrued and unpaid interest and the expenses of foreclosure.          
Thereafter, the lender will assume the burden of ownership, including obtaining 
hazard insurance and making such repairs at its own expense as are necessary to 
render the property suitable for sale. The lender will commonly obtain the      
services of a real estate broker and pay the broker's commission in connection  
with the sale of the property. Depending upon market conditions, the ultimate   
proceeds of the sale of the property may not equal the lender's investment in   
the property.                                                                   

  Courts have imposed general equitable principles upon foreclosure. These
equitable principles are generally designed to relieve the borrower from the    
legal effect of his defaults under the loan documents. Examples of judicial     
remedies that have been fashioned include judicial requirements that the lender 
undertake affirmative and expensive actions to determine the causes for the     
borrower's default and the likelihood that the borrower will be able to         
reinstate the loan. In some cases, courts have substituted their judgment for   
the lender's judgment and have required that lenders reinstate loans or recast  
payment schedules in order to accommodate borrowers who are suffering from      
temporary financial disability. In other cases, courts have limited the right of
the lender to foreclose if the default under the mortgage instrument is not     
monetary, such as the borrower failing adequately to maintain the property or   
the borrower executing a second security instrument affecting the property. Some
courts have been faced with the issue of whether federal or state constitutional
provisions reflecting due process concerns for fair notice require that         
borrowers under deeds of trust receive notice longer than that prescribed by    
statute. For the most part, these cases have upheld the notice provisions as    
being reasonable or have found that the sale by a trustee under a deed of trust 
does not involve sufficient state action to afford constitutional protection to 
the borrower.                                                                   

Home Equity Loans.  Since the Mortgages securing Home Equity Loans are
often junior liens subordinate to the rights of the mortgagee under the related 
senior mortgage or mortgages, the proceeds from any liquidation, insurance or   
condemnation proceedings will be available to satisfy the outstanding balance of
such junior mortgage only to the extent that the claims of such senior          
mortgagees have been satisfied in full, including any related foreclosure costs.
In addition, a junior mortgagee may not foreclose on the property securing a    
junior mortgage unless it forecloses subject to the senior mortgages, in which  
case it must either pay the entire amount due on the senior mortgages to the    
senior mortgagees at or prior to the foreclosure sale or undertake the          
obligation to make payments on the senior mortgages in the event the mortgagor  
is in default thereunder. The Trust Fund will not have any source of funds to   
satisfy the senior mortgages to make payments due to the senior mortgagees.     

Cooperative Loans.  The Cooperative shares owned by the tenant-stockholder
and pledged to the lender are, in almost all cases, subject to restrictions on  
transfer as set forth in the Cooperative's Certificate of Incorporation and     
Bylaws, as well as the proprietary lease or occupancy agreement, and may be     
cancelled by the Cooperative for failure by the tenant-stockholder to pay rent  
or other obligations or charges owed by such tenant-stockholder, including      
mechanics' liens against the cooperative apartment building incurred by such    
tenant-stockholder. The proprietary lease or occupancy agreement generally      
permits the Cooperative to terminate such lease or agreement in the event an    
obligor fails to make payments or defaults in the                               

56

P-->424B3165th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 165th

performance of covenants required thereunder. Typically, the lender and the     
Cooperative enter into a recognition agreement which establishes the rights and 
obligations of both parties in the event of a default by the tenant-stockholder 
on its obligations under the proprietary lease or occupancy agreement. A default
by the tenant-stockholder under the proprietary lease or occupancy agreement    
will usually constitute a default under the security agreement between the      
lender and the tenant-stockholder.                                              

  The recognition agreement generally provides that, in the event that the
tenant-stockholder has defaulted under the proprietary lease or occupancy       
agreement, the Cooperative will take no action to terminate such lease or       
agreement until the lender has been provided with an opportunity to cure the    
default. The recognition agreement typically provides that if the proprietary   
lease or occupancy agreement is terminated, the Cooperative will recognize the  
lender's lien against proceeds from the sale of the Cooperative apartment,      
subject, however, to the Cooperative's right to sums due under such proprietary 
lease or occupancy agreement. The total amount owed to the Cooperative by the   
tenant-stockholder, which the lender generally cannot restrict and does not     
monitor, could reduce the value of the collateral below the outstanding         
principal balance of the Cooperative Loan and accrued and unpaid interest       
thereon.                                                                        

     Recognition agreements also provide that in the event of a foreclosure on a
Cooperative Loan, the lender must obtain the approval or consent of the         
Cooperative as required by the proprietary lease before transferring the        
Cooperative shares or assigning the proprietary lease. Generally, the lender is 
not limited in any rights it may have to dispossess the tenant-stockholders.    

    In some states, foreclosure on the Cooperative shares is accomplished by a
sale in accordance with the provisions of Article 9 of the UCC and the security 
agreement relating to those shares. Article 9 of the UCC requires that a sale be
conducted in a "commercially reasonable" manner. Whether a foreclosure sale has 
been conducted in a "commercially reasonable" manner will depend on the facts in
each case. In determining commercial reasonableness, a court will look to the   
notice given the debtor and the method, manner, time, place and terms of the    
foreclosure. Generally, a sale conducted according to the usual practice of     
banks selling similar collateral will be considered reasonably conducted.       

     Article 9 of the UCC provides that the proceeds of the sale will be applied
first to pay the costs and expenses of the sale and then to satisfy the         
indebtedness secured by the lender's security interest. The recognition         
agreement, however, generally provides that the lender's right to reimbursement 
is subject to the right of the Cooperative to receive sums due under the        
proprietary lease or occupancy agreement. If there are proceeds remaining, the  
lender must account to the tenant-stockholder for the surplus. Conversely, if a 
portion of the indebtedness remains unpaid, the tenant-stockholder is generally 
responsible for the deficiency. See "-- Anti-Deficiency Legislation and Other
Limitations on Lenders" below.                                                  

    In the case of foreclosure on a building which was converted from a rental
building to a building owned by a Cooperative under a non-eviction plan, some   
states require that a purchaser at a foreclosure sale take the property subject 
to rent control and rent stabilization laws which apply to certain tenants who  
elected to remain in the building but who did not purchase shares in the        
Cooperative when the building was so converted.                                 

RIGHTS OF REDEMPTION 

   In some states after sale pursuant to a deed of trust or foreclosure of a
mortgage, the borrower and certain foreclosed junior lienors are given a        
statutory period in which to redeem the property from the foreclosure sale. In  
certain other states, including California, this right of redemption applies    
only to sales following judicial foreclosure, and not to sales pursuant to a    
non-judicial power of sale. In most states where the right of redemption is     
available, statutory redemption may occur upon payment of the foreclosure       
purchase price, accrued interest and taxes. In some states, the right to redeem 
is an equitable right. The effect of a right of redemption is to diminish the   
ability of the lender to sell the foreclosed property. The exercise of a right  
of redemption would defeat the title of any purchaser at a foreclosure sale, or 
of any purchaser from the lender subsequent to judicial foreclosure or sale     
under a deed of trust. Consequently, the practical effect of the redemption     
right is to force the lender to retain the property and pay the expenses of     
ownership until the redemption period has run.                                  

57

P-->424B3166th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 166th

ANTI-DEFICIENCY LEGISLATION AND OTHER LIMITATIONS ON LENDERS 

    Certain states have imposed statutory restrictions that limit the remedies
of a beneficiary under a deed of trust or a mortgagee under a mortgage. In some 
states, including California, statutes limit the right of the beneficiary or    
mortgagee to obtain a deficiency judgment against the borrower following        
foreclosure or sale under a deed of trust. A deficiency judgment is a personal  
judgment against the borrower equal in most cases to the difference between the 
amount due to the lender and the purchase price offered or paid for the property
at the time of the foreclosure sale. As a result of these prohibitions, it is   
anticipated that in most instances the Servicer will utilize the non-judicial   
foreclosure remedy and will not seek deficiency judgments against defaulting    
Mortgagors. In some states, exceptions to the anti-deficiency statutes are      
provided for in certain instances where the value of the lender's security has  
been impaired by acts or omissions of the borrower; for example, in the event of
waste of the property.                                                          

     Some state statutes may require the beneficiary or mortgagee to exhaust the
security afforded under a deed of trust or mortgage by foreclosure in an attempt
to satisfy the full debt before bringing a personal action against the borrower.
In certain other states, the lender has the option of bringing a personal action
against the borrower on the debt without first exhausting such security;        
however, in some of these states, the lender, following judgment on such        
personal action, may be deemed to have elected a remedy and may be precluded    
from exercising remedies with respect to the security. Consequently, the        
practical effect of the election requirement, when applicable, is that lenders  
will usually proceed first against the security rather than bringing a personal 
action against the borrower.                                                    

In addition to anti-deficiency and related legislation, numerous other
federal and state statutory provisions, including the federal bankruptcy laws,  
the federal Soldiers' and Sailors' Civil Relief Act of 1940 and state laws      
affording relief to debtors, may interfere with or affect the ability of the    
secured mortgage lender to realize upon its security. For example, in a         
proceeding under the federal Bankruptcy Code, a lender may not foreclose on the 
Mortgaged Property without the permission of the bankruptcy court. The          
rehabilitation plan proposed by the debtor may provide, if the Mortgaged        
Property is not the debtor's principal residence and the court determines that  
the value of the Mortgaged Property is less than the principal balance of the   
mortgage loan, for the reduction of the secured indebtedness to the value of the
Mortgaged Property as of the date of the commencement of the bankruptcy,        
rendering the lender a general unsecured creditor for the difference, and also  
may reduce the monthly payments due under such mortgage loan, change the rate of
interest and alter the mortgage loan repayment schedule. The effect of any such 
proceedings under the federal Bankruptcy Code, including but not limited to any 
automatic stay, could result in delays in receiving payments on the Mortgage    
Loans underlying a Series of Certificates and possible reductions in the        
aggregate amount of such payments.                                              

The Mortgage Loans are also subject to federal laws, including:       

     (i) the federal Truth-in-Lending Act and Regulation Z promulgated
  thereunder, which require certain disclosures to the borrowers regarding
the terms of the Mortgage Loans;                                      

      (ii) the Equal Credit Opportunity Act and Regulation B promulgated
     thereunder, which prohibit discrimination on the basis of age, race, color,
sex, religion, marital status, national origin, receipt of public     
assistance or the exercise of any right under the Consumer Credit     
Protection Act, in the extension of credit;                           

    (iii) the Fair Credit Reporting Act, which regulates the use and
   reporting of information related to the borrower's credit experience; and

(iv) the Home Ownership and Equity Protection Act of 1994.  

These and other federal and state consumer protection laws impose     
substantive requirements upon mortgage lenders in connection with the           
origination, servicing and enforcement of Mortgage Loans. Violations of certain 
provisions of these laws may limit the ability of the Master Servicer to collect
all or part of the principal of or interest on the Mortgage Loans, may subject  
the Master Servicer to damages and administrative enforcement and in addition   
could be raised by borrowers as a recoupment or setoff in a collection or       

58

P-->424B3167th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 167th

foreclosure action. The federal tax laws provide priority to certain tax liens  
over the lien of a mortgage or secured party.                                   

   Generally, Article 9 of the UCC governs foreclosure on Cooperative shares
and the related proprietary lease or occupancy agreement. Some courts have      
interpreted section 9-504 of the UCC to prohibit a deficiency award unless the  
creditor establishes that the sale of the collateral (which, in the case of a   
Cooperative Loan, would be the shares of the Cooperative and the related        
proprietary lease or occupancy agreement) was conducted in a commercially       
reasonable manner.                                                              

ENVIRONMENTAL RISKS                                                             

    Real property pledged as security to a lender may be subject to unforeseen
environmental risks. Under the laws of certain states, contamination of a       
property may give rise to a lien on the property to assure the payment of the   
costs of clean-up. In several states such a lien has priority over the lien of  
an existing mortgage against such property. In addition, under the federal      
Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act of 1980    
("CERCLA"), the United States Environmental Protection Agency ("EPA") may impose
a lien on property where EPA has incurred clean-up costs. However, a CERCLA lien
is subordinate to pre-existing, perfected security interests.                   

   Under the laws of some states, and under CERCLA, it is conceivable that a
lender may be held liable, as an "owner" or "operator," for costs of addressing 
releases or threatened releases of hazardous substances at a Mortgaged Property,
regardless of whether or not the environmental damage or threat was caused by a 
prior owner or operator. CERCLA imposes liability on any and all "responsible   
parties" (which includes, inter alia, the property owner and operator) for the  
cost of clean-up of releases of hazardous substances. However, CERCLA excludes  
from the definition of "owner or operator" secured creditors who hold indicia of
ownership for the purpose of protecting their security interest, but "without   
participating in the management of the facility." That exclusion was            
substantially narrowed by a May 1990 decision of the United States Court of     
Appeals for the Eleventh Circuit in United States v. Fleet Factors Corp., which 
held that a lender need not have involved itself in the day-to-day operations of
the facility or participated in decisions relating to hazardous waste management
in order to be liable; rather, liability could attach to the lender if its      
involvement with the management of the facility is broad enough to support the  
inference that the lender could affect hazardous waste management practices if  
it so chose. The court added that a lender's capacity to influence such         
decisions could be inferred from the extent of its involvement in the facility's
financial management. In response to Fleet Factors, EPA promulgated regulations 
designed to clarify the range of activities a lender may engage in without      
losing the benefit of the statutory exclusion. Under the regulations, which took
effect in April 1992, a lender is permitted to monitor the borrower's           
environmental practices in order to determine if the facility is in compliance  
with applicable law, and to require the borrower to take measures necessary to  
achieve or maintain compliance or conduct necessary clean-ups. The lender may   
not, however, exercise control over or assume responsibility for the borrower's 
environmental practices. Such actions would be considered "participation in the 
management of the facility." Also, if the lender takes title to or possession of
the property, it might be deemed to have obviated the security interest         
exclusion and to be liable for clean-up costs pursuant to CERCLA. The EPA       
regulations allow lenders to take certain actions with respect to foreclosure,  
without losing the benefit of the statutory exclusion. Essentially, the         
regulations allow the lender to take actions consistent with protecting its     
security interest, but not actions which demonstrate an intent to exercise      
long-term ownership interest in the property. While the EPA regulations offer   
some protection to lenders, it must be noted that such protection may not be    
available under applicable state law. Furthermore, the regulations are binding  
only on EPA with respect to EPA's enforcement powers and cost recovery rights.  
It has not yet been determined whether the federal courts will apply the        
regulations in cost recovery actions brought against lenders by other           
responsible parties, although the regulations may well be considered persuasive 
by the courts. (Two judicial challenges have been brought against the EPA       
regulations in the United States Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia  
Circuit. The challenges both allege that the regulations are inconsistent with  
the statutory requirements of CERCLA and, therefore, should be invalidated. The 
challenges were filed on July 28, 1992, and are still pending.) If a lender is  
or becomes liable, it can bring an action for contribution against any other    
"responsible parties," including a previous owner or operator, who              

59

P-->424B3168th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 168th

created the environmental hazard, but those persons or entities may be bankrupt 
or otherwise judgment proof. The costs associated with environmental clean-up   
may be substantial. It is conceivable that such remedial costs arising from the 
circumstances set forth above would become a liability of the Trust Fund and    
occasion a loss to Certificateholders.                                          

Court decisions have taken varying views of the scope of the          
secured-creditor exemption, leading to administrative and legislative efforts to
provide guidance to lenders on the scope of activities that would trigger CERCLA
and/or RCRA liability. Until recently, these efforts have failed to provide     
substantial guidance.                                                           

 On October 30, 1996, however, the President signed into law legislation
intended to clarify the scope of the secured-creditor exemption under both      
CERCLA and RCRA. This legislation more explicitly defined the kinds of          
"participation in management" that would trigger liability under CERCLA and     
specified certain activities that would not constitute "participation in        
management" or otherwise result in a forfeiture of the secured-creditor         
exemption prior to foreclosure or during a workout period. The legislation also 
clarifies the extent of protection against liability under CERCLA in the event  
of foreclosure. The legislation also authorizes certain regulatory              
clarifications of the scope of the secured-creditor exemption for purposes of   
the Recourse Conservation and Recovery Act similar to the statutory protections 
under CERCLA. However, since the courts have not yet had the opportunity to     
interpret the new statutory provisions, the scope of the additional protections 
offered by the Asset Conservation Act is not fully defined. It also is important
to note that the Asset Conservation Act does not offer complete protection to   
lenders and that the risk of liability remains.                                 

   Except as otherwise specified in the applicable Prospectus Supplement, at
the time the Mortgage Loans were originated, no environmental assessment or a   
very limited environmental assessment of the Mortgaged Properties was conducted.

DUE-ON-SALE CLAUSES 

Unless otherwise provided in the related Prospectus Supplement, each  
conventional Mortgage Loan will contain a due-on-sale clause which will         
generally provide that if the mortgagor or obligor sells, transfers or conveys  
the Mortgaged Property, the loan may be accelerated by the mortgagee. In recent 
years, court decisions and legislative actions placed substantial restriction on
the right of lenders to enforce such clauses in many states. For instance, the  
California Supreme Court in August 1978 held that due-on-sale clauses were      
generally unenforceable. However, the Garn-St Germain Depository Institutions   
Act of 1982 (the "Garn-St Germain Act"), subject to certain exceptions, preempts
state constitutional, statutory and case law prohibiting the enforcement of     
due-on-sale clauses. As to loans secured by an owner-occupied residence, the    
Garn-St Germain Act sets forth nine specific instances in which a mortgagee     
covered by the Act may not exercise its rights under a due-on-sale clause,      
notwithstanding the fact that a transfer of the property may have occurred. The 
inability to enforce a due-on-sale clause may result in transfer of the related 
Mortgaged Property to an uncreditworthy person, which could increase the        
likelihood of default or may result in a mortgage bearing an interest rate below
the current market rate being assumed by a new home buyer, which may affect the 
average life of the Mortgage Loans and the number of Mortgage Loans which may   
extend to maturity.                                                             

PREPAYMENT CHARGES                                                              

 Under certain state laws, prepayment charges may not be imposed after a
certain period of time following the origination of Mortgage Loans with respect 
to prepayments on loans secured by liens encumbering owner-occupied residential 
properties. Since many of the Mortgaged Properties will be owner-occupied, it is
anticipated that prepayment charges may not be imposed with respect to many of  
the Mortgage Loans. The absence of such a restraint on prepayment, particularly 
with respect to fixed-rate Mortgage Loans having higher Mortgage Rates or APRs, 
may increase the likelihood of refinancing or other early retirement of such    
loans or contracts.                                                             

60

P-->424B3169th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 169th
APPLICABILITY OF USURY LAWS                                                     

  Title V of the Depository Institutions Deregulation and Monetary Control
Act of 1980, enacted in March 1980 ("Title V"), provides that state usury       
limitations shall not apply to certain types of residential first mortgage loans
originated by certain lenders after March 31, 1980. The Office of Thrift        
Supervision, as successor to the Federal Home Loan Bank Board, is authorized to 
issue rules and regulations and to publish interpretations governing            
implementation of Title V. The statute authorized the states to reimpose        
interest rate limits by adopting, before April 1, 1983, a law or constitutional 
provision which expressly rejects an application of the federal law. In         
addition, even where Title V is not so rejected, any state is authorized by the 
law to adopt a provision limiting discount points or other charges on mortgage  
loans covered by Title V. Certain states have taken action to reimpose interest 
rate limits and/or to limit discount points or other charges.                   

SOLDIERS' AND SAILORS' CIVIL RELIEF ACT                                         

   Generally, under the terms of the Soldiers' and Sailors' Civil Relief Act
of 1940, as amended (the "Relief Act"), a borrower who enters military service  
after the origination of such borrower's Mortgage Loan (including a borrower who
is a member of the National Guard or is in reserve status at the time of the    
origination of the Mortgage Loan and is later called to active duty) may not be 
charged interest above an annual rate of 6% during the period of such borrower's
active duty status, unless a court orders otherwise upon application of the     
lender. It is possible that such interest rate limitation could have an effect, 
for an indeterminate period of time, on the ability of the Master Servicer to   
collect full amounts of interest on certain of the Mortgage Loans. Unless       
otherwise provided in the applicable Prospectus Supplement, any shortfall in    
interest collections resulting from the application of the Relief Act could     
result in losses to the holders of the Certificates. In addition, the Relief Act
imposes limitations which would impair the ability of the Master Servicer to    
foreclose on an affected Mortgage Loan during the borrower's period of active   
duty status. Thus, in the event that such a Mortgage Loan goes into default,    
there may be delays and losses occasioned by the inability to realize upon the  
mortgaged property in a timely fashion.                                         

CERTAIN FEDERAL INCOME TAX CONSEQUENCES 

The following summary represents the advice of Kilpatrick Stockton LLP
counsel to the Depositor, as to the anticipated material federal income tax     
consequences of the purchase, ownership and disposition of Certificates. The    
summary is based on the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as     
amended (the "Code"), the regulations promulgated thereunder, including, where  
applicable, proposed regulations and, in particular, regulations promulgated    
under the REMIC provisions of the Code (the "REMIC Regulations"), judicial and  
administrative rulings and decisions now in effect, all of which are subject to 
change, possibly with retroactive effect. The summary does not purport to       
address all aspects of federal income taxation that may affect particular       
investors in view of their individual circumstances, including investors that   
may be subject to special treatment under the federal income tax laws, such as  
banks and insurance companies. In addition, the discussion is addressed         
primarily to investors who will hold Certificates as "capital assets" within the
meaning of Section 1221 of the Code. The tax consequences to an investor from an
investment in Certificates will depend in part on the status or individual tax  
circumstances of the investor. Accordingly, prospective investors are urged to  
consult their tax advisors regarding the particular federal, state, local and   
other tax consequences to them of the purchase, ownership and disposition of    
Certificates.                                                                   

GENERAL 

The federal income tax consequences to Certificateholders will vary   
depending on whether an election is made to treat the Trust Fund relating to a  
particular Series of Certificates as one or more REMICs under the Code. The     
Prospectus Supplement for each Series of Certificates will specify whether a    
REMIC election will be made.                                                    

61

P-->424B3170th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 170th
NON-REMIC CERTIFICATES; TAX STATUS AS A GRANTOR TRUST                           

If a REMIC election is not made for a Trust Fund which relates to a   
particular Series of Certificates, Kilpatrick Stockton LLP will deliver its     
opinion that the Trust Fund will not be classified as an association taxable as 
a corporation, but will be classified as a grantor trust under subpart E, Part I
of subchapter J of the Code, and that owners of Certificates issued by a        
particular Trust Fund will be subject to federal income taxation as owners of   
their pro rata share of the Trust Fund's assets. Unless otherwise specified, for
purposes of the discussion below relating to non-REMIC Certificates, the term   
"Mortgage Loan" includes Mortgage Loans and mortgages underlying Agency         
Securities and other Mortgage Assets owned by a Trust Fund.                     

SINGLE CLASS OF SENIOR CERTIFICATES 

 Characterization.  A Trust Fund may be created with one class of Senior
Certificates and one class of Subordinated Certificates. In such case, each     
Senior Certificateholder will be treated as the owner of a pro rata undivided   
interest in the interest and principal portions of the Trust Fund represented by
that Senior Certificate and will be considered the equitable owner of a pro rata
undivided interest in each of the assets in the pool. Any amounts received by a 
Senior Certificateholder in lieu of amounts due with respect to any Mortgage    
Loan because of a default or delinquency in payment will be treated for federal 
income tax purposes as having the same character as the payments they replace.  

Each holder of a Senior Certificate will be required to report on its 
federal income tax return its pro rata share of the entire income from the      
Mortgage Assets in the Trust Fund represented by that Senior Certificate,       
including interest, original issue discount, if any, prepayment fees, assumption
fees, any gain recognized upon an assumption and late payment charges received  
by the Master Servicer in accordance with such Senior Certificateholder's method
of accounting. Under Code Section 162 or 212, each Senior Certificateholder will
be entitled to deduct its pro rata share of servicing fees, prepayment fees,    
assumption fees, any loss recognized upon an assumption and late payment charges
retained by the Master Servicer, provided that such amounts are reasonable      
compensation for services rendered to the Trust Fund. A Senior Certificateholder
that is an individual, estate or trust will be entitled to deduct its share of  
expenses only to the extent such expenses plus all other Code Section 212       
expenses exceed two percent of its adjusted gross income. A Senior              
Certificateholder using the cash method of accounting must take into account its
pro rata share of income and deductions as and when collected by or paid to the 
Master Servicer. A Senior Certificateholder using an accrual method of          
accounting must take into account its pro rata share of income and deductions as
they become due or are paid to the Master Servicer, whichever is earlier. If the
Servicing Fees paid to the Master Servicer were deemed to exceed reasonable     
servicing compensation, the amount of such excess could be considered as a      
retained ownership interest by the Master Servicer (or any person to whom the   
Master Servicer assigned for value all or a portion of the Servicing Fees) in a 
portion of the interest payments on the Mortgage Loans. The Mortgage Loans may  
then be subject to the "coupon stripping" rules of the Code discussed below.    

     Unless otherwise specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, as to each
Series of Certificates, Kilpatrick Stockton LLP will render its opinion that:   

   (i) a Senior Certificate owned by a "domestic building and loan
  association" within the meaning of Code Section 7701(a)(19) representing
 principal and interest payments on Mortgage Loans will be considered to
     represent "loans . . . secured by an interest in real property which is . .
. residential property" within the meaning of Code Section            
 7701(a)(19)(C)(v); to the extent that the Mortgage Loans represented by
that Senior Certificate are of a type described in such Code section; 

        (ii) a Senior Certificate owned by a financial institution described
in Code Section 593(a) representing principal and interest payments on
  Mortgage Loans will be considered to represent "qualifying real property
loans" within the meaning of Code Section 593(d) and the Treasury     
   regulations under Code Section 593; to the extent that the Mortgage Loans
     represented by that Senior Certificate are of a type described in such Code
section;                                                              

      (iii) a Senior Certificate owned by a real estate investment trust
    representing an interest in Mortgage Loans will be considered to represent
"real estate assets" within the meaning of Code                       

62

P-->424B3171st Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 171st

 Section 856(c)(5)(A), and interest income on the Mortgage Loans will be
    considered "interest on obligations secured by mortgages on real property"
 within the meaning of Code Section 856(c)(3)(B); to the extent that the
Mortgage Loans represented by that Senior Certificate are of a type   
described in such Code section; and                                   

         (iv) a Senior Certificate owned by a REMIC will be an "obligation . .
    . which is principally secured by an interest in real property" within the
meaning of Code Section 860G(a)(3).                                   

  Buydown Mortgage Loans.  The assets constituting certain Trust Funds may
include Buydown Mortgage Loans. The characterization of any investment in       
Buydown Mortgage Loans will depend upon the precise terms of the related Buydown
Agreement, but to the extent that such Buydown Mortgage Loans are secured in    
part by a bank account or other personal property, they may not be treated in   
their entirety as assets described in the foregoing sections of the Code. There 
are no directly applicable precedents with respect to the federal income tax    
treatment or the characterization of investments in Buydown Mortgage Loans.     
Accordingly, holders of Senior Certificates should consult their own tax        
advisors with respect to characterization of investments in Senior Certificates 
representing an interest in a Trust Fund that includes Buydown Mortgage Loans.  

Premium.  The price paid for a Senior Certificate by a holder will be 
allocated to such holder's undivided interest in each Mortgage Loan based on    
each Mortgage Loan's relative fair market value, so that such holder's undivided
interest in each Mortgage Loan will have its own tax basis. A Senior            
Certificateholder that acquires an interest in Mortgage Loans at a premium may  
elect to amortize such premium under a constant interest method, provided that  
such Mortgage Loan was originated after September 27, 1985. Premium allocable to
a Mortgage Loan originated on or before September 27, 1985, should be allocated 
among the principal payments on the Mortgage Loan and allowed as an ordinary    
deduction as principal payments are made. Amortizable bond premium will be      
treated as an offset to interest income on such Senior Certificate. The basis   
for such Senior Certificate will be reduced to the extent that amortizable      
premium is applied to offset interest payments.                                 

   It is not clear whether a reasonable prepayment assumption should be used
in computing amortization of premium allowable under Code Section 171. If a     
premium is not subject to amortization using a reasonable prepayment assumption,
the holder of a Senior Certificate acquired at a premium should recognize a     
loss, if a Mortgage Loan prepays in full, equal to the difference between the   
portion of the prepaid principal amount of the Mortgage Loan that is allocable  
to the Certificate and the portion of the adjusted basis of the Certificate that
is allocable to the Mortgage Loan. If a reasonable prepayment assumption is used
to amortize such premium, it appears that such a loss would be available, if at 
all, only if prepayments have occurred at a rate faster than the reasonable     
assumed prepayment rate. It is not clear whether any other adjustments would be 
required to reflect differences between an assumed prepayment rate and the      
actual rate of prepayments.                                                     

Original Issue Discount.  The Internal Revenue Service (the "IRS") has
stated in published rulings that, in circumstances similar to those described   
herein, the special rules of the Code relating to "original issue discount"     
(currently Code Sections 1271 through 1273 and 1275) will be applicable to a    
Senior Certificateholder's interest in those Mortgage Loans meeting the         
conditions necessary for these sections to apply. Rules regarding periodic      
inclusion of original issue discount income are applicable to mortgages of      
corporations originated after May 27, 1969, mortgages of noncorporate mortgagors
(other than individuals) originated after July 1, 1982, and mortgages of        
individuals originated after March 2, 1984. Such original issue discount could  
arise by the financing of points or other charges by the originator of the      
mortgages in an amount greater than a statutory de minimis exception to the     
extent that the points are not currently deductible under applicable Code       
provisions or are not for services provided by the lender. Original issue       
discount generally must be reported as ordinary gross income as it accrues under
a constant interest method. See "Offered Certificates Representing Interests in
Loans Other Than ARMs -- Accrual of Original Issue Discount" below.             

Market Discount.  A Senior Certificateholder that acquires an undivided
interest in Mortgage Loans may be subject to the market discount rules of Code  
Sections 1276 through 1278 to the extent an undivided interest in a Mortgage    
Loan is considered to have been purchased at a "market discount." Generally, any

63

P-->424B3172nd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 172nd

market discount would be equal to the excess of the portion of the principal    
amount of such Mortgage Loan allocable to such holder's undivided interest over 
such holder's tax basis in such interest. Pursuant to certain de minimis rules  
applicable to the computation of market discount, market discount with respect  
to a Senior Certificate will be considered to be zero if the amount allocable to
the Senior Certificate is less than 0.25% of the Senior Certificate's stated    
redemption price at maturity multiplied by the weighted average maturity        
remaining after the date of purchase. Treasury regulations implementing the     
market discount rules have not yet been issued; therefore, investors should     
consult their own tax advisors regarding the application of these rules and the 
advisability of making any of the elections allowed under Code Sections 1276    
through 1278.                                                                   

   The Code provides that any principal payment (whether a scheduled payment
or a prepayment) or any gain on disposition of a market discount bond acquired  
by the taxpayer after October 22, 1986, shall be treated as ordinary income to  
the extent that it does not exceed the accrued market discount at the time of   
such payment. The amount of accrued market discount for purposes of determining 
the tax treatment of subsequent principal payments or dispositions of the market
discount bond is to be reduced by the amount so treated as ordinary income.     

     The Code also grants the Treasury Department authority to issue regulations
providing for the computation of accrued market discount on debt instruments,   
the principal of which is payable in more than one installment. The Treasury    
Department has not yet issued any such regulations; however, the relevant       
legislative history provides the best guidance applicable to this situation.    
Under certain analogous rules set forth in the Code and pursuant to the         
legislative history, the holder of such a market discount bond may elect to     
accrue market discount either on the basis of a constant interest rate or       
according to one of the following methods. If a Senior Certificate is issued    
with original issue discount, the amount of market discount that accrues during 
any accrual period would be equal to the product of (i) the total remaining     
market discount, multiplied by (ii) a fraction, the numerator of which is the   
original issue discount accruing during the period and the denominator of which 
is the total remaining original issue discount at the beginning of the accrual  
period. For Senior Certificates issued without original issue discount, the     
amount of market discount that accrues during a period is equal to the product  
of (i) the total remaining market discount, multiplied by (ii) a fraction, the  
numerator of which is the amount of stated interest paid during the accrual     
period and the denominator of which is the total amount of stated interest      
remaining to be paid at the beginning of the accrual period. For purposes of    
calculating market discount under any of the above methods in the case of       
instruments (such as the Senior Certificates) which provide for payments which  
may be accelerated by reason of prepayments of other obligations securing such  
instruments, the same prepayment assumption applicable to calculating the       
accrual of original issue discount will apply. Because the regulations described
above have not yet been issued, it is not possible to predict what effect those 
regulations might have on the tax treatment of a Senior Certificate purchased at
a discount or premium in the secondary market.                                  

     A holder who acquires a Senior Certificate at a market discount also may be
required to defer, until the maturity date of such Senior Certificate or its    
earlier disposition in a taxable transaction, the deduction of a portion of the 
amount of interest that the holder paid or accrued during the taxable year on   
any indebtedness incurred or maintained to purchase or carry the Senior         
Certificate in excess of the aggregate amount of interest (including original   
issue discount) includable in such holder's gross income for the taxable year   
with respect to such Senior Certificate. The amount of such net interest expense
deferred in a taxable year may not exceed the amount of market discount accrued 
on the Senior Certificate for the days during the taxable year on which the     
holder held the Senior Certificate and, in general, would be deductible when    
such market discount is includable in income. The amount of any remaining       
deferred deduction is to be taken into account in the taxable year in which the 
Senior Certificate matures or is disposed of in a taxable transaction. In the   
case of a disposition in which gain or loss is not recognized in whole or in    
part, any remaining deferred deduction will be allowed to the extent of gain    
recognized on the disposition. This deferral rule does not apply if the Senior  
Certificateholder elects to include such market discount in income currently as 
it accrues on all market discount obligations acquired by such Senior           
Certificateholder in that taxable year or thereafter.                           

64

P-->424B3173rd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 173rd

MULTIPLE CLASSES OF SENIOR CERTIFICATES 

Stripped Bonds and Stripped Coupons.  Pursuant to Code Section 1286, the
separation of ownership of the right to receive some or all of the interest     
payments on an obligation from ownership of the right to receive some or all of 
the principal payments results in the creation of "stripped bonds" with respect 
to principal payments and "stripped coupons" with respect to interest payments. 
For purposes of Code Sections 1271 through 1288, Code Section 1286 treats a     
stripped bond or a stripped coupon as an obligation issued on the date that such
stripped interest is created. If a Trust Fund is created with two classes of    
Senior Certificates, one class of Senior Certificates will represent the right  
to principal and interest, or principal only, on all or a portion of the Loans  
(the "Stripped Bond Certificates"), while the second class of Offered           
Certificates will represent the right to some or all of the interest on all or a
portion of such Loans (the "Stripped Coupon Certificates").                     

    Certain IRS guidance suggests that a servicing fee in excess of reasonable
servicing ("excess servicing") will be characterized under the stripped bond    
rules. In such case, this guidance would appear to require that reasonable      
servicing be calculated on a Mortgage Loan by Mortgage Loan basis which could   
result in some Mortgage Loans being treated as having more than 100 basis points
of interest (i.e., 1% interest on the Mortgage Loan principal balance) stripped 
off. However, if the Certificates are initially sold with a de minimis discount 
(assuming no prepayment assumption is required), any non-de minimis discount    
arising from a subsequent transfer of the Certificates should be treated as     
market discount. See -- Non-REMIC Certificates; Tax Status as a Grantor Trust," 
and " -- Single Class of Senior Certificates -- Market Discount" herein.        

  Under the Treasury Regulations issued December 28, 1992, a Stripped Bond
Certificate is generally treated as a single debt instrument issued on the day  
it is purchased for purposes of calculating any original issue discount.        
Generally, if the discount on a Stripped Bond Certificate is larger than a de   
minimis amount (as calculated for purposes of the original issue discount rules)
a purchaser of such a certificate will be required to accrue the discount under 
the original issue discount rules of the Code. See "-- Non-REMIC Certificates"  
and " -- Single Class of Senior Certificates -- Original Issue Discount" herein.
However, a purchaser of a Stripped Bond Certificate will be required to account 
for any discount on the certificate as market discount rather than original     
issue discount if either (i) the amount of original issue discount with respect 
to the certificate was treated as zero under the original issue discount de     
minimis rule when the certificate was stripped or (ii) no more than 100 basis   
points (including any amount of servicing in excess of reasonable servicing) is 
stripped off of the Trust Fund's Mortgage Loans. The stripped bond rules        
constitute a method of accounting and, pursuant to Revenue Procedure 91-49      
issued on August 8, 1991, purchasers of Stripped Bond Certificates using a      
method of accounting inconsistent with that set forth under these procedures are
required to change their method of accounting to conform with such rules by     
requesting the consent of the IRS to the change in their accounting method on a 
statement attached to their first timely tax return filed after August 8, 1991. 

    The precise tax treatment of Stripped Coupon Certificates is substantially
uncertain. The Code could be read literally to require that original issue      
discount computations be made on a Loan by Loan basis. Certain IRS guidance     
would appear to suggest that a Stripped Coupon Certificate be treated as a      
single installment obligation subject to the original issue discount rules of   
the Code. Under this characterization, all payments on a Stripped Coupon        
Certificate would be included in the certificate's stated redemption price at   
maturity for purposes of calculating income on such certificate under the       
original issue discount rules of the Code.                                      

    It is unclear under what circumstances, if any, the prepayment of Mortgage
Loans will give rise to a loss to the holder of a Stripped Bond Certificate     
purchased at a premium or a Stripped Coupon Certificate. If such Certificate is 
treated as a single instrument (rather than an interest in discrete mortgage    
loans) and the effect of prepayments is taken into account in computing yield   
with respect to such Senior Certificate, it appears that no loss may be         
available as a result of any particular prepayment unless prepayments occur at a
rate faster than the assumed prepayment rate. However, if such Certificate is   
treated as an interest in discrete Mortgage Loans, or if no prepayment          
assumption is used, then when a Mortgage Loan is prepaid, the holder of such    
Certificate should be able to recognize a loss equal to the portion of the      
adjusted issue price of such Certificate that is allocable to such Mortgage     
Loan.                                                                           

65

P-->424B3174th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 174th

    Holders of Stripped Bond Certificates and Stripped Coupon Certificates are
urged to consult with their own tax advisors regarding the proper treatment of  
these Certificates for federal income tax purposes.                             

Treatment of Certain Owners.  Several Code sections, as noted below,  
provide beneficial treatment to certain taxpayers that invest in mortgage loans 
of the type that would typically make up a Trust Fund. With respect to these    
Code sections, there is no specific legal authority specifying whether the      
character of Senior Certificates issued in connection with the issuance of a    
multiple class of Senior Certificates will necessarily be treated the same as   
that of the underlying Mortgage Loans for purposes of these provisions. For     
example, while Code Section 1286 treats a stripped obligation as a separate     
obligation for purposes of the Code provisions addressing original issue        
discount, as described above, there is some uncertainty whether such            
characterization would necessarily apply with regard to other Code sections.    
Nevertheless, unless otherwise specified in the related Prospectus Supplement,  
as to each class of Senior Certificates, Kilpatrick Stockton LLP will render its
opinion that, although the issue is not free from doubt, based on policy        
considerations, each class of Senior Certificates should be considered to       
represent "qualifying real property loans" within the meaning of Code Section   
593(d), "real estate assets" within the meaning of Code Section 856(c)(5)(A) and
"loans . . . secured by, an interest in real property which is . . . residential
real property" within the meaning of Code Section 7701(a)(19)(C)(v), and        
interest income attributable to Senior Certificates should be considered to     
represent "interest on obligations secured by mortgages on real property" within
the meaning of Code Section 856(c)(3)(B), provided that in each case the        
underlying Mortgage Loans and interest on such Mortgage Loans qualify for such  
treatment. In addition, such opinion will opine that Senior Certificates will be
"obligation[s] (including any participation or certificate of beneficial        
ownership therein) which [are] principally secured by an interest in real       
property" within the meaning of Code Section 860G(a)(3).                        

OFFERED CERTIFICATES REPRESENTING INTERESTS IN LOANS OTHER THAN ARMS 

     Original issue discount on a Senior Certificate representing an interest in
a Mortgage Loan must be included in the owner's ordinary income for federal     
income tax purposes as it accrues, in accordance with a constant interest method
that takes into account the compounding of interest, in advance of receipt of   
the cash attributable to such income. The amount of original issue discount     
required to be included in an owner's income in any taxable year with respect to
a Senior Certificate representing an interest in Mortgage Loans other than ARMs 
likely will be computed as described below under " -- Accrual of Original Issue
Discount." The following discussion is based in part on Treasury regulations    
under Code Sections 1271 through 1273 and 1275 (the "OID Regulations") and in   
part on the provisions of the Tax Reform Act of 1986 (the "1986 Act").          

    In general, under the Code, original issue discount is equal to the excess
of a debt instrument's stated redemption price at maturity over its issue price.
The issue price of a debt instrument as to any purchaser is generally equal to  
the price paid by such purchaser for the debt instrument. The stated redemption 
price at maturity of a debt instrument is the sum of all payments to be made on 
such debt instrument other than payments that are treated as qualified stated   
interest payments. The accrual of original issue discount on a Senior           
Certificate representing an interest in Mortgage Loans, as described below under
"Accrual of Original Issue Discount," will, unless otherwise specified in the   
related Prospectus Supplement, utilize the original yield to maturity of the    
Senior Certificate to compute any original issue discount, as calculated based  
on a reasonable assumed prepayment rate for the Mortgage Loans underlying the   
Senior Certificate (the "Prepayment Assumption"), and taking into account events
that occur during the calculation period. The Prepayment Assumption is required 
to be determined in the manner prescribed by regulations, which regulations have
not yet been issued. The legislative history of the 1986 Act (the "Legislative  
History") provides, however, that the regulations will require that the         
Prepayment Assumption be the prepayment assumption that is used in determining  
the offering price of such Certificate. No representation is made that such     
Certificate will prepay at the Prepayment Assumption or at any other rate.      
Although the existing authority literally only apply to debt instruments        
collateralized by mortgages that are subject to prepayment rather than direct   
ownership interests, such as the Senior Certificates, in mortgages, because no  
other legal authority provides guidance with regard to the proper method for    
accruing original issue discount on obligations that are subject to prepayment, 
until Treasury regulations or other legal authority instructs                   

66

P-->424B3175th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 175th

otherwise, the Master Servicer intends to calculate, and report original issue  
discount under the method described below.                                      

Accrual of Original Issue Discount.  Generally, the owner of a Senior 
Certificate must include in gross income the sum of the "daily portions," as    
defined below, of the original issue discount on such Senior Certificate for    
each day on which it owns a Senior Certificate, including the date of purchase  
but excluding the date of disposition. In the case of an original owner, the    
daily portions of original issue discount with respect to each component        
generally will be determined as follows under the existing authority. A         
calculation will be made by the Master Servicer or such other entity specified  
in the related Prospectus Supplement of the portion of original issue discount  
that accrues during each successive monthly accrual period (or shorter period   
from the date of original issue) that ends on the day in the calendar year      
corresponding to each of the Distribution Dates on the Senior Certificate (or   
the day prior to each such date). This will be done, in the case of each full   
month accrual period, by adding (i) the present value at the end of the accrual 
period (determined by using as a discount factor the original yield to maturity 
of the respective component, under the Prepayment Assumption) of all remaining  
payments to be received under the Prepayment Assumption on the respective       
component, and (ii) any payments received during such accrual period, and       
subtracting from that total the "adjusted issue price" of the respective        
component at the beginning of such accrual period. The "adjusted issue price" of
a Senior Certificate at the beginning of the first accrual period is its issue  
price; the "adjusted issue price" of a Senior Certificate at the beginning of a 
subsequent accrual period is the "adjusted issue price" at the beginning of the 
immediately preceding accrual period plus the amount of original issue discount 
allocable to that accrual period reduced by the amount of any payment made at   
the end of or during that accrual period. The original issue discount accruing  
during such accrual period will then be divided by the number of days in the    
period to determine the daily portion of original issue discount for each day in
the period. With respect to an initial accrual period shorter than a full       
monthly accrual period, the daily portions of original issue discount must be   
determined according to an appropriate allocation under any reasonable method.  

SENIOR CERTIFICATES REPRESENTING INTERESTS IN ARM LOANS                         

  The OID Regulations do not address the treatment of instruments, such as
the Senior Certificates, which represent interests in Mortgage Loans with       
Mortgage Rates which adjust periodically ("ARM Loans"). Additionally, the IRS   
has not issued guidance under the Code's coupon stripping rules with respect to 
such instruments. In the absence of any authority the Master Servicer will      
report original issue discount on Senior Certificates attributable to ARM Loans 
("Stripped ARM Obligations") to holders in a manner it believes is consistent   
with the rules described above under the heading "-- Senior Certificates        
Representing Interests in Loans Other Than ARM Loans" and with the OID          
Regulations. In general, application of these rules may require inclusion of    
income on a Stripped ARM Obligation in advance of the receipt of cash           
attributable to such income. Further, the addition of interest deferred by      
reason of negative amortization ("Deferred Interest") to the principal balance  
of an ARM Loan may require the inclusion of such amount in the income of the    
Senior Certificateholder when such amount accrues. Furthermore, the addition of 
Deferred Interest to the Senior Certificate's principal balance will result in  
additional income (including possibly original issue discount income) to the    
Senior Certificateholder over the remaining life of such Senior Certificates.   

   Because the treatment of Stripped ARM Obligations is uncertain, investors
are urged to consult their tax advisors regarding how income will be includable 
with respect to such Certificates. Possible Application of Contingent Payment   
Rules to Certain Non-REMIC Certificates                                         

The regulations under Section 1275 of the Code include rules for      
obligations that provide for one or more contingent payments. Rights to         
interest-only payments on a mortgage loan might be considered to be contingent  
within the meaning of the OID Regulations if such interest would not be paid    
upon the borrower exercising a right to prepay the related mortgage loan. In the
case of an investor having a right to shares of the interest and principal      
payments on a mortgage loan where the share of interest is not substantially    
greater than the share of principal, the possibility of prepayment should not be
considered to characterize otherwise noncontingent interest payments as         
contingent payments; the absence of interest payments following a prepayment    
would be the normal consequence of the return of such investor's capital in the 
form of a principal                                                             

67

P-->424B3176th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 176th

payment. On the other hand, a right to interest on such a mortgage loan is more 
likely to be regarded as contingent if held by an investor that does not also   
hold a right to the related principal; such an investor would not recover its   
capital through receipt of a principal payment at the time of the prepayment of 
the mortgage loan.                                                              

    Applying these principles to the Senior Certificates, because the Mortgage
Loans are subject to prepayment at any time, payments on a Class of Senior      
Certificates representing a right to interest on the Mortgage Loans could be    
considered to be contingent within the meaning of the OID Regulations, at least 
if the right is to interest only or if such Senior Certificate was issued at a  
premium. The likelihood that such payments will be considered contingent        
increases the greater the amount of such premium.                               

The IRS recently issued regulations (the "Final Contingent Debt       
Regulations") governing the calculation of OID on instruments having contingent 
interest payments. The Final Contingent Debt Regulations, which apply to debt   
instruments issued on or after August 13, 1996, specifically do not apply       
(similar to the proposed contingent debt regulations) for purposes of           
calculating OID on debt instruments subject to principal acceleration under Code
Section 1272(a)(6), such as the Senior Certificates likely represent.           

   In the event that payments on a Senior Certificate in respect of interest
on the Mortgage Loans were considered contingent, the holder would generally    
report income or loss as described above under "-- Multiple Classes of Senior
Certificates -- Stripped Bonds and Stripped Coupons," except that the yield that
would be used in calculating interest income would not be the actual yield but  
would instead equal the "applicable Federal rate" (the "AFR," generally, an     
average of current yields of Treasury securities computed and published monthly 
by the IRS), in effect at the time of purchase of such Senior Certificate by    
such holder. In addition, once such holder's adjusted basis in such Senior      
Certificate has been reduced (by prior distributions or losses) to an amount    
equal to the aggregate amount of the remaining noncontingent payments of the    
Mortgage Loans that are allocable to such Senior Certificate (or to zero if such
Senior Certificate does not share in principal payments), then such holder would
recognize income in each subsequent month equal to the full amount of interest  
on the Mortgage Loans that accrues in that month and is allocable to such Senior
Certificate. It is uncertain whether, under the contingent payment rules, any   
other adjustments would be made to take account of prepayments of the Mortgage  
Loans.                                                                          

SALE OR EXCHANGE OF A SENIOR CERTIFICATE                                        

    Sale or exchange of a Senior Certificate prior to its maturity will result
in gain or loss equal to the difference, if any, between the amount received,   
and the owner's adjusted basis in the Senior Certificate. Such adjusted basis   
generally will equal the seller's purchase price for the Senior Certificate,    
increased by the original issue discount included in the seller's gross income  
with respect to the Senior Certificate, and reduced by principal payments on the
Senior Certificate previously received by the seller. Such gain or loss will be 
capital gain or loss to an owner for which a Senior Certificate is a "capital   
asset" within the meaning of Code Section 1221, and will be long-term or        
short-term depending on whether the Senior Certificate has been owned for the   
long-term capital gain holding period (currently more than one year).           

    Senior Certificates will be "evidences of indebtedness" within the meaning
of Code Section 582(c)(1), so that gain or loss recognized from the sale of a   
Senior Certificate by a bank or a thrift institution to which such section      
applies will be ordinary income or loss.                                        

NON-U.S. PERSONS 

   Generally, to the extent that a Senior Certificate evidences ownership in
Mortgage Loans that are issued on or before July 18, 1984, interest or original 
issue discount paid by the person required to withhold tax under Code Section   
1441 or 1442 to (i) an owner that is not a U.S. Person (as defined below), or   
(ii) a Senior Certificateholder holding on behalf of an owner that is not a U.S.
Person, will be subject to federal income tax, collected by withholding, at a   
rate of 30% or such lower rate as may be provided for interest by an applicable 
tax treaty. Accrued original issue discount recognized by the owner on the sale 
or exchange of such a Senior Certificate also will be subject to federal income 
tax at the same rate. Generally, such payments would not be subject to          
withholding to the extent that a Senior Certificate evidences ownership in      
Mortgage Loans issued                                                           

68

P-->424B3177th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 177th

after July 18, 1984, if (i) such Senior Certificateholder does not actually or  
constructively own 10 percent or more of the combined voting power of all       
classes of equity in the issuer (which for purposes of this discussion may be   
defined as the Trust Fund (the "Issuer")); (ii) such Senior Certificateholder is
not a controlled foreign corporation (within the meaning of Code Section 957)   
related to the Issuer; and (iii) such Senior Certificateholder complies with    
certain identification requirements (including delivery of a statement, signed  
by the Senior Certificateholder under penalties of perjury, certifying that such
Senior Certificateholder is not a U.S. Person and providing the name and address
of such Senior Certificateholder).                                              

A "U.S. Person" means a citizen or resident of the United States, a   
corporation or a partnership organized in or under the laws of the United       
States, or any political subdivision thereof or an estate or trust, the income  
of which is includable in gross income for federal income tax purposes          
regardless of source.                                                           

INFORMATION REPORTING AND BACKUP WITHHOLDING 

 The Master Servicer will furnish or make available, within a reasonable
time after the end of each calendar year, to each Certificateholder at any time 
during such year, such information as may be deemed necessary or desirable to   
assist Certificateholders in preparing their federal income tax returns, or to  
enable holders to make such information available to owners or other financial  
intermediaries of holders that hold such Certificates as nominees. If a holder, 
owner or other recipient of a payment on behalf of an owner fails to supply a   
certified taxpayer identification number or if the Secretary of the Treasury    
determines that such person has not reported all interest and dividend income   
required to be shown on its federal income tax return, 31% backup withholding   
may be required with respect to any payments. Any amounts deducted and withheld 
from a distribution to a recipient would be allowed as a credit against such    
recipient's federal income tax liability.                                       

REMIC CERTIFICATES                                                              

   A Trust Fund relating to a Series of Certificates may elect to be treated
as a REMIC. Qualification as a REMIC requires ongoing compliance with certain   
conditions. Although a REMIC is not generally subject to federal income tax     
(see, however, "-- Residual Certificates" and " -- Prohibited Transactions and
Other Taxes"), if a Trust Fund with respect to which a REMIC election is made   
fails to comply with one or more of the ongoing requirements of the Code for    
REMIC status during any taxable year, including the implementation of           
restrictions on the purchase and transfer of the residual interest in a REMIC as
described below under "Residual Certificates," the Code provides that a Trust   
Fund will not be treated as a REMIC for such year and thereafter. In that event,
such entity may be taxable as a separate corporation, and the related REMIC     
Certificates may not be accorded the status or given the tax treatment described
below. While the Code authorizes the Treasury Department to issue regulations   
providing relief in the event of an inadvertent termination of status as a      
REMIC, no such regulations have been issued. Any such relief, moreover, may be  
accompanied by sanctions, such as the imposition of a corporate tax on all or a 
portion of the REMIC's income for the period in which the requirements for such 
status are not satisfied. With respect to each such Trust Fund that elects REMIC
status, Kilpatrick Stockton LLP will deliver its opinion generally to the effect
that, under then existing law and assuming compliance with all provisions of the
related Agreement, such Trust Fund will qualify as a REMIC and the related      
Certificates will be considered to be regular interests ("Regular Certificates")
or residual interests ("Residual Certificates") in the REMIC. The related       
Prospectus Supplement for each Series of Certificates will indicate whether the 
Trust Fund will make a REMIC election and whether a class of Certificates will  
be treated as a regular or residual interest in the REMIC.                      

   In general, with respect to each Series of Certificates for which a REMIC
election is made, (i) Certificates held by a thrift institution taxed as a      
"mutual savings bank" or "domestic building and loan association" will represent
interests in "qualifying real property loans" within the meaning of Code Section
593(d)(1); (ii) Certificates held by a thrift institution taxed as a "domestic  
building and loan association" will constitute assets described in Code Section 
7701(a)(19)(C); (iii) Certificates held by a real estate investment trust will  
constitute "real estate assets" within the meaning of Code Section 856(c)(5)(A);
and (iv) interest on Certificates held by a real estate investment trust will be
considered "interest on obligations secured by mortgages on real property"      
within the meaning of Code Section 856(c)(3)(B). If less than 95% of the REMIC's
assets are assets qualifying under any of the foregoing Code sections, the      
Certificates will be qualifying assets only to the extent that the REMIC's      
assets are qualifying assets. In addition, payments on                          

69

P-->424B3178th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 178th

Mortgage Loans held pending distribution on the REMIC Certificates will be      
considered to be qualifying real property loans for purposes of Code Section    
593(d)(1) and real estate assets for purposes of Code Section 856(c).           

    In some instances the Mortgage Loans may not be treated entirely as assets
described in the foregoing sections. See, in this regard, the discussion of     
Buydown Mortgage Loans contained in "Non-REMIC Certificates" and "Single Class
of Senior Certificates" above. REMIC Certificates held by a real estate         
investment trust will not constitute "Government Securities" within the meaning 
of Code Section 856(c)(5)(A), and REMIC Certificates held by a regulated        
investment company will not constitute "Government Securities" within the       
meaning of Code Section 851(b)(4)(A)(ii). REMIC Certificates held by certain    
financial institutions will constitute "evidences of indebtedness" within the   
meaning of Code Section 582(c)(1).                                              

A "qualified mortgage" for REMIC purposes is any obligation (including
certificates of participation in such an obligation) that is principally secured
by an interest in real property and that is transferred to the REMIC within a   
prescribed time period in exchange for regular or residual interests in the     
REMIC. The REMIC Regulations provide that manufactured housing or mobile homes  
(not including recreational vehicles, campers or similar vehicles) which are    
"single family residences" under Code Section 25(e)(10) will qualify as real    
property without regard to state law classifications. Under Code Section        
25(e)(10), a single family residence includes any manufactured home which has a 
minimum of 400 square feet of living space and a minimum width in excess of 102 
inches and which is of a kind customarily used at a fixed location.             

    Tiered REMIC Structures.  For certain Series of Certificates, two separate
elections may be made to treat designated portions of the related Trust Fund as 
REMICs (respectively, the "Subsidiary REMIC" and the "Master REMIC") for federal
income tax purposes. Upon the issuance of any such Series of Certificates,      
Kilpatrick Stockton LLP, counsel to the Depositor, will deliver its opinion     
generally to the effect that, assuming compliance with all provisions of the    
related Agreement, the Master REMIC as well as any Subsidiary REMIC will each   
qualify as a REMIC and the REMIC Certificates issued by the Master REMIC and the
Subsidiary REMICs, respectively, will be considered to evidence ownership of    
Regular Certificates or Residual Certificates in the related REMIC within the   
meaning of the REMIC provisions.                                                

Only REMIC Certificates issued by the Master REMIC will be offered    
hereunder. The Subsidiary REMIC and the Master REMIC will be treated as one     
REMIC solely for purposes of determining whether the REMIC Certificates will be 
(i) "qualifying real property loans" under Section 593(d) of the Code; (ii)     
"real estate assets" within the meaning of Section 856(c)(5)(A) of the Code;    
(iii) "loans secured by an interest in real property" under Section             
7701(a)(19)(C) of the Code; and (iv) whether the income on such Certificates is 
interest described in Section 856(c)(3)(B) of the Code.                         

REGULAR CERTIFICATES 

General.  Except as otherwise stated in this discussion, Regular      
Certificates will be treated for federal income tax purposes as debt instruments
issued by the REMIC and not as ownership interests in the REMIC or its assets.  
Moreover, holders of Regular Certificates that otherwise report income under a  
cash method of accounting will be required to report income with respect to     
Regular Certificates under an accrual method.                                   

Original Issue Discount.  The Regular Certificates may be issued with 
"original issue discount" within the meaning of Code Section 1273(a). Generally,
such original issue discount, if any, will equal the difference between the     
"stated redemption price at maturity" of a Regular Certificate and its "issue   
price." Holders of any class of Certificates issued with original issue discount
will be required to include such original issue discount in gross income for    
federal income tax purposes as it accrues, in accordance with a constant        
interest method based on the compounding of interest, in advance of receipt of  
the cash attributable to such income. The following discussion is based in part 
on the OID Regulations and the 1986 Act. The holder of a Regular Certificate    
should be aware, however, that the OID Regulations do not currently address     
certain issues relevant to prepayable securities, such as the Regular           
Certificates.                                                                   

70

P-->424B3179th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 179th

     Rules governing original issue discount are set forth in Code Sections 1271
through 1273 and 1275. These rules require that the amount and rate of accrual  
of original issue discount be calculated based on a Prepayment Assumption and   
prescribe a method for adjusting the amount and rate of accrual of such discount
where the actual prepayment rate differs from the Prepayment Assumption. Under  
the Code, the Prepayment Assumption is required to be determined in the manner  
prescribed by regulations which have not yet been issued. The Legislative       
History provides, however, that Congress intended the regulations to require    
that the Prepayment Assumption be the prepayment assumption that is used in     
determining the initial offering price of such Regular Certificates. The        
Prospectus Supplement for each Series of Regular Certificates will specify the  
Prepayment Assumption to be used for the purpose of determining the amount and  
rate of accrual of original issue discount. No representation is made that the  
Regular Certificates will prepay at the Prepayment Assumption or at any other   
rate.                                                                           

In general, each Regular Certificate will be treated as a single      
installment obligation issued with an amount of original issue discount equal to
the excess, if any, of its "stated redemption price at maturity" over its "issue
price." The issue price of a Regular Certificate will generally be the first    
price at which a substantial amount of Regular Certificates of that class are   
first sold to the public (excluding bond houses, brokers, underwriters or       
wholesalers). The issue price of a Regular Certificate also will include the    
amount paid by an initial Regular Certificateholder, if any, for accrued        
interest that relates to a period prior to the issue date of the Regular        
Certificate. The stated redemption price at maturity of a Regular Certificate   
will equal all payments to be made on the Certificate other than payments which 
constitute "qualified stated interest." Under the OID Regulations, qualified    
stated interest generally means interest payable at a single fixed rate or      
qualified variable rate (as described below) provided that such interest        
payments are unconditionally payable at intervals of one year or less during the
entire term of the Regular Certificate. Interest is payable at a single fixed   
rate only if the rate appropriately takes into account the length of the        
interval between payments. Distributions of interest on Regular Certificates,   
with respect to which deferred interest will accrue, will not constitute        
qualified stated interest payments, in which case the stated redemption price at
maturity of such Regular Certificates includes all distributions of interest as 
well as principal thereon. Where the interval between the issue date and the    
first Distribution Date on a Regular Certificate is either longer or shorter    
than the interval between subsequent Distribution Dates, all or part of the     
interest foregone, in the case of the longer interval, and all of the additional
interest, in the case of the shorter interval, will be included in the stated   
redemption price at maturity and tested under the de minimis rule described     
below. The OID Regulations suggest that all interest on a long first period     
Regular Certificate that is issued with non-de minimis OID may be treated as    
OID. Regular Certificateholders should consult their own tax advisors to        
determine the issue price and stated redemption price at maturity of a Regular  
Certificate.                                                                    

     Under the de minimis rule, original issue discount on a Regular Certificate
will be considered to be zero if such original issue discount is less than 0.25%
of the stated redemption price at maturity of the Regular Certificate multiplied
by the weighted average maturity of the Regular Certificate. For this purpose,  
the weighted average maturity of the Regular Certificate is computed as the sum 
of the amounts determined by multiplying the number of full years (i.e.,        
rounding down partial years) from the issue date until each distribution in     
reduction of stated redemption price at maturity is scheduled to be made by a   
fraction, the numerator of which is the amount of each distribution included in 
the stated redemption price at maturity of the Regular Certificate and the      
denominator of which is the stated redemption price at maturity of the Regular  
Certificate. Although currently unclear, it appears that the schedule of such   
distributions should be determined in accordance with the Prepayment Assumption.
The Prepayment Assumption with respect to a Series of Regular Certificates will 
be set forth in the related Prospectus Supplement. Holders generally must report
de minimis OID pro rata as principal payments are received, and such income will
be capital gain if the Regular Certificate is held as a capital asset. However, 
accrual method holders may elect to accrue all de minimis OID as well as market 
discount under a constant interest method.                                      

 Generally, a Regular Certificateholder must include in gross income the
"daily portions," as determined below, of the original issue discount that      
accrues on a Regular Certificate for each day the Regular Certificateholder     
holds the Regular Certificate, including the purchase date but excluding the    
disposition date. In the case of an original holder of a Regular Certificate, a 
calculation will be made of the portion of the                                  

71

P-->424B3180th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 180th

original issue discount that accrues during each successive period (an "accrual 
period") that ends on the day in the calendar year corresponding to a           
Distribution Date (or if Distribution Dates are on the first day or first       
business day of the immediately preceding month, interest may be treated as     
payable on the last day of the immediately preceding month) and begins on the   
day after the end of the immediately preceding accrual period (or on the issue  
date in the case of the first accrual period). This will be done, in the case of
each full accrual period, by (i) adding (a) the present value at the end of the 
accrual period (determined by using as a discount factor the original yield to  
maturity of the Regular Certificates as calculated under the Prepayment         
Assumption) of all remaining payments to be received on the Regular Certificate 
under the Prepayment Assumption, and (b) any payments included in the stated    
redemption price at maturity received during such accrual period, and (ii)      
subtracting from that total the "adjusted issue price" of the Regular           
Certificates at the beginning of such accrual period. The "adjusted issue price"
of a Regular Certificate at the beginning of the first accrual period is its    
issue price; the "adjusted issue price" of a Regular Certificate at the         
beginning of a subsequent accrual period is the "adjusted issue price" at the   
beginning of the immediately preceding accrual period plus the amount of        
original issue discount allocable to that accrual period and reduced by the     
amount of any payment other than a payment of stated periodic interest made at  
the end of or during that accrual period. The original issue discount accrued   
during an accrual period will then be divided by the number of days in the      
period to determine the daily portion of original issue discount for each day in
the accrual period. The calculation of original issue discount under the method 
described above will cause the accrual of original issue discount to either     
increase or decrease (but never below zero) in a given accrual period to reflect
the fact that prepayments are occurring faster or slower than under the         
Prepayment Assumption. With respect to an initial accrual period shorter than a 
full accrual period, the daily portions of original issue discount may be       
determined according to an appropriate allocation under any reasonable method.  

    A subsequent purchaser of a Regular Certificate issued with original issue
discount who purchases the Regular Certificate at a cost less than the remaining
stated redemption price at maturity will also be required to include in gross   
income the sum of the daily portions of original issue discount on that Regular 
Certificate. In computing the daily portions of original issue discount for such
a purchaser (as well as an initial purchaser that purchases at a price higher   
than the adjusted issue price but less than the stated redemption price at      
maturity), however, the daily portion is reduced by the amount that would be the
daily portion for such day (computed in accordance with the rules set forth     
above) multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the excess of (a) the
purchaser's adjusted basis in the Regular Certificate immediately after the     
purchase thereof over (b) the adjusted issue price of the Regular Certificate,  
and the denominator of which is the excess of (c) all amounts remaining to be   
paid on the Regular Certificate, other than qualified stated interest, over (d) 
the adjusted issue price of the Regular Certificate.                            

Acquisition Premium.  A purchaser of a Regular Certificate at a price 
greater than its adjusted issue price but less than its redemption price at     
maturity will be required to include in gross income the daily portions of the  
original issue discount on the Regular Certificate reduced pro rata by a        
fraction, the numerator of which is the excess of its purchase price over such  
adjusted issue price and the denominator of which is the excess of the remaining
stated redemption price at maturity over the adjusted issue price.              
Alternatively, such a subsequent purchaser may elect to treat all such          
acquisition premium under the "constant yield method."                          

  Variable Rate Regular Certificate.  Regular Certificates may provide for
interest based on a variable rate. Under the OID Regulations, interest is       
treated as payable at a variable rate and not as contingent interest if,        
generally, (i) the issue price does not exceed the original principal balance,  
and (ii) the interest compounds or is payable at least annually at current      
values of (a) one or more "qualified floating rates," (b) a single fixed rate   
and one or more qualified floating rates, (c) a single "objective rate," or (d) 
a single fixed rate and a single objective rate that is a "qualified inverse    
floating rate." A floating rate is a qualified floating rate if variations in   
the rate can reasonably be expected to measure contemporaneous variations in the
cost of newly borrowed funds, where such rate is subject to a multiple of not   
less than zero nor more than 1.35. Such rate may also be increased or decreased 
by a fixed spread or subject to a fixed cap or floor, or a cap or floor that is 
not reasonably expected as of the issue date to affect the yield of the         
instrument significantly. An objective rate includes a rate determined using a  
single fixed formula and that is based on one or more qualified floating rates  
or the yield or changes in the price of actively traded personal property.      
Certain proposed OID Regulations                                                

72

P-->424B3181st Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 181st

would expand the definition of objective rate to include any rate (other than a 
qualified floating rate) that is determined using a single fixed formula and    
that is based on objective financial or economic information, provided that such
information is not (i) within the control of the issuer or a related party or   
(ii) unique to the circumstances of the issuer or a related party. A qualified  
inverse floating rate is a rate equal to a fixed rate minus a qualified floating
rate that inversely reflects contemporaneous variations in the cost of newly    
borrowed funds; an inverse floating rate that is not a qualified inverse        
floating rate may nevertheless be an objective rate. A class of Regular         
Certificates may be issued that does not have a variable rate under the         
foregoing rules; for example, a class that bears different rates at different   
times during the period it is outstanding such that it is considered            
significantly "front-loaded" or "back-loaded" within the meaning of the OID     
Regulations. It is possible that such a class may be considered to bear         
"contingent interest" within the meaning of the OID Regulations and the proposed
OID Regulations. The proposed OID Regulations, as they relate to the treatment  
of contingent interest, are by their terms not applicable to Regular            
Certificates. However, if final regulations dealing with contingent interest    
with respect to Regular Certificates apply the same principles as the proposed  
OID Regulations, such regulations may lead to different timing of income        
inclusion than would be the case under the OID Regulations. Furthermore,        
application of such principles could lead to the characterization of gain on the
sale of contingent interest Regular Certificates as ordinary income.            

    Under the REMIC Regulations, a Regular Certificate (i) bearing a rate that
qualifies as a variable rate under the OID Regulations that is tied to current  
values of a variable rate (or the highest, lowest or average of two or more     
variable rates, including a rate based on the average cost of funds of one or   
more financial institutions), or a positive or negative multiple of such a rate 
(plus or minus a specified number of basis points), or that represents a        
weighted average of rates on some or all of the Mortgage Loans, including such a
rate that is subject to one or more caps or floors, or (ii) bearing one or more 
such variable rates for one or more periods, or one or more fixed rates for one 
or more periods, and a different variable rate or fixed rate for other periods, 
qualifies as a regular interest in a REMIC. Accordingly, unless otherwise       
indicated in the applicable Prospectus Supplement, the Depositor intends to     
treat Regular Certificates that qualify as regular interests under this rule in 
the same manner as obligations bearing a variable rate for original issue       
discount reporting purposes.                                                    

     The amount of original issue discount with respect to a Regular Certificate
bearing a variable rate of interest will accrue in the manner described above   
under "-- Original Issue Discount," with the yield to maturity and future       
payments on such Regular Certificate generally to be determined by assuming that
interest will be payable for the life of the Regular Certificate based on the   
initial rate (or, if different, the value of the applicable variable rate as of 
the pricing date) for the relevant class. Unless otherwise specified in the     
applicable Prospectus Supplement, the Depositor intends to treat such variable  
interest as qualified stated interest, other than variable interest on an       
interest-only or super-premium class, which will be treated as non-qualified    
stated interest includable in the stated redemption price at maturity. Ordinary 
income reportable for any period will be adjusted based on subsequent changes in
the applicable interest rate index.                                             

 Unless otherwise specified in the applicable Prospectus Supplement, the
Depositor intends to treat Regular Certificates bearing an interest rate that is
a weighted average of the net interest rates on Mortgage Loans as having        
qualified stated interest. In the case of adjustable rate Mortgage Loans, the   
applicable index used to compute interest on the Mortgage Loans in effect on the
pricing date (or possibly the issue date) will be deemed to be in effect        
beginning with the period in which the first weighted average adjustment date   
occurring after the issue date occurs. Adjustments will be made in each accrual 
period either increasing or decreasing the amount of ordinary income reportable 
to reflect the actual pass-through rate on the Regular Certificates.            

Market Discount.  A purchaser of a Regular Certificate may also be subject
to the market discount provisions of Code Sections 1276 through 1278. Under     
these provisions and the OID Regulations, "market discount" equals the excess,  
if any, of (i) the Regular Certificate's stated principal amount or, in the case
of a Regular Certificate with original issue discount, the adjusted issue price 
(determined for this purpose as if the purchaser had purchased such Regular     
Certificate from an original holder) over (ii) the price for such Regular       
Certificate paid by the purchaser. A Certificateholder that purchases a REMIC   
Regular Certificate at a market discount will recognize income upon receipt of  
each distribution representing stated redemption                                

73

P-->424B3182nd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 182nd

price. In particular, under Section 1276 of the Code such a holder generally    
will be required to allocate each such principal distribution first to accrued  
market discount not previously included in income, and to recognize ordinary    
income to that extent. A Certificateholder may elect to include market discount 
in income currently as it accrues rather than including it on a deferred basis  
in accordance with the foregoing. If made, such election will apply to all      
market discount bonds acquired by such Certificateholder on or after the first  
day of the first taxable year to which such election applies. In addition, the  
OID Regulations permit a Certificateholder using the accrual method of          
accounting to elect to accrue all interest, discount (including de minimis      
market or original issue discount) and premium in income as interest, based on a
constant yield method. If such an election were made with respect to a REMIC    
Regular Certificate with market discount, the Certificateholder is deemed to    
have made an election to include in income currently market discount with       
respect to all other debt instruments having market discount that such          
Certificateholder acquires during the year of the election or thereafter.       
Similarly, a Certificateholder that makes this election for a Certificate that  
is acquired at a premium is deemed to have made an election to amortize bond    
premium with respect to all debt instruments having amortizable bond premium    
that such Certificateholder owns or acquires. See "-- Regular
Certificates -- Premium." The election to accrue interest, discount and premium 
on a constant yield method with respect to a Certificate is irrevocable.        

     Market discount with respect to a Regular Certificate will be considered to
be zero if the amount allocable to the Regular Certificate is less than 0.25% of
the Regular Certificate's stated redemption price at maturity multiplied by the 
Regular Certificate's weighted average maturity remaining after the date of     
purchase. If market discount on a Regular Certificate is considered to be zero  
under this rule, the actual amount of market discount must be allocated to the  
remaining principal payments on the Regular Certificate, and gain equal to such 
allocated amount will be recognized when the corresponding principal payment is 
made. Treasury regulations implementing the market discount rules have not yet  
been issued; therefore, investors should consult their own tax advisors         
regarding the application of these rules and the advisability of making any of  
the elections allowed under Code Sections 1276 through 1278.                    

   The Code provides that any principal payment (whether a scheduled payment
or a prepayment) or any gain on disposition of a market discount bond shall be  
treated as ordinary income to the extent that it does not exceed the accrued    
market discount at the time of such payment. The amount of accrued market       
discount for purposes of determining the tax treatment of subsequent principal  
payments or dispositions of the market discount bond is to be reduced by the    
amount so treated as ordinary income.                                           

The Code also grants authority to the Treasury Department to issue    
regulations providing for the computation of accrued market discount on debt    
instruments, the principal of which is payable in more than one installment.    
Until such time as regulations are issued by the Treasury, rules described in   
the Legislative History will apply. Under those rules, the Holder of a market   
discount bond may elect to accrue market discount either on the basis of a      
constant interest rate or according to one of the following methods. For Regular
Certificates issued with original issue discount, the amount of market discount 
that accrues during a period is equal to the product of (i) the total remaining 
market discount, multiplied by (ii) a fraction, the numerator of which is the   
original issue discount accruing during the period and the denominator of which 
is the total remaining original issue discount at the beginning of the period.  
For Regular Certificates issued without original issue discount, the amount of  
market discount that accrues during a period is equal to the product of (a) the 
total remaining market discount and (b) a fraction, the numerator of which is   
the amount of stated interest paid during the accrual period and the denominator
of which is the total amount of stated interest remaining to be paid at the     
beginning of the period. For purposes of calculating market discount under any  
of the above methods in the case of instruments (such as the Regular            
Certificates) which provide for payments which may be accelerated by reason of  
prepayments of other obligations securing such instruments, the same Prepayment 
Assumption applicable to calculating the accrual of original issue discount will
apply.                                                                          

     A holder of a Regular Certificate that acquires such Regular Certificate at
a market discount also may be required to defer, until the maturity date of such
Regular Certificate or its earlier disposition in a taxable transaction, the    
deduction of a portion of the amount of interest that the holder paid or accrued
during the taxable year on indebtedness incurred or maintained to purchase or   
carry the Regular Certificate in excess of the aggregate amount of interest     
(including original issue discount) includable in such holder's gross income    

74

P-->424B3183rd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 183rd

for the taxable year with respect to such Regular Certificate. The amount of    
such net interest expense deferred in a taxable year may not exceed the amount  
of market discount accrued on the Regular Certificate for the days during the   
taxable year on which the holder held the Regular Certificate and, in general,  
would be deductible when such market discount is includable in income. The      
amount of any remaining deferred deduction is to be taken into account in the   
taxable year in which the Regular Certificate matures or is disposed of in a    
taxable transaction. In the case of a disposition in which gain or loss is not  
recognized in whole or in part, any remaining deferred deduction will be allowed
to the extent of gain recognized on the disposition. This deferral rule does not
apply if the Regular Certificateholder elects to include such market discount in
income currently as it accrues on all market discount obligations acquired by   
such Regular Certificateholder in that taxable year or thereafter.              

Premium.  A purchaser of a Regular Certificate that purchases the Regular
Certificate at a cost (not including accrued qualified stated interest) greater 
than its remaining stated redemption price at maturity will be considered to    
have purchased the Regular Certificate at a premium, and may elect to amortize  
such premium under a constant yield method. It is not clear whether the         
Prepayment Assumption would be taken into account in determining the life of the
Regular Certificate for this purpose. However, the Legislative History states   
that the same rules that apply to accrual of market discount (which rules       
require use of a Prepayment Assumption in accruing market discount with respect 
to Regular Certificates without regard to whether such Certificates have        
original issue discount) will also apply in amortizing bond premium under Code  
Section 171. The Code provides that amortizable bond premium will be allocated  
among the interest payments on such Regular Certificates and will be applied as 
an offset against such interest payment.                                        

Deferred Interest.  Certain classes of Regular Certificates may provide for
the accrual of interest when one or more ARM Loans are adding interest to their 
principal balance by reason of negative amortization ("Deferred Interest"). Any 
Deferred Interest that accrues with respect to a class of Regular Certificates  
will constitute income to the holders of such Certificates prior to the time    
distributions of cash with respect to such Deferred Interest are made. It is    
unclear, under the OID Regulations, whether any of the interest on such         
Certificates will constitute qualified stated interest or whether all or a      
portion of the interest payable on the Certificates must be included in the     
stated redemption price at maturity of the Certificate and accounted for as     
original issue discount (which could accelerate such inclusion). Interest on    
Regular Certificates must in any event be accounted for under an accrual method 
by the holders of such Certificates and, therefore, applying the latter analysis
may result only in a slight difference in the timing of the inclusion in income 
of interest on such Regular Certificates.                                       

    Effects of Defaults and Delinquencies.  Certain Series of Certificates may
contain one or more Classes of Subordinate Certificates, and in the event there 
are defaults or delinquencies on the Mortgage Loans, amounts that would         
otherwise be distributed on the Subordinate Certificates may instead be         
distributed on the Senior Certificates. Holders of Subordinate Certificates     
nevertheless will be required to report income with respect to such Certificates
under an accrual method without giving effect to delays and reductions in       
distributions on such Subordinate Certificates attributable to defaults and     
delinquencies on the Mortgage Loans, except to the extent that it can be        
established that such amounts are uncollectible. As a result, the amount of     
income reported by a holder of a Subordinate Certificate in any period could    
significantly exceed the amount of cash distributed to such holder in that      
period. The holder will eventually be allowed a loss (or will be allowed to     
report a lesser amount of income) to the extent that the aggregate amount of    
distributions on the Subordinate Certificate is reduced as a result of defaults 
and delinquencies on the Mortgage Loans. However, the law is unclear with       
respect to the timing and character of such losses or reductions in income, and,
accordingly, Holders of Subordinate Certificates should consult their own tax   
advisors on this point.                                                         

   Sale, Exchange or Redemption.  Upon the sale, exchange or redemption of a
Regular Certificate, the holder will recognize gain or loss equal to the        
difference between the amount realized on such disposition, and the holder's    
adjusted basis in the Regular Certificate. Such adjusted basis generally will   
equal the cost of the Regular Certificate to the holder, increased by any       
original issue discount and market discount included in the holder's gross      
income with respect to the Regular Certificate, and reduced (but not below zero)
by payments included in the stated redemption price at maturity previously      
received by the holder and by any amortized premium. Except as provided in the  
following paragraph and as provided under "--Market Discount" above,            

75

P-->424B3184th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 184th

any such gain or loss will be capital gain or loss, provided that the Regular   
Certificate is held as a "capital asset" (generally, property held for          
investment) within the meaning of Code Section 1221.                            

     Gain from the sale or other disposition of a Regular Certificate that might
otherwise be capital gain will be treated as ordinary income to the extent that 
such gain does not exceed the excess, if any, of (i) the amount that would have 
been includable in such holder's income with respect to the Regular Certificate 
had income accrued thereon at a rate equal to 110% of the AFR as defined in Code
Section 1274(d) determined as of the date of purchase of such Regular           
Certificate, over (ii) the amount actually includable in such holder's income.  

     Regular Certificates will be "evidences of indebtedness" within the meaning
of Code Section 582(c)(1), so that gain or loss recognized from the sale or     
exchange of a Regular Certificate by a bank or a thrift institution to which    
such section applies will be ordinary income or loss.                           

     The Regular Certificate information reports will include a statement of the
adjusted issue price of the Regular Certificate at the beginning of each accrual
period. In addition, the reports will include information necessary to compute  
the accrual of any market discount that may arise upon secondary trading of     
Regular Certificates. Because exact computation of the accrual of market        
discount on a constant yield method would require information relating to the   
holder's purchase price which the REMIC may not have, it appears that the       
information reports will only require information pertaining to the appropriate 
proportionate method of accruing market discount.                               

  Non-Interest Expenses of the REMIC.  Under the REMIC regulations, if the
REMIC is considered to be a "single-class REMIC," a portion of the REMIC's      
servicing, administrative and other non-interest expenses will be allocated as a
separate item to those Regular Certificateholders that are "pass-through        
interest holders." Certificateholders that are "pass-through interest holders"  
should consult their own tax advisors about the impact of these rules on an     
investment in the Regular Certificates. See "Taxation of the
REMIC -- Pass-Through of Non-Interest Expenses of the REMIC" below.             

Non-U.S. Persons.  Generally, payments of interest (including any payment
with respect to accrued original issue discount) on the Regular Certificates to 
a Regular Certificateholder who is a non-U.S. Person not engaged in a trade or  
business within the United States, will not be subject to federal withholding   
tax if (i) such Regular Certificateholder does not actually or constructively   
own 10 percent or more of the combined voting power of all classes of equity in 
the issuer (which for purposes of this discussion may be defined as the Trust   
Fund or the beneficial owners of the related Residual Certificates (the         
"Issuer")); (ii) such Regular Certificateholder is not a controlled foreign     
corporation (within the meaning of Code Section 957), related to the Issuer; and
(iii) such Regular Certificateholder complies with certain identification       
requirements (including delivery of a statement, signed by the Regular          
Certificateholder under penalties of perjury, certifying that such Regular      
Certificateholder is a foreign person and providing the name and address of such
Regular Certificateholder). If a Regular Certificateholder is not exempt from   
withholding, distributions of interest, including distributions in respect of   
accrued original issue discount, such holder may be subject to a 30% withholding
tax, subject to reduction under any applicable tax treaty.                      

    Further, it appears that a REMIC Regular Certificate would not be included
in the estate of a non-resident alien individual and would not be subject to    
United States estate taxes. However, Certificateholders who are non-resident    
alien individuals should consult their tax advisors concerning this question.   

     Regular Certificateholders Who Are Non-U.S.  Persons and persons related to
such holders should not acquire any Residual Certificates, and Residual         
Certificateholders and persons related to Residual Certificateholders should not
acquire any Regular Certificates without consulting their tax advisors as to the
possible adverse tax consequences of doing so.                                  

Information Reporting and Backup Withholding.  The Servicer will furnish or
make available, within a reasonable time after the end of each calendar year, to
each Regular Certificateholder at any time during such year, such information as
may be deemed necessary or desirable to assist Regular Certificateholders in    
preparing their federal income tax returns, or to enable holders to make such   
information available to owners or other financial intermediaries of holders    
that hold such Regular Certificates. If a holder, owner or other recipient of a 
payment on behalf of an owner fails to supply a certified taxpayer              
identification number or if the                                                 

76

P-->424B3185th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 185th

Secretary of the Treasury determines that such person has not reported all      
interest and dividend income required to be shown on its federal income tax     
return, 31% backup withholding may be required with respect to any payments. Any
amounts deducted and withheld from a distribution to a recipient would be       
allowed as a credit against such recipient's federal income tax liability.      

RESIDUAL CERTIFICATES 

Allocation of the Income of the REMIC to the Residual Certificates.  The
REMIC will not be subject to federal income tax except with respect to income   
from prohibited transactions and certain other transactions. See "--Prohibited
Transactions and Other Taxes" herein. Instead, each original holder of a        
Residual Certificate will report on its federal income tax return, as ordinary  
income, its share of the taxable income of the REMIC for each day during the    
taxable year on which such holder owns any Residual Certificates. The taxable   
income of the REMIC for each day will be determined by allocating the taxable   
income of the REMIC for each calendar quarter ratably to each day in the        
quarter. Such a holder's share of the taxable income of the REMIC for each day  
will be based on the portion of the outstanding Residual Certificates that such 
holder owns on that day. The taxable income of the REMIC will be determined     
under an accrual method and will be taxable to the Residual Certificateholders  
without regard to the timing or amounts of cash distributions by the REMIC.     
Ordinary income derived from Residual Certificates will be "portfolio income"   
for purposes of the taxation of taxpayers subject to the limitations on the     
deductibility of "passive losses." As residual interests, the Residual          
Certificates will be subject to tax rules, described below, that differ from    
those that would apply if the Residual Certificates were treated for federal    
income tax purposes as direct ownership interests in the assets of the Trust    
Fund or as debt instruments issued by the REMIC.                                

     A Residual Certificateholder may be required to include taxable income from
the Residual Certificate in excess of the cash distributed. For example, a      
structure where principal distributions are made serially on regular interests  
(that is, a fast-pay, slow-pay structure) may generate such a mismatching of    
income and cash distributions. This mismatching may be caused by the use of     
certain required tax accounting methods by the REMIC, variations in the         
prepayment rate of the underlying Mortgage Loans and certain other factors.     
Depending upon the structure of a particular transaction, the aforementioned    
factors may significantly reduce the after-tax yield of a Residual Certificate  
to a Residual Certificateholder. Investors should consult their own tax advisors
concerning the federal income tax treatment of a Residual Certificate and the   
impact of such tax treatment on the after-tax yield of a Residual Certificate.  

 A subsequent Residual Certificateholder also will report on its federal
income tax return amounts representing a daily share of the taxable income of   
the REMIC for each day that such Residual Certificateholder owns such Residual  
Certificate. Those daily amounts generally would equal the amounts that would   
have been reported for the same days by an original Residual Certificateholder, 
as described above. The Legislative History indicates that certain adjustments  
may be appropriate to reduce (or increase) the income of a subsequent holder of 
a Residual Certificate that purchased such Residual Certificate at a price      
greater than (or less than) the adjusted basis such Residual Certificate would  
have in the hands of an original Residual Certificateholder. See "--Sale or
Exchange of Residual Certificates" below. It is not clear, however, whether such
adjustments will in fact be permitted or required and, if so, how they would be 
made. The REMIC Regulations do not provide for any such adjustments.            

Excess Inclusions.  A portion of the income on a Residual Certificate 
(referred to in the Code as an "excess inclusion") for any calendar quarter     
will, with an exception discussed below for certain thrift institutions, be     
subject to federal income tax in all events. Thus, for example, an excess       
inclusion (i) may not, except as described below, be offset by any unrelated    
losses, deductions or loss carryovers of a Residual Certificateholder; (ii) will
be treated as "unrelated business taxable income" within the meaning of Code    
Section 512 if the Residual Certificateholder is a pension fund or any other    
organization that is subject to tax only on its unrelated business taxable      
income (see "--Tax-Exempt Investors" below); and (iii) is not eligible for any  
reduction in the rate of withholding tax in the case of a Residual              
Certificateholder that is a foreign investor. See "--Non-U.S. Persons" below.   
The exception for thrift institutions is available only to the institution      
holding the Residual Certificate, and not to any affiliate of the institution,  
unless the affiliate is a subsidiary all the stock of which, and substantially  
all the indebtedness of which, is held by the institution, and                  

77

P-->424B3186th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 186th

which is organized and operated exclusively in connection with the organization 
and operation of one or more REMICs.                                            

Except as discussed in the following paragraph, with respect to any   
Residual Certificateholder, the excess inclusions for any calendar quarter is   
the excess, if any, of (i) the income of such Residual Certificateholder for    
that calendar quarter from its Residual Certificate over (ii) the sum of the    
"daily accruals" (as defined below) for all days during the calendar quarter on 
which the Residual Certificateholder holds such Residual Certificate. For this  
purpose, the daily accruals with respect to a Residual Certificate are          
determined by allocating to each day in the calendar quarter its ratable portion
of the product of the "adjusted issue price" (as defined below) of the Residual 
Certificate at the beginning of the calendar quarter and 120 percent of the     
"Federal long-term rate" in effect at the time the Residual Certificate is      
issued. For this purpose, the "adjusted issue price" of a Residual Certificate  
at the beginning of any calendar quarter equals the issue price of the Residual 
Certificate, increased by the amount of daily accruals for all prior quarters,  
and decreased (but not below zero) by the aggregate amount of payments made on  
the Residual Certificate before the beginning of such quarter. The "Federal     
long-term rate" is an average of current yields on Treasury securities with a   
remaining term of greater than nine years, computed and published monthly by the
IRS.                                                                            

As an exception to the general rule described above, the Treasury     
Department has authority to issue regulations that would treat the entire amount
of income accruing on a Residual Certificate as excess inclusions if the        
Residual Certificates in the aggregate are considered not to have "significant  
value." Under the REMIC Regulations, Residual Certificateholders that are thrift
institutions described in Code Section 593 can offset excess inclusions with    
unrelated deductions, losses and loss carryovers provided the Residual          
Certificates have "significant value." For purposes of applying this rule,      
thrift institutions that are members of an affiliated group filing a            
consolidated return, together with their subsidiaries formed to issue REMICs,   
are treated as separate corporations. Residual Certificates have "significant   
value" if: (i) the Residual Certificates have an aggregate issue price that is  
at least equal to 2% of the aggregate issue price of all Residual Certificates  
and Regular Certificates with respect to the REMIC and (ii) the anticipated     
weighted average life of the Residual Certificates is at least 20% of the       
anticipated weighted average life of the REMIC based on the anticipated         
principal payments to be received with respect thereto (using the Prepayment    
Assumption and any required or permitted clean up calls or required liquidation 
provided for in the REMIC's organizational documents), except that all          
anticipated distributions are to be used if the Residual Certificate is not     
entitled to any principal payments or is entitled to a disproportionately small 
portion relative to interest payments thereon. The principal amount will be     
considered disproportionately small if the issue price of the Residual          
Certificates exceeds 125% of their initial principal amount. Finally, an        
ordering rule under the REMIC Regulations provides that a thrift institution may
only offset its excess inclusion income with deductions after it has first      
applied its deductions against income that is not excess inclusion income.      

   In the case of any Residual Certificates held by a real estate investment
trust, the aggregate excess inclusions with respect to such Residual            
Certificates, reduced (but not below zero) by the real estate investment trust  
taxable income (within the meaning of Code Section 857(b)(2), excluding any net 
capital gain), will be allocated among the shareholders of such trust in        
proportion to the dividends received by such shareholders from such trust, and  
any amount so allocated will be treated as an excess inclusion with respect to a
Residual Certificate as if held directly by such shareholder. Regulated         
investment companies, common trust funds, and certain cooperatives are subject  
to similar rules.                                                               

  Payments.  Any distribution made on a Residual Certificate to a Residual
Certificateholder will be treated as a non-taxable return of capital to the     
extent it does not exceed the Residual Certificateholder's adjusted basis in    
such Residual Certificate. To the extent a distribution exceeds such adjusted   
basis, it will be treated as gain from the sale of the Residual Certificate.    

Sale Or Exchange Of Residual Certificates.  If a Residual Certificate is
sold or exchanged, the seller will generally recognize gain or loss equal to the
difference between the amount realized on the sale or exchange and its adjusted 
basis in the Residual Certificate (except that the recognition of loss may be   
limited under the "wash sale" rules described below). A holder's adjusted basis 
in a Residual Certificate generally equals the cost of such Residual Certificate
to such Residual Certificateholder, increased by the taxable income of the      

78

P-->424B3187th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 187th

REMIC that was included in the income of such Residual Certificateholder with   
respect to such Residual Certificate, and decreased (but not below zero) by the 
net losses that have been allowed as deductions to such Residual                
Certificateholder with respect to such Residual Certificate and by the          
distributions received thereon by such Residual Certificateholder. In general,  
any such gain or loss will be capital gain or loss provided the Residual        
Certificate is held as a capital asset. However, Residual Certificates will be  
"evidences of indebtedness" within the meaning of Code Section 582(c)(1), so    
that gain or loss recognized from sale of a Residual Certificate by a bank or   
thrift institution to which such section applies would be ordinary income or    
loss.                                                                           

    Except as provided in Treasury regulations yet to be issued, if the seller
of a Residual Certificate reacquires such Residual Certificate, or acquires any 
other Residual Certificate, any residual interest in another REMIC or similar   
interest in a "taxable mortgage pool" (as defined in Code Section 7701(i))      
during the period beginning six months before, and ending six months after, the 
date of such sale, such sale will be subject to the "wash sale" rules of Code   
Section 1091. In that event, any loss realized by the Residual Certificateholder
on the sale will not be deductible, but, instead, will increase such Residual   
Certificateholder's adjusted basis in the newly acquired asset.                 

TAXATION OF THE REMIC 

General.  As noted above, although a REMIC is a separate entity for federal
income tax purposes, a REMIC is not generally subject to entity-level tax.      

Taxable Income of the REMIC Attributable to Residual Interests.  The  
taxable income of the REMIC will reflect a netting of (i) the income from the   
Mortgage Loans and the REMIC's other assets and (ii) the deductions allowed to  
the REMIC for interest and original issue discount on the Regular Certificates  
and, except as described below under "--Pass-Through of Non-Interest Expenses of
the REMIC," other expenses.                                                     

For purposes of determining its taxable income, the REMIC will have an
initial aggregate tax basis in its assets equal to the sum of the issue prices  
of the Regular and Residual Certificates (or, if a class of Certificates is not 
sold initially, their fair market values). Such aggregate basis will be         
allocated among the Mortgage Loans and other assets of the REMIC in proportion  
to their respective fair market values. A Mortgage Loan will be deemed to have  
been acquired with discount or premium to the extent that the REMIC's basis     
therein is less than or greater than its principal balance, respectively. Any   
such discount (whether market discount or original issue discount) will be      
includable in the income of the REMIC as it accrues, in advance of receipt of   
the cash attributable to such income, under a method similar to the method      
described above for accruing original issue discount on the Regular             
Certificates. The REMIC expects to elect under Code Section 171 to amortize any 
premium on the Mortgage Loans. Premium on any Mortgage Loan to which such       
election applies would be amortized under a constant yield method. It is not    
clear whether the yield of a Mortgage Loan would be calculated for this purpose 
based on scheduled payments or taking account of the Prepayment Assumption.     
Additionally, such an election would not apply to any Mortgage Loan originated  
on or before September 27, 1985. Instead, premium on such a Mortgage Loan would 
be allocated among the principal payments thereon and would be deductible by the
REMIC as those payments become due.                                             

The REMIC will be allowed a deduction for interest and original issue 
discount on the Regular Certificates. The amount and method of accrual of       
original issue discount will be calculated for this purpose in the same manner  
as described above with respect to Regular Certificates except that the 0.25%   
per annum de minimis rule and adjustments for subsequent holders described      
therein will not apply.                                                         

    A Residual Certificateholder will not be permitted to amortize the cost of
the Residual Certificate as an offset to its share of the REMIC's taxable       
income. However, that taxable income will not include cash received by the REMIC
that represents a recovery of the REMIC's basis in its assets, and, as described
above, the issue price of the Residual Certificates will be added to the issue  
price of the Regular Certificates in determining the REMIC's initial basis in   
its assets. See "--Sale or Exchange of Residual Certificates" herein. For a     
discussion of possible adjustments to income of a subsequent holder of a        
Residual Certificate to reflect any difference between the actual cost of such  
Residual Certificate to such holder and the adjusted basis such                 

79

P-->424B3188th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 188th

Residual Certificate would have in the hands of an original Residual            
Certificateholder, see "--Allocation of the Income of the REMIC to the Residual
Certificates" above.                                                            

Net Losses of the REMIC.  The REMIC will have a net loss for any calendar
quarter in which its deductions exceed its gross income. Such net loss would be 
allocated among the Residual Certificateholders in the same manner as the       
REMIC's taxable income. The net loss allocable to any Residual Certificate will 
not be deductible by the holder to the extent that such net loss exceeds such   
holder's adjusted basis in such Residual Certificate. Any net loss that is not  
currently deductible by reason of this limitation may only be used by such      
Residual Certificateholder to offset its share of the REMIC's taxable income in 
future periods (but not otherwise). The ability of Residual Certificateholders  
that are individuals or closely held corporations to deduct net losses may be   
subject to additional limitations under the Code.                               

Pass-Through of Non-Interest Expenses of the REMIC.  As a general rule, all
of the fees and expenses of a REMIC will be taken into account by holders of the
Residual Interests. In the case of a "single class REMIC," however, the expenses
and a matching amount of additional income will be allocated, under the Treasury
regulations, among the holders of the Regular Certificates and the holders of   
the Residual Interests on a daily basis in proportion to the relative amounts of
income accruing to each Certificateholder on that day. In general terms, a      
single class REMIC is one that either (i) would qualify, under existing Treasury
regulations, as a grantor trust if it were not a REMIC (treating all interests  
as ownership interests, even if they would be classified as debt for federal    
income tax purposes) or (ii) is similar to such a trust and is structured with  
the principal purpose of avoiding the single class REMIC rules. Unless otherwise
stated in the applicable Prospectus Supplement, the expenses of the REMIC will  
be allocated to holders of the related Residual Interests in their entirety and 
not to holders of the related Regular Certificates.                             

In the case of individuals (or trusts, estates, or other persons who  
compute their income in the same manner as individuals) who own an interest in a
Regular or Residual Certificate directly or through a pass-through interest     
holder which is required to pass miscellaneous itemized deductions through to   
its owners or beneficiaries (e.g., a partnership, an S corporation, or a grantor
trust), such expenses will be deductible under Code Section 67 only to the      
extent that such expenses, plus other "miscellaneous itemized deductions" of the
individual, exceed 2% of such individual's adjusted gross income. In addition,  
Code Section 68 provides that the amount of itemized deductions otherwise       
allowable for an individual whose adjusted gross income exceeds a certain amount
(the "Applicable Amount") will be reduced by the lesser of (i) 3% of the excess 
of the individual's adjusted gross income over the Applicable Amount or (ii) 80%
of the amount of itemized deductions otherwise allowable for the taxable year.  
The amount of additional taxable income recognized by Residual                  
Certificateholders who are subject to the limitations of either Code Section 67 
or Code Section 68 may be substantial. Further, holders (other than             
corporations) subject to the alternative minimum tax may not deduct             
miscellaneous itemized deductions in determining such holders' alternative      
minimum taxable income. The REMIC is required to report to each pass-through    
interest holder and to the IRS such holder's allocable share, if any, of the    
REMIC's non-interest expenses. The term "pass-through interest holder" generally
refers to individuals, entities taxed as individuals and certain pass-through   
entities, but does not include real estate investment trusts. Residual          
Certificateholders that are "pass-through interest holders" should consult their
own tax advisors about the impact of these rules on an investment in the        
Residual Certificates.                                                          

PROHIBITED TRANSACTIONS AND OTHER TAXES 

 The REMIC is subject to a tax at a rate equal to 100 percent of the net
income derived from "prohibited transactions." In general, a prohibited         
transaction means the disposition of a Mortgage Loan other than pursuant to     
certain specified exceptions, the receipt of investment income from a source    
other than a Mortgage Loan or certain other permitted investments or the        
disposition of an asset representing a temporary investment of payments on the  
Mortgage Loans pending payment on the Residual Certificates or Regular          
Certificates. In addition, the assumption of a Mortgage Loan by a subsequent    
purchaser could cause the REMIC to recognize gain, which would also be subject  
to the 100 percent tax on prohibited transactions.                              

80

P-->424B3189th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 189th

   In addition, certain contributions to a REMIC made after the Closing Date
could result in the imposition of a tax on the REMIC equal to 100% of the value 
of the contributed property.                                                    

It is not anticipated that the REMIC will engage in any prohibited    
transactions or receive any contributions subject to the contributions tax.     
However, in the event that the REMIC is subject to any such tax, unless         
otherwise disclosed in the related Prospectus Supplement, such tax would be     
borne first by the Residual Certificateholders, to the extent of amounts        
distributable to them and then by the Master Servicer.                          

LIQUIDATION AND TERMINATION                                                     

   If the REMIC adopts a plan of complete liquidation, within the meaning of
Code Section 860F(a)(4)(A)(i), which may be accomplished by designating in the  
REMICs final tax return a date on which such adoption is deemed to occur, and   
sells all of its assets (other than cash) within a 90-day period beginning on   
such date, the REMIC will not be subject to any prohibited transaction tax on   
such sales, provided that the REMIC credits or distributes in liquidation all of
the sale proceeds plus its cash (other than the amounts retained to meet claims)
to holders of Regular and Residual Certificates within the 90-day period.       

ADMINISTRATIVE MATTERS                                                          

  Solely for the purpose of the administrative provisions of the Code, the
REMIC will be treated as a partnership and the Residual Certificateholders will 
be treated as the partners thereof; however, under the Treasury regulations if  
there is at no time during the taxable year more than one Residual              
Certificateholder, a REMIC shall not be subject to the rules of Subchapter C of 
Chapter 63 of the Code relating to the treatment of Partnership items for a     
taxable year. Accordingly, the REMIC will file an annual tax return on Form     
1066, U.S. Real Estate Mortgage Investment Conduit Income Tax Return. In        
addition, certain other information will be furnished quarterly to each Residual
Certificateholder who held such Residual Certificate on any day in the previous 
calendar quarter. Each Residual Certificateholder is required to treat items on 
its return consistently with their treatment on the REMIC's return, unless the  
Residual Certificateholder either files a statement identifying the             
inconsistency or establishes that the inconsistency resulted from incorrect     
information received from the REMIC.                                            

TAX-EXEMPT INVESTORS 

    Any Residual Certificateholder that is a pension fund or other entity that
is subject to federal income taxation only on its "unrelated business taxable   
income" within the meaning of Code Section 512 will be subject to such tax on   
that portion of the distributions received on a Residual Certificate that is    
considered an "excess inclusion." See "-- Residual Certificates -- Excess
Inclusions" herein.                                                             

NON-U.S. PERSONS 

   Amounts paid to Residual Certificateholders who are not U.S. persons (see
"-- Regular Certificates -- Non-U.S. Persons") are treated as interest for      
purposes of the 30% (or lower treaty rate) United States withholding tax.       
Treasury regulations provide that amounts distributed to Residual Holders may   
qualify as "portfolio interest," subject to the conditions described in         
"-- Regular Certificates" above, but only to the extent that the Mortgage Loans 
were originated after July 18, 1984, and the Mortgage Loans to which the        
Residual Certificates relate are in "registered form" within the meaning of     
Section 163(f)(1) of the Code. In general, it is expected that Mortgage Loans   
will not be treated as in registered form. Furthermore, the rate of withholding 
on any income on a Residual Certificate that is excess inclusion income will not
be subject to reduction under any applicable tax treaties. See "-- Residual
Certificates -- Excess Inclusions." If the portfolio interest exemption is      
unavailable, amounts paid will be subject to United States withholding tax when 
paid or otherwise distributed (or when the Residual Certificate is disposed of) 
under rules similar to those for withholding upon disposition of debt           
instruments that have original issue discount. The Code, however, grants the    
Treasury Department authority to issue regulations requiring that those amounts 
be taken into account earlier than otherwise provided where necessary to prevent
avoidance of tax (for example, where                                            

81

P-->424B3190th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 190th

the Residual Certificates do not have significant value). See "-- Residual
Certificates -- Excess Inclusions." If the amounts paid to Residual             
Certificateholders that are not U.S. Persons are effectively connected with     
their conduct of a trade or business within the United States, the 30% (or lower
treaty rate) withholding will not apply. Instead, the amounts paid to such      
non-U.S. Person will be subject to U.S. federal income taxation at regular      
graduated rates. For special restrictions on the transfer of Residual           
Certificates, see "-- Tax-Related Restrictions on Transfers of Residual
Certificates" below.                                                            

   Regular Certificateholders and persons related to such holders should not
acquire any Residual Certificates, and Residual Certificateholders and persons  
related to Residual Certificateholders should not acquire any Regular           
Certificates without consulting their tax advisors as to the possible adverse   
tax consequences of such acquisition.                                           

TAX-RELATED RESTRICTIONS ON TRANSFERS OF RESIDUAL CERTIFICATES 

Disqualified Organizations.  An entity may not qualify as a REMIC unless
there are reasonable arrangements designed to ensure that residual interests in 
such entity are not held by "disqualified organizations" (as defined below).    
Further, a tax is imposed on the transfer of a residual interest in a REMIC to a
"disqualified organization." The amount of the tax equals the product of (A) an 
amount (as determined under the REMIC regulations) equal to the present value of
the total anticipated "excess inclusions" with respect to such interest for     
periods after the transfer and (ii) the highest marginal federal income tax rate
applicable to corporations. The tax is imposed on the transferor unless the     
transfer is through an agent (including a broker or other middlemen) for a      
disqualified organization, in which event the tax is imposed on the agent. The  
person otherwise liable for the tax shall be relieved of liability for the tax  
if the transferee furnished to such person an affidavit that the transferee is  
not a disqualified organization and, at the time of the transfer, such person   
does not have actual knowledge that the affidavit is false. A "disqualified
organization" means (A) the United States, any State, possession, or political  
subdivision thereof, any foreign government, any international organization, or 
any agency or instrumentality of any of the foregoing (provided that such term  
does not include an instrumentality if all its activities are subject to tax    
and, except for FHLMC, a majority of its board of directors is not selected by  
any such governmental agency), (B) any organization (other than certain farmers'
cooperatives) generally exempt from federal income taxes unless such            
organization is subject to the tax on "unrelated business taxable income" and   
(C) a rural electric or telephone cooperative.                                  

  A tax is imposed on a "pass-through entity" (as defined below) holding a
residual interest in a REMIC if at any time during the taxable year of the      
pass-through entity a disqualified organization is the record holder of an      
interest in such entity. The amount of the tax is equal to the product of (A)   
the amount of excess inclusions for the taxable year allocable to the interest  
held by the disqualified organization, and (B) the highest marginal federal     
income tax rate applicable to corporations. The pass-through entity otherwise   
liable for the tax, for any period during which the disqualified organization is
the record holder of an interest in such entity, will be relieved of liability  
for the tax if such record holder furnishes to such entity an affidavit that    
such record holder is not a disqualified organization and, for such period, the 
pass-through entity does not have actual knowledge that the affidavit is false. 
For this purpose, a "pass-through entity" means (i) a regulated investment      
company, real estate investment trust or common trust fund, (ii) a partnership, 
trust or estate and (iii) certain cooperatives. Except as may be provided in    
Treasury regulations not yet issued, any person holding an interest in a        
pass-through entity as a nominee for another will, with respect to such         
interest, be treated as a pass-through entity.                                  

 In order to comply with these rules, the Agreement will provide that no
record or beneficial ownership interest in a Residual Certificate may be,       
directly or indirectly, purchased, transferred or sold without the express      
written consent of the Master Servicer. The Master Servicer will grant such     
consent to a proposed transfer only if it receives the following: (i) an        
affidavit from the proposed transferee to the effect that it is not a           
disqualified organization and is not acquiring the Residual Certificate as a    
nominee or agent for a disqualified organization, and (ii) a covenant by the    
proposed transferee to the effect that the proposed transferee agrees to be     
bound by and to abide by the transfer restrictions applicable to the Residual   
Certificate.                                                                    

82

P-->424B3191st Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 191st

  Noneconomic Residual Certificates.  The REMIC Regulations disregard, for
federal income tax purposes, any transfer of a Noneconomic Residual Certificate 
to a "U.S. Person," as defined below, if a significant purpose of the transfer  
is to enable the transferor to impede the assessment or collection of tax. A    
Noneconomic Residual Certificate is any Residual Certificate (including a       
Residual Certificate with a positive value at issuance) unless, at the time of  
transfer, taking into account the Prepayment Assumption and any required or     
permitted clean up calls or required liquidation provided for in the REMIC's    
organizational documents, (i) the present value of the expected future          
distributions on the Residual Certificate at least equals the product of the    
present value of the anticipated excess inclusions and the highest corporate    
income tax rate in effect for the year in which the transfer occurs and (ii) the
transferor reasonably expects that the transferee will receive distributions    
from the REMIC at or after the time at which taxes accrue on the anticipated    
excess inclusions in an amount sufficient to satisfy the accrued taxes. A       
significant purpose to impede the assessment or collection of tax exists if the 
transferor, at the time of the transfer, either knew or should have known that  
the transferee would be unwilling or unable to pay taxes due on its share of the
taxable income of the REMIC. A transferor is presumed not to have such knowledge
if (i) the transferor conducted a reasonable investigation of the transferee and
(ii) the transferee acknowledges to the transferor that the residual interest   
may generate tax liabilities in excess of the cash flow and the transferee      
represents that it intends to pay such taxes associated with the residual       
interest as they become due. If a transfer of a Noneconomic Residual Certificate
is disregarded, the transferor would continue to be treated as the owner of the 
Residual Certificate and would continue to be subject to tax on its allocable   
portion of the net income of the REMIC.                                         

 Mark to Market Rules.  Prospective purchasers of a Residual Certificate
should be aware that on January 3, 1995, the IRS released proposed regulations  
under Section 475 (the "Proposed Regulations"). The Proposed Regulations provide
that any Residual Certificate acquired after January 3, 1995, cannot be marked  
to market, regardless of the value of such Residual Certificate. The Proposed   
Regulations change temporary regulations under Section 475 (the "Temporary      
Regulations") which were issued on December 28, 1993, and which allowed         
securities dealers to mark to market securities held for sale to customers,     
including Residual Certificates which did not have "negative value." In general,
a Residual Certificate has negative value if, as of the date a taxpayer acquires
the Residual Certificate, the present value of the tax liabilities associated   
with holding the Residual Certificate exceeds the sum of (i) the present value  
of the expected future distributions on the Residual Certificate, and (ii) the  
present value of the anticipated tax savings associated with holding the        
Residual Certificate as the REMIC generates losses. The amounts and present     
values of the anticipated tax liabilities, expected future distributions and    
anticipated tax savings are all to be determined using (i) the prepayment and   
reinvestment assumptions adopted under Section 1272(a)(6), or that would have   
been adopted had the REMIC's regular interests been issued with original issue  
discount, (ii) any required or permitted clean up calls, or required qualified  
liquidation, provided for in the REMIC's organizational documents and (iii) a   
discount rate equal to the "applicable Federal rate" (as specified in Section   
1274(d)(1), that would apply to a debt instrument issued on the date of         
acquisition of the Residual Certificate. The Proposed Regulations still apply to
any REMIC residual interest acquired on or prior to January 3, 1995. Thus,      
Holders of positive value REMIC residual interests acquired on or prior to      
January 3, 1995, may continue to mark such residual interests to market for the 
entire economic life of such interests. Prospective purchasers of a Residual    
Certificate should consult their tax advisors regarding the possible application
of the Proposed Regulations.                                                    

  Foreign Investors.  The REMIC Regulations provide that the transfer of a
Residual Certificate that has a "tax avoidance potential" to a "foreign person" 
will be disregarded for federal income tax purposes. This rule appears to apply 
to a transferee who is not a "U.S. Person," unless such transferee's income in  
respect of the Residual Certificate is effectively connected with the conduct of
a United Sates trade or business. A Residual Certificate is deemed to have a tax
avoidance potential unless, at the time of transfer, the transferor reasonably  
expects that the REMIC will distribute to the transferee amounts that will equal
at least 30 percent of each excess inclusion, and that such amounts will be     
distributed at or after the time the excess inclusion accrues and not later than
the end of the calendar year following the year of accrual. If the non-U.S.     
Person transfers the Residual Certificate to a U.S. Person, the transfer will be
disregarded, and the foreign transferor will continue to be treated as the      
owner, if the transfer has the effect of allowing the transferor to avoid tax on

83

P-->424B3192nd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 192nd

accrued excess inclusions. The Agreement will provide that no record or         
beneficial ownership interest in a Residual Certificate may be, directly or     
indirectly, transferred to a non-U.S. Person unless such person provides the    
Trustee with a duly completed I.R.S. Form 4224 and the Trustee consents to such 
transfer in writing.                                                            

    Any attempted transfer or pledge in violation of the transfer restrictions
shall be absolutely null and void and shall vest no rights in any purported     
transferee. Investors in Residual Certificates are advised to consult their own 
tax advisors with respect to transfers of the Residual Certificates and, in     
addition, pass-through entities are advised to consult their own tax advisors   
with respect to any tax which may be imposed on a pass-through entity.          

STATE, LOCAL AND OTHER TAX CONSIDERATIONS 

In addition to the federal income tax consequences described above in 
"Certain Federal Income Tax Considerations," potential investors should consider
the state, local and other tax consequences relating to the acquisition,        
ownership and disposition of the Certificates. State, local and other income tax
law may differ substantially from the corresponding federal law, and this       
discussion does not purport to describe any aspect of the tax laws other than   
federal income tax law. Therefore, potential investors should consult their tax 
advisors with respect to the state, local and other tax consequences to them    
arising from an investment in the Certificates.                                 

ERISA CONSIDERATIONS

The following describes certain considerations under the Employee     
Retirement Income Act of 1974, as amended ("ERISA") and the Code, which apply   
only to Certificates of a Series that are not divided into subclasses. If       
Certificates are divided into subclasses the related Prospectus Supplement will 
contain information concerning considerations relating to ERISA and the Code    
that are applicable to such Certificates.                                       

    ERISA imposes requirements on employee benefit plans subject to ERISA (and
on certain other retirement plans and arrangements, including individual        
retirement accounts and annuities, Keogh plans and collective investment funds  
and separate accounts in which such plans, accounts or arrangements are invested
subject to the requirement of ERISA and/or the Code) (collectively "Plans") and 
on persons who are fiduciaries with respect to such Plans. Generally, ERISA     
applies to investments made by Plans. Among other things, ERISA requires that   
the assets of Plans be held in trust and that the trustee, or other duly        
authorized fiduciary, have exclusive authority and discretion to manage and     
control the assets of such Plans. ERISA also imposes certain duties on persons  
who are fiduciaries of Plans. Under ERISA, any person who exercises any         
authority or control respecting the management or disposition of the assets of a
Plan is considered to be a fiduciary of such Plan (subject to certain exceptions
not here relevant). Certain employee benefit plans, such as governmental plans  
(as defined in ERISA Section 3(32)) and, if no election has been made under     
Section 410(d) of the Code, church plans (as defined in ERISA Section 3(33)),   
are not subject to ERISA requirements. Accordingly, assets of such plans may be 
invested in Senior Certificates without regard to the ERISA considerations      
described above and below, subject to the provisions of applicable state law.   
Any such plan which is qualified and exempt from taxation under Code Sections   
401(a) and 501(a), however, is subject to the prohibited transaction rules set  
forth in Code Section 503.                                                      

On November 13, 1986, the United States Department of Labor ("Labor") 
issued final regulations concerning the definition of what constitutes the      
assets of a Plan. (Labor Reg. Section 2510.3-101) Under this regulation, the    
underlying assets and properties of corporations, partnerships and certain other
entities in which a Plan makes an "equity" investment could be deemed for       
purposes of ERISA to be assets of the investing Plan in certain circumstances.  
However, the regulation provides that, generally, the assets of a corporation or
partnership in which a Plan invests will not be deemed for purposes of ERISA to 
be assets of such Plan if the equity interest acquired by the investing Plan is 
a publicly-offered security. A publicly-offered                                 

84

P-->424B3193rd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 193rd

security, as defined in the Labor Reg. Section 2510.3-101, is a security that is
widely held, freely transferable and registered under the Securities Exchange   
Act of 1934, as amended.                                                        

    In addition to the imposition of general fiduciary standards of investment
prudence and diversification, ERISA prohibits a broad range of transactions     
involving Plan assets and persons ("Parties in Interest") having certain        
specified relationships to a Plan and imposes additional prohibitions where     
Parties in Interest are fiduciaries with respect to such Plan. Because the      
Mortgage Loans may be deemed Plan assets of each Plan that purchases            
Certificates, an investment in the Certificates by a Plan might be a prohibited 
transaction under ERISA Sections 406 and 407 and subject to an excise tax under 
Code Section 4975 unless a statutory or administrative exemption applies.       

PTE 83-1 

In Prohibited Transaction Exemption 83-1 ("PTE 83-1"), which amended  
Prohibited Transaction Exemption 81-7, Labor exempted from ERISA's prohibited   
transaction rules certain transactions relating to the operation of residential 
mortgage pool investment trusts and the purchase, sale and holding of "mortgage 
pool pass-through certificates" in the initial issuance of such certificates.   
PTE 83-1 permits, subject to certain conditions, transactions that might        
otherwise be prohibited between Plans and Parties in Interest with respect to   
those Plans related to the origination, maintenance and termination of mortgage 
pools consisting of mortgage loans secured by first or second mortgages or deeds
of trust on single-family residential property, and the acquisition and holding 
of certain mortgage pool pass-through certificates representing an interest in  
such mortgage pools by Plans. If the general conditions (discussed below) of PTE
83-1 are satisfied, investments by a Plan in Certificates that represent        
interests in a Mortgage Pool consisting of Mortgage Loans representing loans for
single family homes ("Single Family Certificates") will be exempt from the      
prohibitions of ERISA Sections 406(a) and 407 (relating generally to            
transactions with Parties in Interest who are not fiduciaries) if the Plan      
purchases the Single Family Certificates at no more than fair market value and  
will be exempt from the prohibitions of ERISA Sections 406(b)(1) and (2)        
(relating generally to transactions with fiduciaries) if, in addition, the      
purchase is approved by an independent fiduciary, no sales commission is paid to
the pool sponsor, the Plan does not purchase more than 25% of all Single Family 
Certificates, and at least 50% of all Single Family Certificates are purchased  
by persons independent of the pool sponsor or pool trustee. PTE 83-1 does not   
provide an exemption for transactions involving Subordinate Certificates.       
Accordingly, unless otherwise provided in the related Prospectus Supplement, no 
transfer of a Subordinate Certificate may be made to a Plan.                    

  The discussion in this and the next succeeding paragraph applies only to
Single Family Certificates. The Depositor believes that, for purposes of PTE    
83-1, the term "mortgage pass-through certificate" would include: (i)           
Certificates issued in a Series consisting of only a single class of            
Certificates; and (ii) Offered Certificates issued in a Series in which there is
only one class of Offered Certificates; provided that the Certificates in the   
case of clause (i), or the Offered Certificates in the case of clause (ii),     
evidence the beneficial ownership of both a specified percentage of future      
interest payments (greater than 0%) and a specified percentage (greater than 0%)
of future principal payments on the Mortgage Loans. It is not clear whether a   
class of Certificates that evidences the beneficial ownership in a Trust Fund   
divided into Mortgage Loan Groups, beneficial ownership of a specified          
percentage of interest payments only or principal payments only, or a notional  
amount of either principal or interest payments, or a class of Certificates     
entitled to receive payments of interest and principal on the Mortgage Loans    
only after payments to other classes or after the occurrence of certain         
specified events would be a "mortgage pass-through certificate" for purposes of 
PTE 83-1.                                                                       

  PTE 83-1 sets forth three general conditions which must be satisfied for
any transaction to be eligible for exemption: (i) the maintenance of a system of
insurance or other protection for the pooled mortgage loans and property        
securing such loans, and for indemnifying Certificateholders against reductions 
in pass-through payments due to property damage or defaults in loan payments in 
an amount not less than the greater of one percent of the aggregate principal   
balance of all covered pooled mortgage loans or the principal balance of the    
largest covered pooled mortgage loan; (ii) the existence of a pool trustee who  
is not an affiliate of the pool sponsor; and (iii) a limitation on the amount of
the payment retained by the pool sponsor, together with other                   

85

P-->424B3194th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 194th

funds inuring to its benefit, to not more than adequate consideration for       
selling the mortgage loans plus reasonable compensation for services provided by
the pool sponsor to the Mortgage Pool. The Depositor believes that the first    
general condition referred to above will be satisfied with respect to the       
Certificates in a Series issued without a subordination feature, or the Senior  
Certificates only in a Series issued with a subordination feature, provided that
the subordination and Reserve Fund, subordination by shifting of interests, the 
pool insurance or other form of credit enhancement described herein (such       
subordination, pool insurance or other form of credit enhancement being the     
system of insurance or other protection referred to above) with respect to a    
Series of Certificates is maintained in an amount not less than the greater of  
one percent of the aggregate principal balance of the Mortgage Loans or the     
principal balance of the largest Mortgage Loan. See "Description of the
Certificates" herein. In the absence of a ruling that the system of insurance or
other protection with respect to a Series of Certificates satisfies the first   
general condition referred to above, there can be no assurance that these       
features will be so viewed by Labor. The Trustee will not be affiliated with the
Depositor.                                                                      

    Each Plan fiduciary who is responsible for making the investment decisions
whether to purchase or commit to purchase and to hold Single Family Certificates
must make its own determination as to whether the first and third general       
conditions, and the specific conditions described briefly in the preceding      
paragraph, of PTE 83-1 have been satisfied, or as to the availability of any    
other prohibited transaction exemptions. Each Plan fiduciary should also        
determine whether, under the general fiduciary standards of investment prudence 
and diversification, an investment in the Certificates is appropriate for the   
Plan, taking into account the overall investment policy of the Plan and the     
composition of the Plan's investment portfolio.                                 

UNDERWRITER EXEMPTIONS 

   Labor has issued to various underwriters substantially similar individual
exemptions (each, an "Underwriter Exemption" and collectively, the "Underwriter 
Exemptions") which apply to certain sales and servicing of "certificates" that  
are obligations of a "trust" with respect to which such underwriters are the    
underwriter, manager or co-manager of an underwriting syndicate. The Underwriter
Exemptions provide relief which is generally similar to that provided by PTE    
83-1, but is broader in several respects.                                       

The Underwriter Exemptions contain several requirements, some of which
differ from those in PTE 83-1. The Underwriter Exemptions contain an expanded   
definition of "certificate," which includes an interest which entitles the      
Holder to pass-through payments of principal, interest and/or other payments.   
The Underwriter Exemptions contain an expanded definition of "trust" which      
permits the trust corpus to consist of secured consumer receivables, including  
obligations secured by shares issued by a cooperative housing association. The  
definition of "trust," however, does not include private mortgage-backed        
securities like the Private Mortgage-Backed Securities, and does not include any
other investment pool unless, inter alia: (i) the investment pool consists only 
of assets of the type which have been included in other investment pools; (ii)  
certificates evidencing interests in such other investment pools have been      
purchased by investors other than Plans for at least one year prior to the      
Plan's acquisition of certificates pursuant to the Underwriter Exemptions; and  
(iii) certificates in such other investment pools have been rated in one of the 
three highest generic rating categories of the four credit rating agencies noted
below. Generally, the Underwriter Exemptions hold that the acquisition of       
certificates by a Plan must be on terms (including the price for the            
certificates) that are at least as favorable to the Plan as they would be in an 
arm's-length transaction with an unrelated party. The Underwriter Exemptions    
require that the rights and interests evidenced by the certificates held by a   
Plan not be "subordinated" to the rights and interests evidenced by other       
certificates of the same trust. Further, the Underwriter Exemptions require that
certificates acquired by a Plan have received a rating at the time of their     
acquisition that is in one of the three highest generic rating categories of    
Standard and Poor's Ratings Services, Moody's Investors Service, Inc., Duff &   
Phelps Inc. or Fitch Investors Service, Inc. The Underwriter Exemptions also    
specify that the pool trustee must not be an affiliate of the pool sponsor, nor 
an affiliate of the underwriter, the pool servicer, any obligor with respect to 
mortgage loans included in the trust constituting more than five percent of the 
aggregate unamortized principal balance of the assets in the trust, or any      
affiliate of such entities. Finally, the Underwriter Exemptions stipulate that  
any Plan investing in the certificates must be an "accredited investor," as     
defined in Rule 501(a)(1) of Regulation D of the Securities and Exchange        

86

P-->424B3195th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 195th

Commission under the Securities Act of 1933. The Prospectus Supplement relating 
to a Series of Certificates will describe the Underwriters Exemption, if any,   
that may be applicable to such Series of Certificates.                          

    Any Plan fiduciary which proposes to cause a Plan to purchase Certificates
should consult with their counsel concerning the impact of ERISA and the Code,  
the applicability of PTE 83-1, and the potential consequences in their specific 
circumstances, prior to making such investment. The Prospectus Supplement for a 
Series of Certificates will contain additional information with respect to PTE  
83-1 and other prohibited transaction exemptions that may be applicable to such 
Series of Certificates. Moreover, each Plan fiduciary should determine whether  
under the general fiduciary standards of investment procedure and               
diversification an investment in the Certificates is appropriate for the Plan,  
taking into account the overall investment policy of the Plan and the           
composition of the Plan's investment portfolio.                                 

LEGAL INVESTMENT

The Prospectus Supplement for each Series of Certificates will specify
which, if any, of the Classes of Certificates offered thereby will constitute   
"mortgage related securities" for purposes of the Secondary Mortgage Market     
Enhancement Act of 1984 ("SMMEA"). Classes of Certificates that qualify as      
"mortgage related securities" will be legal investments for persons, trusts,    
corporations, partnerships, associations, business trusts and business entities 
(including depository institutions, life insurance companies and pension funds) 
created pursuant to or existing under the laws of the United States or of any   
state (including the District of Columbia and Puerto Rico) whose authorized     
investments are subject to state regulation to the same extent as, under        
applicable law, obligations issued by or guaranteed as to principal and interest
by the United States or any such entities. Under SMMEA, if a state enacts       
legislation prior to October 4, 1991, specifically limiting the legal investment
authority of any such entities with respect to "mortgage related securities,"   
the Certificates that qualify as mortgage related securities will constitute    
legal investments for entities subject to such legislation only to the extent   
provided therein. Approximately twenty-one states adopted such legislation prior
to the October 4, 1991, deadline. SMMEA provides, however, that in no event will
the enactment of any such legislation affect the validity of any contractual    
commitment to purchase, hold or invest in Certificates that qualify as mortgage 
related securities, or require the sale or other disposition of such            
Certificates, so long as such contractual commitment was made or such           
Certificates acquired prior to the enactment of such legislation.               

  SMMEA also amended the legal investment authority of federally-chartered
depository institutions as follows: federal savings and loan associations and   
federal savings banks may invest in, sell or otherwise deal in Certificates     
without limitations as to the percentage of their assets represented thereby,   
federal credit unions may invest in mortgage related securities, and national   
banks may purchase Certificates for their own account without regard to the     
limitations generally applicable to investment securities set forth in 12 U.S.C.
SS24 (Seventh), subject in each case to such regulations as the applicable      
federal authority may prescribe. In this connection, federal credit unions      
should review the National Credit Union Administration ("NCUA") Letter to Credit
Unions No. 96, as modified by Letter to Credit Unions No. 108, which includes   
guidelines to assist federal credit unions in making investment decisions for   
mortgage related securities, and the NCUA's regulation "Investment and Deposit  
Activities" (12 C.F.R. Part 703), (whether or not the Class of Certificates     
under consideration for purchase constitutes a "mortgage related security").    

   All depository institutions considering an investment in the Certificates
(whether or not the Class of Certificates under consideration for purchase      
constitutes a mortgage related security should review the Federal Financial     
Institutions Examination Council's Supervisory Policy Statement on the          
Securities Activities (to the extent adopted by their respective regulators)    
(the "Policy Statement"), setting forth, in relevant part, certain securities   
trading and sales practices deemed unsuitable for an institution's investment   
portfolio, and guidelines for (and restrictions on) investing in mortgage       
derivative products, including mortgage related securities, which are "high-risk
mortgage securities" as defined in the Policy Statement. According to the Policy
Statement, such "high-risk mortgage securities" include securities such as      
Certificates not entitled to distributions allocated to principal or interest,  
or Subordinated Certificates. Under the Policy Statement, it is the             
responsibility of each depository institution to determine, prior to purchase   
(and at stated intervals                                                        

87

P-->424B3196th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 196th

thereafter), whether a particular mortgage derivative product is a "high-risk   
mortgage security," and whether the purchase (or retention) of such a product   
would be consistent with the Policy Statement.                                  

The foregoing does not take into consideration the applicability of   
statutes, rules, regulations, orders, guidelines, or agreements generally       
governing investments made by a particular investor, including, but not limited 
to, "prudent investor" provisions, percentage-of-assets limits and provisions   
that may restrict or prohibit investment in securities that are not "interest   
bearing" or "income paying."                                                    

There may be other restrictions on the ability of certain investors,  
including depository institutions, either to purchase Certificates or to        
purchase Certificates representing more than a specified percentage of the      
investor's assets. Investors should consult their own legal advisors in         
determining whether and to what extent the Certificates constitute legal        
investments for such investors.                                                 

METHOD OF DISTRIBUTION

   The Certificates offered hereby and by the Prospectus Supplements will be
offered in Series. The distribution of the Certificates may be effected from    
time to time in one or more transactions, including negotiated transactions, at 
a fixed public offering price or at varying prices to be determined at the time 
of sale or at the time of commitment therefor. If so specified in the related   
Prospectus Supplement, the Certificates will be distributed in a firm commitment
underwriting, subject to the terms and conditions of the underwriting agreement,
by First Union Capital Markets, an affiliate of the Depositor, acting as        
underwriter with other underwriters, if any, named therein. In such event, the  
Prospectus Supplement may also specify that the underwriters will not be        
obligated to pay for any Certificates agreed to be purchased by purchasers      
pursuant to purchase agreements acceptable to the Depositor. In connection with 
the sale of the Certificates, underwriters may receive compensation from the    
Depositor or from purchasers of the Certificates in the form of discounts,      
concessions or commissions. The Prospectus Supplement will describe any such    
compensation paid by the Depositor.                                             

    Alternatively, the Prospectus Supplement may specify that the Certificates
will be distributed by First Union Capital Markets acting as agent or in some   
cases as principal with respect to Certificates that it has previously purchased
or agreed to purchase. If First Union Capital Markets acts as agent in the sale 
of Certificates, First Union Capital Markets will receive a selling commission  
with respect to each Series of Certificates, depending on market conditions,    
expressed as a percentage of the aggregate principal balance of the Certificates
sold hereunder as of the Cut-off Date. The exact percentage for each Series of  
Certificates will be disclosed in the related Prospectus Supplement. To the     
extent that First Union Capital Markets elects to purchase Certificates as      
principal, First Union Capital Markets may realize losses or profits based upon 
the difference between its purchase price and the sales price. The Prospectus   
Supplement with respect to any Series offered other than through underwriters   
will contain information regarding the nature of such offering and any          
agreements to be entered into between the Depositor and purchasers of           
Certificates of such Series.                                                    

    This Prospectus and the related Prospectus Supplement may be used by First
Union Capital Markets, an affiliate of the Depositor, in connection with offers 
and sales related to market-making transactions in the Certificates. First Union
Capital Markets may act as principal or agent in such transactions. Such sales  
will be made at prices related to prevailing market prices at the time of sale  
or otherwise.                                                                   

The Depositor will indemnify First Union Capital Markets and any      
underwriters against certain civil liabilities, including liabilities under the 
Securities Act of 1933, or will contribute to payments First Union Capital      
Markets and any underwriters may be required to make in respect thereof.        

 In the ordinary course of business, First Union Capital Markets and the
Depositor may engage in various securities and financing transactions, including
repurchase agreements to provide interim financing of the Depositor's Mortgage  
Loans pending the sale of such Mortgage Loans or interests therein, including   
the Certificates.                                                               

   The Depositor anticipates that the Certificates will be sold primarily to
institutional investors. Purchasers of Certificates, including dealers, may,    
depending on the facts and circumstances of such purchases, be                  

88

P-->424B3197th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 197th

deemed to be "underwriters" within the meaning of the Securities Act of 1933 in 
connection with reoffers and sales by them of Certificates. Holders of          
Certificates should consult with their legal advisors in this regard prior to   
any such reoffer or sale.                                                       

    Underwriters or agents and their associates may be customers of (including
borrowers from), engage in transactions with and/or perform services for, FUNB, 
its affiliates and the Trustee in the ordinary course of business.              

LEGAL MATTERS 

  Unless otherwise specified in the related Prospectus Supplement, certain
legal matters relating to the Certificates, including certain federal income tax
consequences with respect thereto, will be passed upon for the Depositor by     
Kilpatrick Stockton LLP.                                                        

FINANCIAL INFORMATION 

     A new Trust Fund will be formed with respect to each Series of Certificates
and no Trust Fund will engage in any business activities or have any assets or  
obligations prior to the issuance of the related Series of Certificates.        
Accordingly, no financial statements with respect to any Trust Fund will be     
included in this Prospectus or in the related Prospectus Supplement.            

RATING

It is a condition to the issuance of the Certificates of each Series  
offered hereby and by the Prospectus Supplement that they shall have been rated 
in one of the four highest rating categories by the nationally recognized       
statistical rating agency or agencies specified in the related Prospectus       
Supplement.                                                                     

 Ratings on mortgage pass-through certificates address the likelihood of
receipt by certificateholders of all distributions on the underlying mortgage   
loans. These ratings address the structural, legal and issuer-related aspects   
associated with such certificates, the nature of the underlying mortgage loans  
and the credit quality of the credit enhancer or guarantor, if any. Ratings on  
mortgage pass-through certificates do not represent any assessment of the       
likelihood of principal prepayments by mortgagors or of the degree by which such
prepayments might differ from those originally anticipated. As a result,        
certificateholders might suffer a lower than anticipated yield, and, in         
addition, holders of stripped pass-through certificates in extreme cases might  
fail to recoup their underlying investments.                                    

   A security rating is not a recommendation to buy, sell or hold securities
and may be subject to revision or withdrawal at any time by the assigning rating
organization. Each security rating should be evaluated independently of any     
other security rating.                                                          

89

P-->424B3198th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 198th

 ANNEX I
GLOBAL CLEARANCE, SETTLEMENT AND
TAX DOCUMENTATION PROCEDURES

     Except in certain limited circumstances, a class of Book-Entry Certificates
(the "Global Securities") will be available only in book-entry form. Investors  
in the Global Securities may hold such Global Securities through any of DTC,    
CEDEL or Euroclear. The Global Securities will be tradeable as home market      
instruments in both the European and U.S. domestic markets. Initial settlement  
and all secondary trades will settle in same-day funds.                         

Secondary market trading between investors holding Global Securities  
through CEDEL and Euroclear will be conducted in the ordinary way in accordance 
with their normal rules and operating procedures and in accordance with         
conventional eurobond practice (i.e., seven calendar day settlement).           

Secondary market trading between investors holding Global Securities  
through DTC will be conducted according to the rules and procedures applicable  
to U.S. corporate debt obligations and prior Residential Mortgage Pass-Through  
Certificates issues.                                                            

Secondary cross-market trading between CEDEL or Euroclear and DTC     
Participants holding Certificates will be effected on a delivery-against-payment
basis through the respective Depositaries of CEDEL and Euroclear (in such       
capacity) and as DTC Participants.                                              

    Non-U.S. Holders (as described below) of Global Securities will be subject
to U.S. withholding taxes unless such Holders meet certain requirements and     
deliver appropriate U.S. tax documents to the securities clearing organizations 
or their participants.                                                          

INITIAL SETTLEMENT                                                              

     All Global Securities will be held in book-entry form by DTC in the name of
Cede & Co. as nominee of DTC. Investors' interests in the Global Securities will
be represented through financial institutions acting on their behalf as direct  
and indirect Participants in DTC. As a result, CEDEL and Euroclear will hold    
positions on behalf of their Participants through their respective Depositaries,
which in turn will hold such positions in accounts as DTC Participants.         

    Investors electing to hold their Global Securities through DTC will follow
the settlement practices applicable to prior Residential Mortgage Pass-Through  
Certificates issues. Investor securities custody accounts will be credited with 
their holdings against payment in same-day funds on the settlement date.        

Investors electing to hold their Global Securities through CEDEL or   
Euroclear accounts will follow the settlement procedures applicable to          
conventional eurobonds, except that there will be no temporary global security  
and no "lock-up" or restricted period. Global Securities will be credited to the
securities custody accounts on the settlement date against payment in same-day  
funds.                                                                          

SECONDARY MARKET TRADING                                                        

  Since the purchaser determines the place of delivery, it is important to
establish at the time of the trade where both the purchaser's and seller's      
accounts are located to ensure that settlement can be made on the desired value 
date.                                                                           

 Trading Between DTC Participants.  Secondary market trading between DTC
Participants will be settled using the procedures applicable to prior           
Residential Mortgage Pass-Through Certificates issues in same-day funds.        

Trading Between Cedel and/or Euroclear Participants.  Secondary market
trading between CEDEL Participants or Euroclear Participants will be settled    
using the procedures applicable to conventional eurobonds in same-day funds.    

II-1

P-->424B3199th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 199th

   Trading Between DTC Seller and CEDEL or Euroclear Purchaser.  When Global
Securities are to be transferred from the account of a DTC Participant to the   
account of a CEDEL Participant or a Euroclear Participant, the purchaser will   
send instructions to CEDEL or Euroclear through a CEDEL Participant or Euroclear
Participant at least one business day prior to settlement. CEDEL or Euroclear   
will instruct the respective Depositary, as the case may be, to receive the     
Global Securities against payment. Payment will include interest accrued on the 
Global Securities from and including the last coupon payment date to and        
excluding the settlement date, on the basis of the actual number of days in such
accrual period and a year assumed to consist of 360 days. For transactions      
settling on the 31st of the month, payment will include interest accrued to and 
excluding the first day of the following month. Payment will then be made by the
respective Depositary of the DTC Participant's account against delivery of the  
Global Securities. After settlement has been completed, the Global Securities   
will be credited to the respective clearing system and by the clearing system,  
in accordance with its usual procedures, to the CEDEL Participant's or Euroclear
Participant's account. The securities credit will appear the next day (European 
time) and the cash debt will be back-valued to, and the interest on the Global  
Securities will accrue from, the value date (which would be the preceding day   
when settlement occurred in New York). If settlement is not completed on the    
intended value date (i.e., the trade fails), the CEDEL or Euroclear cash debt   
will be valued instead as of the actual settlement date.                        

   CEDEL Participants and Euroclear Participants will need to make available
to the respective clearing systems the funds necessary to process same-day funds
settlement. The most direct means of doing so is to preposition funds for       
settlement, either from cash on hand or existing lines of credit, as they would 
for any settlement occurring within CEDEL or Euroclear. Under this approach,    
they may take on credit exposure to CEDEL or Euroclear until the Global         
Securities are credited to their accounts one day later.                        

   As an alternative, if CEDEL or Euroclear has extended a line of credit to
them, CEDEL Participants or Euroclear Participants can elect not to preposition 
funds and allow that credit line to be drawn upon the finance settlement. Under 
this procedure, CEDEL Participants or Euroclear Participants purchasing Global  
Securities would incur overdraft charges for one day, assuming they cleared the 
overdraft when the Global Securities were credited to their accounts. However,  
interest on the Global Securities would accrue from the value date. Therefore,  
in many cases the investment income on the Global Securities earned during that 
one-day period may substantially reduce or offset the amount of such overdraft  
charges, although this result will depend on each CEDEL Participant's or        
Euroclear Participant's particular cost of funds.                               

  Since the settlement is taking place during New York business hours, DTC
Participants can employ their usual procedures for sending Global Securities to 
the respective European Depositary for the benefit of CEDEL Participants or     
Euroclear Participants. The sale proceeds will be available to the DTC seller on
the settlement date. Thus, to the DTC Participants a cross-market transaction   
will settle no differently than a trade between two DTC Participants.           

   Trading Between CEDEL or Euroclear Seller and DTC Purchaser.  Due to time
zone differences in their favor, CEDEL Participants and Euroclear Participants  
may employ their customary procedures for transactions in which Global          
Securities are to be transferred by the respective clearing system, through the 
respective Depositary, to a DTC Participant. The seller will send instructions  
to CEDEL or Euroclear through a CEDEL Participant or Euroclear Participant at   
least one business day prior to settlement. In these cases CEDEL or Euroclear   
will instruct the respective Depositary, as appropriate, to deliver the Global  
Securities to the DTC Participant's account against payment. Payment will       
include interest accrued on the Global Securities from and including the last   
coupon payment to and excluding the settlement date on the basis of the actual  
number of days in such accrual period and a year assumed to consist of 360 days.
For transactions settling on the 31st of the month, payment will include        
interest accrued to and excluding the first day of the following month. The     
payment will then be reflected in the account of the CEDEL Participant or       
Euroclear Participant the following day, and receipt of the cash proceeds in the
CEDEL Participant's or Euroclear Participant's account will be back-valued to   
the value date (which would be the preceding day, when settlement occurred in   
New York). Should the CEDEL Participant or Euroclear Participant have a line of 
credit with its respective clearing system and elect to be in debt in           
anticipation of receipt of the sale proceeds in its account, the back-valuation 
will extinguish any overdraft incurred over that one-day period. If settlement  
is not completed on the                                                         
II-2

P-->424B3200th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 200th

intended value date (i.e., the trade fails), receipt of the cash proceeds in the
CEDEL Participant's or Euroclear Participant's account would instead be valued  
as of the actual settlement date.                                               

   Finally, day traders that use CEDEL or Euroclear and that purchase Global
Securities from DTC Participants for delivery to CEDEL Participants or Euroclear
Participants should note that these trades would automatically fail on the sale 
side unless affirmative action were taken. At least three techniques should be  
readily available to eliminate this potential problem:                          

   (a) borrowing through CEDEL or Euroclear for one day (until the
 purchase side of the day trade is reflected in their CEDEL or Euroclear
  accounts) in accordance with the clearing system's customary procedures;

          (b) borrowing the Global Securities in the U.S. from a DTC Participant
no later than one day prior to settlement, which would give the Global
Securities sufficient time to be reflected in their CEDEL or Euroclear
account in order to settle the sale side of the trade; or             

          (c) staggering the value dates for the buy and sell sides of the trade
so that the value date for the purchase from the DTC Participant is at
     least one day prior to the value date for the sale to the CEDEL Participant
or Euroclear Participant.                                             

CERTAIN U.S. FEDERAL INCOME TAX DOCUMENTATION REQUIREMENTS

     A beneficial owner of Global Securities holding securities through CEDEL or
Euroclear (or through DTC if the Holder has an address outside the U.S.) will be
subject to the 30% U.S. withholding tax that generally applies to payments of   
interest (including original issue discount) on registered debt issued by U.S.  
Persons, unless (i) each clearing system, bank or other financial institution   
that holds customers' securities in the ordinary course of its trade or business
in the chain of intermediaries between such beneficial owner and the U.S. entity
required to withhold tax complies with applicable certification requirements and
(ii) such beneficial owner takes one of the following steps to obtain an        
exemption or reduced tax rate:                                                  

    Exemption for Non-U.S. Persons (Form W-8).  Beneficial owners of
     Global Securities that are non-U.S. Persons can obtain a complete exemption
from the withholding tax by filing a signed Form W-8 (Certificate of  
   Foreign Status). If the information shown on Form W-8 changes, a new Form
W-8 must be filed within 30 days of such change.                      

       Exemption for Non-U.S. Persons with Actively Connected Income (Form
    4224).  A non-U.S. Person, including a non-U.S. corporation or bank with a
  U.S. branch, for which the interest income is effectively connected with
its conduct of a trade or business in the United States, can obtain an
exemption from the withholding tax by filing Form 4224 (Exemption from
  Withholding of Tax on Income Effectively Connected with the Conduct of a
Trade or Business in the United States).                              

     Exemption or Reduced Rate for Non-U.S. Persons Resident in Treaty
Countries (Form 1001). Non-U.S. Persons that are Certificate Owners   
residing in a country that has a tax treaty with the United States can
    obtain an exemption or reduced tax rate (depending on the treaty terms) by
     filing Form 1001 (Ownership, Exemption or Reduced Rate Certificate). If the
     treaty provides only for a reduced rate, withholding tax will be imposed at
   that rate unless the filer alternatively files Form W-8. Form 1001 may be
filed by the Certificate Owners or his agent.                         

     Exemption for U.S. Persons (Form W-9).  U.S. Persons can obtain a
 complete exemption from the withholding tax by filing Form W-9 (Payer's
Request for Taxpayer Identification Number and Certification).        

          U.S. Federal Income Tax Reporting Procedure.  The Certificate Owner of
    a Global Security or, in the case of a Form 1001 or a Form 4224 filer, his
    agent, files by submitting the appropriate form to the person through whom
   it holds (the clearing agency, in the case of persons holding directly on
     the books of the clearing agency). Form W-8 and Form 1001 are effective for
three calendar years and Form 4224 is effective for one calendar year.

II-3

P-->424B3201st Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 201st

The term "U.S. Person" means (i) a citizen or resident of the United  
States, (ii) a corporation or partnership organized in or under the laws of the 
United States or any political subdivision thereof or (iii) an estate or trust  
the income of which is includable in gross income for United States tax         
purposes, regardless of its source. This summary does not deal with all aspects 
of U.S. Federal income tax withholding that may be relevant to foreign holders  
of the Global Securities. Investors are advised to consult their own tax        
advisors for specific tax advice concerning their holding and disposing of the  
Global Securities.                                                              

II-4

P-->424B3202nd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 202nd

INDEX TO DEFINED TERMS

                                                                [Download Table]

                                                              PAGE
                                                              ----
                                                                  
1986 Act....................................................    66
Accrual Certificates........................................    28
Accrual period..............................................    72
Act.........................................................    54
Adjusted issue price........................................    67
Advance.....................................................     8
AFR.........................................................    68
Agency Securities...........................................     i
Agreement...................................................     1
ALTA........................................................    23
Applicable Amount...........................................    80
ARM Loans...................................................    67
Available Distribution Amount...............................    27
Balloon Loan................................................    23
Balloon payments............................................     2
Balloon Period..............................................    23
Bankruptcy Bond.............................................    37
Bankruptcy Bonds............................................     7
Beneficial owner............................................    31
Book-Entry Certificates.....................................    31
Buydown Fund................................................    13
Buydown Loans...............................................    13
Capital asset...............................................    76
Cede........................................................    31
CEDEL.......................................................    31
CEDEL Participants..........................................    32
CERCLA......................................................    59
Certificate Balance.........................................    29
Certificate Owners..........................................    31
Certificate Register........................................    26
Certificates................................................     1
Charter Act.................................................    18
Closing Date................................................     1
Code........................................................     8
Collateral Value............................................    14
Collection Account..........................................    42
Combined Loan-to-Value Ratio................................    14
Commission..................................................    ii
Cooperative.................................................    33
Cooperative Loans...........................................     2
Cooperatives................................................     2
Cut-off Date................................................     6
Deferred Interest...........................................    67
Definitive Certificate......................................    31
Depositor...................................................     1
Detailed Description........................................    12
Determination Date..........................................    28
Disqualified organization...................................    82
Distribution Date...........................................     5

 i

P-->424B3203rd Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 203rd

                                                                [Download Table]

                                                              PAGE
                                                              ----

DTC.........................................................    31
Due-on-sale.................................................     3
Eligible Investments........................................    42
EPA.........................................................    59
ERISA.......................................................     9
Euroclear...................................................    31
Euroclear Operator..........................................    33
Euroclear Participants......................................    32
European Depositaries.......................................    31
Excess inclusion............................................    77
Excess inclusions...........................................    82
Excess servicing............................................    65
FDIC........................................................    24
Federal long-term rate......................................    78
FHA.........................................................     2
FHA Insurance...............................................     7
FHA Loans...................................................    15
FHLMC.......................................................    23
FHLMC Act...................................................    17
FHLMC Certificate Group.....................................    17
FHLMC Certificates..........................................     3
Financial Intermediary......................................    31
FNMA........................................................    23
FNMA Certificates...........................................     3
FUNB........................................................     1
Funding Period..............................................     8
Garn-St Germain Act.........................................    60
Global Securities...........................................  II-1
GNMA........................................................     1
GNMA Certificates...........................................     3
GNMA Issuer.................................................    15
Guaranty Agreement..........................................    15
Home Equity Loans...........................................     2
Housing Act.................................................    15
HUD.........................................................    48
Insurance Proceeds..........................................    43
Insured Expenses............................................    43
IRS.........................................................    63
Issuer......................................................    69
Labor.......................................................    84
Legislative History.........................................    66
Letter of Credit............................................     7
Limited Guarantee...........................................     7
Liquidation Expenses........................................    43
Liquidation Proceeds........................................    43
Loan-to-Value Ratio.........................................    14
lockout periods.............................................     3
Master REMIC................................................    10
Master Servicer.............................................     1
Master Servicing Fee........................................    49

ii

P-->424B3204th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 204th

                                                                [Download Table]

                                                              PAGE
                                                              ----
                                                                  
Morgan......................................................    31
Mortgage....................................................    41
Mortgage Assets.............................................     1
Mortgage Loans..............................................     i
Mortgage Note...............................................    41
Mortgage pass-through certificate...........................    85
Mortgage Pool...............................................     1
Mortgage Pool Insurance Policy..............................     6
Mortgage Rate...............................................     5
Mortgage related securities.................................     8
Mortgaged Properties........................................    12
Mortgagor...................................................    10
NCUA........................................................    87
Net Liquidation Proceeds....................................    43
OID Regulations.............................................    66
Participant.................................................    31
Parties in Interest.........................................    85
Pass-through entity.........................................    82
Pass-through interest holder................................    80
Pass-Through Rate...........................................     5
Plans.......................................................     5
PMBS Agreement..............................................    20
PMBS Issuer.................................................    20
PMBS Servicer...............................................    20
PMBS Trustee................................................    20
Policy Statement............................................    87
Pool Insurer................................................    35
Pre-Funded Amount...........................................     1
Pre-Funding Account.........................................     8
Prepayment Assumption.......................................    66
Primary Insurer.............................................    46
Primary Mortgage Insurance Policy...........................    12
Principal Prepayments.......................................    29
Private Mortgage-Backed Securities..........................     i
Proposed Regulations........................................    83
PTE 83-1....................................................    85
Purchase Price..............................................    25
Qualified mortgage..........................................    70
Rating Agency...............................................     9
Record Date.................................................    26
Regular Certificates........................................    69
Regular interests...........................................    27
Relevant Depositary.........................................    31
Relief Act..................................................    61
REMIC.......................................................     8
REMIC Regulations...........................................    61
Reserve Fund................................................     6
Residual Certificates.......................................    69
Residual interests..........................................    27
Retained Interest...........................................    25

 iii

P-->424B3205th Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 205th

                                                                [Download Table]

                                                              PAGE
                                                              ----
                                                                  
Rules.......................................................    31
Seller......................................................     i
Sellers.....................................................    12
Senior Certificates.........................................     4
Series......................................................     1
Significant value...........................................    78
Single Family Certificates..................................    85
SMMEA.......................................................     8
Special Hazard Insurance Policy.............................     6
Special Hazard Insurer......................................    36
Stripped ARM Obligations....................................    67
Stripped Bond Certificates..................................    65
Stripped bonds..............................................    65
Stripped Coupon Certificates................................    65
Stripped coupons............................................    65
Sub-Servicer................................................     1
Subordinated Certificates...................................     4
Subsequent Mortgage Assets..................................     1
Subsidiary REMIC............................................    70
Subsidy Account.............................................    23
Subsidy Loans...............................................    23
Subsidy Payments............................................    23
Surety Bond.................................................     7
Temporary Regulations.......................................    83
Terms and Conditions........................................    33
Title V.....................................................    61
Trust Fund..................................................     i
Trustee.....................................................     1
U.S. Person.................................................    69
Underwriter Exemption.......................................    86
Underwriter Exemptions......................................    86
VA..........................................................     2
VA Guaranty Policy..........................................    49
VA Insurance................................................     7
VA Loans....................................................    15

iv

P-->424B3Last Page of 206TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 206th

======================================================                          

NO PERSON HAS BEEN AUTHORIZED TO GIVE ANY INFORMATION OR TO MAKE ANY        
REPRESENTATIONS OTHER THAN THOSE CONTAINED IN THIS PROSPECTUS SUPPLEMENT OR THE 
PROSPECTUS AND, IF GIVEN OR MADE, SUCH INFORMATION OR REPRESENTATIONS MUST NOT  
BE RELIED UPON. THIS PROSPECTUS SUPPLEMENT AND THE PROSPECTUS DO NOT CONSTITUTE 
AN OFFER TO SELL OR A SOLICITATION OF AN OFFER TO BUY ANY SECURITIES OTHER THAN 
THE OFFERED CERTIFICATES OFFERED HEREBY, NOR AN OFFER OF THE OFFERED            
CERTIFICATES IN ANY STATE OR JURISDICTION IN WHICH, OR TO ANY PERSON TO WHOM,   
SUCH OFFER WOULD BE UNLAWFUL. THE DELIVERY OF THIS PROSPECTUS SUPPLEMENT OR THE 
PROSPECTUS AT ANY TIME DOES NOT IMPLY THAT INFORMATION HEREIN OR THEREIN IS     
CORRECT AS OF ANY TIME SUBSEQUENT TO ITS DATE; HOWEVER, IF ANY MATERIAL CHANGE  
OCCURS WHILE THIS PROSPECTUS SUPPLEMENT OR THE PROSPECTUS IS REQUIRED BY LAW TO 
BE DELIVERED, THIS PROSPECTUS SUPPLEMENT OR THE PROSPECTUS WILL BE AMENDED OR   
SUPPLEMENTED ACCORDINGLY.                                                       

--------------------- 

TABLE OF CONTENTS 

                                                                [Download Table]

                                                  PAGE
                                                  ----

                PROSPECTUS SUPPLEMENT                 
Incorporation of Certain Documents by                 
  Reference.....................................     v
Summary of Terms of the Offered Certificates....   S-1
Risk Factors....................................  S-19
The Mortgage Loan Pool..........................  S-24
The Seller and the Servicer.....................  S-37
Prepayment and Yield Considerations.............  S-39
Formation of the Trust Fund and Trust
Property......................................  S-46
Description of the Certificates.................  S-46
Description of the Mortgage Loan Purchase
Agreement.....................................  S-74
The Trustee.....................................  S-75
Certain Legal Aspects of the Mortgage Loans.....  S-75
Certain Federal Income Tax Consequences.........  S-79
State Taxes.....................................  S-82
ERISA Considerations............................  S-82
Use of Proceeds.................................  S-85
Legal Investment Considerations.................  S-85
Underwriting....................................  S-85
Legal Matters...................................  S-86
Certificate Rating..............................  S-86
Index of Principal Terms........................  S-87
Appendix A......................................   A-1

 PROSPECTUS 
Prospectus Supplement...........................    ii
Available Information...........................    ii
Reports to Certificateholders...................    ii
Incorporation of Certain Information by
Reference.....................................    ii
Summary of Terms................................     1
Risk Factors....................................    10
The Trust Fund..................................    12
Use of Proceeds.................................    21
The Depositor...................................    21
Mortgage Loan Program...........................    22
Description of the Certificates.................    25
Credit Enhancement..............................    34
Yield and Prepayment Considerations.............    39
The Pooling and Servicing Agreement.............    40
Certain Legal Aspects of The Mortgage Loans.....    53
Certain Federal Income Tax Consequences.........    61
State, Local and Other Tax Considerations.......    84
ERISA Considerations............................    84
Legal Investment................................    87
Method of Distribution..........................    88
Legal Matters...................................    89
Financial Information...........................    89
Rating..........................................    89
Annex I -- Global Clearance, Settlement and Tax       
  Documentation Procedures......................  II-1
Index to Defined Terms..........................     i

======================================================                          
======================================================                          

$347,077,774

FIRST UNION 
RESIDENTIAL SECURITIZATION
TRANSACTIONS, INC., 
Depositor 

MORTGAGE
PASS-THROUGH CERTIFICATES,
SERIES 1998-A 
FIRST UNION NATIONAL BANK,
Seller

FIRST UNION MORTGAGE CORPORATION, 
Servicer
--------------------------------- 
PROSPECTUS SUPPLEMENT 
----------------------------------- 

FIRST UNION CAPITAL MARKETS 
DONALDSON LUFKIN & JENRETTE 
SECURITIES CORPORATION
April 24, 1998
======================================================                          
R-->Dates Referenced Herein   and   Documents Incorporated by Reference
Referenced-On PageThis ‘424B3’ Filing    Date First  Last      Other Filings4/1/289303/1/25308/31/992712/31/988610-K,  10-K/A7/24/982458-KFiled on:5/1/98474/30/9829474/29/981478-K4/24/9812068-K4/1/982912/31/9742449/30/97446/30/97443/31/974410/30/961688/13/961762/27/961291/1/9615712/31/95851/3/9519112/28/9319112/28/921737/28/92167 List all Filings 
↑TopFiling Submission 0000950144-98-005492   –   Alternative Formats (Word / Rich Text, HTML, Plain Text, et al.)
Copyright © 2017 Fran Finnegan & Company.  All Rights Reserved.About – Privacy – Redactions – Help —
Sat, 29 Jul 05:50:26.2 GMT 
 















Wachovia Asset Securitization Issuance II, LLC 2007-HE2 Trust Credit Rating - Moody's






















































Yes
No





























About Moody'sCareersRegulatory AffairsTerms of UseContact UsAbout Moody'sCompany OverviewInvestor RelationsMedia RelationsCorporate Social ResponsibilityAlumni













GO






































There are too many sessions currently in use on this account















Log In




Cancel


































Research & Ratings

OverviewRatings NewsRating MethodologiesRatings DisclosuresRatings PerformanceRegulatory AffairsCode of Professional ConductSector in DepthLook Up a RatingFind an AnalystInteractive ChartsMarket SegmentCorporatesFinancial InstitutionsStructured FinanceManaged InvestmentsInfrastructure & Project FinanceSovereign & SupranationalSub-SovereignU.S. Public FinanceRegionNorth AmericaLatin America & CaribbeanEurope, Middle East & AfricaAsia PacificResearch TypeIssuer ResearchIndustry / Sector ResearchMethodologyCapital Markets ResearchDefault & Ratings AnalyticsEconomic ResearchData ReportsPolitical / Economic GroupEmerging MarketsEuropean UnionAsia-Pacific Economic Cooperation (APEC)Association of Southeast Asian Nations (ASEAN)Commonwealth of Independent States (CIS)EurozoneGulf Cooperation CouncilMercosurOrganisation for Economic Co-operation and Development  (OECD)Credit PolicyRating MethodologiesRequests for CommentThe Commercial GroupHow to Get RatedRatings DefinitionsRatings Policy & Approach



Products & Solutions

OverviewProducts Listing by A - ZMoody's AnalyticsMoody's Pricing & Valuations ToolsMoody's Advisory ServicesMoody's Economy.comMoody’s Training & CertificationSolutionsAsset and Liability Management SolutionsCredit Origination SolutionsCredit Risk SolutionsData SolutionsEconomic SolutionsInsurance SolutionsInvestment & Pensions SolutionsLearning Solutions and CertificationsPortfolio Management SolutionsRegulatory and Accounting SolutionsStructured Finance SolutionsAccess ProductsCredit Risk CalculatorCredit Transition ModelCredit TrendsCreditEdge®Default Recovery Database (DRD)Default Risk Service - StructuredFund MonitoringLossCalc™Market Implied Ratings (MIR®)Moody's Financial Metrics™Moody's Project Finance ScorecardMoody's Quantitative Ratings Estimator (QRATE)Municipal Financial Ratio AnalysisRatings InteractiveRiskCalc™



News & Events

OverviewRatings NewsEventsTraining EventsTopics





Log In
Register







            Log In 

            Please log in for full access to your permissions. Password is case sensitive.











                    User Name:





                    Password:









                Automatically log me in when I return





                Log In





                Forgot your Username or Password?




        Or Log In using:

























Please Note


We brought you to this page based on your search query. If this isn't what you are looking for, you can continue to Search Results for ""
















The maximum number of items you can export is 3,000.
  Please reduce your list by using the filtering tool to the left.









Close








































































Back to Previous Page



















Please Log In to access this content






Registered User


        Please log in for full access to your permissions. Password is case sensitive.








            User Name:





            Password:








            Automatically log me in when I return



            Log In





            Forgot your Username or Password?



        Or Log In using:
    







Not Registered Yet?

Register now to get FREE access to:
Issuer Ratings.
Ratings on over 170,000 corporate, government and structured finance securities.
Events Calendar.
Information about training seminars, briefings, and teleconferences.
Watchlists.
Listings of issuers under review for rating changes.
Rating Methodologies.
Descriptive frameworks underlying Moody's ratings.

 

Register Now

















Wachovia Asset Securitization Issuance II, LLC 2007-HE2 Trust

Moody's Org ID:720309125







Moody's Org ID:720309125

Market Segment:Structured Finance > Residential MBS > Second Liens...>> > HELOC <<







Please Log In to view this content.



















                                    Research



                                    Ratings



                                    Related Parties







                            Go to RMBS Industry Page
                        









    Deal Research


    Industry Research


    Performance


    Related Parties Research


    Methodology






Results 
        1 - 5
Of 
        5


 
        Page 
        
        1
Of 
        1 
        






                Filter By:
            


Document Type - All
Announcement
Rating Action


Source - All
Moody's Investors Service







Date
    
    



Document Type
    



                        Title
                    

                        Source
                    




                    01 Sep 2011
                

                    Announcement
                













                                    Moody's: No Negative Ratings Impact From Addition of Cash Reserve in RMBS Deals





                    Moody's Investors Service
                



                    01 Jul 2010
                

                    Rating Action
                













                                    Moody's takes action on $3.7 bn of Second Lien RMBS issued by WASI





                    Moody's Investors Service
                



                    18 Mar 2010
                

                    Rating Action
                













                                    Moody's updates loss projections for US second lien RMBS





                    Moody's Investors Service
                



                    17 Nov 2008
                

                    Rating Action
                













                                    Moody's takes rating actions on structured finance bonds insured by Ambac Assurance Corporation





                    Moody's Investors Service
                



                    31 Jul 2007
                

                    Rating Action
                













                                    Moody's Rates WASI II 2007-HE2 Deal





                    Moody's Investors Service
                





Results 
        1 - 5
Of 
        5


 
        Page 
        
        1
Of 
        1 
        
















                6The rating history for this credit rating accurately reflects the current status of the (sf) indicator but, due to technical limitations, does not accurately reflect the (sf) indicator history. Please visit the Research tab to view the press release(s) announcing when the (sf) indicator was added or removed.


For credit ratings that are derived exclusively from an existing credit rating of a program, series, category/class of debt, support provider or primary rated entity, or that replace a previously assigned provisional rating at the same rating level, Moody’s publishes a rating announcement on that series, category/class of debt or program as a whole, on the support provider or primary rated entity, or on the provisional rating, but often does not publish a specific rating announcement on each subsequent bond or note for which the credit rating is derived from the existing credit rating. Rating announcements are usually press releases classified as Rating Actions on www.moodys.com. Please refer to the Research tab on the issuer/entity page for the rating announcement.
















Moody's Integrity Hotline
EU

001-800-506-1440
Japan

KDDI: 00-539-111 then 888-320-1668
NTT: 0034-811-001 then 888-320-1668
Outside of the EU and Japan

1-866-330-MDYS (6397)



Browse By
HomeResearch & RatingsProducts & SolutionsNews & EventsCareers


Contact Us
Help & SupportContact UsSubmit a Complaint


Terms & Conditions
Terms of UsePrivacy PolicyProprietary Rights





            © 2017 Moody's Investors Service, Inc., Moody’s Analytics, Inc. and/or their affiliates and licensors. All rights reserved.
        

           Regional Sites:
            
GlobalArgentinaAsiaAustraliaBoliviaBrazilCanadaCEEChinaCzech RepublicCISEMEAFranceGermanyIndonesiaIndiaItalyJapanKoreaMexicoMiddle EastPolandSouth AfricaSpainTurkeyTaiwanUruguay



























































































 















Wachovia Asset Securitization Issuance II, LLC 2007-HE1 Trust Credit Rating - Moody's






















































Yes
No





























About Moody'sCareersRegulatory AffairsTerms of UseContact UsAbout Moody'sCompany OverviewInvestor RelationsMedia RelationsCorporate Social ResponsibilityAlumni













GO






































There are too many sessions currently in use on this account















Log In




Cancel


































Research & Ratings

OverviewRatings NewsRating MethodologiesRatings DisclosuresRatings PerformanceRegulatory AffairsCode of Professional ConductSector in DepthLook Up a RatingFind an AnalystInteractive ChartsMarket SegmentCorporatesFinancial InstitutionsStructured FinanceManaged InvestmentsInfrastructure & Project FinanceSovereign & SupranationalSub-SovereignU.S. Public FinanceRegionNorth AmericaLatin America & CaribbeanEurope, Middle East & AfricaAsia PacificResearch TypeIssuer ResearchIndustry / Sector ResearchMethodologyCapital Markets ResearchDefault & Ratings AnalyticsEconomic ResearchData ReportsPolitical / Economic GroupEmerging MarketsEuropean UnionAsia-Pacific Economic Cooperation (APEC)Association of Southeast Asian Nations (ASEAN)Commonwealth of Independent States (CIS)EurozoneGulf Cooperation CouncilMercosurOrganisation for Economic Co-operation and Development  (OECD)Credit PolicyRating MethodologiesRequests for CommentThe Commercial GroupHow to Get RatedRatings DefinitionsRatings Policy & Approach



Products & Solutions

OverviewProducts Listing by A - ZMoody's AnalyticsMoody's Pricing & Valuations ToolsMoody's Advisory ServicesMoody's Economy.comMoody’s Training & CertificationSolutionsAsset and Liability Management SolutionsCredit Origination SolutionsCredit Risk SolutionsData SolutionsEconomic SolutionsInsurance SolutionsInvestment & Pensions SolutionsLearning Solutions and CertificationsPortfolio Management SolutionsRegulatory and Accounting SolutionsStructured Finance SolutionsAccess ProductsCredit Risk CalculatorCredit Transition ModelCredit TrendsCreditEdge®Default Recovery Database (DRD)Default Risk Service - StructuredFund MonitoringLossCalc™Market Implied Ratings (MIR®)Moody's Financial Metrics™Moody's Project Finance ScorecardMoody's Quantitative Ratings Estimator (QRATE)Municipal Financial Ratio AnalysisRatings InteractiveRiskCalc™



News & Events

OverviewRatings NewsEventsTraining EventsTopics





Log In
Register







            Log In 

            Please log in for full access to your permissions. Password is case sensitive.











                    User Name:





                    Password:









                Automatically log me in when I return





                Log In





                Forgot your Username or Password?




        Or Log In using:

























Please Note


We brought you to this page based on your search query. If this isn't what you are looking for, you can continue to Search Results for ""
















The maximum number of items you can export is 3,000.
  Please reduce your list by using the filtering tool to the left.









Close








































































Back to Previous Page



















Please Log In to access this content






Registered User


        Please log in for full access to your permissions. Password is case sensitive.








            User Name:





            Password:








            Automatically log me in when I return



            Log In





            Forgot your Username or Password?



        Or Log In using:
    







Not Registered Yet?

Register now to get FREE access to:
Issuer Ratings.
Ratings on over 170,000 corporate, government and structured finance securities.
Events Calendar.
Information about training seminars, briefings, and teleconferences.
Watchlists.
Listings of issuers under review for rating changes.
Rating Methodologies.
Descriptive frameworks underlying Moody's ratings.

 

Register Now

















Wachovia Asset Securitization Issuance II, LLC 2007-HE1 Trust

Moody's Org ID:720107101







Moody's Org ID:720107101

Market Segment:Structured Finance > Residential MBS > Second Liens...>> > HELOC <<







Please Log In to view this content.



















                                    Research



                                    Ratings



                                    Related Parties







                            Go to RMBS Industry Page
                        









    Deal Research


    Industry Research


    Performance


    Related Parties Research


    Methodology






Results 
        1 - 5
Of 
        5


 
        Page 
        
        1
Of 
        1 
        






                Filter By:
            


Document Type - All
Announcement
Rating Action


Source - All
Moody's Investors Service







Date
    
    



Document Type
    



                        Title
                    

                        Source
                    




                    01 Sep 2011
                

                    Announcement
                













                                    Moody's: No Negative Ratings Impact From Addition of Cash Reserve in RMBS Deals





                    Moody's Investors Service
                



                    01 Jul 2010
                

                    Rating Action
                













                                    Moody's takes action on $3.7 bn of Second Lien RMBS issued by WASI





                    Moody's Investors Service
                



                    18 Mar 2010
                

                    Rating Action
                













                                    Moody's updates loss projections for US second lien RMBS





                    Moody's Investors Service
                



                    17 Nov 2008
                

                    Rating Action
                













                                    Moody's takes rating actions on structured finance bonds insured by Ambac Assurance Corporation





                    Moody's Investors Service
                



                    17 Apr 2007
                

                    Rating Action
                













                                    Moody's Rates WASI II 2007-HE1 HELOC Deal





                    Moody's Investors Service
                





Results 
        1 - 5
Of 
        5


 
        Page 
        
        1
Of 
        1 
        
















                6The rating history for this credit rating accurately reflects the current status of the (sf) indicator but, due to technical limitations, does not accurately reflect the (sf) indicator history. Please visit the Research tab to view the press release(s) announcing when the (sf) indicator was added or removed.


For credit ratings that are derived exclusively from an existing credit rating of a program, series, category/class of debt, support provider or primary rated entity, or that replace a previously assigned provisional rating at the same rating level, Moody’s publishes a rating announcement on that series, category/class of debt or program as a whole, on the support provider or primary rated entity, or on the provisional rating, but often does not publish a specific rating announcement on each subsequent bond or note for which the credit rating is derived from the existing credit rating. Rating announcements are usually press releases classified as Rating Actions on www.moodys.com. Please refer to the Research tab on the issuer/entity page for the rating announcement.
















Moody's Integrity Hotline
EU

001-800-506-1440
Japan

KDDI: 00-539-111 then 888-320-1668
NTT: 0034-811-001 then 888-320-1668
Outside of the EU and Japan

1-866-330-MDYS (6397)



Browse By
HomeResearch & RatingsProducts & SolutionsNews & EventsCareers


Contact Us
Help & SupportContact UsSubmit a Complaint


Terms & Conditions
Terms of UsePrivacy PolicyProprietary Rights





            © 2017 Moody's Investors Service, Inc., Moody’s Analytics, Inc. and/or their affiliates and licensors. All rights reserved.
        

           Regional Sites:
            
GlobalArgentinaAsiaAustraliaBoliviaBrazilCanadaCEEChinaCzech RepublicCISEMEAFranceGermanyIndonesiaIndiaItalyJapanKoreaMexicoMiddle EastPolandSouth AfricaSpainTurkeyTaiwanUruguay

































































































Wachovia Asset Securitization Inc 2003-he2 Trust 8-k - Form 8 K Special Events Filing - Free Search.
















 


















                 You are here: Agreements   >      > WACHOVIA ASSET SECURITIZATION INC 2003-HE2 TRUST 8-K

 
Search Documents | Browse Documents











SITE SEARCH


AGREEMENTS / CONTRACTS






Document Title:



Entire Document:(optional)



Governing Law(optional)

AllAlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareFlorida
                            GeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMaryland
                            MassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevada
                            New HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahoma
                            OregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtah
                            VermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming 






Try our advanced search >>

CLAUSES
Search Contract Clauses >>
Browse Contract Clause Library>>

















Wachovia Asset Securitization Inc 2003-he2 Trust 8-k
Form 8 K Special Events Filing



You are currently viewing:
 This  involves WACHOVIA ASSET SECURITIZATION INC 2003-HE2 TRUST. RealDealDocs™ contains millions of easily searchable legal documents and clauses from top law firms. Search for free - click here.  
                  



Title: WACHOVIA ASSET SECURITIZATION INC 2003-HE2 TRUST 8-K Date: 6/1/2010 









Preview

Edit & Save 

Related Documents 



50 of the Top 250 law firms use our Products every day










     Wachovia
Asset Securitization Issuance, LLC

Series
2003-HE2

Statement
to Securityholders

Distribution
Date: 05/25/10

Totals

Certificate

25,249,930.37

1,250,000,000.00

83,074,281.03

214,687.25

1,069,775.51

0.00

1,284,462.76

82,004,505.52

430,690.97

0.57425462

Balance

63.12482593

50,077,566.31

66.77008841

Total

Distribution

616,625.27

1.54156318

Unpaid

Principal

Amount

0.00

0.02720680

Principal

605,742.55

1.51435638

409,440.85

21,250.12

0.00

0.54592113

Interest

10,882.72

0.02833349

Distribution
Summary

750,000,000.00

Beginning

Certificate

Balance

25,855,672.92

64.63918230

Cusip

67.31600954

Original

Certificate

Balance

400,000,000.00

50,487,007.16

 

Factors
per Thousand

0.522500%

A-II-1

A-I-1

92975RAA6

92975RAB4
0.522500%

Ending

Factors
per Thousand

Certificate

Rate

Class

A-II-2

92975RAC2
1.514000%

100,000,000.00

6,731,600.95

8,209.94

54,592.11

0.00

62,802.05

6,677,008.84

Factors
per Thousand

67.31600953

0.08209940

0.54592113

0.62802053

66.77008840

Certificate

n/a

0.000000%

0.00

14,122,931.26

174,344.47

0.00

0.00

174,344.47

14,055,420.85


Wachovia
Asset Securitization Issuance, LLC

Series
2003-HE2

Statement
to Securityholders

Distribution
Date: 05/25/10

* The
Rapid Amortization Tranche does not affect the bond
distribution.

Totals

Excluded
Balance

Rapid

 

Amortization

Original

Beginning

Total

Ending

Tranche

Cusip

Rate

Balance

Balance

Payments

Draws

Losses

Distribution

Balance

Excluded*

n/a

n/a

0.00

13,710,704.29

-335,253.62

287,399.66

0.00

-47,853.96

13,662,850.33

Pool
I

Excluded*

n/a

n/a

0.00

29,886,731.80

-236,103.51

770,055.65

-1,382.00

532,570.14

30,419,301.94

Pool
II

Excluded*

n/a

n/a

0.00

43,597,436.09

-571,357.13

1,057,455.31

-1,382.00

484,716.18

44,082,152.27

Total

-1,382.00

484,716.18

44,082,152.27

0.00

43,597,436.09

-571,357.13

1,057,455.31


Wachovia
Asset Securitization Issuance, LLC

Series
2003-HE2

Statement
to Securityholders

Distribution
Date: 05/25/10

Bond
Interest Information

Type
of

Certificate

Senior/Variable

Senior/Variable

Senior/Auction

Residual

* Original
Ratings of the Offered Certificates per the Prospectus Supplement
dated June 25, 2003

Cusip

92975RAA6

92975RAB4

Period

29/360

29/360

-

-

AAA

Aaa

AAA

Aaa

AAA

Aaa

-

Moody's

11.37038%

Accrual

13.70201%

Certificate

A-I-1

A-II-1

A-II-2

Class

S &
P

Fitch

Original
Rating* Original Rating* Original Rating

-

-

29/360

n/a

n/a

n/a

92975RAC2

n/a

WAC
Rate

Class
Net

13.70201%

LIBOR/Auction

0.26250%

0.26250%

1.51400%

-


Wachovia
Asset Securitization Issuance, LLC

Series
2003-HE2

Statement
to Securityholders

Distribution
Date: 05/25/10

Bond
Interest Information

0.00

0.00

0.00

92975RAC2

8,209.94

0.00

0.00

92975RAA6

0.00

0.00

92975RAB4

21,250.12

0.00

0.00

Current

Carryforward
Paid

Current

Outstanding

Current

Cusip

Interest
Due

Interest
Carryforward Interest Carryforward

A-I-1

10,882.72

A-II-1

A-II-2

Class


Wachovia
Asset Securitization Issuance, LLC

Series
2003-HE2

Statement
to Securityholders

Distribution
Date: 05/25/10

Interest

Interest
Collected

(Additional
Balance Interest)

(Relief
Act Shortfalls)

Total
Interest Collected

Principal

 Principal Collected
Net Liquidation Proceeds
Substitute Adjustment Amount
Other Principal Collected
(Additional Balance Increase)
(Draw Amounts)

Total
Principal Collected

Additional
Funds 
 Additional Funds from the Funding Accou
Draws from the Policy
Yield Maintenance Payment

Total
Additional Funds Collected

Total
Available Collections

1,335,345.89

Collection
Activity

0.00

464,032.96

0.00
0.00

0.00
0.00

Total

178,000.33

265,570.38

0.00

Pool
I

Pool
II

605,742.55

0.00

178,000.33

464,032.96

642,033.29

87,570.05

0.00
0.00

87,570.05

0.00

0.00

0.00
0.00

693,312.60

0.00
0.00
0.00

0.00

0.00
0.00

0.00

0.00

605,742.55

0.00
0.00
0.00
0.00

1,069,775.51

0.00
0.00
0.00

0.00

1,069,775.51

0.00
0.00

0.00
0.00

265,570.38


Wachovia
Asset Securitization Issuance, LLC

Series
2003-HE2

Statement
to Securityholders

Distribution
Date: 05/25/10

Beginning
Collateral Balance
Ending Collateral Balance
Current Liquidation Loss Amounts
Cumulative Liquidation Loss Amounts
Gross WAC
WAM
AGE
Gross CPR
Net CPR
Draw Rate

Collateral
Balance
Number of Loans
Gross WAC
WAM

Overcollateralization
Target Amount
Beginning Overcollateralization Amount
Ending Overcollateralization Amount
Overcollateralization Increase
Overcollateralization Decrease

67,510.41

14,122,931.26

14,055,420.85

0.00

67,510.41

8,819,217.17

8,751,706.76

4.276%

231

5,303,714.09

9,295,153.62

2,892,98


 








 















WACHOVIA ASSET SECURITIZATION ISSUANCE II, LLC Top Holdings  

































WhaleWisdom









Search All
Search 13F Filers Only
Search SEC Filer
Search Stocks Only
Search Mgmt Inv. Cos Only
ETFs Only
Search Active




















                      WACHOVIA ASSET SECURITIZATION ISSUANCE II, LLC
                    

•   CHARLOTTE, NC
                      
How do I update this listing?




                                             Wachovia Asset Securitization Issuance II is based out of Charlotte.   
                                           














Summary
13D/G
Insider (Form 4)



   Create Email Alert
 




×
Email Notification.







                   ***Log In or
                   Sign-up
                   to see more advanced email alert options such as selecting any type of
                   SEC form, multiple filers or classes of filers, and much more.***
                 

                    ...or to simply have an email sent to you whenever we receive a new
                           13F filing from WACHOVIA ASSET SECURITIZATION ISSUANCE II, LLC, enter your
                    email address below and choose 'Submit'.
                

Your email:








Cancel














Contact Info




wachovia asset securitization issuance ii, llc


301 S COLLEGE STREET, SUITE G

CHARLOTTE
NC
                                                        
                                                    28288-5578


                                                      Business Phone:
                                                      612-667-0161







Recent SEC Filings




ABS-15G filed on 05/12/2017
ABS-15G filed on 02/13/2017
ABS-15G filed on 11/14/2016
ABS-15G filed on 08/12/2016
ABS-15G filed on 05/13/2016
ABS-15G filed on 02/12/2016
ABS-15G filed on 11/13/2015
ABS-15G filed on 08/13/2015
ABS-15G filed on 05/14/2015
ABS-15G filed on 02/13/2015
















Schedule 13D and 13G events since 03/31/2017

Subscription required



 
Form 4 - Non-derivative Insider Transactions Since 03/31/2017
Loading...








Elevate your investments
Try it for free

















